<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080311064852.txt.gz
TIME:20080311064852
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01   Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 11, 2008, Aetna Inc. issued a press release, furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference, r
eaffirming its first quarter and full-year 2008 financial guidance.
 
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
_______________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________
News Release
that it is reaffirming its guidance for full-year 2008 operating earnings per share to be $4.00, with medical membership growth of 800,000 to 850,000 and a Commercial Medical Benefit Ratio of less than 80 percent.  The company expects first-quarter operating earnings per share to be $0.92.
HARTFORD, Conn., March 11, 2008
 Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced
(1)
As previously announced, the company will hold its Investor Conference in New York City on March 14.
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.7 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. www.aetna.com
Aetna/2
 
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION; CAUTIONARY STATEMENT -- Certain information in this press release is forward looking, including our projections as to operating earnings, medical membership growth and commercial medical benefit ratio. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to significant competition, reputational issues or other factors in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increased pharmacy costs, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; as well as changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends); and the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance. Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to:  the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs; the ability to successfully implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; reduced levels of investment income from low interest rates; adverse government regulation (including legislative proposals eliminating or reducing ERISA pre-emption of state laws that would increase potential litigation exposure, legislative proposals that would limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, and other proposals, such as patients' rights legislation, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse pricing actions by government payors; changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership in key markets; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission .  You also should read Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080401161609.txt.gz
TIME:20080401161609
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On March 27, 2008, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) entered into an amended and restated unsecured $1.5 billion, five-year revolving credit agreement (the New Credit Agreement) with JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (JPMCB), as administrative agent, and the 21 lender parties thereto led by JPMCB, Bank of America, N.A., and Citibank N.A.  The New Credit Agreement amends, restates and supersedes Aetnas $1.0 billion five-year revolving credit agreement, dated as of January 20, 2006 (as previously amended and extended), among Aetna, JPMCB, as administrative agent, and the 20 lender parties thereto (the Prior Credit Agreement).  The Prior Credit Agreement was Exhibit 99.1 to Aetnas Form 8-K filed on January 23, 2006 and was scheduled to expire on January 20, 2012.
The New Credit Agreement is summarized in Item 2.03 of this report, which is incorporated by reference into this Item 1.01.
The administrative agent and certain of the lender parties to the New Credit Agreement perform normal banking, investment banking and/or advisory services for Aetna and its affiliates from time to time for which they have received customary fees and expenses.
A copy of the New Credit Agreement is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The New Credit Agreement provides for the granting of revolving loans and the issuance of letters of credit at Aetnas request, up to a maximum aggregate amount outstanding of $1.5 billion.  Aetna has the option to expand the lenders aggregate commitments under the New Credit Agreement to a maximum of $2.0 billion, subject to certain conditions precedent.  The maximum aggregate amount of outstanding letters of credit under the New Credit Agreement is limited to $200 million.  Outstanding letters of credit count as usage of the available commitments under the New Credit Agreement.
The New Credit Agreement expires March 27, 2013; however that expiration date may be extended by one year on each March 27 for the commitments under the New Credit Agreement represented by lenders consenting to such extension, subject to certain conditions precedent.  Various interest rate options are available under the New Credit Agreement.  Any revolving borrowings mature on the termination date of the New Credit Agreement.  Aetna pays facility fees on the lenders aggregate commitments under the facility ranging from 0.045% to 0.175% per annum, depending on Aetnas long-term senior unsecured debt rating.  The facility fee at March 27, 2008 is at an annual rate of 0.06%.
The New Credit Agreement contains customary representations, warranties and covenants, including a financial covenant, for a transaction of this type.  Under the terms of the New Credit Agreement, Aetna is required to maintain its ratio of total debt to adjusted consolidated capitalization as of the end of each fiscal quarter ending on or after December 31, 2007 at or below 0.50 to 1.00.  For this purpose, adjusted consolidated capitalization means the sum of Aetnas consolidated shareholders equity, excluding any adjustment recorded to reflect the overfunded or underfunded status of Aetnas defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans in accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 158, and any net unrealized capital gains and losses, plus total debt.
Employers Accounting for Defined Benefit Pension and Other Postretirement Plans, an amendment of FASB Statements No. 87, 88, 106 and 132(R),
The New Credit Agreement also contains customary events of default, including a cross default provision and a change of control provision.  If an event of default occurs that is not otherwise waived or cured, lenders holding a specified percentage of the commitments or outstanding loans may terminate the obligations of the lenders to make loans under the New Credit Agreement and the obligations of the issuing banks to issue letters of credit and/or may declare the loans outstanding under the New Credit Agreement to be due and payable.  Such termination and acceleration will occur automatically in the event of a bankruptcy default.
The foregoing summary of the New Credit Agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the New Credit Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.  You are encouraged to read the New Credit Agreement.
 
 
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
99.1           $1,500,000,000 Amended and Restated Five-Year Credit Agreement Dated as of March 27, 2008.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
i
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 The Table of Contents is not a part of this Agreement.
*
 
 
 
 
ii
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
iii
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
iv
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
AMENDED AND RESTATED FIVE-YEAR CREDIT
AGREEMENT dated as of March 27, 2008 among AETNA INC.,
the LENDERS listed on the signature pages hereof, and
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
 
The parties hereto agree that the Existing Credit Agreement (as defined in Article I) shall be, upon effectiveness of this Agreement in accordance with Section 3.01 hereof, amended and restated to read in its entirety as follows:
 
 
 
SECTION 1.01.
 
  The following terms, as used herein, have the following meanings:
Definitions.
 
 means a solicitation of Money Market Quotes setting forth Money Market Absolute Rates pursuant to Section 2.03.
Absolute Rate Auction
 
 means, as of any date, the sum of (i) Total Debt as of such date and (ii) Adjusted Consolidated Net Worth as of such date.
Adjusted Consolidated Capitalization
 
 means at any date, the total consolidated shareholders equity of the Borrower determined as of such date in accordance with GAAP, adjusted to exclude (i) any adjustment recorded to reflect the overfunded or underfunded status of the Borrowers defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans in accordance with SFAS 158 and (ii) any net unrealized capital gains and losses.
Adjusted Consolidated Net Worth
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the administrative questionnaire in the form submitted to such Lender by the Agent and submitted to the Agent (with a copy to the Borrower) duly completed by such Lender.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder, and its successors in such capacity.
Agent
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, (i) in the case of its Base Rate Loans, its Domestic Lending Office, (ii) in the case of its Euro-Dollar Loans, its Euro-Dollar Lending Office and (iii) in the case of its Money Market Loans, its Money Market Lending Office.
Applicable Lending Office
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lenders Commitment.  If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentage shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
Applicable Percentage
 
2
 
 
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.05), and accepted by the Agent, in the form of Exhibit F or any other form approved by the Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.08.
Augmenting Lender
 
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the higher of (i) the Prime Rate for such day and (ii) the sum of 1/2 of 1% plus the Federal Funds Rate for such day.
Base Rate
 
 means (i) a Committed Loan which bears interest at the Base Rate pursuant to the applicable Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Interest Rate Election or the provisions of Article VIII or (ii) an overdue amount which was a Base Rate Loan immediately before it became overdue.
Base Rate Loan
 
 means Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation, and its successors.
Borrower
 
 means a borrowing hereunder consisting of Loans made to the Borrower at the same time by the Lenders pursuant to Article II.  A Borrowing is a Base Rate Borrowing if such Loans are Base Rate Loans, a Euro-Dollar Borrowing if such Loans are Euro-Dollar Loans and a Money Market Borrowing if such Loans are Money Market Loans.
Borrowing
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the amount set forth opposite the name of such Lender on Schedule 2.01 hereto, as such amount may be terminated or reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.07, increased pursuant to Section 2.08, terminated pursuant to Section 8.07 or changed pursuant to Section 9.05.
Commitment
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.08(b).
Commitment Increase
 
 means a loan made by a Lender pursuant to Section 2.01; that, if any such loan or loans (or portions thereof) are combined or subdivided pursuant to a Notice of Interest Rate Election, the term Committed Loan shall refer to the combined principal amount resulting from such combination or to each of the separate principal amounts resulting from such subdivision, as the case may be.
Committed Loan
provided
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(c).
Consenting Lender
 
 means, at any date, any Subsidiary or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the Borrower in its consolidated financial statements in accordance with GAAP if such statements were prepared as of such date.
Consolidated Subsidiary
 
 means, at any time, a director who (i) was a director of the Borrower on the Effective Date or (ii) was nominated or elected as a
Continuing Director
 
 
 
3
 
director by vote of a majority of the persons who were Continuing Directors at the time of such nomination or election.
 
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.   and  have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(c).
Declining Lender
 
 means any condition or event which constitutes an Event of Default or which with the giving of notice or lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means (a) the Confidential Information Memorandum dated March 2008 previously delivered to the Lenders; (b) the Borrowers Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the period ended December 31, 2007; and (c)  the Borrowers Current Reports on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on or before March 3, 2008.
Disclosure Documents
 
 and the sign  mean lawful currency of the United States of America.
Dollars
$
 
 means any day except a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized by law to close.
Domestic Business Day
 
 means, as to each Lender, its office located at its address set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire (or identified in its Administrative Questionnaire as its Domestic Lending Office) or such other office as such Lender may hereafter designate as its Domestic Lending Office by notice to the Borrower and the Agent.
Domestic Lending Office
 
 means the date this Agreement becomes effective in accordance with Section 3.01.
Effective Date
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
ERISA
 
 means all members of a controlled group of corporations and all trades or businesses (whether or not incorporated) under common control which, together with the Borrower, are treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code.
ERISA Group
 
 means any Domestic Business Day on which commercial banks are open for international business (including dealings in dollar deposits) in London.
Euro-Dollar Business Day
 
4
 
 
 
 means, as to each Lender, its office, branch or Affiliate located at its address set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire (or
Euro-Dollar Lending Office
identified in its Administrative Questionnaire as its Euro-Dollar Lending Office) or such other office, branch or Affiliate of such Lender as it may hereafter designate as its Euro-Dollar Lending Office by notice to the Borrower and the Agent.
 
 means (i) a Committed Loan which bears interest at a Euro-Dollar Rate pursuant to the applicable Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Interest Rate Election or (ii) an overdue amount which was a Euro-Dollar Loan immediately before it became overdue.
Euro-Dollar Loan
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.09(b).
Euro-Dollar Margin
 
 means a rate of interest determined pursuant to Section 2.09(b) on the basis of the London Interbank Offered Rate.
Euro-Dollar Rate
 
 means, for any day, that percentage (expressed as a decimal) which is in effect on such day, as prescribed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor), for determining the maximum reserve requirement for a member bank of the Federal Reserve System in New York City with deposits exceeding five billion dollars in respect of Eurocurrency liabilities (or in respect of any other category of liabilities which includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Euro-Dollar Loans is determined or any category of extensions of credit or other assets which includes loans by a non-United States office of any Lender to United States residents).
Euro-Dollar Reserve Percentage
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 6.01.
Event of Default
 
 means the $1,000,000,000 Amended and Restated Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of January 20, 2006 (as further amended from time to time), among the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
Existing Credit Agreement
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(c).
Existing Maturity Date
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(c).
Extension Date
 
 means, for any day, the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100th of 1%) equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Domestic Business Day next succeeding such day; that (i) if such day is not a Domestic Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Domestic Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Domestic Business Day, and (ii) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Domestic Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate quoted to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. on
Federal Funds Rate
provided
 
5
 
 
 
such day on such transactions as calculated by the Agent, such calculation to be supplied to the Borrower upon the Borrowers request.
 
 means Fitch, Inc.
Fitch
 
 means Euro-Dollar Loans or Money Market Loans (excluding Money Market LIBOR Loans bearing interest at the Base Rate for the reason stated in Section 8.01) or any combination of the foregoing.
Fixed Rate Loans
 
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
 
 or  means at any time a group of Loans consisting of (i) all Committed Loans which are Base Rate Loans at such time or (ii) all Committed Loans which are Euro-Dollar Loans having the same Interest Period at such time; that, if Committed Loans of any particular Lender are converted to or made as Base Rate Loans pursuant to Article VIII, such Loans shall be included in the same Group or Groups of Loans from time to time as they would have been in if they had not been so converted or made.
Group of Loans
Group
provided
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness of any other Person (the ) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness of the payment thereof, including pursuant to any synthetic lease arrangement, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness; that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
 of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding current accounts payable and accrued obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all obligations of such Person as an account party to reimburse amounts drawn under any letter of credit or letter of guaranty that
Indebtedness
 
 
 
 
6
constituted Indebtedness of such Person under clause (f) above prior to drawing thereunder and (h) all obligations of such Person in respect of leases required to be accounted for as capital leases under GAAP.
 
 means:
Interest Period
 
(a)
 
with respect to each Base Rate Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the next succeeding Quarterly Date; that any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date;
provided
 
(b)
 
with respect to each Euro-Dollar Loan, a period commencing on the date of Borrowing specified in the applicable Notice of Committed Borrowing or on the date specified in the applicable Notice of Interest Rate Election and ending one, two, three or six months thereafter, as the Borrower may elect in the applicable Notice or such longer period as mutually agreed to by the Borrower and all of the Lenders; that:
provided
 
(i)
 
any Interest Period which would otherwise end on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day shall, subject to clause (b)(iii) below, be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day;
 
(ii)
 
any Interest Period which begins on the last Euro-Dollar Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall, subject to clause (b)(iii) below, end on the last Euro-Dollar Business Day of a calendar month; and
 
(iii)
 
any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date.
 
(c)
 
with respect to each Money Market LIBOR Loan, the period commencing on the date of Borrowing and ending such whole number of months thereafter as the Borrower may elect in accordance with Section 2.03; that:
provided
 
(i)
 
any Interest Period which would otherwise end on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day shall, subject to clause (c)(iii) below, be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day;
 
(ii)
 
any Interest Period which begins on the last Euro-Dollar Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall, subject to clause (c)(iii) below, end on the last Euro-Dollar Business Day of a calendar month; and
 
(iii)
 
any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date;
7
(d)
 
with respect to each Money Market Absolute Rate Loan, the period commencing on the date of Borrowing and ending such number of days thereafter (but not less than seven days) as the Borrower may elect in accordance with Section 2.03; that:
provided
 
(i)
 
any Interest Period which would otherwise end on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day shall, subject to clause (d)(ii) below, be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day; and
 
(ii)
 
any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date.
 
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or any successor statute.
Internal Revenue Code
 
 means an invitation from the Agent to the Lenders to submit Money Market Quotes pursuant to Section 2.03(c).
Invitation for Money Market Quotes
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and each other Person that shall have become an Issuing Bank hereunder as provided in Section 2.17(j), each in its capacity as an issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder.  Each Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term Issuing Bank shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.17(j).
Issuing Bank Agreement
 
 means, as to each Issuing Bank, the commitment of such Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit pursuant to Section 2.17.
LC Commitment
 
 means a payment made by an Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
 
 means, at any time, the sum of (i) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (ii) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time.  The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
 
 means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 who are parties to this Agreement and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to Sections 2.06(c) or 2.08 or pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that shall have ceased to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or whose Commitment shall have been terminated pursuant to Section 2.06(c) as a result of being a Declining Lender.
Lender
8
 
 
 means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
 
 means any period during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings:  (i) A+ by S&P and/or (ii) A1 by Moodys and/or (iii) A+ by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level I Period
provided
 
 means any period (other than a Level I Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings:  (i) A by S&P and/or (ii) A2 by Moodys and/or (iii) A by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level II Period
provided
 
 means any period (other than a Level I Period or a Level II Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) A- by S&P and/or (ii) A3 by Moodys and/or (iii) A- by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level III Period
provided
 
 means any period (other than a Level I Period, Level II Period or Level III Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings which are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) BBB+ by S&P and/or (ii) Baa1 by Moodys and/or (iii) BBB+ by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level IV Period
provided
 
 means any period (other than a Level I Period, Level II Period, Level III Period or Level IV Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings which are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) BBB by S&P and/or (ii) Baa2 by Moodys and/or (iii) BBB by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level V Period
provided
 
 means any period (other than a Level I Period, Level II Period, Level III Period, Level IV Period or Level V Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings which are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) BBB- by S&P and/or (ii) Baa3 by Moodys and/or (iii) BBB- by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating
Level VI Period
provided
 
 
 
9
 
system after the date hereof, the new rating of such agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
 
 means any period other than a Level I Period, Level II Period, Level III Period, Level IV Period, Level V Period or Level VI Period.
Level VII Period
 
 means, as of any date, the ratio of (a) Total Debt as of such date to (b) Adjusted Consolidated Capitalization as of such date.
Leverage Ratio
 
 means a solicitation of Money Market Quotes setting forth Money Market Margins based on the London Interbank Offered Rate pursuant to Section 2.03.
LIBOR Auction
 
 means, with respect to any asset, any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset.
Lien
 
 means a Base Rate Loan, a Euro-Dollar Loan or a Money Market Loan and Loans means any combination of the foregoing.
Loan
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.09(b).
London Interbank Offered Rate
 
 means a Consolidated Subsidiary of the Borrower that, as of the time of determination of whether such Consolidated Subsidiary is a Material Subsidiary, accounted on a consolidated basis for 10% or more of the total assets of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries (i) as of December 31, 2007, and, thereafter, (ii) as of the most recent date for which a consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower has been delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b); that, for purposes of Article VI, if any event or combination of events described in Sections 6.01(g) and 6.01(h) occur with respect to any one or more Consolidated Subsidiaries that are not Material Subsidiaries but in the aggregate would constitute a Material Subsidiary if such Consolidated Subsidiaries constituted a single Consolidated Subsidiary, then such Consolidated Subsidiaries shall be deemed collectively to constitute a Material Subsidiary for purposes of such Sections.
Material Subsidiary
provided
 
 means March 27, 2013, as such date may be extended pursuant to Section 2.06(c), or, if such day is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, the next preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day.
Maturity Date
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.03(d).
Money Market Absolute Rate
 
 means a loan made or to be made by a Lender pursuant to an Absolute Rate Auction.
Money Market Absolute Rate Loan
 
 means, as to each Lender, its Domestic Lending Office or such other office or branch of such Lender as it may hereafter designate as its Money Market Lending Office by notice to the Borrower and the Agent;
Money Market Lending Office
 
10
 
 
 
that any Lender may from time to time by notice to the Borrower and the Agent designate separate Money Market Lending Offices for its Money Market LIBOR Loans, on the one hand, and its Money Market Absolute Rate Loans, on the other hand, in which case all references herein to the Money Market Lending Office of such Lender shall be deemed to refer to either or both of such offices, as the context may require.
provided
 
 means a loan made or to be made by a Lender pursuant to a LIBOR Auction (including such a loan bearing interest at the Base Rate for the reason stated in Section 8.01).
Money Market LIBOR Loan
 
 means a Money Market LIBOR Loan or a Money Market Absolute Rate Loan.
Money Market Loan
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.03(d).
Money Market Margin
 
 means an offer by a Lender to make a Money Market Loan in accordance with Section 2.03.
Money Market Quote
 
 means a request by the Borrower to the Lenders to make Money Market Loans in accordance with Section 2.03(b).
Money Market Quote Request
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 means promissory notes of the Borrower, substantially in the form of Exhibit A hereto, evidencing the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans, and Note means any one of such promissory notes issued hereunder.
Notes
 
 means a Notice of Committed Borrowing (as defined in Section 2.02) or a Notice of Money Market Borrowing (as defined in Section 2.03(f)).
Notice of Borrowing
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.11.
Notice of Interest Rate Election
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.04(a).
Other Taxes
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.05(e).
Participant
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation or any entity succeeding to any or all of its functions under ERISA.
PBGC
 
 means an individual, a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, an association, a trust or any other entity or organization, including a government or political subdivision or an agency or instrumentality thereof.
Person
 
 means at any time an employee pension benefit plan which is covered by Title IV of ERISA or subject to the minimum funding standards under Section 412 of the Internal Revenue Code and is either (i) maintained by a member of the
Plan
 
11
 
 
 
ERISA Group for employees of a member of the ERISA Group or (ii) maintained pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or any other arrangement under which more than one employer makes contributions and to which a member of the ERISA Group is then making or accruing an obligation to make contributions or has within the preceding five plan years made contributions.
 
 means the rate of interest publicly announced by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in New York City from time to time as its Prime Rate.
Prime Rate
 
 means the last Domestic Business Day of each March, June, September and December.
Quarterly Date
 
 means Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, as in effect from time to time.
Regulation U
 
 means any reportable event as defined in Section 4043(c) of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder (other than a Reportable Event as to which the 30-day notice requirement has been waived by applicable regulation) with respect to a Plan (other than a Plan maintained by a member of an applicable ERISA Group that is considered a member of such ERISA Group only pursuant to subsection (m) or (o) of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code).
Reportable Event
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.06(c).
Request Date
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.03(b).
Required Capital
 
 means at any time Lenders having at least 51% of the aggregate amount of the outstanding Loans, LC Exposure and unused Commitments.
Required Lenders
 
 means chief financial officer, treasurer, chief accounting officer or senior corporate finance officer.
Responsible Financial Officer
 
 means the period from the Effective Date to and including the Maturity Date.
Revolving Credit Period
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
 means indebtedness for borrowed money that is not subordinated to any other indebtedness for borrowed money and is not secured or supported by a guarantee, letter of credit or other form of credit enhancement.
Senior Unsecured Debt
 
 means  Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 158, , issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board of the Financial Accounting Foundation in September 2006, as amended by subsequent pronouncements, if applicable.
SFAS 158
Employers Accounting for Defined Benefit Pension and Other Postretirement Plans, an amendment of FASB Statements No. 87, 88, 106 and 132(R)
 
12
 
 means any corporation or other entity of which securities or other ownership interests having ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or other persons performing similar functions are at the time directly or indirectly owned by the Borrower.
Subsidiary
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.04(a).
Taxes
 
 means, as of any date, the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries as of such date (whether or not such Indebtedness would be reflected on a consolidated balance sheet prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP), determined on a consolidated basis.
Total Debt
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.03(c).
Trigger Event
 
 means the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001.
USA Patriot Act
 
 means at any date the percentage equivalent of a fraction (a) the numerator of which is the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans (including Money Market Loans) and the total LC Exposure at such date, and (b) the denominator of which is the aggregate amount of the Commitments at such date, after giving effect to any reduction or increase in the Commitments on such date.
Usage
 
SECTION 1.02.
 
  Unless otherwise specified herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted, all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made and all financial statements required to be delivered hereunder shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP as in effect from time to time, applied on a basis consistent (except for changes concurred in by the Borrowers independent public accountants) with the most recent audited consolidated financial statements of the Borrower delivered to the Lenders; that, if the Borrower notifies the Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in  GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change in GAAP shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith.
Accounting Terms and Determinations.
provided
 
SECTION 1.03.
 
  Borrowings are classified for purposes of this Agreement either by reference to the pricing of Loans comprising such Borrowing (, a Euro-Dollar Borrowing is a Borrowing comprised of Euro-Dollar Loans) or by reference to the provisions of Article II under which participation therein is determined (, a Committed Borrowing is a Borrowing under Section 2.01 in which all Lenders participate in proportion to their Commitments, while a
Classifications of Borrowings.
e.g.
i.e.
 
 
 
13
 
Money Market Borrowing is a Borrowing under Section 2.03 in which the Lender participants are determined on the basis of their bids).
 
 
 
SECTION 2.01.
 
  On the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, each Lender severally agrees to lend to the Borrower, from time to time during the Revolving Credit Period, amounts not to exceed in the aggregate at any one time outstanding (together with its LC Exposure) the amount of such Lenders Commitment.  Each Borrowing under this Section 2.01 shall be in an aggregate principal amount of $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000 (except that any such Borrowing may be in the aggregate amount of the unused Commitments or any lesser aggregate amount required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.17(e)) and shall be made from the several Lenders ratably in proportion to their respective Commitments.  Within the foregoing limits, the Borrower may borrow under this Section, repay, or to the extent permitted by Section 2.12, prepay Loans and reborrow at any time during the Revolving Credit Period under this Section.  Failure by any Lender to make Loans as required under the terms of this Agreement will not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Money Market Loans made by a Lender shall be deemed Usage of the total Commitments for the purpose of availability, but shall not reduce such Lenders obligation to lend its pro rata share of the total Commitments.
Commitments to Lend.
 
SECTION 2.02.
 
  The Borrower shall give the Agent notice (a ) not later than 10:30 A.M. (New York City time) on (x) the date of each Base Rate Borrowing and (y) the third Euro-Dollar Business Day before each Euro-Dollar Borrowing, specifying:
Notice of Committed Borrowings.
Notice of Committed Borrowing
 
(a)
 
the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Domestic Business Day in the case of a Base Rate Borrowing and a Euro-Dollar Business Day in the case of a Euro-Dollar Borrowing,
 
(b)
 
the aggregate amount of such Borrowing,
 
(c)
 
whether the Loans comprising such Borrowing are to be Base Rate Loans or Euro-Dollar Loans, and
 
(d)
 
in the case of a Euro-Dollar Borrowing, the duration of the initial Interest Period applicable thereto, subject to the provisions of the definition of Interest Period.
 
SECTION 2.03.
 
  (a)    In addition to Committed Loans pursuant to Section 2.01, the Borrower may, as set forth in this Section, request the Lenders from time to time during the Revolving Credit Period to make offers to make Money Market Loans to the Borrower.  The Lenders may, but shall have no obligation to, make such offers and the Borrower may,
Money Market Borrowings.
The Money Market Option.
 
14
 
 
 
but shall have no obligation to, accept any such offers in the manner set forth in this Section.
 
(b)
 
  When the Borrower wishes to request offers to make Money Market Loans under this Section, it shall transmit to the Agent by facsimile transmission a Money Market Quote Request substantially in the form of Exhibit B hereto so as to be received no later than 10:00 A.M. (New York City time) on (x) the fourth Euro-Dollar Business Day prior to the date of Borrowing proposed therein, in the case of a LIBOR Auction or (y) the Domestic Business Day next preceding the date of Borrowing proposed therein, in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction (or, in either case, such other time or date as the Borrower and the Agent shall have mutually agreed upon and shall have notified to the Lenders not later than the date of the Money Market Quote Request for the first LIBOR Auction or Absolute Rate Auction for which such change is to be effective) specifying:
Money Market Quote Request.
 
(i)
 
the proposed date of Borrowing, which shall be a Euro-Dollar Business Day in the case of a LIBOR Auction or a Domestic Business Day in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction,
 
(ii)
 
the aggregate amount of such Borrowing, which shall be $15,000,000 or a larger multiple of $1,000,000,
 
(iii)
 
the duration of the Interest Period applicable thereto, subject to the provisions of the definition of Interest Period, and
 
(iv)
 
whether the Money Market Quotes requested are to set forth a Money Market Margin or a Money Market Absolute Rate.
 
The Borrower may request offers to make Money Market Loans for more than one Interest Period in a single Money Market Quote Request.  No Money Market Quote Request shall be given within five Euro-Dollar Business Days (or following notice to each of the Lenders, such other number of days as the Borrower and the Agent may agree upon) of any other Money Market Quote Request.
 
(c)
 
  Promptly upon receipt of a Money Market Quote Request, the Agent shall send to the Lenders by facsimile transmission an Invitation for Money Market Quotes substantially in the form of Exhibit C hereto, which shall constitute an invitation by the Borrower to each Lender to submit Money Market Quotes offering to make the Money Market Loans to which such Money Market Quote Request relates in accordance with this Section.
Invitation for Money Market Quotes.
 
(d)
 
  (i) Each Lender may submit a Money Market Quote containing an offer or offers to make Money Market Loans in response to any Invitation for Money Market Quotes.  Each Money Market Quote must comply with the requirements of this Section 2.03(d) and must be submitted to the Agent by facsimile transmission at its offices specified in or pursuant to Section 9.01 not later than (x) 9:30 A.M. (New York City time) on the third Euro-Dollar Business Day prior to the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of a LIBOR Auction, or (y) 9:30
Submission and Contents of Money Market Quotes.
 
15
 
 
 
A.M. (New York City time) on the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction (or, in either case, such other time or date as the Borrower and the Agent shall have mutually agreed and shall have notified to the Lenders not later than the date of the Money Market Quote Request for the first LIBOR Auction or Absolute Rate Auction for which such change is to be effective); that Money Market Quotes submitted by the Agent (or any Affiliate of the Agent) in the capacity of a Lender may be submitted, and may only be submitted, if the Agent or such Affiliate notifies the Borrower of the terms of the offer or offers contained therein not later than (x) 9:15 A.M. (New York City time) on the third Euro-Dollar Business Day prior to the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of a LIBOR Auction or (y) 9:15 A.M. (New York City time) on the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction.  Subject to Articles III and VI, any Money Market Quote so made shall be irrevocable except with the written consent of the Agent given on the instructions of the Borrower.
provided
 
(ii)
 
Each Money Market Quote shall be in substantially the form of Exhibit D hereto and shall in any case specify:
 
(A)
 
the proposed date of Borrowing,
 
(B)
 
the principal amount of the Money Market Loan for which each such offer is being made, which principal amount (x) may be greater than or less than the Commitment of the quoting Lender, (y) must be $15,000,000 or a larger multiple of $1,000,000 and (z) may not exceed the principal amount of Money Market Loans for which offers were requested,
 
(C)
 
in the case of a LIBOR Auction, the margin above or below the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate (the ) offered for each such Money Market Loan, expressed as a percentage (rounded to the nearest 1/10,000th of 1%) to be added to or subtracted from such base rate,
Money Market Margin
 
(D)
 
in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction, the rate of interest per annum (rounded to the nearest 1/10,000th of 1%) (the ) offered for each such Money Market Loan, and
Money Market Absolute Rate
 
(E)
 
the identity of the quoting Lender.
 
A Money Market Quote may set forth up to five separate offers by the quoting Lender with respect to each Interest Period specified in the related Invitation for Money Market Quotes.
 
(iii)
 
Any Money Market Quote shall be disregarded if it:
 
(A)
 
is not substantially in conformity with Exhibit D hereto or does not specify all of the information required by Section 2.03(d)(ii);
 
(B)
 
contains qualifying, conditional or similar language;
 
16
 
 
 
 
(C)
 
proposes terms other than or in addition to those set forth in the applicable Invitation for Money Market Quotes; or
 
(D)
 
arrives after the time set forth in Section 2.03(d)(i).
 
(e)
 
  The Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower of the terms (x) of any Money Market Quote submitted by a Lender that is in accordance with Section 2.03(d) and (y) of any Money Market Quote that amends, modifies or is otherwise inconsistent with a previous Money Market Quote submitted by such Lender with respect to the same Money Market Quote Request.  Any such subsequent Money Market Quote shall be disregarded by the Agent unless such subsequent Money Market Quote is submitted solely to correct a manifest error in such former Money Market Quote.  The Agents notice to the Borrower shall specify (A) the aggregate principal amount of Money Market Loans for which offers have been received for each Interest Period specified in the related Money Market Quote Request, (B) the respective principal amounts and Money Market Margins or Money Market Absolute Rates, as the case may be, so offered (including the names of the Lenders) and (C) if applicable, limitations on the aggregate principal amount of Money Market Loans for which offers in any single Money Market Quote for any Interest Period may be accepted.
Notice to Borrower.
 
(f)
 
  Not later than 10:30 A.M. (New York City time) on (x) the third Euro-Dollar Business Day prior to the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of a LIBOR Auction or (y) the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction (or, in either case, such other time or date as the Borrower and the Agent shall have mutually agreed upon and shall have notified to the Lenders not later than the date of the Money Market Quote Request for the first LIBOR Auction or Absolute Rate Auction for which such change is to be effective), the Borrower shall notify the Agent of its acceptance or non-acceptance of the offers so notified to it pursuant to Section 2.03(e).  In the case of acceptance, such notice (a ) shall specify the aggregate principal amount of offers for each Interest Period that are accepted.  The Borrower may accept any Money Market Quote for any Interest Period in whole or in part; that:
Acceptance and Notice by Borrower.
Notice of Money Market Borrowing
provided
 
(i)
 
the aggregate principal amount of each Money Market Borrowing may not exceed the applicable amount set forth in the related Money Market Quote Request,
 
(ii)
 
the principal amount of each Money Market Borrowing must be $15,000,000 or a larger multiple of $1,000,000,
 
(iii)
 
acceptance of offers may only be made on the basis of ascending Money Market Margins or Money Market Absolute Rates, as the case may be, and
 
(iv)
 
the Borrower may not accept any offer that is described in Section 2.03(d)(iii) or that otherwise fails to comply with the requirements of this Agreement.
 
17
 
 
 
(g)
 
  If offers are made by two or more Lenders with the same Money Market Margins or Money Market Absolute Rates, as the case may be, for a greater aggregate principal amount than the amount in respect of which such offers are accepted for the related Interest Period, the principal amount of Money Market Loans in respect of which such offers are accepted shall be allocated by the Agent among such Lenders as nearly as possible (in multiples of such number, not greater than $1,000,000 as the Agent may deem appropriate) in proportion to the aggregate principal amounts of such offers.  Determinations by the Agent of the pro rata amounts of Money Market Loans shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error.
Allocation by Agent.
 
(h)
 
  If the Maturity Date shall have been extended pursuant to Section 2.06(c), no Money Market Borrowing shall be requested or made hereunder if, after giving effect thereto, the sum of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit expiring after any Existing Maturity Date and the aggregate principal amount of all Money Market Loans maturing after such Existing Maturity Date would exceed the aggregate Commitments that have been extended to a date after the latest expiration date of such Letters of Credit and the latest maturity of such Money Market Loans.
Certain Conditions.
 
SECTION 2.04.
 
  (a)  Upon receipt of a Notice of Borrowing, the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and of such Lenders share (if any) of such Borrowing and such Notice of Borrowing shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower.
Notice to Lenders; Funding of Loans.
 
(b)
 
Not later than 12:00 Noon (New York City time) on the date of each Borrowing, each Lender participating therein shall make available its share of such Borrowing, in Federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, to the Agent at its address specified in or pursuant to Section 9.01.  Unless the Agent determines that any applicable condition specified in Article III has not been satisfied, the Agent will make the funds so received from the Lenders available to the Borrower at the Agents aforesaid address; that Base Rate Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.17(e) shall be remitted by the Agent to the applicable Issuing Bank.
provided
 
(c)
 
Unless the Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available to the Agent on the date of such Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.04(b) and the Agent may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower on such date a corresponding amount.  If and to the extent that such Lender shall not have so made such share available to the Agent, such Lender and the Borrower severally agree to repay to the Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount together with interest thereon, for each day from the date such amount is made available to the Borrower until the date such amount is repaid to the Agent, at (i) in the case of the Borrower, a rate per annum equal to the higher of the Federal Funds Rate and the interest rate applicable thereto pursuant to Section 2.09 and (ii) in the case of such Lender, the Federal Funds Rate.  If such Lender shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount,
 
18
 
 
 
such amount so repaid shall constitute such Lenders Loan included in such Borrowing for purposes of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 2.05.
 
   (a)  Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
Evidence of Debt.
 
(b)
 
The Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the Commitment of each Lender and the amount of each Loan made hereunder by such Lender, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Agent hereunder for the accounts of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
(c)
 
The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to Section 2.05(b) shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein and shall be presumptively correct absent demonstrable error; that the failure of the Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
 
(d)
 
Any Lender may request in writing that Loans made by it be evidenced by a Note.  In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a Note payable to the order of such Lender in the form of Exhibit A.  Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such Note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.05) be represented by one or more Notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein.
 
(e)
 
Each Lender agrees that it will cancel and return to the Borrower all Notes then held by it upon the earlier of (i) the Maturity Date; that no Default shall have then occurred and be continuing or (ii) the date such Lenders Commitment has been terminated and there are no Loans outstanding to or accrued interest owing to such Lender.
provided
 
SECTION 2.06.
 
  (a)  The Committed Loans of each Lender shall mature, and the principal amount thereof shall be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon, on the Maturity Date.
Maturity of Loans.
 
(b)
 
Each Money Market Loan shall mature, and the principal amount thereof shall be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon, on the last day of the Interest Period applicable to such Money Market Loan.
 
(c)
 
The Borrower may, by written notice to the Agent (which shall promptly deliver a copy to each of the Lenders) not less than 45 days and not more than 90 days prior to any anniversary of the date hereof, request that the Lenders extend the Maturity Date and the Commitments for an additional period of one year (the date of any
 
19
 
 
 
 
such request being called the ).  Each Lender shall, by notice to the Borrower and the Agent given not later than the 20th day after the date of the Agents receipt of the Borrowers extension request, advise the Borrower whether or not it agrees to the requested extension (each Lender agreeing to a requested extension being called a  and each Lender declining to agree to a requested extension being called a ).  Any Lender that has not so advised the Borrower and the Agent by such day shall be deemed to have declined to agree to such extension and shall be a Declining Lender.  If Lenders constituting the Required Lenders shall have agreed to an extension request, then the Maturity Date shall, as to the Consenting Lenders, be extended to the first anniversary of the Maturity Date theretofore in effect.  The decision to agree or withhold agreement to any Maturity Date extension shall be at the sole discretion of each Lender.  The Commitment of any Declining Lender shall terminate on the Maturity Date for such Lender in effect immediately prior to giving effect to any such extension (such Maturity Date being called the ).  The principal amount of any outstanding Loans made by Declining Lenders, together with any accrued interest thereon and any accrued fees and other amounts payable to or for the accounts of such Declining Lenders hereunder, shall be due and payable on the Existing Maturity Date, and on the Existing Maturity Date, the Borrower shall also make such other prepayments of Loans as shall be required in order that, after giving effect to the termination of the Commitments of, and all payments to, Declining Lenders pursuant to this sentence, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans plus the LC Exposure shall not exceed the aggregate amount of the Commitments that shall have been extended beyond the Existing Maturity Date.  Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section, the Borrower shall have the right, pursuant to Section 8.06, at any time prior to the Existing Maturity Date, to replace a Declining Lender with one or more Lenders or other financial institutions that will agree to a request for the extension of the Maturity Date, and any such replacement Lender shall for all purposes constitute a Consenting Lender.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, no extension of the Maturity Date pursuant to this Section shall become effective unless (i) on or prior to the anniversary of the date hereof that immediately follows the Request Date (such date, the ), the Agent shall have received documents consistent with those delivered with respect to the Borrower under Subsections (b), (c) and (d) of Section 3.01, giving effect to such extension and (ii) on the Extension Date the condition set forth in Section 3.01(e) shall be satisfied (with all references in such Section to the Effective Date being deemed to be references to the Extension Date; provided, however, that, solely for purposes of this sentence, the date in Section 4.04(b) shall be deemed to be December 31 of the year for which the Borrower shall most recently have filed an Annual Report on Form 10-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission prior to the Request Date, and provided further, that solely for purposes of this sentence, clause (b) of the definition of Disclosure Documents shall be deemed to refer to the Borrowers most recently filed Annual Report on Form 10-K prior to the Request Date and to the Borrowers Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed for all the quarterly periods, if any, beginning on or after the end of the annual period covered by said Annual Report and ending on or before the Request Date, and clause (c) of such definition shall be deemed to refer to the Borrowers Current Reports on Form 8-K, if any, filed or furnished prior to the Request Date).
Request Date
Consenting Lender
Declining Lender
Existing Maturity Date
Extension Date
 
20
 
 
 
SECTION 2.07.
 
  (a)  The Commitments of each Lender shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
Termination or Reduction of Commitments.
 
(b)
 
During the Revolving Credit Period the Borrower may, upon at least three Domestic Business Days notice to the Agent, terminate the Commitments at any time, if no Loans are outstanding at such time and there is no LC Exposure at such time.
 
(c)
 
During the Revolving Credit Period the Borrower may, upon at least three Domestic Business Days notice to the Agent, ratably reduce the Commitments from time to time by an aggregate amount of $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000, but only to the extent that the aggregate amount of the Commitments exceeds the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans plus the LC Exposure.
 
SECTION 2.08.
 
  (a)  During the Revolving Credit Period, the Borrower may on one or more occasions, by written notice to the Agent (which shall promptly deliver a copy to each of the Lenders), executed by the Borrower and one or more financial institutions (any such financial institution referred to in this Section being called an ), which may include any Lender, cause Commitments to be made available by the Augmenting Lenders (or cause the Commitments of the Augmenting Lenders to be increased, as the case may be) in an amount for each Augmenting Lender set forth in such notice; that (i) the aggregate amount of all such increases pursuant to this Section shall not exceed $500,000,000, (ii) each Augmenting Lender, if not already a Lender hereunder, shall be subject to the approval of the Agent (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld) and (iii) each Augmenting Lender, if not already a Lender hereunder, shall become a party to this Agreement by completing and delivering to the Agent a duly executed accession agreement in a form satisfactory to the Agent and the Borrower.  Any such notice shall set forth the amount of the requested increase in the total Commitments (which shall be the lesser of (x) a minimum aggregate amount of $20,000,0000 or any larger multiple of $5,000,000 or (y) the remaining aggregate allowance for such increases) and the date on which such increase is requested to become effective.  Increases and new Commitments created pursuant to this Section 2.08(a) shall become effective on the date specified in the notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to the first sentence of this Section 2.08(a).  Notwithstanding the foregoing, no increase in the total Commitments (or in the Commitment of any Lender) shall become effective under this Section 2.08(a) unless, (i) on the date of such increase, the conditions set forth in Sections 3.02(b) and 3.02(d) (without giving effect to the parenthetical in Section 3.02(d)) shall be satisfied (as though a Borrowing were being made on such date) and the Agent shall have received a certificate to that effect dated such date and executed by a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower, and (ii) the Agent shall have received (to the extent requested by the Agent reasonably in advance of such date) documents consistent with those delivered under Sections 3.01(c) and 3.01(d) as to the corporate power and authority of the Borrower to borrow hereunder and as to the enforceability of this Agreement after giving effect to such increase.
Increase in Commitments.
Augmenting Lender
provided
21
(b)
 
At the time that any increase in the total Commitments pursuant to Section 2.08(a) (a ) becomes effective, if any Committed Loans are outstanding, the Borrower shall prepay in accordance with Section 2.12 the aggregate principal amount of all Committed Loans outstanding (the ); that (i) nothing in this Section shall prevent the Borrower from funding the prepayment of Initial Loans with concurrent Borrowings hereunder in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, giving effect to the Commitment Increase, and (ii) no such prepayment shall be required to the extent that, after giving effect to the Commitment Increase, each Lender has the same Applicable Percentage as immediately prior to such Commitment Increase.
Commitment Increase
Initial Loans
provided
 
(c)
 
At the time that any Commitment Increase becomes effective, if any Letters of Credit issued hereunder remain outstanding, each Lenders participation in such Letters of Credit will be adjusted in accordance with such Lenders Applicable Percentage, after giving effect to such Commitment Increase.
 
SECTION 2.09.
 
  (a)  Each Base Rate Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for each day from the date such Loan is made until it becomes due, at a rate per annum equal to the Base Rate for such day.  Such interest shall be payable for each Interest Period on the earlier of (i) the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto or (ii) the Maturity Date.  Any overdue principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, overdue interest on any Base Rate Loan shall bear interest, payable on demand, for each day until paid at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Base Rate for such day.
Interest Rates.
 
(b)
 
Each Euro-Dollar Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for each Interest Period applicable thereto, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the Euro-Dollar Margin plus the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate.  Such interest shall be payable for each Interest Period on the earlier of (i) the last day thereof, (ii) three months after the initial date thereof and, if such Interest Period is longer than three months, at intervals of three months thereafter or (iii) the Maturity Date.
 
The  applicable to any Euro-Dollar Loan outstanding on any day means:
Euro-Dollar Margin
 
(A)  if Usage on such day is less than or equal to 50%:
 
(i)
 
if such day falls within a Level I Period, then 0.105%;
 
(ii)
 
if such day falls within a Level II Period, then 0.150%;
 
(iii)
 
if such day falls within a Level III Period, then 0.190%;
 
(iv)
 
if such day falls within a Level IV Period, then 0.270%;
 
(v)
 
if such day falls within a Level V Period, then 0.350%;
 
(vi)
 
if such day falls within a Level VI Period, then 0.425%; and
 
22
 
 
 
(vii)
 
if such day falls within a Level VII Period, then 0.450%; and
 
 
(i)
 
if such day falls within a Level I Period, then 0.155%;
 
(ii)
 
if such day falls within a Level II Period, then 0.200%;
 
(iii)
 
if such day falls within a Level III Period, then 0.240%;
 
(iv)
 
if such day falls within a Level IV Period, then 0.320%;
 
(v)
 
if such day falls within a Level V Period, then 0.400%;
 
(vi)
 
if such day falls within a Level VI Period, then 0.500%; and
 
(vii)
 
if such day falls within a Level VII Period, then 0.575%.
 
The  applicable to any Interest Period means the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100 of 1%) appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or any successor page) as the London interbank offered rate for deposits in Dollars at 11:00 A.M. (London time) two Euro-Dollar Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period for a period equal to such Interest Period; that, if for any reason such rate is not available, the term  applicable to any Interest Period shall mean the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100 of 1%) as offered by the principal London office of the Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market for deposits in Dollars at approximately 11:00 A.M. (London time) two Euro-Dollar Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period for a period equal to such Interest Period.
London Interbank Offered Rate
provided
London Interbank Offered Rate
 
(c)
 
Any overdue principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, overdue interest on any Euro-Dollar Loan shall bear interest, payable on demand, for each day from and including the date payment thereof was due to but excluding the date of actual payment, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Euro-Dollar Margin plus the higher of (i) the London Interbank Offered Rate applicable to such Loan and (ii) the average (rounded upward, if necessary, to the next higher 1/100 of 1%) of the respective rates per annum at which one day (or, if such amount due remains unpaid more than three Euro-Dollar Business Days, then for such other period of time not longer than three months as the Agent may select) deposits in dollars in an amount approximately equal to such overdue payment due to the Agent are offered to the Agent in the London interbank market for the applicable period determined as provided above (or, if the circumstances described in Section 8.01 shall exist, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Base Rate for such day).
 
(d)
 
Subject to clause (y) of Section 8.01, each Money Market LIBOR Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for the Interest Period applicable thereto, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the London Interbank
 
23
 
 
 
Offered Rate for such Interest Period plus (or minus) the Money Market Margin quoted by the Lender making such Loan in accordance with Section 2.03.  Each Money Market Absolute Rate Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for the Interest Period applicable thereto, at a rate per annum equal to the Money Market Absolute Rate quoted by the Lender making such Loan in accordance with Section 2.03.  Such interest shall be payable for each Interest Period on the earlier of (i) the last day thereof, (ii) three months after the initial date thereof and, if such Interest Period is longer than three months, at intervals of three months thereafter or (iii) the Maturity Date.  Any overdue principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, overdue interest on any Money Market Loan shall bear interest, payable on demand, for each day until paid at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Base Rate for such day.
 
(e)
 
The Agent shall determine (in accordance with this Agreement) each interest rate applicable to the Loans hereunder.  The Agent shall give prompt notice to the Borrower by facsimile transmission and the participating Lenders by facsimile transmission of each rate of interest so determined, and its determination thereof shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error.
 
SECTION 2.10.
 
  (a)    The Borrower shall pay to the Agent for the account of the Lenders, ratably in proportion to their Commitments (or, if the Commitments have terminated, ratably in proportion to their outstanding Loans and LC Exposure), a facility fee at the rate of (i) 0.045% per annum during each Level I Period, (ii) 0.050% per annum during each Level II Period, (iii) 0.060% per annum during each Level III Period, (iv) 0.080% per annum during each Level IV Period, (v) 0.100% per annum during each Level V Period, (vi) 0.125% per annum during each Level VI Period and (vii) 0.175% per annum during each Level VII Period.  Such facility fee shall accrue (i) from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the last day of the Revolving Credit Period, in each case, on the daily average aggregate amount of the Commitments (whether used or unused) and (ii) if any Loan or LC Exposure remains outstanding after the Revolving Credit Period (or if any Loan or LC Exposure of any Lender remains outstanding after such Lenders Commitment shall have terminated), from and including the last day of the Revolving Credit Period (or the termination of such Commitment) to but excluding the date such Loans shall be repaid in full, on the daily average aggregate outstanding principal amount of such Loans and LC Exposure.
Fees.
Facility Fee.
 
(b)
 
.  The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Agent for the account of each Lender a letter of credit fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the Euro-Dollar Margin used to determine the interest rate applicable to Euro-Dollar Loans (and solely for purposes of determining the applicable Euro-Dollar Margin used in computing Letter of Credit participation fees Usage shall be deemed to be greater than 50%) on the average daily amount of such Lenders LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lenders Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to each Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate or rates per annum separately agreed upon between the Borrower and the applicable Issuing Bank on the
Letter of Credit and Fronting Fees
 
24
 
 
 
average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) attributable to Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as such Issuing Banks standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit by such Issuing Bank or the processing of drawings thereunder.
 
(c)
 
.  Except as otherwise indicated, accrued facility fees, letter of credit fees and fronting fees under this Section 2.10 shall be payable quarterly in arrears on (i) each Quarterly Date, (ii) the Maturity Date and (iii) if any Loans or LC Exposure remains outstanding after the Revolving Credit Period, the date such Loans shall be repaid in full and such LC Exposure ceases to exist.  Any other fees payable to any Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section shall be payable within 10 days after demand.
Payments
 
SECTION 2.11.
 
  (a)  The Loans included in each Committed Borrowing shall bear interest initially at the type of rate specified by the Borrower in the applicable Notice of Committed Borrowing.  Thereafter, the Borrower may from time to time elect to change or continue the type of interest rate borne by each Group of Loans (subject in each case to the provisions of Article VIII), as follows:
Method of Electing Interest Rates.
 
(i)
 
if such Loans are Base Rate Loans, the Borrower may elect to convert such Loans to Euro-Dollar Loans as of any Euro-Dollar Business Day; and
 
(ii)
 
if such Loans are Euro-Dollar Loans, the Borrower may (x) elect to convert such Euro-Dollar Loans to Base Rate Loans as of any Domestic Business Day, (y) elect to convert such Euro-Dollar Loans to Euro-Dollar Loans with an Interest Period different from the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans as of any Euro-Dollar Business Day or (z) elect to continue such Loans as Euro-Dollar Loans for an additional Interest Period beginning on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans;
 
that, if the Borrower elects to convert any Euro-Dollar Loans to Base Rate Loans or to Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period, as of any day other than the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans, the Borrower shall reimburse each Lender in accordance with Section 2.14.
provided
 
Each such election shall be made by delivering a notice (a ) to the Agent (i) at least one Domestic Business Day before such notice is to be effective if the relevant Loans are to be converted into Base Rate Loans or (ii) at least three Euro-Dollar Business Days before such conversion or continuation is to be effective if such Loans are to be converted into, or continued as, Euro-Dollar Loans.
Notice of Interest Rate Election
 
25
 
 
 
A Notice of Interest Rate Election may, if it so specifies, apply to only a portion of the aggregate principal amount of the relevant Group of Loans; that (i) such portion is allocated ratably among the Loans comprising such Group and (ii) the portion to which such Notice applies, and the remaining portion to which it does not apply, are each $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000.
provided
 
(b)
 
Each Notice of Interest Rate Election shall specify:
 
(i)
 
the Group of Loans (or portion thereof) to which such notice applies;
 
(ii)
 
the date on which the conversion or continuation selected in such notice is to be effective, which shall comply with the applicable clause of Section 2.11(a);
 
(iii)
 
whether such Group of Loans (or portion thereof) is to be converted to Base Rate Loans or Euro-Dollar Loans or continued as Euro-Dollar Loans for an additional Interest Period; and
 
(iv)
 
if such Loans (or portions thereof) are to be converted to or continued as Euro-Dollar Loans, the duration of the Interest Period to be applicable thereto immediately after such conversion or continuation.
 
Each Interest Period specified in a Notice of Interest Rate Election shall comply with the provisions of the definition of Interest Period.
 
(c)
 
Upon receipt of a Notice of Interest Rate Election from the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.11(a), the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and such notice shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower.  If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Notice of Interest Rate Election to the Agent for any Euro-Dollar Loans, such Loans shall be converted into Base Rate Loans on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable thereto.
 
SECTION 2.12.
 
  (a)  The Borrower may (i) upon notice to the Agent to be received no later than 10:30 A.M. (New York City time), prepay the Base Rate Loans (or any Money Market LIBOR Loans which bear interest at the Base Rate at such time for the reason stated in Section 8.01), in whole or in part, on any Domestic Business Day and (ii) upon at least two Euro-Dollar Business Days notice to the Agent, prepay any Euro-Dollar Loan, in whole or in part, in amounts aggregating $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000, by paying the principal amount to be prepaid together with accrued interest thereon to the date of prepayment; that a Money Market Loan may not be prepaid without the prior written consent of the Lender that holds such Money Market Loan, other than as contemplated by clause (i) above.  Each such optional prepayment shall be applied to prepay ratably the relevant Loans of the several Lenders.  Prepayment of a Euro-Dollar Loan on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto shall be subject to Section 2.14.
Prepayments.
provided
 
26
 
 
 
(b)
 
Upon receipt of a notice of prepayment pursuant to this Section 2.12, the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and of such Lenders ratable share (if any) of such prepayment and such notice shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower.
 
SECTION 2.13.
 
  (a)  The Borrower shall make each payment of principal of, and interest on, the Loans, fees and reimbursements of LC Disbursements hereunder, not later than 12:00 Noon (New York City time) on the date when due, in Federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, to the Agent at its address referred to in its Administrative Questionnaire (or to an Issuing Bank, in the case of payments to be made directly to an Issuing Bank as expressly provided herein), without set-off or counterclaim.  The Agent will promptly distribute to each Lender its ratable share of each such payment received by the Agent for the account of the Lenders, or to each applicable Issuing Bank in the case of payments for the account of one or more of the Issuing Banks.  Whenever any payment of principal of, or interest on, any Base Rate Loans or fees shall be due on a day which is not a Domestic Business Day, the date for payment thereof shall be extended to the next succeeding Domestic Business Day.  Whenever any payment of principal of, or interest on, the Euro-Dollar Loans and Money Market LIBOR Loans shall be due on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, the date for payment thereof shall be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day unless such Euro-Dollar Business Day falls in another calendar month or falls after the Maturity Date, in which case the date for payment thereof shall be the next preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day.  Whenever any payment of principal of, or interest on, the Money Market Absolute Rate Loans shall be due on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, the date for payment thereof shall be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day.  If the date for any payment of principal is extended by operation of law or otherwise, interest thereon shall be payable for such extended time.
General Provisions as to Payments.
 
(b)
 
Unless the Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Lenders or one or more Issuing Banks hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment in full, the Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment in full to the Agent on such date and the Agent may, in reliance upon such assumption, cause to be distributed to each Lender or each applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, on such due date an amount equal to the amount then due such Lender or such Issuing Bank.  If and to the extent that the Borrower shall not have so made such payment, each Lender or each applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, shall repay to the Agent forthwith on demand such amount distributed to such Lender or such Issuing Bank together with interest thereon, for each day from the date such amount is distributed to such Lender or such Issuing Bank until the date such Lender or such Issuing Bank repays such amount to the Agent, at the Federal Funds Rate.
 
(c)
 
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and participations in LC
 
27
 
 
 
Disbursements and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans and participations in LC Disbursements of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans and participations in LC Disbursements; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this Section 2.13(c) shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary (as to which the provisions of this Section 2.13(c) shall apply).  The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
 
SECTION 2.14.
 
  If the Borrower makes any payment of principal with respect to any Fixed Rate Loan or any Fixed Rate Loan is converted to a Base Rate Loan (pursuant to Section 2.11, Section 2.12, Article VI or Article VIII) on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto or the end of an applicable period fixed pursuant to Section 2.09(c), or if any Lender assigns any Fixed Rate Loan as required by Section 8.06 on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto, or if the Borrower fails to borrow or prepay any Fixed Rate Loan after notice has been given to any Lender in accordance with Section 2.04(a) or Section 2.12, the Borrower shall reimburse each Lender within 15 days after demand for any resulting loss or expense incurred by it (or by an existing or prospective Participant in the related Loan), including (without limitation) any loss reasonably incurred in obtaining, liquidating or employing deposits from third parties, but excluding loss of margin for the period after such payment or conversion or assignment or failure to borrow or prepay; that such Lender shall have delivered to the Borrower a certificate as to the amount of such loss or expense with an explanation of the calculation of such loss or expense, which certificate shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith.
Funding Losses.
provided
 
SECTION 2.15.
 
  Interest based on the Prime Rate hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year) and paid for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  All other interest, facility fees, letter of credit fees and fronting fees hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and paid for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
Computation of Interest and Fees.
 
SECTION 2.16.
 
  For each day for which a Lender is required to maintain reserves in respect of either (x) 
Regulation D Compensation.
Eurocurrency Liabilities
 
28
 
 
 
(as defined in all regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) or (y) any other category of liabilities which includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate in Euro-Dollar Loans is determined or any category of extensions of credit or other assets which includes loans by a non-United States office of any Lender to United States residents, such Lender may require the Borrower to pay, contemporaneously with each payment of interest on the Euro-Dollar Loans, additional interest on the related Euro-Dollar Loan of such Lender at a rate per annum determined by such Lender up to but not exceeding the excess of (i) (A) the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate divided by (B) one the Euro-Dollar Reserve Percentage over (ii) the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate.  Any Lender wishing to require payment of such additional interest (x) shall so notify the Borrower and the Agent, in which case such additional interest on the Euro-Dollar Loans of such Lender shall be payable to such Lender at the place indicated in such notice with respect to each Interest Period commencing at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days after the giving of such notice and (y) shall notify the Borrower at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days prior to each date on which interest is payable on the Euro-Dollar Loans of the amount then due to such Lender under this Section.  Such Lenders notice to the Borrower shall set forth its calculation of such additional interest and such calculation shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith.
minus
 
SECTION 2.17.
 
  (a)    Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit denominated in Dollars for its own account or, as provided below, for the account of a Subsidiary, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the Revolving Credit Period.  In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.  The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that (i) Letters of Credit may be issued to support obligations of Subsidiaries of the Borrower as well as the Borrower, (ii) Letters of Credit issued to support obligations of a Subsidiary may state that they are issued for such Subsidiarys account and (iii) regardless of any such statement in any Letter of Credit, the Borrower is the account party in respect of all Letters of Credit and will be responsible for reimbursement of LC Disbursements as provided herein.
Letters of Credit.
General.
 
(b)
 
  To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver (or transmit by electronic communication or facsimile transmission, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Domestic Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with Section 2.17(c)), the amount of such Letter of Credit in Dollars, the name and address of the beneficiary
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
 
29
 
 
 
thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit.  If requested by the applicable Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Banks standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit.  A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (X) the Agent shall have confirmed, based solely on the information delivered to it pursuant to Section 2.17(k) below, that (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), (A) after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $200,000,000, (ii) the amount of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by the applicable Issuing Bank will not exceed the LC Commitment of such Issuing Bank and (iii) the sum of the total LC Exposure plus the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans shall not exceed the aggregate amount of the Commitments, and (B) in the event the Maturity Date shall have been extended as provided in Section 2.06(c), the sum of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit expiring after any Existing Maturity Date and the aggregate principal amount of all Money Market Loans maturing after such Existing Maturity Date shall not exceed the aggregate Commitments that have been extended to a date after the latest expiration date of such Letters of Credit and the latest maturity of such Money Market Loans, and (Y) the Issuing Bank shall not have received written notice from any Lender, the Agent or the Borrower, at least one Business Day prior to the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of the applicable Letter of Credit, that one or more applicable conditions contained in Section 3.02 shall not be satisfied.
 
(c)
 
  Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Domestic Business Days prior to the Maturity Date.
Expiration Date.
 
(d)
 
  By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the applicable Issuing Bank or the Lenders, such Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit.  In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Agent, for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by such Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in Section 2.17(e), or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason.  Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this Section 2.17(d) in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations.
 
30
 
 
 
(e)
 
  If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 Noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 Noon, New York City time, on (i) the Domestic Business Day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Domestic Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that the Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.02 that such payment be financed with a Base Rate Borrowing in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrowers obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting Base Rate Borrowing.  If the Borrower fails to make such payment when due, the Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrower in respect thereof and such Lenders Applicable Percentage thereof.  Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrower, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.04 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.04 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Agent shall promptly pay to the applicable Issuing Bank the amounts so received by the Agent from the Lenders.  For the avoidance of doubt, any Declining Lender that has been replaced by a Substitute Lender pursuant to Section 8.06 prior to the date of reimbursement shall not be required to make any payment to the Agent or the applicable Issuing Bank pursuant to the preceding sentence, regardless of whether the applicable Letter of Credit was issued before or after such Lender has become a Declining Lender.  Promptly following receipt by the Agent of any payment from the Borrower pursuant to this Section 2.17(e), the Agent shall distribute such payment to the applicable Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this Section 2.17(e) to reimburse such Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and such Issuing Bank as their interests may appear.  Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this Section 2.17(e) to reimburse any Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of Base Rate Loans as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Reimbursement.
provided
mutatis
mutandis
 
(f)
 
  The Borrowers obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in Section 2.17(e) shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by an Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever,
Obligations Absolute.
 
31
 
 
 
whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section 2.17(f), constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrowers obligations hereunder.  Neither the Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Banks (nor any of their Affiliates, directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors, or their Affiliates directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors), shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the applicable Issuing Bank; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse any Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by such Issuing Banks failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof.  The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of an Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination.  In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the applicable Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
provided
 
(g)
 
  The applicable Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit.  Such Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Agent and the Borrower by telephone (confirmed by facsimile transmission) of such demand for payment and whether such Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures.
provided
 
(h)
 
  If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to Base Rate Loans; that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to Section 2.17(e), then the last sentence of Section 2.09(a) shall apply.  Interest accrued pursuant to this Section 2.17(h) shall be for the account of the
Interim Interest.
provided
 
32
 
 
 
applicable Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17(e) to reimburse such Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
 
(i)
 
  If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Domestic Business Day that the Borrower receives notice from the Agent or the Required Lenders that the Required Lenders are demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this Section 2.17(i), the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Agent, in the name of the Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to the Borrower described in Section 6.01(g) or Section 6.01(h).  Such deposit shall be held by the Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement.  The Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account.  Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Agent and at the Borrowers risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest.  Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account.  Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Agent to reimburse each Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of the Required Lenders), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement.  If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three Domestic Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.
Cash Collateralization.
provided
 
(j)
 
.  From time to time, the Borrower may by notice to the Agent designate as additional Issuing Banks one or more Lenders that agree to serve in such capacity as provided in this Section 2.17(j).  The acceptance by a Lender of any appointment as an Issuing Bank hereunder shall be evidenced by an agreement (an ), which shall be in a form satisfactory to the Borrower and the Agent, shall set forth the LC Commitment of such Lender and shall be executed by such Lender, the Borrower and the Agent.  From and after the effective date of each Issuing Bank Agreement, (i) the applicable Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement and (ii) references herein to the term Issuing Bank shall be deemed to include such Lender in its capacity as an Issuing Bank.
Designation of Additional Issuing Banks
Issuing Bank Agreement
 
(k)
 
.  Unless otherwise agreed by the Agent, each Issuing Bank shall report in writing to the Agent (i) on or prior to each Business Day on which such Issuing Bank issues, amends, renews or extends any Letter of Credit, the date of such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension and the aggregate face amount of the
Issuing Bank Reports
 
33
 
 
 
Letter of Credit issued, amended, renewed or extended by it and outstanding after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (and whether the amount thereof has changed), it being understood that such Issuing Bank shall not effect any issuance, renewal, extension or amendment resulting in an increase in the amount of any Letter of Credit without first obtaining written confirmation from the Agent that such increase complies with the conditions contained in clauses (A) and (B) of Section 2.17(b), (ii) on each Business Day on which such Issuing Bank makes an LC Disbursement, the date and amount of such LC Disbursement, (iii) on any Business Day on which the Borrower reimburses or fails to reimburse an LC Disbursement required to be reimbursed to such Issuing Bank on such day, the date of such reimbursement or failure and the amount of such LC Disbursement and (iv) on any other Business Day, such other information as the Agent shall reasonably request as to the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank and outstanding on such Business Day.
 
 
 
SECTION 3.01.
 
  This Agreement shall become effective on the date that all of the following conditions shall have been satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.04):
Effectiveness.
 
(a)
 
receipt by the Agent from each of the parties hereto of either (i) a counterpart hereof signed by such party or (ii) facsimile transmission or other written confirmation, in form satisfactory to the Agent, confirming that a counterpart hereof has been signed by such party;
 
(b)
 
receipt by the Agent of a certificate signed by the Chief Financial Officer or the Vice President, Finance, of the Borrower, dated the Effective Date, to the effect that (i) no Default has occurred and is continuing as of the Effective Date and (ii) the representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in Article IV hereof are true in all material respects on, and as of, the Effective Date;
 
(c)
 
receipt by the Agent of an opinion of William C. Baskin III, Esq., counsel to the Borrower, of Davis Polk & Wardwell, special counsel to the Borrower, and of Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, Pennsylvania counsel to the Borrower, in each case given upon the Borrowers express instructions, substantially in the forms of Exhibits E-1, E-2 and E-3 hereto, respectively;
 
(d)
 
receipt by the Agent of all documents it may reasonably request relating to the existence of the Borrower, the corporate authority for and the validity of this Agreement, and any other matters relevant hereto, all in form and substance satisfactory to the Agent;
 
(e)
 
the representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in Article IV hereof are true in all material respects on and as of the Effective Date;
 
34
 
 
 
(f)
 
receipt by the Lenders of all the financial statements referred to in Section 4.04(a);
 
(g)
 
all fees, interest and other amounts accrued for the accounts of or owing to the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Agent under the Existing Credit Agreement, whether or not due and payable as of the Effective Date, shall have been paid or shall simultaneously be paid in full, and no Loans or Letters of Credit shall be outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement on the Effective Date; and
 
(h)
 
the Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable by the Borrower on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower;
 
that this Agreement shall not become effective or be binding on any party hereto unless all of the foregoing conditions are satisfied not later than April 18, 2008.  The Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding on all parties hereto.
provided
 
SECTION 3.02.
 
  The obligation of any Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of any Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Borrowings.
 
(a)
 
receipt by the Agent of a Notice of Borrowing as required by Section 2.02 or 2.03 or receipt by the applicable Issuing Bank of a notice as required by Section 2.17(b), as the case may be;
 
(b)
 
the fact that, immediately before and immediately after such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
 
(c)
 
the fact that immediately after such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans plus the total LC Exposure will not exceed the aggregate amount of the Commitments;
 
(d)
 
the fact that the representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in Article IV (other than those set forth in Sections 4.04(b) and 4.05) shall be true on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable; and
 
(e)
 
the fact that (i) the Borrowing shall have been approved by the Chairman, the President, the Chief Executive Officer, the Executive Vice President, Strategy and Finance or the Chief Financial Officer of the Borrower or any one of their respective designees or (ii) the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of the Letter of Credit shall have been approved by the Executive Vice President, Strategy and Finance, the Chief Financial Officer, the Vice President, Finance, or the Treasurer of the Borrower.
 
35
 
 
 
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit hereunder shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Borrower on the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, (i) as to the facts specified in Sections 3.02(b), 3.02(c) and 3.02(d) and as to the facts specified in Section 3.02(e)(i) (in the case of each Borrowing) or 3.02(e)(ii) (in the case of each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit), as applicable, and (ii) that such Borrowing or issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, would not cause the aggregate principal amount outstanding at any time under (x) this Agreement, (y) any other lines of credit heretofore or hereafter established or any other funds heretofore or hereafter borrowed by the Borrower pursuant to the resolutions of the board of directors of the Borrower dated as of October 13, 2000, as amended September 28, 2001 and April 26, 2002 , and (z) any unsecured promissory notes of the Borrower issued pursuant to the resolutions of the board of directors of the Borrower dated as of October 13, 2000, as amended September 28, 2001 and April 26, 2002, to exceed $2,500,000,000, as such amount may be increased from time to time by a subsequent resolution of the board of directors of the Borrower, provided, however, that for purposes of this Agreement such increase will only take effect after a written notice thereof, in form reasonably satisfactory to the Agent, shall be delivered to the Agent by the Chief Financial Officer, the Corporate Secretary, the Assistant Corporate Secretary, the Secretary or the Assistant Secretary of the Borrower or any one of their respective designees.
 
 
 
The Borrower represents and warrants that:
 
SECTION 4.01.
 
  The Borrower (i) is a Pennsylvania corporation duly incorporated, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Pennsylvania, and (ii) has all corporate powers required to carry on its business as now conducted.  Each of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries has all governmental licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals required to carry on its business as now conducted, the failure to obtain which would, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on the Borrowers ability to perform its obligations hereunder or on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
Corporate Existence and Power.
 
SECTION 4.02  The execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of this Agreement are within its corporate powers, have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action, require no action by or in respect of, or advance filing with, any governmental body, agency or official and do not contravene, or constitute a default under, (i) any provision of the certificate of incorporation or by-laws of the Borrower, (ii) any applicable law or regulation or any judgment, injunction, order or decree binding upon the Borrower, or (iii) any material financial agreement or instrument of the Borrower.
 
 
Corporate and GovernmeAuthorization; No Contravention.
ntal
36
 
SECTION 4.03.
 
  This Agreement constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Borrower and each Note, when executed and delivered in accordance with this Agreement, will constitute a valid and binding obligation of the Borrower, in each case enforceable in accordance with its terms except as may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors rights generally and by general principles of equity.
Binding Effect.
 
SECTION 4.04.
 
  (a)  The Borrower has heretofore furnished to the Agent, for distribution to each of the Lenders, the audited consolidated balance sheet for the Borrower as of December 31, 2007, and related consolidated statements of cash flows, income and retained earnings for the Borrower for the twelve-month period then ended.  Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Borrower as of such date and for such period, in accordance with GAAP.
Financial Information.
 
(b)
 
Since December 31, 2007, there has not been nor is there reasonably likely to be any  material adverse change in the business, assets, operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole; that the charges and other information disclosed in the Disclosure Documents shall be deemed not to constitute any such material adverse change.
provided
 
SECTION 4.05.
 
  Except as disclosed in the Disclosure Documents, there is no action, suit or proceeding pending against, or to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened against or affecting, the Borrower or its Consolidated Subsidiaries before any court or arbitrator or any governmental body, agency or official in which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse decision which could materially adversely affect the business, consolidated financial position or consolidated results of operations of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries taken as a whole or which in any manner draws into question the validity of this Agreement.
Litigation.
 
SECTION 4.06.
 
  Each member of the ERISA Group has fulfilled its obligations under the minimum funding standards of ERISA and the Internal Revenue Code with respect to each Plan and is not in violation of the presently applicable provisions of ERISA and the Internal Revenue Code where such violation would have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, and has not incurred any material liability to the PBGC or a Plan under Title IV of ERISA; that this Section 4.06 applies to the members of the ERISA Group only in their capacity as employers and not in any other capacity (such as fiduciaries or service providers to Plans for the benefit of employers of others).
Compliance with ERISA.
provided
 
SECTION 4.07.
 
  Each of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries has complied in all material respects with all applicable laws and material agreements binding upon it, except where any failure to comply therewith would not individually or collectively have a material adverse effect on the Borrowers ability to perform its obligations hereunder, and except where necessity of compliance therewith is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings;
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
 
37
 
 
 
, , that the sole representation and warranty with respect to compliance with ERISA is limited to Section 4.06.
provided
however
 
SECTION 4.08.
 
  The Borrower is not  an investment company or a company controlled by an investment company within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
Investment Company Act.
 
SECTION 4.09.
 
   None of the Disclosure Documents or any other information furnished in writing by or on behalf of the Borrower to the Agent or any Lender for purposes of or in connection with this Agreement (in each case taken as a whole with all other information so furnished) contained, as of the time it was furnished, any material misstatement of fact or omitted as of such time to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein taken as a whole not misleading, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made; that with respect to information consisting of statements, estimates and projections regarding the future performance of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, the Borrower represents only that such information has been prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed by the Borrower to be reasonable at the time of preparation thereof.
Full Disclosure.
provided
 
SECTION 4.10.
 
   The Borrower has filed or caused to be filed all United States Federal income tax returns and all other material tax returns required to be filed by it and has paid or caused to be paid all material taxes required to have been paid by it, except taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Borrower has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP.
Taxes.
 
 
 
The Borrower agrees that, so long as any Lender has any Commitment hereunder and so long as any Loan is outstanding hereunder, any Letter of Credit remains outstanding or any LC Disbursement has not been reimbursed:
 
SECTION 5.01.
 
  The Borrower will deliver to the Agent, for delivery by the Agent to each of the Lenders:
Information.
 
(a)
 
as soon as available and in any event within 105days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, the consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower as of the end of such fiscal year and the related consolidated statements of earnings and of cash flows for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on in a manner acceptable to the Securities and Exchange Commission and audited by KPMG LLP or other independent public accountants of nationally recognized standing;
 
 
38
 
 
 
(b)
 
as soon as available and in any event within 55 days after the end of each of the first three quarters of each fiscal year of the Borrower, its Form 10-Q as of the end of such quarter;
 
(c)
 
simultaneously with the delivery of each set of financial statements referred to in Sections 5.01(a) and 5.01(b), a certificate of a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower (i) stating whether any Default exists on the date of such certificate and, if any Default then exists, setting forth the details thereof and the action which the Borrower is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto and (ii) setting forth calculations demonstrating compliance, as of the date of the most recent balance sheet included in the financial statements being furnished at such time, with the covenants set forth in Sections 5.03 and 5.04(e);
 
(d)
 
within five days after any officer of the Borrower obtains knowledge of any Default (other than one resulting from a failure to perform the covenant contained in paragraph (i) of this Section), if such Default is then continuing, a certificate of a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower setting forth the details thereof and the action which the Borrower is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto;
 
(e)
 
promptly upon the mailing thereof to the shareholders of the Borrower generally, copies of all financial statements and reports, and proxy statements so mailed;
 
(f)
 
promptly following a request therefor, any documentation or other information that a Lender reasonably requests in order to comply with its ongoing obligations under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA Patriot Act;
 
(g)
 
from time to time such additional publicly available information regarding the financial position or business of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries as the Agent, at the request of any Lender, may reasonably request;
 
(h)
 
prompt written notice after the occurrence of (i) any Reportable Event that, alone or together with any other Reportable Events that have occurred, or (ii) a failure to make a required installment or other payment (within the meaning of Section 412(n)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code) that, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower to the PBGC or to a Plan in an aggregate amount exceeding $50,000,000; and
 
(i)
 
promptly after Moodys, Fitch or S&P shall have announced a change in the rating established for the Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower, written notice of such rating change.
 
Information required to be delivered pursuant to this Section shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date on which the Borrower provides notice to the Lenders that such information has been posted on the Borrowers website on the Internet at or at ; that the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of the information referred to in this Section after the date delivery is
http://www.aetna.com
http://www.sec.gov
provided
 
39
 
 
 
required thereunder to any Lender which requests such delivery within 5 Business Days after such request.
 
SECTION 5.02.
 
  The Borrower will preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect, and will cause each Material Subsidiary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect, their respective corporate existence; that the foregoing shall not prohibit (i) the termination of the existence of any Material Subsidiary if the surviving entity (in the case of any such termination resulting from a merger or consolidation) or the entity to which substantially all such Material Subsidiarys assets are transferred (in the case of any other such termination) is or becomes a Material Subsidiary or is the Borrower or (ii) any transaction involving the Borrower in accordance with Section 5.05.  The Borrower will also maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies, insurance (including, without limitation, self insurance), if reasonably available, in such amounts and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations.
Conduct of Business and Maintenance of Existence and Insurance.
provided
 
SECTION 5.03.
 
  The Leverage Ratio as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Borrower ending on or after December 31, 2007, will not exceed 0.50 to 1.00.
Leverage Ratio.
 
SECTION 5.04.
 
  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Consolidated Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness secured by any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, except:
Liens.
 
(a)
 
any Indebtedness secured by a Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary existing on the date hereof; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only the Indebtedness which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
 
(b)
 
any Indebtedness secured by a Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary after the date hereof prior to the time such Person becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary; that (i) such Indebtedness and Lien are not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Consolidated Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only the any Indebtedness which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
 
(c)
 
any Indebtedness secured by purchase money security interests in property or assets or improvements thereto hereafter acquired (or, in the case of
 
40
 
 
 
improvements, constructed) by the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary; that (i) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred within 180 days of such acquisition (or construction), (ii) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the lesser of the cost or the fair market value of such property or assets or improvements at the time of such acquisition (or construction) and (iii) such security interests do not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary;
provided
 
(d)
 
any capitalized lease obligations secured by Liens; that such Liens do not extend to any property of the Borrower or its Consolidated Subsidiaries other than the property subject to the relevant capital lease; and
provided
 
(e)
 
Indebtedness secured by Liens that are not otherwise permitted by any of the foregoing provisions of this Section 5.04; that, at the time that any such Indebtedness is incurred or that any such Lien is granted (and after giving effect thereto), the aggregate outstanding principal amount of all Indebtedness secured by Liens permitted by this Section 5.04(e) shall not exceed 10% of the consolidated shareholders equity of the Borrower (i) as of December 31, 2007, until the first consolidated financial statements of the Borrower are delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) and, thereafter, (ii) as of the most recent date for which a consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower has been delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b), determined in accordance with GAAP.
provided
 
SECTION 5.05.
 
  The Borrower will not consolidate or merge with or into any other corporation or convey or transfer (or permit the conveyance or transfer of) all or substantially all of the properties and assets of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries to any other Person unless (i) the surviving or acquiring entity is a corporation organized under the laws of one of the United States, (ii) the surviving or acquiring corporation, if other than the Borrower, expressly assumes the performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement and all Notes, and (iii) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Default shall exist.
Consolidations, Mergers and Sales of Assets.
 
SECTION 5.06.
 
  The proceeds of the Loans made under this Agreement will be used by the Borrower for general corporate purposes, including, without limitation, the payment of maturing commercial paper.  Letters of Credit issued under this Agreement may support obligations of Subsidiaries of the Borrower as well as the Borrower.  None of such proceeds or Letters of Credit will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose, whether immediate, incidental or ultimate, of buying or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U.
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit.
 
SECTION 5.07.
 
  The Borrower will comply, and will cause its Consolidated Subsidiaries to comply, in all material respects with all applicable laws, except where any failure to comply therewith would not individually or collectively have a material adverse effect on the Borrowers ability to perform its obligations hereunder, and except where necessity of compliance therewith is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings; , , that with respect
Compliance with Laws.
provided
however
 
41
 
 
 
 to compliance with ERISA, this Section 5.07 applies to the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries only in their respective capacities as employers and not in any other capacity (such as a fiduciary or service provider to Plans for the benefit of employers of others).
 
SECTION 5.08.
 
   The Borrower will keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries (in all material respects) in conformity with GAAP shall be made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities.  The Borrower will permit representatives of any Lender at such Lenders expense to visit and inspect the Borrowers financial records and properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs and financial condition with the Borrowers officers and (with the participation of or prior notice to such officers) independent public accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested.
Inspection of Property, Books and Records.
 
SECTION 5.09.
 
  The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Consolidated Subsidiaries to, pay its tax liabilities and other material obligations, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) (i) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and (ii) the Borrower or such Consolidated Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP or (b) the failure to make such payments could not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Borrowers ability to perform its obligations hereunder or on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
Payment of Obligations.
 
 
 
SECTION 6.01.
 
  If one or more of the following events () shall have occurred and be continuing:
Events of Default.
Events of Default
 
(a)
 
the Borrower shall fail to pay when due any principal on any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement;
 
(b)
 
the Borrower shall fail to pay within five Domestic Business Days of the date when due any fees or any interest on any Loan or LC Disbursement;
 
(c)
 
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant contained in Sections 5.01(d), 5.03 and 5.05;
 
(d)
 
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform, in any material respect, any covenant or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those covered by Sections 6.01(a), 6.01(b) or 6.01(c) above) and such failure shall have continued for a period of 30 days after written notice thereof has been given to the Borrower by the Agent at the request of any Lender;
 
42
 
 
 
(e)
 
any representation, warranty, certification or statement made by the Borrower in this Agreement or in any certificate, financial statement or other document delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made (or deemed made);
 
(f)
 
the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest) in respect of any indebtedness for borrowed money having an outstanding principal amount of $100,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) or more, when and as the same shall become due and payable; or any event or condition occurs that results in any outstanding indebtedness for borrowed money of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary having an outstanding principal amount of $100,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) or more becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity, or that enables or permits the holder or holders of such indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause such indebtedness to become due prior to its scheduled maturity;
 
(g)
 
the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary shall commence a voluntary case or other proceeding seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief with respect to itself or its debts under any bankruptcy, insolvency or other similar law now or hereafter in effect or seeking the appointment of a trustee, receiver, liquidator, custodian or other similar official of it or all or substantially all of its property, or shall consent to any such relief or to the appointment of or taking possession by any such official in an involuntary case or other proceeding commenced against it, or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or shall fail generally to pay its debts as they become due, or shall take any corporate action to authorize any of the foregoing;
 
(h)
 
an involuntary case or other proceeding shall be commenced against the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief with respect to it or its debts under any bankruptcy, insolvency or other similar law now or hereafter in effect or seeking the appointment of a trustee, receiver, liquidator, custodian or other similar official of it or all or substantially all of its property, and such involuntary case or other proceeding shall remain undismissed and unstayed for a period of 60 days; or an order for relief shall be entered against the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary under the federal bankruptcy laws as now or hereafter in effect;
 
(i)
 
any person or group of persons (within the meaning of Section 13 or 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) shall have acquired beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 promulgated by the Securities and Exchange Commission under said Act) of more than 35% of the outstanding shares of common stock of the Borrower; or at any time Continuing Directors shall not constitute a majority of the board of directors of the Borrower;
 
(j)
 
one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $50,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) shall be rendered against the Borrower, any Consolidated Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 60 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a
 
43
 
 
 
judgment creditor to levy upon assets or properties of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment; or
 
(k)
 
a Reportable Event or Reportable Events, or a failure to make a required installment or other payment (within the meaning of Section 412(n)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code), shall have occurred with respect to any Plan or Plans that reasonably could be expected to result in liability of the Borrower to the PBGC or to a Plan in an aggregate amount exceeding $50,000,000 and, within 30 days after the reporting of any such Reportable Event to the Agent, the Agent shall have notified the Borrower in writing that (i) the Required Lenders have made a determination that, on the basis of such Reportable Event or Reportable Events or the failure to make a required payment, there are reasonable grounds (A) for the termination of such Plan or Plans by the PBGC, (B) for the appointment by the appropriate United States District Court of a trustee to administer such Plan or Plans or (C) for the imposition of liens in an amount exceeding $25,000,000 in favor of a Plan and (ii) as a result thereof an Event of Default exists hereunder; or a trustee shall be appointed by a United States District Court to administer any such Plan or Plans; or the PBGC shall institute proceedings to terminate any Plan or Plans;
 
then, and in every such event, the Agent shall (i) if requested by Lenders having more than 50% in aggregate amount of the Commitments, by notice to the Borrower terminate the Commitments and they shall thereupon terminate, and (ii) if requested by Lenders holding more than 50% in aggregate principal amount of the Loans, by notice to the Borrower declare the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) to be, and the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) shall thereupon become, immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; that in the case of any of the Events of Default specified in Sections 6.01(g) or 6.01(h) above with respect to the Borrower, without any notice to the Borrower or any other act by the Agent or the Lenders, the Commitments shall thereupon terminate and the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) shall become immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
provided
 
SECTION 6.02.
 
  The Agent shall give notice to the Borrower under Section 6.01(d) promptly upon being requested to do so by any Lender and shall thereupon notify all the Lenders thereof.
Notice of Default.
 
 
 
SECTION 7.01.
 
  Each Lender and each Issuing Bank irrevocably appoints and authorizes the Agent to take such action as agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under this Agreement as are delegated to the Agent by the terms hereof, together with all such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.  The Lenders named on the cover page of this Agreement as co-syndication agents are not authorized to take any action as agent on behalf of the Agent or on behalf
Appointment and Authorization.
 
44
 
 
 
of any Lender, and shall not have any rights, responsibilities, duties or any powers as an agent under this Agreement.
 
SECTION 7.02.
 
  JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. shall have the same rights and powers under this Agreement as any other Lender and may exercise or refrain from exercising the same as though it were not the Agent, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate of the Borrower as if it were not the Agent hereunder.
Agent and Affiliates.
 
SECTION 7.03.
 
  The obligations of the Agent hereunder are only those expressly set forth herein.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Agent shall not be required to take any action with respect to any Default, except as expressly provided in Article VI.
Action by Agent.
 
SECTION 7.04.
 
  The Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it and shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with the advice of such counsel, accountants or experts.
Consultation with Experts.
 
SECTION 7.05.
 
  Neither the Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents, or employees shall be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in connection herewith (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct.  Neither the Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents or employees shall be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain, inquire into or verify (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in connection with this Agreement or any Borrowing hereunder; (ii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants or agreements of the Borrower; (iii) the satisfaction of any condition specified in Article III, except receipt of items required to be delivered to the Agent; or (iv) the validity, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement or any other instrument or writing furnished in connection herewith.  The Agent shall not incur any liability by acting in reliance upon any notice, consent, certificate, statement, or other writing (which may be a bank wire, facsimile transmission or similar writing) reasonably believed by it to be genuine and to be signed by the proper party or parties.
Liability of Agent.
 
SECTION 7.06.
 
  Each Lender shall, ratably in accordance with its Commitment (or outstanding Loans and LC Exposure, if the Commitments have terminated), indemnify the Agent (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrower) against any cost, expense (including counsel fees and disbursements), claim, demand, action, loss or liability (except such as result from the Agents gross negligence or willful misconduct) that the Agent may suffer or incur in connection with this Agreement or any action taken or omitted by the Agent hereunder.
Indemnification.
 
SECTION 7.07.
 
  Each Lender and each Issuing Bank acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Agent or any other
Credit Decision.
 
45
 
 
 
Lender or Issuing Bank, and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Lender and each Issuing Bank also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Agent or any other Lender or Issuing Bank, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking any action under this Agreement.
 
SECTION 7.08.
 
  The Agent may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Borrower.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right to appoint a successor Agent approved by the Borrower (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld).  If no successor Agent shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders, and approved by the Borrower and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Agent gives notice of resignation, then the retiring Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, appoint a successor Agent, which shall be a commercial bank organized or licensed under the laws of the United States of America or of any State thereof and having a combined capital and surplus of at least two billion dollars.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Agent hereunder by a successor Agent, such successor Agent shall thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights and duties of the retiring Agent, and the retiring Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder.  After any retiring Agents resignation hereunder as Agent, the provisions of this Article shall inure to its benefit as to any actions taken or omitted to be taken by it while it was Agent.
Successor Agent.
 
SECTION 7.09.
 
  The Borrower shall pay to the Agent, for its own account, fees in the amounts and at the times previously agreed upon between the Borrower and the Agent.
Agents Fees.
 
SECTION 7.10.
 
  It is agreed that the Co-Syndication Agents shall, in their capacities as such, have no duties or responsibilities under this Agreement or liability in connection with this Agreement.  Neither the Agent nor any Co-Syndication Agent, in its capacity as such, has or is deemed to have any fiduciary relationship with any Lender.
Co-Syndication Agents.
 
 
 
 
SECTION 8.01.
 
  If on or prior to the first day of any Interest Period for any Euro-Dollar Loan or Money Market LIBOR Loan the Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that deposits in dollars (in the applicable amounts) are not generally available in the London interbank market for such period or that the London Interbank Offered Rate cannot be determined in accordance with the definition thereof, the Agent shall forthwith give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders, whereupon
Basis for Determining Interest Rate Inadequate or Unfair.
 
46
 
 
 
until the Agent notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension no longer exist, (i) the obligations of the Lenders to make Euro-Dollar Loans, to convert outstanding Base Rate Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans or to convert outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period shall be suspended, (ii) each outstanding Euro-Dollar Loan or Money Market LIBOR Loan, as the case may be, shall be converted into a Base Rate Loan on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable thereto, and (iii) unless the Borrower notifies the Agent at least two Domestic Business Days before the date of any Euro-Dollar Borrowing or Money Market LIBOR Borrowing, as the case may be, for which a Notice of Borrowing has previously been given that it elects not to borrow on such date, (x) if such Borrowing is a Euro-Dollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall instead be made as a Base Rate Borrowing and (y) if such Borrowing is a Money Market LIBOR Borrowing, the Money Market LIBOR Loans comprising such Borrowing shall bear interest for each day from and including the first day to but excluding the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto at the Base Rate for such day.
 
SECTION 8.02.
 
  If, on or after the date of this Agreement, the adoption of any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change in any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency shall make it unlawful or impossible for any Lender (or its Euro-Dollar Lending Office) to make, maintain or fund its Euro-Dollar Loans and such Lender shall so notify the Agent, the Agent shall forthwith give notice thereof to the other Lenders and the Borrower, whereupon until such Lender notifies the Borrower and the Agent that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension no longer exist, the obligation of such Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans, or to convert outstanding Base Rate Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans, or to convert outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period shall be suspended.  Before giving any notice to the Agent pursuant to this Section 8.02, such Lender shall designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for giving such notice and will not, in the judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.  If such notice is given, all Euro-Dollar Loans of such Lender then outstanding shall be converted to Base Rate Loans either (a) on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Euro-Dollar Loans if such Lender may lawfully continue to maintain and fund such Loans to such day or (b) immediately if such Lender may not lawfully continue to maintain and fund such Loans to such day.
Illegality.
 
SECTION 8.03.
 
  (a)  If any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change in any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or any Issuing Bank with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency, made or adopted
Increased Cost and Reduced Return.
 
47
 
 
 
after the date hereof (other than a change currently provided for in any existing law, rule or regulation) shall impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit, insurance assessment or similar requirement (including, without limitation, any such requirement imposed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, but excluding, with respect to any Euro-Dollar Loan, any such requirement with respect to which such Lender is entitled to compensation during the relevant Interest Period under Section 2.16) against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or any Issuing Bank or shall impose on any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or any Issuing Bank or on the United States market for certificates of deposit or the London interbank market any other condition affecting its Fixed Rate Loans (other than Money Market Absolute Rate Loans), its Note (in respect of such Fixed Rate Loans), its obligation to make such Fixed Rate Loans or its participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit; and the result of any of the foregoing is to increase the cost to such Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or such Issuing Bank of making or maintaining any Fixed Rate Loan, participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit, or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or such Issuing Bank under this Agreement or under its Note with respect thereto, by an amount reasonably deemed by such Lender or such Issuing Bank to be material, then, within 15 days after demand by such Lender or such Issuing Bank (with a copy to the Agent), the Borrower shall pay to such Lender or such Issuing Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank for such increased cost or reduction.
 
(b)
 
If any Lender or any Issuing Bank shall have determined that any applicable law, rule or regulation regarding capital adequacy, or any change in any such law, rule or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or any request or directive regarding capital adequacy (whether or not having the force of law) of any such governmental authority, central bank or comparable agency, made or adopted after the date hereof (other than a change currently provided for in any existing law, rule or regulation), has or would have the effect of increasing the amount of capital of such Lender or such Issuing Bank (or its parent) required to be maintained in respect of, or otherwise allocated to, such Lender or such Issuing Banks obligations hereunder (its ) by an amount reasonably deemed by such Lender or such Issuing Bank to be material, then such Lender or such Issuing Bank may, by notice to the Borrower and the Agent, increase the facility fee, letter of credit fee or fronting fee payable to such Lender or such Issuing Bank hereunder to the extent required so that the ratio of (w) the sum of the increased facility fee, letter of credit fee or fronting fee applicable to such Lender or such Issuing Banks Commitment or Loans hereunder to (x) the prior facility fee, letter of credit fee or fronting fee applicable to such Lenders or such Issuing Banks Commitment or Loans or Letters of Credit (or participations therein) hereunder is the same as the ratio of (y) such Lenders or such Issuing Banks increased Required Capital to (z) its prior Required Capital.  Such Lender or such Issuing Banks notice to the Borrower and the Agent shall set forth its calculation of the foregoing ratios and the increased facility fee, letter of credit fee or fronting fee to which it is entitled under this Section.
Required Capital
 
48
 
 
 
(c)
 
Each Lender or each Issuing Bank will promptly notify the Borrower and the Agent of any event of which it has knowledge, occurring after the date hereof, which will entitle such Lender or such Issuing Bank to compensation pursuant to this Section 8.03 (each, a ) and will designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, such compensation and will not, in the judgment of such Lender or such Issuing Bank, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender or such Issuing Bank.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 8.03, neither any Lender nor any Issuing Bank shall be entitled to any compensation pursuant to this Section 8.03 in respect of any Trigger Event (i) for any period of time in excess of 120 days prior to such notice or (ii) for any period of time prior to such notice if such Lender or such Issuing Bank (as applicable) shall not have given such notice within 120 days of the date on which such Trigger Event shall have been enacted, promulgated, adopted or issued in definitive or final form unless such Trigger Event is retroactive.  A certificate of any Lender or any Issuing Bank claiming compensation under Section 8.03(a) or (b) and setting forth the additional amount or amounts to be paid to it hereunder and describing the method of calculation thereof shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith.  In determining such amount, such Lender or such Issuing Bank may use any reasonable averaging and attribution methods.
Trigger Event
 
SECTION 8.04.
 
  (a)  For purposes of this Section 8.04, the following terms have the following meanings:
Taxes.
 
 means any and all present or future taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings with respect to any payment by the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement or under any Note, and all liabilities with respect thereto, (i) in the case of each Lender, each Issuing Bank and the Agent, taxes imposed on its income, and franchise or similar taxes imposed on it, by a jurisdiction under the laws of which such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent (as the case may be) is organized or in which its principal executive office is located or, in the case of each Lender, in which its Applicable Lending Office is located and (ii) in the case of each Lender, any United States withholding tax imposed on such payments but only to the extent that such Lender is subject to United States withholding tax at the time such Lender first becomes a party to this Agreement.
Taxes
excluding
 
 means any present or future stamp or documentary taxes and any other excise or property taxes, or similar charges or levies, which arise from any payment made pursuant to this Agreement or under any Note or from the execution or delivery of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement or any Note.
Other Taxes
 
(b)
 
Any and all payments by the Borrower to or for the account of any Lender, any Issuing Bank or the Agent hereunder or under any Note shall be made without deduction for any Taxes or Other Taxes; that, if the Borrower shall be required by law to deduct any Taxes or Other Taxes from any such payments, (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section 8.04) such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower
provided
 
49
 
 
 
shall make such deductions, (iii) the Borrower shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant taxation authority or other authority in accordance with applicable law and (iv) the Borrower shall furnish to the Agent, at its address referred to in Section 9.01, the original or a certified copy of a receipt evidencing payment thereof.
 
(c)
 
The Borrower agrees to indemnify each Lender, each Issuing Bank and the Agent for the full amount of Taxes or Other Taxes (including, without limitation, any Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted by any jurisdiction on amounts payable under this Section 8.04) paid by such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent (as the case may be) and any liability (including penalties, interest and expenses, except to the extent attributable to the negligence or misconduct of such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent, as the case may be) arising therefrom or with respect thereto.  This indemnification shall be made within 15 days from the date such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent (as the case may be) makes demand therefor.
 
(d)
 
Each Lender organized under the laws of a jurisdiction outside the United States, on or prior to the date of its execution and delivery of this Agreement in the case of each Lender listed on the signature pages hereof and on or prior to the date on which it becomes a Lender in the case of each other Lender, shall provide the Borrower with (i) two Internal Revenue Service () forms W8-BEN or any successor form prescribed by the IRS, certifying that such Lender is entitled to benefits under an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party which exempts such Lender from United States withholding tax or reduces the rate of withholding tax on payments of interest and eliminates withholding tax on any fees, or (ii) two IRS forms W8-ECI certifying that the income receivable pursuant to this Agreement is effectively connected with the conduct of a trade or business in the United States.  If the form provided by a Lender indicates a United States interest withholding tax rate in excess of zero, withholding tax at such rate shall be considered excluded from  as defined in Section 8.04(a).  Each such Lender undertakes to deliver to each of the Borrower and the Agent (A) a replacement form (or successor form) on or before the date that such form expires or becomes obsolete or after the occurrence of any event requiring a change in the most recent form so delivered by it, and (B) such amendments thereto or extensions or renewals thereof as may reasonably be required (but only so long as such Lender remains lawfully able to do so).
IRS
Taxes
 
(e)
 
For any period with respect to which a Lender has failed to provide the Borrower with the appropriate form pursuant to Section 8.04(d) (unless such failure is due to a change in treaty, law or regulation occurring subsequent to the date on which a form originally was required to be provided), such Lender shall not be entitled to indemnification under Section 8.04(b) or Section 8.04(c) with respect to Taxes imposed by the United States; that if a Lender, which is otherwise exempt from or subject to a reduced rate of withholding tax, becomes subject to Taxes because of its failure to deliver a form required hereunder, the Borrower shall take such steps as such Lender shall reasonably request to assist such Lender to recover such Taxes.
provided
 
(f)
 
Each Lender will promptly notify the Borrower and the Agent of any event of which it has knowledge, occurring after the date hereof, which will entitle such
 
50
 
 
 
Lender to make any claim for indemnification in respect of Taxes or Other Taxes pursuant to this Section 8.04 (each, a ) and will designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, such claim or any other amounts payable by the Borrower under this Section 8.04 and will not, in the judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, no Lender shall be entitled to any indemnification pursuant to this Section in respect of any Tax Event (i) for any period of time in excess of 180 days prior to such notice or (ii) for any period of time prior to such notice if such Lender shall not have given such notice within 120 days of the date on which such Lender became aware of such Tax Event unless such Tax Event is retroactive.
Tax Event
 
SECTION 8.05.
 
  If (i) the obligation of any Lender to make or maintain Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02 or (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03(a) and the Borrower shall, by at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days prior notice to such Lender through the Agent, have elected that the provisions of this Section shall apply to such Lender, then, unless and until such Lender notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension or demand for compensation no longer apply:
Base Rate Loans Substituted for Affected Euro-Dollar Loans.
 
(a)
 
all Loans which would otherwise be made by such Lender as (or continued as or converted into) Euro-Dollar Loans shall instead be Base Rate Loans, and
 
(b)
 
after each of its outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans has been repaid (or converted to a Base Rate Loan), all payments of principal which would otherwise be applied to repay such Euro-Dollar Loans shall be applied to repay its Base Rate Loans instead.
 
If such Lender notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer apply, the Borrower shall elect that the principal amount of each such Base Rate Loan shall be converted into a Euro-Dollar Loan on the first day of the next succeeding Interest Period applicable to the related Euro-Dollar Loans of the other Lenders.
 
 
SECTION 8.06.
 
  If (i) the obligation of any Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02, (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03 or 8.04 or (iii) any Lender shall be a Declining Lender pursuant to Section 2.06(c), the Borrower shall have the right to seek a substitute financial institution or financial institutions () (which may be one or more of the Lenders) to purchase the Loans and assume the Commitment of such Lender (the ) under this Agreement and, if the Borrower locates a Substitute Lender, the Affected Lender shall, upon payment to it of the purchase price agreed between it and the Substitute Lender (or, failing such agreement, a purchase price in the amount of the outstanding principal amount of its Loans and accrued interest thereon to the date of payment) plus any amount (other than principal and interest) then due to it or accrued for its account hereunder, assign all its rights and obligations under
Substitution of Lender.
Substitute Lenders
Affected Lender
 
51
 
 
 
 
 this Agreement and all of its Notes to the Substitute Lender, and the Substitute Lender shall assume such rights and obligations, whereupon the Substitute Lender shall be a Lender party to this Agreement and shall have all the rights and obligations of a Lender.
 
SECTION 8.07.
 
  If during any Level I Period, Level II Period, Level III Period, Level IV Period or Level V Period (i) the obligation of any Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02 or (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03 or 8.04, the Borrower may elect to terminate this Agreement as to such Lender, and in connection therewith not to borrow any Loan hereunder from such Lender or to prepay any Base Rate Loan made pursuant to Section 8.02 or 8.05 (without altering the Commitments or Loans of the remaining Lenders); that the Borrower (i) notifies such Lender through the Agent of such election at least two Euro-Dollar Business Days before any date fixed for such borrowing or such a prepayment, as the case may be, and (ii) repays all of such Lenders outstanding Loans, accrued interest thereon and any other amounts then due to such Lender or accrued for its account hereunder concurrently with such termination.  Upon receipt by the Agent of such notice, the Commitment of such Lender shall terminate.
Election to Terminate.
provided
 
 
 
SECTION 9.01.
 
  (a) Subject to Section 9.01(b), all notices, requests and other communications to any party hereunder shall be in writing (including bank wire, facsimile transmission or similar writing) and shall be given to such party:  (x) in the case of the Borrower or the Agent (or the Issuing Bank, if JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.), at its address or facsimile number set forth on the signature pages hereof, (y) in the case of any Lender or any Issuing Bank (other than JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.), at its address or facsimile number set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire (or as otherwise communicated in writing by the applicable Issuing Bank), (z) in the case of any party, such other address or facsimile number as such party may hereafter specify for the purpose by notice to the Agent and the Borrower.  All notices from outside the United States to the Borrower shall only be given by facsimile transmission.  Each such notice, request or other communication shall be effective (i) if given by facsimile transmission, when such facsimile transmission is transmitted to the number determined pursuant to this Section and the appropriate answerback is received, (ii) if given by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, when such return receipt is signed by the recipient or (iii) if given by any other means, when delivered at the address specified in this Section, or, if such date is not a business day in the location where received, on the next business day in such location; that notices to the Agent under Article II or Article VIII shall not be effective until received.
Notices.
provided
 
(b)
 
Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder (including, without limitation, the delivery of information required by Section 5.01) may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II
provided
 
52
 
 
 
unless otherwise agreed by the Agent and the applicable Lender.  The Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
provided
 
SECTION 9.02.
 
  No failure or delay by the Agent or any Lender or any Issuing Bank in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder or under any Note shall operate as a waiver thereof nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege.  The rights and remedies herein provided shall be cumulative and not exclusive of any rights or remedies provided by law.
No Waivers.
 
SECTION 9.03.
 
  (a)  The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses of the Agent, including reasonable fees and disbursements of special counsel for the Agent, in connection with the preparation and administration of this Agreement, any waiver or consent hereunder or any amendment hereof or any Default or alleged Default hereunder, (ii) if an Event of Default occurs, all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Agent or any Lender or any Issuing Bank, including fees and disbursements of counsel, in connection with such Event of Default and collection and other enforcement proceedings resulting therefrom, and (iii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by any Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder.
Expenses; Indemnification.
 
(b)
 
The Borrower agrees to indemnify the Agent, each Lender and each Issuing Bank and each of their respective Affiliates, and the directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of each of the foregoing (each, an ) and hold each Indemnitee harmless from and against any and all liabilities, claims, losses, damages, penalties, costs and expenses of any kind, including, without limitation, the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel, which may be incurred by any Indemnitee relating to or arising out of (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement or the performance of the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder, (ii) any actual or proposed use of proceeds of Loans hereunder, (iii) any actual or proposed use of any Letter of Credit issued pursuant to this Agreement (including any refusal by any Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit) or (iv) any claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that no Indemnitee shall have the right to be indemnified hereunder for its own gross negligence or willful misconduct as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction.  To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of proceeds thereof.
Indemnitee
provided
 
53
 
 
 
(c)
 
The agreements in this Section 9.03 shall survive the termination of the Commitments and this Agreement, and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of the Loans and all the other amounts due hereunder.
 
SECTION 9.04.
 
  Any provision of this Agreement or the Notes may be amended or waived if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed by the Borrower and the Required Lenders (and, if the rights or duties of the Agent are affected thereby, by the Agent); that no such amendment or waiver shall, unless signed by each Lender directly affected thereby, (i) increase or, other than pursuant to Section 2.06(c), decrease the Commitment of any Lender or subject any Lender to any additional obligation, (ii) reduce or forgive the principal of or rate of interest on any Loan or LC Disbursement or any fees hereunder, (iii) postpone the date fixed for any payment of principal of or interest on any Loan or LC Disbursement or any fees hereunder or for any reduction or termination of any Commitment or (iv) change Section 2.07(c) or Section 2.13(c) or any other provision requiring the ratable sharing of payments or reduction of Commitments among the Lenders; that no such amendment or waiver shall (i) unless signed by all the Lenders, amend this Section 9.04 or otherwise change the percentage of the Commitments or of the aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Loans or LC Exposure, or the number of Lenders, which shall be required for the Lenders or any of them to take any action under this Section 9.04 or any other provision of this Agreement; or (ii) amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of Issuing Banks without the prior written consent of each Issuing Bank.
Amendments and Waivers.
provided
provided
further
 
SECTION 9.05.
 
  (a)  The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of an Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender and each Issuing Bank (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void), except as contemplated by Section 5.05.  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit) and each Indemnitee) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns.
 
(b)
 
Any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it); that (i) each of the Agent, each Issuing Bank and, except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender, the Borrower must give their prior written consent to such assignment (which consents shall not be unreasonably withheld, it being understood that it shall be reasonable for the Borrower to withhold consent if the proposed assignee does not have an investment grade rating), (ii) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Commitment (or, if the Commitments have terminated, the entire amount of its outstanding Loans and LC
provided
 
54
 
 
 
Exposure), the amount of the Commitment (or, if the Commitments have terminated, the amount of the outstanding Loans and LC Exposure) of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Agent otherwise consent, (iii) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, except that this clause (iii) shall not apply to rights in respect of outstanding Money Market Loans, (iv) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500 (except that such fee shall not be payable in the case of an assignment by a Lender to one of its Affiliates or to another Lender), and (v) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Agent an Administrative Questionnaire; and that any consent of the Borrower otherwise required under this Section 9.05(b) shall not be required if an Event of Default under Section 6.01(a), Section 6.01(b), Section 6.01(g) or Section 6.01(h) has occurred and is continuing.  Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to Section 9.05(d), from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.14, 8.03, 8.05 and 9.03).  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.05(b) shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with Section 9.05(e).
provided
further
 
(c)
 
The Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in The City of New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans owing to and LC Exposure of, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ).  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and the Borrower, the Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower, any Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(d)
 
Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignees completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in Section 9.05(b) and any written consent to such assignment required by Section 9.05(b), the Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register.  No
 
55
 
 
 
assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this Section 9.05(d).
 
(e)
 
Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower, the Issuing Banks or the Agent, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a ) in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (i) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (iii) the Borrower, the Agent, the Issuing Banks and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement.  Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first  proviso to Section 9.04 that affects such Participant.  Subject to Section 9.05(f), the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.14, 2.16, 8.03 and 8.04 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to Section 9.05(b).
Participant
provided
provided
 
(f)
 
A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 8.03 or 8.04 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrowers prior written consent or by reason of the provisions of Section 8.02, 8.03 or 8.04 requiring such Lender to designate a different Applicable Lending Office under certain circumstances.
 
(g)
 
Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
 
SECTION 9.06.
 
  Each Lender hereby notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Borrower in accordance with the requirements of the USA Patriot Act.  The Borrower hereby agrees to cooperate with each Lender to provide such information promptly following a request therefor from such Lender.
USA Patriot Act.
 
56
 
 
 
SECTION 9.07.
 
  (a)This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(b)
 
Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees, to the fullest extent permitted by law, that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right any party hereto may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement against any other party hereto or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)
 
Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any court referred to in Section 9.07(b).  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(d)
 
Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01.  Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 9.08.
 
  This Agreement may be signed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile transmission or other electronic transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement and understanding among the parties hereto and supersedes any and all prior agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.
Counterparts; Integration.
 
SECTION 9.09.
 
.  The headings in this Agreement are for reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement.
Headings
 
SECTION 9.10.
 
.  EACH OF THE BORROWER, THE AGENT AND THE LENDERS HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
57
 
 
 
PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
 
SECTION 9.11.
 
.  Each Lender agrees to maintain and to cause its Affiliates to maintain the confidentiality of all non-public information provided to it by the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or by the Agent on the Borrowers or such Subsidiarys behalf, under this Agreement, and neither it nor any of its Affiliates shall use any such information other than in connection with or in enforcement of this Agreement or in connection with other business now or hereafter existing or contemplated with the Borrower or any Subsidiary; except to the extent such information (i) was or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of disclosure by such Lender or its Affiliates or their respective directors, officers, employees and agents, or (ii) was or becomes available on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries so long as such source is not, to the knowledge of such Lender, prohibited from disclosing such information by a legal, contractual or fiduciary obligation to the Borrower or any of its Affiliates; that any Lender may disclose such information (A) at the request or pursuant to any requirement of any self-regulatory body, governmental body, agency or official to which such Lender or any of its Affiliates is subject or in connection with an examination of such Lender or Affiliate thereof by any such authority or body; (B) pursuant to subpoena or other court process; (C) when require to do so in accordance with the provisions of any applicable requirement of law; (D) to the extent reasonably required in connection with any litigation or proceeding to which the Agent, any Lender or their respective Affiliates may be party; (E) to the extent reasonably required in connection with the exercise of any remedy hereunder; (F) to such Lenders independent auditors, counsel, and any other professional advisors of such Lender who are advised of the confidentiality of such information; (G) to any Participant or assignee, actual or potential or to any direct or indirect contractual counterparties (or the professional advisors thereto) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations, that such Person agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to keep such information confidential to the same extent required of the Lenders hereunder; (H) as to any Lender or its Affiliate, as expressly permitted under the terms of any other document or agreement regarding confidentiality to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is party with such Lender or such Affiliate; (I) to its Affiliates and its and its Affiliates directors, officers, employees and agents, provided that each such Affiliate, director, officer, employee or agent shall keep such information confidential to the same extent required of the Lenders hereunder; and (J) to any other party to the Agreement.  Each Lender shall be responsible for any breach of this Section 9.11 by any of its Affiliates or any of its or its Affiliates directors, officers, employees and agents.
Confidentiality
provided, however,
provided
 
SECTION 9.12.
 
  The Borrower, on behalf of itself and the Subsidiaries, agrees that in connection with all aspects of the transactions contemplated hereby and any communications in connection therewith, the Borrower, the Subsidiaries and their Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Bank and their Affiliates, on the other hand, will have a business relationship that does not create, by implication or otherwise, any fiduciary duty on the part of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Bank or their Affiliates, and no
No Fiduciary Relationship.
 
58
 
 
 
such duty will be deemed to have arisen in connection with any such transactions or communications.
 
 
59
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
60
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO AETNA INC. CREDIT AGREEMENT DATED AS OF March 27, 2008
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
*  For use by any Lender requiring a second signature line.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080424065158.txt.gz
TIME:20080424065158
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 24, 2008, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Securities
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
_________________________________________________________
News Release
YSE: AET) today announced first-quarter 2008 operating earnings of $0.92 per share, a 14 percent increase over the prior year quarter.  The increase in operating earnings per share reflects a 16 percent growth in total revenue, primarily from quarter-over-quarter membership growth and premium rate increases, as well as stable underwriting results.  This improvement also reflects the benefit of share repurchases.  First-quarter net income was $0.85 per share, an increase of 5 percent over the prior-year quarter.  Operating earnings exclude net realized capital losses.
HARTFORD, Conn., April 24, 2008
 Aetna (N
(1)
 
 
 
Aetna/2
 
We are pleased to report very solid first quarter results that saw operating earnings in line with expectations, along with strong revenue growth driven by solid membership gains, said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO.  We continue to perform and grow in this challenging industry environment. The critical elements of our success have been an experienced team, a sound business strategy rooted in innovation and effectiveness, and the management of health care quality and cost through disciplined focus and execution.
We are winning in the marketplace, as demonstrated by the consistent membership growth we have shown over several quarters while adhering to our disciplined approach to profitability, and exemplified by the recent announcement of our agreement with Bank of America for 2009.  Our goal is to make Aetna the preferred company in our industry.
Our focus remains on executing our strategy to drive profitable growth, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO. We demonstrated this in the first quarter in the following ways: strong top-line growth, resulting from solid membership increases and disciplined pricing actions; strong underwriting discipline and medical cost management that led to a Commercial Medical Benefit Ratio of 79.8 percent; and effective management of capital and its accretive deployment.
Given these results, we feel confident in reaffirming our full-year 2008 operating earnings guidance of $4.00 per share, Zubretsky said. In addition, we project medical membership growth to be in the range of 850,000 to 900,000 members, a 50,000 member increase over our prior guidance.
(2)
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
Aetna/3
 
 
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
 
 
Aetna/4
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
Total company results
 
 
 
Aetna/5
 
 
The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com.  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
A live audio webcast of the first-quarter results conference call will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today.  
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 800-289-0544, or 913-312-1460for international callers.  Aetna suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 6004344. Telephone replays will be available from 11:30 a.m. ET on April 24 until midnight ET on May 7, 2008.
www.aetna.com
 
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. www.aetna.com
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/6
 
 
 
Aetna/7
 
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
 
 
Aetna/10
 
 
 
Aetna/11
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses from net income. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities.  However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetnas business operations. Management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(1)
For a reconciliation of this item to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 7 through 8 and page 10 of this press release.
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income, or to a projected change in net income, in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full-year 2008 assumes less than 505 million weighted-average diluted shares.
(2)
Operating expenses as a percentage of revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses from total revenue.
(3)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(4)  
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings information is presented net of income taxes.
 (5)
Segment revenue includes net realized capital gains and losses
(6)  
.
At March 31, 2008, approximately 28,000 and 22,000 State Childrens Health Insurance Program (SCHIP) medical members and 21,000 and 19,000 of both SCHIP pharmacy and dental members at December 31, 2007 and March 31, 2007, respectively, were reclassified from Commercial to Medicaid.  Additionally, at March 31, 2008, Aetna began including Schaller Anderson (Medicaid) dental membership.  Dental membership at December 31, 2007 has been revised accordingly.
(7)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(8)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(9)
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetna Rx Home Delivery, our mail order pharmacy, during the quarterly period.
(10)
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION; CAUTIONARY STATEMENT -- Certain information in this press release is forward looking, including our projections as to operating earnings, medical membership growth and weighted-average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to significant competition, reputational issues or other factors in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increased pharmacy costs, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; as well as changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends); and the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance. Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to:  the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; reduced levels of investment income from low interest rates; adverse government regulation (including legislative proposals eliminating or reducing ERISA pre-emption of state laws that would increase potential litigation exposure, legislative proposals that would limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, and other proposals, such as patients' rights legislation, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse pricing or funding actions by government payors; changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership in key markets; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme
 
 
 
Aetna/12
 
events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). You also should read Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2008 when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080603160323.txt.gz
TIME:20080603160323
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
Ronald M. Olejniczak has notified Aetna Inc. (the Company) that he intends to retire effective July 31, 2008.  Mr. Olejniczak will continue to serve as the Companys Vice President and Controller and principal accounting officer until his retirement.  The Company expects to file its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ending June 30, 2008, on July 31, 2008.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080619092025.txt.gz
TIME:20080619092025
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01   Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 19, 2008, Aetna Inc. issued a press release, furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference, reaffirming its second quarter and full-year 2008 earnings guidance.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
Exhibit 99.1
_________________________________________________________
News Release
 Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced that it is reaffirming its guidance for full-year 2008 operating earnings per share to be $4.00 and second-quarter operating earnings per share to be $0.93.
HARTFORD, Conn., June 19, 2008
(1)
The medical cost trend we are experiencing in the second quarter is in line with our expectations to date and consistent with our prior guidance of 7.5 percent, plus-or-minus 50 basis points, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and chief financial officer. We will provide updated information on our second-quarter earnings call on July 31.
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. www.aetna.com
 
 
 
 
Aetna/2
 
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION; CAUTIONARY STATEMENT -- Certain information in this press release is forward looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and medical cost trend.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to significant competition, reputational issues or other factors in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increased pharmacy costs, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; as well as changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends); and the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance. Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to:  the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs; the ability to successfully implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; reduced levels of investment income from low interest rates; adverse government regulation (including legislative proposals eliminating or reducing ERISA pre-emption of state laws that would increase potential litigation exposure, legislative proposals that would limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, and other proposals, such as patients' rights legislation, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse pricing actions by government payors; changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership in key markets; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC).
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080731064515.txt.gz
TIME:20080731064515
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 31, 2008, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended June 30, 2008.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
_________________________________________________________
News Release
YSE: AET) today announced second-quarter 2008 operating earnings of $0.94 per share, a 13 percent increase over the prior-year quarter.  The increase in operating earnings per share reflects 15 percent growth in total revenue, solid underwriting results and the impact of share repurchases.  The growth in total revenue was primarily from quarter-over-quarter membership growth and premium rate increases.  Second-quarter net income was $0.97 per share, an increase of 14 percent over the prior-year quarter.  Operating earnings exclude net realized capital losses and other items.
HARTFORD, Conn., July 31, 2008
 Aetna (N
(1)
 
 
 
Aetna/2
Aetnas performance in the second quarter demonstrates our ability to continue producing solid results driven by strong revenue growth as well as membership gains, even in a challenging economic and industry environment, said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO. Our success continues to be rooted in two basic principles:  providing our customers with innovative products and services tailored to their needs; and managing health care quality and cost for our customers with disciplined focus and execution.
Our focus remains on delivering profitable growth, and we are well positioned to deliver on our projections for 2008, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO.  We are therefore confident in reaffirming our full-year 2008 operating earnings guidance of $4.00 per share.We also expect solid operating earnings per share growth in 2009, and we remain committed to our long term operating earnings per share growth goal of 15 percent.
(2)  
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/3 
 
 
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
Total company results
 
 
Aetna/4 
 
The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor In link on the internet at www.aetna.com.  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
A live audio webcast of the second-quarter results conference call will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today.  
nformatio
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 866-409-1561, or 913-312-1466for international callers.  Aetna suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
 
 
Aetna/5 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 8312145. Telephone replays will be available from 11:30 a.m. ET on July 31 until midnight ET on August 13, 2008.
www.aetna.com
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.2 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates.
www.aetna.com
 
 
Aetna/6 
 
 
Aetna/7 
 
 
 
Aetna/8 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/9 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/10 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/11
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income as discussed below.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.  Each of the excluded items is discussed below:
(1)
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 7 through 8 and page 10 of this press release.
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income, or to a projected change in net income, in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full-year 2008 assumes less than 495 million weighted-average diluted shares.
(2)
Operating expenses as a percentage of revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses from total revenue.  Aetna also displays operating expenses as a percentage of revenue excluding revenue and operating expenses from the 2007 acquisitions of Schaller Anderson and Goodhealth Worldwide.
(3)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(4)  
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings information is presented net of income taxes.
 (5)
Segment revenue includes net realized capital gains and losses
(6)  
.
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(7)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(8)
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetna Rx Home Delivery, our mail order pharmacy, during the quarterly period.
(9)
 
 
 
Aetna/12
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this press release is forward looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted-average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits). Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to:  unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increased pharmacy costs, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; as well as changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends); the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; reduced levels of investment income from low interest rates; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). You also should read Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2008 when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080806160205.txt.gz
TIME:20080806160205
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On August 4, 2008, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) announced that Rajan Parmeswar was appointed Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer of Aetna.  Mr. Parmeswar is expected to commence employment at Aetna on August 18, 2008.  Mr. Parmeswar succeeds Ronald M. Olejniczak who, as previously announced, retired from Aetna on July 31, 2008.
 
Mr. Parmeswar, age 46, is a certified public accountant and is currently an audit partner at Pricewaterhouse Coopers LLP, a position he has held since 1998.  Mr. Parmeswar joined Pricewaterhouse Coopers LLP in 1989.
 
The key terms of Mr. Parmeswars compensation arrangements are as follows:
* Reflects the theoretical grant date value of the SARs to be granted. The strike price and the number of SARs will be determined using Aetnas closing stock price on the grant date and a SAR valuation factor of 30% (i.e., the number of SARs granted will be equal to the dollar value of the theoretical grant date value divided by a factor determined by multiplying Aetnas closing stock price on the grant date by 30%).
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080825162607.txt.gz
TIME:20080825162607
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Senior members of Aetna Inc.s (the Companys) management team will be meeting with investors and analysts from August 26, 2008 through September 12, 2008.  Those discussions will focus on the Companys strategy, tactics and future outlook.  During these meetings, the Company intends to reaffirm its publicly disclosed third quarter and full-year 2008 guidance, which includes third quarter 2008 operating earnings of $1.12 per share and full-year 2008 operating earnings of $4.00 per share, and repeat its publicly disclosed expectation of solid operating earnings per share growth in 2009.
1
  Projected full-year 2008 operating earnings per share exclude after tax net realized capital losses of $52.3 million and the release of reserves for anticipated future losses on discontinued products of $28.5 million, after-tax, reported by the Company for the six months ended June 30, 2008.  Projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any net realized capital gains or losses and other items occurring after June 30, 2008.  The Company is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or other items and cannot therefore reconcile projected operating earnings per share in any period to projected net income per share.  Projected full-year 2008 operating earnings assume less than 495 million weighted-average diluted shares.
1
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted-average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits). Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to:  unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increased pharmacy costs, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; as well as changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends); the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; reduced levels of investment income from low interest rates; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). You also should read Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2008 on file with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
All of the information furnished in this report shall not be deemed to be filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080912171518.txt.gz
TIME:20080912171518
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
Item 1.01  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On September 9, 2008, Aetna Inc. (the Company) executed a Pricing Agreement (the Pricing Agreement) with Banc of America Securities LLC, Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., as representatives of the underwriters named in Schedule I thereto (together, the Underwriters), pursuant to which the Company agreed to issue and sell to the Underwriters $500 million aggregate principal amount of its 6.50% senior notes due September 15, 2018 (the Senior Notes).  The Pricing Agreement incorporated by reference the terms of a previously-filed Underwriting Agreement (the Underwriting Agreement) of the Company dated as of June 6, 2006.  The sale of the Senior Notes was registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission in a Registration Statement on Form S-3, File No. 333-130126.  The Senior Notes were offered pursuant to a prospectus dated December 5, 2005 and a prospectus supplement dated September 9, 2008.  The closing of the sale of the Senior Notes occurred on September 12, 2008.
 
The Underwriting Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report, and the Pricing Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 1.2 to this Current Report, are incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 1.01.
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01  Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On September 12, 2008, the Company issued a press release announcing the completion of the offering and sale of the Senior Notes.  A copy of the press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report.
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01  Other Events.
 
In connection with the offering and sale of the Senior Notes, an officers certificate of the Company was executed to establish and designate the Senior Notes and the terms and characteristics of the Senior Notes (the Officers Certificate).  The Senior Notes were issued, and the Officers Certificate was executed, pursuant to the Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee.
 
The Officers Certificate is filed as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report and is incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 8.01.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 
Banc of America Securities LLC
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.
 
As Representatives of the several
Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
 
September 9, 2008
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and in the Underwriting Agreement dated as of June 6, 2006 (the ), to issue and sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the ) the debt securities specified in Schedule II hereto (the ). Each of the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety, and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein; and each of the representations and warranties set forth therein shall be deemed to have been made at and as of the date of this Pricing Agreement. Each reference to the Representatives herein and in the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement so incorporated by reference shall be deemed to refer to you. Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Underwriting Agreement are used herein as therein defined. The Representatives designated to act on behalf of each of the Underwriters of the Designated Securities pursuant to Section 15 of the Underwriting Agreement and the address of the Representatives referred to in such Section 15 are set forth at the end of Schedule II hereto.
Company
Underwriting Agreement
Underwriters
Designated Securities
 
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, the Company agrees to issue and to sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the time and place and at the purchase price to the Underwriters set forth in Schedule II hereto, the principal amount of Designated Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto.
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof, including the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of
 
 
the Underwriters is or will be pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of Agreement Among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request.
 
2
 
Accepted
as of the date hereof:
 
Banc of America Securities LLC
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.
 
On behalf of each of the
Underwriters
 
 
3
 
 
TITLE OF DESIGNATED SECURITIES:
 
6.50% Senior Notes due September 15, 2018 (hereinafter referred to as the )
Notes
 
AGGREGATE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT:
 
$500,000,000
 
PRICE TO PUBLIC:
 
99.716% of the principal amount of the Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from September 12, 2008.
 
PURCHASE PRICE BY UNDERWRITERS:
 
99.066% of the principal amount of the Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from September 12, 2008.
 
SPECIFIED FUNDS FOR PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE:
 
Immediately Available Funds
 
INDENTURE:
 
Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001, between the Company, and U.S. Bank National Association, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as Trustee.
 
MATURITY:
 
September 15, 2018
 
INTEREST RATE:
 
6.50% per annum
 
INTEREST PAYMENT DATES:
 
March 15 and September 15, beginning March 15, 2009.
 
 
REDEMPTION PROVISIONS:
 
Optional Redemption
The Notes will be redeemable at any time, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
 means, with respect to any redemption date for any portion of the Notes,
Treasury Rate
 
6
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 means, with respect to any redemption date for any Notes, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 means each of Banc of America Securities LLC, Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in New York City (a  ), the Company will substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 days but no more than 60 days before the redemption date to each holder of Notes to be redeemed.
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the redemption price, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or portions of the Notes called for redemption on and after the redemption date.
 
Repurchase Upon a Change of Control
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Notes in full, as described under Optional Redemption above, the Company will make an offer to each holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such holders Notes at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ).Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to holders of Notes describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Notes on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Notes and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act, and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes by virtue of such conflicts.
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Notes upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Notes properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Notes and the Senior Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Notes unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Notes at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
7
 means the Notes are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Notes, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Notes by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the rating agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
, in each case until the end
of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of our intention to effect a Change of Control;
provided, however
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will
Change of Control
provided, however
 
8
 
not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
voting stock
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Notes; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Notes or fails to make a rating of the Notes publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule
Rating Agencies
 
9
 
15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
SINKING FUND PROVISIONS:
 
No sinking fund provisions
 
TIME OF DELIVERY:
 
9:00 a.m. Eastern time on September 12, 2008
 
CLOSING LOCATION:
 
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, 125 Broad Street, New York, New York10004
 
NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF REPRESENTATIVES:
 
Banc of America Securities LLC
One Bryant Park
New York, New York 10036
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
388 Greenwich Street
New York, New York  10013
J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.
270 Park Avenue
New York, New York  10017
10
 
 
Time of Sale
2:00 p.m. on September 9, 2008
Time of Sale Information
Preliminary Prospectus dated September 9, 2008
Free Writing Prospectus dated September 9, 2008
 

Exhibit 4.1
Kim A. Keck, Head of Finance, Corporate, and Alfred P. Quirk, Jr., Vice President, Finance and Treasurer, each of Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), pursuant to Sections 201 and 301 of the Senior Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2001 (the ), between the Company, as issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the ), and pursuant to resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors of the Company on September 28, 2007 and the Delegation of Authority of Ronald A. Williams, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of the Company, dated September 8, 2008 (the  ), hereby certify that there are hereby approved and established pursuant to the Indenture a series of securities (the ) of the Company whose terms shall be as set forth in Annex A attached hereto.
Company
Indenture
Trustee
Company
Resolutions
Securities
 
Each of the undersigned officers (i) has read the applicable provisions of the Indenture, (ii) has reviewed the forms and terms of the Securities, (iii) in the opinion of each of the undersigned, has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable the undersigned to express an informed opinion as to whether or not the applicable covenants and conditions of the Indenture have been complied with, (iv) hereby certifies that the applicable covenants and conditions of the Indenture have been complied with and (v) hereby certifies that the forms and terms of the Securities comply with the Indenture.
 
Capitalized terms used but not defined herein have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Indenture.
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, we have hereunto signed our names as of the date first written above.
 
 
2
 ANNEX A
1
 
.  The Securities shall be known and designated as the 6.50% Senior Notes due September 15, 2018 of the Company (the ).
Securities
2
 
.  The aggregate principal amount of the Securities which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is initially limited to $500,000,000 (except for such Securities authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, other Securities pursuant to Sections 304, 305, 306, 906 or 1107 of the Indenture and except for any Securities which, pursuant to Section 303 of the Indenture, are deemed never to have been authenticated and delivered thereunder).  Additional Securities may be authenticated and delivered from time to time as contemplated in Section 301 of the Indenture.
3
 
.  The Stated Maturity of the principal of the Securities shall be September 15, 2018.
4
 
.  The Securities shall bear interest at the rate of 6.50% per annum, which will accrue from September 12, 2008, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, as the case may be, payable semi-annually on March 15 and September 15 in each year, commencing March 15, 2009, to the Person in whose name such Securities (or one or more predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date next preceding the Interest Payment Date.  Each March 15 and September 15 shall be an  for such Securities, and the February 28 or August 31 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding an Interest Payment Date shall be the  for the interest payable on such Interest Payment Date.
Interest Payment Date
Regular Record Date
5
 
.  The Securities are unsecured.
6
 
.  Payment of the principal of and interest on the Securities will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York; provided, however, that at any time that the Securities are not represented by Global Securities, at the option of the Company, payment of interest may be made by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as such address shall appear in the Security Register.
7
 
.  The Securities will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, at any time, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
 
 
3
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Securities,
Treasury Rate
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Securities that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Securities.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 
4
 
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Securities, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 means each of Banc of America Securities LLC, Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in New York City (a  ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each holder of the Securities.
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Securities called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
8
 
. If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Securities in full, the Company will make an offer to each Holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Securities at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ).Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of Securities describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Securities on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Securities and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ), and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities,
Exchange Act
 
5
 
 
the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities by virtue of such conflicts.
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Securities upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Securities properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Securities and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Securities unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Securities at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 means the Securities are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Securities, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Securities by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 
 
6
 
foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the rating agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
Change of Control
provided, however
voting stock
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Securities; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by
Continuing Directors
 
7
 
approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Securities or fails to make a rating of the Securities publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
Rating Agencies
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
9
.   The Company shall not be obligated to redeem or purchase the Securities pursuant to any sinking fund or analogous provision, or at the option of any Holder thereof, except as provided above.
10
.  The Securities shall be issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
11
.  The Securities shall be issued in the form of one or more Global Securities registered in the name of The Depository Trust Company () or its nominee, to be deposited with, or on behalf of, The Depository Trust Company, New York, New York.
DTC
12
.  U.S. Bank National Association shall act as paying agent and registrar with respect to the Securities.
13
.  The Securities shall be in such form or forms as may be approved by the officers of the Company as provided in the Company Resolutions, such approval to be evidenced by any such officers manual or facsimile signature on the Securities, provided
 
8
 
 
that such form or forms of the Securities are not inconsistent with the requirements of the Indenture or the Company Resolutions and are substantially in the form or forms attached hereto as Exhibit A-1.
9
 
Exhibit A-1
THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF.  THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO, OR REGISTERED OR EXCHANGED FOR SECURITIES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF, ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF, AND NO SUCH TRANSFER MAY BE REGISTERED EXCEPT IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE.  EVERY SECURITY AUTHENTICATED AND DELIVERED UPON REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER OF, OR IN EXCHANGE FOR OR IN LIEU OF, THIS SECURITY SHALL BE A GLOBAL SECURITY SUBJECT TO THE FOREGOING, EXCEPT IN SUCH LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES.
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation (""), to Aetna Inc. or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
DTC
CUSIP: 008117 AM5
ISIN: US008117AM56
 
 
AETNA INC., a Pennsylvania corporation (herein called the ), which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of FIVE HUNDRED MILLION Dollars ($500,000,000) upon presentation and surrender of this Security on September 15, 2018, and to pay interest thereon from September 12, 2008 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually on March 15 and September 15 in each year,
Company
 
 
10
 
commencing March 15, 2009, at the rate of 6.50% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made available for payment.  The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the February 28 or August 31 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date.  Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Securities of this series not less than 10 calendar days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture.
Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on this Security will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts.
Reference is hereby made to the further provisions of this Security set forth on the reverse hereof, which further provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as if set forth at this place.  Such provisions include, without limitation, provisions relating to redemption of this Security by the Company.
Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee referred to on the reverse hereof by manual signature, this Security shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
 
11
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
Dated: September 12, 2008
 
 
 
[SEAL]
Attest:
__________________
Melinda Westbrook
This is one of the Securities of the series designated under, and referred to in, the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
 
12
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the ), issued and to be issued in one or more series under a Senior Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2001 (herein called the ), between the Company, as issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association (as successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company), as Trustee (herein called the , which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered.  This Security is one of the series designated on the face hereof, initially limited in aggregate principal amount to $500,000,000, subject to future issuances of additional Securities pursuant to Section 301 of the Indenture.
Securities
Indenture
Trustee
The Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, at any time, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Securities,
Treasury Rate
 
13
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Securities to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Securities to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Securities, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 means each of Banc of America Securities LLC, Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in New York City (a  ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
 
14
 
 
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each Holder of the Securities of this series.
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Securities of this series called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
If this Security is redeemed in part only, a new Security or Securities of this series and of like tenor for the unredeemed portion hereof will be issued in the name of the Holder hereof upon the cancellation hereof.
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Securities in full, the Company will make an offer to each Holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Securities at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ).Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of Securities describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Securities on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required hereby and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ), and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities by virtue of such conflicts.
Exchange Act
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Securities upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Securities properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Securities and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Securities unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Securities at 101% of the
provided
 
15
 
 
outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 means the Securities are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Securities, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Securities by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the rating agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or
Change of Control
 
16
 
consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
provided, however
voting stock
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Securities; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 
17
 
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Securities or fails to make a rating of the Securities publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
Rating Agencies
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
If an Event of Default with respect to Securities of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Securities of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture.
The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the rights of the Holders of the Securities of each series to be affected under the Indenture at any time by the Company and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities at the time Outstanding of each series to be affected.  The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of specified percentages in principal amount of the Securities of each series at the time Outstanding, on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series, to waive compliance by the Company with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and their consequences.  Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Security shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Security and of any Security issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange hereof or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Security.
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Security or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the transfer of this Security is registrable in the Security Register upon surrender of this Security for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Company in any place where the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security are payable, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or such
 
18
 
 
Holders attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Securities of this series and of like tenor, of authorized denominations and for the same aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
The Securities of this series are issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.  As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, Securities of this series are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of Securities of this series and of like tenor of a different authorized denomination, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company or the Trustee may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, other than exchanges pursuant to Section 304, 906 or 1107 of the Indenture not involving any transfer.
Prior to due and proper presentment of this Security for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name this Security is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Security is overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
The Indenture provides that the Company, at the Companys option, (a) will be discharged from any and all obligations in respect of the Securities (except for certain obligations to register the transfer or exchange of Securities, replace stolen, lost or mutilated Securities, maintain paying agencies and hold moneys for payment in trust) or (b) need not comply with certain restrictive covenants of the Indenture, in each case if the Company deposits, in trust, with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations which through the payment of interest thereon and principal thereof in accordance with their terms will provide money, in an amount sufficient to pay all the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on, the Securities on the dates such payments are due in accordance with the terms of such Securities, and certain other conditions are satisfied.
No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, or interest on this Security, or for any claim based hereon, or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture or any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer, employee, agent or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
 
19
 
 
All terms used in this Security which are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
20

Exhibit 99.1
 
__________________________________________________________
News Release
 Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced that it has completed a public offering of $500 million of its 6.5 percent Senior Notes due in 2018.  The company intends to use the net proceeds from the offering torepay outstanding commercial paper borrowings
HARTFORD, Conn., September 12, 2008
 
.
 
 
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.2 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. www.aetna.com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080918080416.txt.gz
TIME:20080918080416
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 8 
Other Events
Item 8.01 Other Events.
Aetna Inc. (together with its consolidated subsidiaries, the Company) has a diversified investment portfolio, including investments in the financial services industry.  At June 30, 2008, the Company had an investment portfolio with an aggregate book value of approximately $12.7 billion (excluding investments supporting experience-rated and discontinued products in the Company's Large Case Pensions business, which generally do not affect the Company's results of operations) and shareholders' equity of $9.7 billion.  In this portfolio, the book value of the Company's investment in debt securities of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc. ("Lehman") and its affiliates and American International Group, Inc. and its affiliates ("AIG") as of September 17, 2008 was approximately $132 million and $102 million, respectively.  The Company is continuing to assess the recoverability of these investments.  The Company has no equity or preferred stock investments in Lehman or its affiliates or AIG.
The Company also has a reinsurance recoverable in the amount of $163 million (at August 31, 2008) from an affiliate of Lehman.  The Lehman affiliate currently is not part of Lehmans bankruptcy proceedings and to date has performed its reinsurance obligations to the Company, and the reinsurance recoverable is collateralized by assets held in a trust.  The Company does not have any reinsurance withAIG.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080929073629.txt.gz
TIME:20080929073629
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 8 
Other Events
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
As previously disclosed on September 18, 2008, Aetna Inc. (together with its consolidated subsidiaries, "Aetna") has a reinsurance recoverable (the Recoverable) in the amount of $163 million (at August 31, 2008) from an affiliate of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.  The Recoverable results from a 1999 transaction in which Lehman Re Ltd. (a Bermuda company, Lehman Re) reinsured a block of paid-up group whole life insurance policies issued by Aetna between 1941 and October 22, 1999.  On September 19, 2008, Aetna took possession of the assets supporting the Recoverable (the Assets), which previously were held as collateral in a trust.  On September 23, 2008, Lehman Re commenced proceedings in Bermuda to liquidate itself.  Given current market conditions, the value of the Assets may continue to fluctuate, and Aetna currently estimates that the Assets have a market value that is less than the amount of the Recoverable.  Aetna intends to pursue its claims in Lehman Res liquidation proceedings, including its claim for any amount by which Lehman Res obligations to Aetna exceed the Assets.  Aetna will assess the impact of these circumstances in connection with the preparation of its third quarter 2008 financial statements.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20080930160950.txt.gz
TIME:20080930160950
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On September 26, 2008, the Aetna Inc. (Aetna) Board of Directors (the Board) appointed Richard J. Harrington a Director of Aetna effective immediately.  Mr. Harringtons term will run until Aetnas 2009 Annual Meeting of Shareholders.  Mr. Harrington, 61, is chairman of the Thomson Reuters Foundation.  With the appointment of Mr. Harrington, Aetna's Board consists of thirteen directors.
Mr. Harrington was also appointed to the Boards Audit Committee and Investment and Finance Committee.
The Board affirmatively determined in its business judgment that Mr. Harrington is independent as defined in the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) listing standards and under Aetnas Director Independence Standards and that any relationship with Aetna or its subsidiaries (either directly or as a partner, shareholder or officer of any organization that has a relationship with Aetna or its subsidiaries) is immaterial under the independence test thresholds contained in the NYSE listing standards and under Aetnas Director Independence Standards. 
In addition, the Board determined in its business judgment that Mr. Harrington meets the independence, financial literacy and expertise requirements for audit committee members set forth in the NYSE listing standards and that, based on his background and experience, Mr. Harrington has the requisite attributes of an audit committee financial expert as defined by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Aetna will compensate Mr. Harrington in the manner and amounts and pursuant to the plans applicable to all Aetna Directors as described in the 2008 Aetna Inc. Notice of Annual Meeting and Proxy Statement, including fees related to service on Board committees.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20081029064852.txt.gz
TIME:20081029064852
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 29, 2008, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended September 30, 2008.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
 
Exhibit 99.1
_________________________________________________________
News Release
YSE: AET) today announced third-quarter 2008 operating earnings of $1.12 per share, a 15 percent increase over the prior-year quarter.  The increase in operating earnings per share reflects 14 percent growth in revenue (excluding net realized capital losses), solid underwriting results, operating expense efficienciesand the impact of the companys share repurchases.  The growth in revenue was primarily from quarter-over-quarter membership growth and premium rate increases.  Operating earnings exclude net realized capital losses and an other item.
HARTFORD, Conn., October 29, 2008
 Aetna (N
(1)
(3)
 
 
 
Aetna/2
Third quarter net income was $0.58 per share, a decrease of 39 percent over the prior-year quarter, primarily due to net realized capital losses of $0.48 per share as well as $0.06 per share for an allowance recorded against a reinsurance recoverable from a subsidiary of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.  The majority of the net realized capital losses resulted from declines in the market value of certain securities in the companys investment portfolio as a result of deteriorating global economic conditions.  The company does not expect the net realized capital losses or any other impacts of the current financial markets turmoil to have a material impact on its financial position or liquidity.  Third quarter 2008 total revenue, which includes net realized capital losses, grew 10 percent over the prior-year quarter.
 
Despite the significant weakening of the U.S. economy as well as the unprecedented turmoil in the financial markets around the world, our core business performance remains solid, said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO. We continue to win in the marketplace by offering a broad range of products and providing excellent customer service.  Aetna also continues to be proactive at the national and state levels in promoting the important issues of increased accessibility and affordability of health care and improved quality for more Americans.  Our national presence, strong competitive position and well-conceived strategy have continued to produce solid results even in this difficult economy.
 
Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO, said, While we did incur investment losses this quarter due to the turmoil in the capital markets, Aetna is well-capitalized, with a strong balance sheet and excellent cash flows and liquidity.  We expect to generate over $1 billion of excess capital in 2008 and currently have no need to raise additional capital.  Our underwriting results were strong, demonstrating our continued ability to manage costs and price with discipline.
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/3
 
"We have lowered our 2008 full-year operating earnings per share guidance to $3.90 to
$3.95 primarily due to lower net investment income in the fourth quarter than we originally projected.
(2)
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
Aetna/4
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
 
 
 
Aetna/5
 
 
 
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
 
 
Total company results
 
 
 
Aetna/6
 
 
 
A live audio webcast of Aetnas conference call to discuss third quarter results, 2008 guidance and preliminary 2009 guidance will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today.  The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com.  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 877-397-0297, or 719-325-4860for international callers.  Aetna suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call.  The access code is 9786614.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 9786614. Telephone replays will be available from 11:30 a.m. ET on October 29 until midnight ET on November 12, 2008.
 
 
 
/7
Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.2 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates.
www.aetna.com
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
 
Aetna/10
 
 
Aetna/11
 
Aetna/12
 
Aetna/13
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/14
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income as discussed below.    Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.  Each of the excluded items is discussed below:
(1)
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses.
Aetna also provides medical benefit ratios excluding development of prior-period health care cost estimates when that development is significant.  Each quarter, Aetna re-examines previously established health care cost payable estimates based on actual claim submissions and other changes in facts and circumstances.  Decreases (increases) in prior periods estimates represent the effect of favorable (unfavorable) development of prior-period health care cost estimates on current period results of operations at each financial statement date.  Aetna believes excluding significant prior-period reserve development better reflects the underlying current-period health care costs.
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 10 through 11 and page 13 of this press release.
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income, or to a projected change in net income, in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full-year 2008 assumes approximately 490 million weighted-average diluted shares.
(2)
Operating expenses as a percentage of revenue excludes the allowance recorded on the reinsurance recoverable (described in footnote above) from operating expenses and net realized capital gains and losses from total revenue.
(3)
(1)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(4)
Includes an allowance on reinsurance recoverable as described in footnote above.
(
5
)
(1)
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings information is presented net of income taxes.
(6)
Includesmembers who participated in a CMS pilot program under which we provided disease and case management services to selected Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries in exchange for a fee.  This program terminated in September 2008.
(7)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(8)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(9)
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetna Rx Home Delivery, our mail order pharmacy, during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(10)
 
 
 
Aetna/15
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this press release is forward looking, including our expectations and projections as to operating earnings per share, increase in 2009 pension expense, weighted average diluted shares and the impact of the current financial markets turmoil on Aetna's financial position or liquidity.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including adverse economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, increased pharmacy costs, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; as well as changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends). Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).  You also should read each of the following documents for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition:  Aetna's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on September 18, 2008 as amended by Aetna's Current Report on Form 8-K/A filed with the SEC on September 29, 2008, Aetna's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the SEC on September 12, 2008, Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q/A for the quarter ended June 30, 2008, filed with the SEC on August 1, 2008 and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008 when filed with the SEC.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20081218215042.txt.gz
TIME:20081218215042
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
 
On December 17, 2008, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) announced it will reduce its workforce by approximately 1,000 positions, or less than 3% of Aetnas 36,208 employees.  This action is designed to align administrative expenses with Aetnas growth outlook for 2009 and redirect resources to areas with a greater potential for future growth.  The workforce reduction and related real estate lease consolidations are expected to be completed in the fourth quarter of 2008.  As a result of these actions, Aetna expects to incur a fourth quarter charge of approximately $28 million, after tax, related to severance and benefit costs and a fourth quarter charge of approximately $7 million, after tax, related to the consolidation of real estate leases.  Aetna expects approximately $34 million, after tax, of these charges to result in future cash expenditures.
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward looking, including our projections as to severance and benefit costs, real estate lease consolidation costs and future cash expenditures.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual outcomes and results to differ materially from what is expressed in the information in this Form 8-K, including changes in Aetnas actual tax rate compared to the rate assumed in estimating the charges, changes in the number of severed employees compared to the number assumed in estimating the charges, changes in the amounts payable to severed employees compared to the amounts assumed in estimating the charges and completion of agreements with lease and related counterparties prior to December 31, 2008. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K or its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).  You also should read Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, on file with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20090112084439.txt.gz
TIME:20090112084439
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
    Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
    Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On January 12, 2009 at 1:30 p.m. Eastern time (10:30 a.m. Pacific time), Ronald A. Williams, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Aetna Inc. (Aetna) will provide a presentation at the J. P. Morgan Healthcare Conference.  Mr. Williams also will meet with investors and analysts after the presentation.  A copy of Aetnas presentation is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1, and the information in the presentation as to Aetnas projected 2008 results of operations and financial condition is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 2.02.
 
During the presentation and the subsequent meetings, Aetna intends to update its full-year 2008 guidance, including reaffirming its previously disclosed projected full-year 2008 operating earnings of $3.90 to $3.95 per share.
1
  Aetna also wi
ll update its
preliminary
guidance on certain 2009 performance metrics, including full-year 2009 operating earnings per share.  Aetna currently
projects
full-year 2009 operating earnings per share growth to be 12% to 14% excluding the projected year-over-y
ear increase in pension expense, consistent with Aetna's prior guidance.  Including the projected year-over-year increase in pension expense of $.54 per share, Aetna
projects
full-year 2009 operating earnings per share to be slightly lower than 2008.  Aetn
a
s projected 2008 opera
ting earnings per share include
approximately $.15 per share of pension benefit.  As a result of the significant decline in equity markets experienced during 2008, Aetna
s projected 2009 operating earnings per share include a pensio
n expense of approximately $.39 per share, or a projected year-over-year increase of $.54 per share.  Aetna
s previous guidance provided on
October 29, 2008
, included a year-over-year
increase
in pension expense range of $.30 to $.40 per share; but since t
hat time, the equity markets and interest rates have declined, resulting in an additional increase in Aetna
s net pension obligations as of the
December 31, 2008
measurement date.
 
The presentation will be accessible on Aetnas Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor.  A webcast replay will be available on that web site, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 days.
 
 
   Projected full-year 2008 operating earnings per share exclude after tax net realized capital losses of $232.0 million, the release of reserves for anticipated future losses on discontinued products of $28.5 million, after-tax, and an allowance against a reinsurance recoverable from Lehman Re of $27.4 million after tax reported by the Company in the nine months ended September 30, 2008.  Projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any net realized capital gains or losses and other items occurring after September 30, 2008.  The Company is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or other items and cannot therefore reconcile projected operating earnings per share in any period to projected net income per share.
1
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT -- Certain information in this Form 8-K and the furnished presentation are forward-looking, including our current estimates and projections as to operating earnings per share, medical membership, health care revenue, medical benefit ratios, medical cost trend, operating expense ratio, pension benefit or expense, 12/31/08 statutory surplus, 12/31/08 debt to capital ratio, 12/31/08 risk based capital ratios, generation of excess capital, need to raise additional capital, ability to hold assets to maturity and investment portfolio declines/losses.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including adverse economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, increased pharmacy costs, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; as well as changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends). Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; the
 
 
ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC").  You also should read Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008, on file with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial conditions.
 
The information in this Item 2.02 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
The information above in Item 2.02 of this current report, other than the portion of Aetnas presentation thereby incorporated by reference in such Item 2.02, is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 7.01. A copy of Aetnas presentation is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1, and the information in that presentation other than the information as to Aetnas projected 2008 results of operations and financial condition is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 7.01.
 
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20090212063144.txt.gz
TIME:20090212063144
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 12, 2009, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2008.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

99.1
Exhibit
 
_________________________________________________________
News Release
YSE: AET) today announced that fourth-quarter 2008 operating earnings per share, which exclude net realized capital losses and other items, increased 9 percent to $0.96.  Full-year 2008 operating earnings per share increased 13 percent to $3.93.  The increase in operating earnings per share reflects significant growth in revenue, solid underwriting results and continued operating expense efficiencies, partially offset by lower net investment income.  Operating results also benefited from share repurchases and the full-year impact of recent acquisitions.  The companys 17 percent growth in full year health care revenue was driven by premium rate increases and medical membership growth in both core and newer customer segments.  Total health care revenue, including realized capital losses, grew by 16 percent for the full year.
HARTFORD, Conn., February 12, 2009
 Aetna (N
(1)
 
 
 
Aetna/2
Net income, which includes net realized capital losses and other items, was $0.42 per share for the fourth quarter of 2008, 52 percent lower than the prior-year quarter, due to net realized capital losses of $0.42 per share and the previously announced severance and facility charge and contribution for the establishment of a new out-of-network pricing database of $.08 and $.04 per share, respectively.  Full-year 2008 net income was $2.83 per share, 18 percent lower than 2007, primarily due to net realized capital losses of $.99 per share.  The majority of the net realized capital losses resulted from declines in the market value of debt securities in the companys investment portfolio as a result of the widening of credit spreads in 2008.
 
 
Aetna delivered another year of solid results in 2008 despite the challenging economic environment, said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO. These results included industry-leading organic medical membership growth of 848,000, or 5 percent; more than half of which came from growth in newer customer segments. This growth underscores the success of our segmentation strategy to continuously identify new customer markets to serve.
 
 
Aetna/3
As we enter 2009, we are listening very closely to our customers to make sure we understand their needs and can respond appropriately," Williams said.  "Our underlying business fundamentals remain strong because of our sound and flexible operating model and a value proposition that is resonating in the marketplace. We believe we remain well positioned for continued success.
We delivered industry-leading operating earnings per share growth of 13 percent in 2008, a strong result in light of the increasingly difficult economic environment that developed as the year progressed, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO. Our strong membership growth, combined with our disciplined pricing actions, drove double-digit revenue growth.
In addition, despite the impact of the volatile financial markets on our investment portfolio, our sound investment and capital management strategies enabled us to end 2008 with a high-quality balance sheet and in an excellent capital position, Zubretsky said.  We project our 2009 operating earnings per share to be $3.85 to $3.95.  Excluding the incremental non-cash pension expense we expect in 2009, this represents a 12 to 14 percent growth over 2008.
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
Aetna/4
 
 
Full-year 2008 operating earnings for Health Care were $1.9 billion, compared with $1.8 billion in 2007.  Full-year operating earnings were higher primarily due to 17 percent revenue growth (excluding net realized capital losses), primarily from membership growth and premium rate increases.  Full-year 2008 net income was $1.6 billion, compared with $1.7 billion in 2007. Full-year 2008 net income includes $213.1 million of net realized capital losses, a $35.6 million severance and facility charge and a $20.0 million contribution to a non-profit organization to help create a new independent database for determining out-of-network reimbursement rates.  Full-year 2008 Commercial MBR was 80.3 percent, compared with 79.5 percent for 2007.  Full-year membership growth was 848,000.
 
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Aetna/5
 
 
For full-year 2008, Group Insurance reported operating earnings of $140.0 million, compared with $145.5 million for 2007.  The decrease was due to lower net investment income partially offset by an improved underwriting margin.  Full-year net loss for 2008 was $112.1 million, including net realized capital losses of $224.7 million, and $27.4 million for the allowance recorded on a reinsurance recoverable from a subsidiary of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.  Full-year net income for 2007 was $120.4 million.
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
For full-year 2008, Large Case Pensions, reported operating earnings of $39.2 million, compared with $38.1 million for 2007.  Full-year net income for 2008 was $23.2 million, including $44.5
million of net realized capital losses, compared with a net income of $79.0 million for 2007.  Net income for full-year 2008 and 2007 also includes $28.5 million and $41.8 million, respectively, of after-tax benefits related to the reduction of reserves for discontinued products.
Total company results
 
 
Aetna/6
 
 
 
 
Aetna/7
 
 
 
Aetnas conference call to discuss fourth quarter and full-year 2008 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today.  The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com.  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 877-419-6603, or 719-325-4889for international callers.  Aetna suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call.  The access code is 6507984.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 6507984. Telephone replays will be available from 11:30 a.m. ET on February 12 until midnight ET on February 26, 2009.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.5 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates.  For more information, see www.aetna.com.
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
Aetna/10
 
 
 
Aetna/11
 
Aetna/12
 
 
 
Aetna/13
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/14
 
Aetna/15
 
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income as discussed below.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.  Each of the excluded items is discussed below:
(1)
 
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses.
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 10 through 12 and page 14 of this press release.
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income, or to a projected change in net income, in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2009 assumes approximately 460 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
 
Operating expenses as a percentage of revenue excludes a severance and facility charge, the contribution to a non-profit organization and the allowance recorded on the reinsurance recoverable (each of which are described in footnote above) from operating expenses and net realized capital gains and losses from total revenue.
(3)
(1)
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pre-tax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(4)
 
Includes the severance and facility charge, the contribution to a non-profit organization and the allowance on reinsurance recoverable, each of which are described in footnote above.
(
5
)
(1)
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings information is presented net of income taxes.
(6)
 
Includesmembers who participated in a CMS pilot program under which we provided disease and case management services to selected Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries in exchange for a fee.  This program terminated in September 2008.
(7)
 
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(8)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(9)
 
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetna Rx Home Delivery, our mail order pharmacy, during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(10)
 
 
Aetna/16
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our expectations and projections as to operating earnings per share, increase in 2009 pension expense and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including adverse economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad which can significantly and adversely affect Aetna's business and profitability; continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, increased pharmacy costs, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends); as well as adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits).  Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership, the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2007 Annual Report on Form 10-K (the 2007 Annual Report) and September 30, 2008 Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and Aetnas 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K (the 2008 Annual Report) when filed with the SEC.  You also should read the 2007 Annual Report and Aetnas 2008 Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q on file with the SEC and the 2008 Annual Report when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20090218163535.txt.gz
TIME:20090218163535
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On February 13, 2009, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) granted special restricted stock unit (RSU) awards to Aetnas President Mark T. Bertolini and its Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Joseph M. Zubretsky under Aetnas 2000 Stock Incentive Plan.  Aetna believes each of the executives execution of Aetnas strategy and business plans and made the grants in order to promote the retention of the executives at a time when the executives prior equity grants have lost retention value.  The grant date values of Mr. Bertolinis and Mr. Zubretskys awards were $5.5 million and $3.8 million, respectively.  One third of the RSUs will vest on August 13, 2010, and two-thirds of the RSUs will vest on February 13, 2012, subject to earlier termination as provided in Aetnas 2000 Stock Incentive Plan and the applicable RSU award agreement.  No dividends will be paid on the unvested portion of the RSUs.
is important to the and
development
The special RSU awards are in addition to Aetnas regular annual cash bonus awards and equity grants.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20090303160746.txt.gz
TIME:20090303160746
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On March 10, 2009, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) will grant a special restricted stock unit (RSU) award to Aetnas Senior Vice President and General Counsel, William J. Casazza, under Aetnas 2000 Stock Incentive Plan.  The grant promotes the retention of Mr. Casazza.  The grant date value of Mr. Casazzas award will be approximately $900,000.  One third of the RSUs will vest on each of March 10, 2010, March 10, 2011 and March 10, 2012, subject to earlier termination as provided in Aetnas 2000 Stock Incentive Plan and the applicable RSU award agreement.  No dividends will be paid on the unvested portion of the RSUs.  In connection with this grant, Mr. Casazza will enter into an agreement not to compete with Aetna for a period of one year following his termination of employment.
The special RSU award is in addition to Aetnas regular annual cash bonus awards and equity grants.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20090309141218.txt.gz
TIME:20090309141218
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Senior members of Aetna Inc.s (the Companys) management team will be meeting with investors and analysts from March 9, 2009 through March 20, 2009.  The Company expects discussions at those meetings to focus on the Companys strategy, tactics and future outlook.  During these meetings, the Company intends to reaffirm its publicly disclosed 2009 guidance, which includes full-year 2009 operating earnings of $3.85 to $3.95 per share.
1
  Projected operating earnings per share exclude net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income.  The Company is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or other items and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share.  Projected full-year 2009 operating earnings assume approximately 460 million weighted-average diluted shares.
1
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Current Report on Form 8-K is forward looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted-average diluted shares.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including adverse economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased medical utilization, increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, increased pharmacy costs, changes in membership mix to lower-premium or higher-cost products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends); as well as adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits).  Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership, the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation and ongoing reviews of business practices by various regulatory authorities (including the current industry-wide investigation by the New York Attorney General into certain payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers); reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; and increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any acts of terrorism, epidemics or other extreme events. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetnas 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K (the 2008 Annual Report) on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).  You also should read the 2008 Annual Report on file with the SEC for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Current Report on Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20090429062142.txt.gz
TIME:20090429062142
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 29, 2009, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended March 31, 2009.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
____________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________
News Release
YSE: AET) today announced that first-quarter 2009 operating earnings per share increased 4 percent to $.96.  The increase in operating earnings per share reflects growth in revenue, which is primarily the result of higher membership levels and premium rate increases for renewing membership, and reduced shares outstanding from continued share repurchases.  This performance was largely offset by the previously announced increase in pension expense.  Operating earnings exclude net realized capital losses.  First quarter 2009 net income was $.95 per share, a 12 percent increase over the prior year quarter.
HARTFORD, Conn., April 29, 2009
 Aetna (N
(1)
Aetna/2
 
"We are pleased to have met our first quarter operating objectives in the areas of membership growth, revenue growth, expense efficiency, investment performance and capital management," said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO.  We did, however, incur higher than projected medical costs in our commercial products.  We believe we are experiencing two impacts from the recessionary economy: first, the impact of layoffs and increased COBRA membership and second, a higher intensity of facility services.  We have adapted our already strong medical quality and cost management processes to reflect changing market conditions.
"Our strong membership and revenue gains reflect both the underlying strength of our value proposition in the marketplace and our ability to respond to the changing needs of our customers.  Our focus on disciplined execution of our operating model has been a key to our success and will be even more important as we move through the remainder of 2009," said Williams.
Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO, said:  "We had strong top line growth and an excellent performance in Medicare.  While we experienced higher than projected commercial medical costs in the first quarter, we improved our investment performance, managed our operating expenses, and continued to generate and effectively deploy excess capital.  Our sound strategy, flexible operating model, and well-diversified business portfolio will enable us to successfully manage through this difficult economy.  We remain confident in our full-year 2009 operating earnings per share guidance of $3.85 to $3.95."
Aetna/3
 
Aetna has become an industry leader by providing our customers with a broad range of products and a high level of service, Williams concluded.  That leadership also is reflected in the investments we have made to differentiate ourselves and the vigilance we maintain to position ourselves for continued profitable growth.
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
 
 
/4
Aetna
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
Total company results
 
Aetna/5
 
The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com.  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
Aetnas conference call to discuss first quarter 2009 results and full year 2009 guidance will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today.  
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 877-874-1589, or 719-325-4828for international callers.  Aetna suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call.  The access code is 5487857.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
 
 
 
Aetna/6
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 5487857. Telephone replays will be available from 11:30 a.m. ET on April 29, 2009 until midnight ET on May 13, 2009.
www.aetna.com
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.2 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates.  For more information, see www.aetna.com.
Aetna/7
 
Aetna/8
 
Aetna/9
 
Aetna/10
 
 
Aetna/11
 
 
 
 
Aetna/12
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/13
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses from net income.  Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities.  However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetnas business operations. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(1)
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses.
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and page 12 of this press release.
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2009 assumes approximately 455 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
Operating expenses as a percentage of revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses from total revenue.
(3)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pre-tax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(4)
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment.  It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results.  The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and, beginning in 2009, the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (referred to herein as "pension expense") (the service cost (or operating component) of this expense is allocated to our business segments).  The service cost component allocated to our business segments for the three months ended March 31, 2009 and 2008 was $10.6 million ($6.9 million after tax) and $9.4 million ($6.1 million after tax), respectively. Prior periods have been reclassified to reflect this change.
(5)
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings information is presented net of income taxes.
(6)
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(7)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(8)
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetna Rx Home Delivery, our mail order pharmacy, during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(9)
 
 
 
Aetna/14
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers; and increased pharmacy costs); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate) which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits).  Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of,  certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; and reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and Aetnas 2009 Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 (Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q), when filed with the SEC.  You also should read Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q, when filed with the SEC, for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20090602160628.txt.gz
TIME:20090602160628
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01   Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 2, 2009, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) issued a press release announcing that it is revising its 2009 operating earnings per share guidance from a range of $3.85 to $3.95 to a range of $3.55 to $3.70 .  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 7.01 by reference.
(1)
Senior members of Aetnas management team are currently scheduled to meet with investors and analysts from June 2, 2009 through June 18, 2009.  Aetna expects discussions at those meetings to focus on its strategy, tactics and future outlook.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
  Projected full-year 2009 operating earnings per share exclude after tax net realized capital losses of $4.8 million reported by Aetna for the three months ended March 31, 2009.  Projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any net realized capital gains or losses and other items occurring after March 31, 2009.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or other items and cannot therefore reconcile projected operating earnings per share in any period to projected net income per share.  Projected full-year 2009 operating earnings assume less than 455 million weighted-average diluted shares.
(1)
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
__________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________         
News Release
YSE: AET) today announced that it is revising its 2009 operating earnings per share guidance from a range of $3.85 to $3.95 to a range of $3.55 to $3.70 . The primary drivers of the revised guidance are: a continuation of higher projected Commercial medical costs; and lower projected 2009 Medicare revenue, The company will hold a conference call for investors today at 5 p.m. ET.
HARTFORD, Conn., June 2, 2009
 Aetna (N
(1)
reflecting an updated view of the risk profile of the Medicare book of business
.
The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com. The conference call can be accessed by dialing 877-874-1586, or 719-325-4770 for international callers.  Aetna suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call.  The access code is 4736815.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations. A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers.  The replay access code is 4736815. Telephone replays will be available from 8:00 p.m. ET on June 2, 2009 until midnight ET on June 16, 2009.
www.aetna.com
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.2 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans.
 
 
 
Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates.  
For more information, see and Aetna's Annual Report at .
www.aetna.com
www.aetna.com/2008annualreport
 
  Projected full-year 2009 operating earnings per share exclude after tax net realized capital losses of $4.8 million reported by Aetna for the three months ended March 31, 2009.  Projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any net realized capital gains or losses and other items occurring after March 31, 2009.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or other items and cannot therefore reconcile projected operating earnings per share in any period to projected net income per share.  Projected full-year 2009 operating earnings assume less than 455 million weighted-average diluted shares.
(1)
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers; and increased pharmacy costs); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate) which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits).  Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; and reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and Aetnas 2009 Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 (Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q), on file with the SEC.  You also should read Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20090727074758.txt.gz
TIME:20090727074758
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
  
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
  
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
  
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 27, 2009, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended June 30, 2009.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
_____________________________________________________________________________________
News Release
 
 
 
 
 
YSE: AET) today announced second-quarter 2009 operating earnings of $308.5 million, or $.68 per share, a 28 percent decrease from the prior-year quarter.  Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains (losses) and an other item.  Second-quarter 2009 net income was $346.6 million, or $.77 per
HARTFORD, Conn., July 27, 2009
  Aetna (N
(1)
share, a 21 percent decrease from the prior-year quarter.
 
The second-quarter 2009 operating earnings were affected by significantly higher Commercial medical costs, which reflect higher second quarter 2009 medical costs and additional unfavorable reserve development, primarily from 2008.  These factors resulted in a lower Commercial underwriting margin in the companys Health Care business.  The second-quarter operating earnings also reflect the impact of lower-than-projected 2009 Medicare revenue, which the company previously disclosed.
 
Aetna/2
 
The higher-than-projected medical costs experienced were not fully captured in 2009 pricing, which resulted in a higher Commercial medical benefit ratio for the second quarter of 2009.  The company is taking appropriate actions to address higher medical costs, including pricing actions, enhanced medical management and provider contracting.  The company expects that full-year 2009 operating earnings will continue to be adversely affected by a higher Commercial medical benefit ratio.  As a result, the company has revised its full-year 2009 operating earnings per share projection to a range of $2.75 to $2.90.
 
"Our second quarter results do not meet our expectations or the standards we have established over several years of strong operational execution and financial performance, said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO.  We continue to see upward pressure on medical costs beyond what we projected in early June, which we believe is driven in part by changing provider behavior in the face of a deep recession.  We did not fully capture the impact of these forces in our 2009 pricing.  This is disappointing, but it can be fixed.
 
Mark Bertolini, president, said, We believe these increases in Commercial medical costs are largely the result of continued higher claim intensity, such as services rendered in a higher cost setting and more tests and procedures per visit, resulting in higher costs for emergency room, ambulatory, laboratory and preventive services.We are taking immediate actions to address these issues.
 
 
Aetna/3
 
"We have factored the most recent medical cost experience into our actuarial methodologies in setting our June 30 reserves and into our revised full-year outlook, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO.  "Meanwhile, we continue to have a very strong financial profile and capital position, and our health care revenue growth is strong.  In addition, we continue to effectively manage our operating expenses while making the appropriate investments to ensure our long-term competitive strength.
 
Given our updated outlook, we now project operating earnings per share for full-year 2009 to be in the range of $2.75 to $2.90 and our full-year 2009 Commercial medical benefit ratio to be in the range of 84.0 percent to 84.5 percent, Zubretsky said.
 
"Aetna has a sound strategy.  We have built a diverse portfolio of high-performing businesses; our brand continues to resonate in our key markets; and we have a sound business model.  We are confident that we can achieve our goal of long-term profitable growth, Williams said.
 
 
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
Aetna/4
 
 
 
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
 
 
Aetna/5
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
 
Total company results
 
Aetna/6
 
 
The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com.  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
Aetnas conference call to discuss second quarter 2009 results and full-year 2009 guidance will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today.
 
 
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 888-318-7470 or 719-325-2383 for international callers.  The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call.  The access code is 5460217.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers.  The replay access code is 5460217.  Telephone replays will be available from 11:00 a.m. ET on July 27, 2009 until midnight ET on August 10, 2009.
www.aetna.com
 
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.8 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates.  For more information, see
www.aetna.com
.
 
Aetna/7 
 
 
 
Aetna/8 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
Aetna/10
 
 
Aetna/12 
 
 
Aetna/13
 
Operating earnings exclude net losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per
(1)
realized gains and
capital
from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance
and of resources
allocation
 
Each of the excluded items is discussed below:
 
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses.
 
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and page 12 of this press release.
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2009 assumes approximately 450 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
 
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any.  Refer to a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure on page 10.
(3)
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pre-tax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(4)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment.  It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results.  The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and, beginning in 2009, the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (referred to herein as "pension expense") (the service cost (or operating component) of this expense is allocated to our business segments).  The service cost component allocated to our business segments for the three and six months ended June 30, 2009  was $10.7 million ($6.9 million after tax) and $21.3 million ($13.8 million after tax), respectively, and $9.4 million ($6.1 million after tax) and $18.8 million ($12.2 million after tax) for the three and six months ended June 30, 2008, respectively. Prior periods have been reclassified to reflect this change.
(5)
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings information is presented net of income taxes.
(6)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(7)
 
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(8)
 
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetna Rx Home Delivery, our mail order pharmacy, during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(9)
Aetna/14
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, medical benefit ratios, weighted average diluted shares, the impact of actions designed to address higher medical costs and the impact of our Commercial medical benefit ratio on operating earnings. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers; and increased pharmacy costs); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate) which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits).  Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; and reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), Aetnas 2009 Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2009 and Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2009 (Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q), when filed with the SEC.  You also should read Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q, when filed with the SEC, for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20091029063918.txt.gz
TIME:20091029063918
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 29, 2009, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended September 30, 2009.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
_______________________________________________________________________________________________________________________             
NeRelease
ws
 
.
YSE: AET) today announced third-quarter 2009 operating earnings of $308.2 million, or $.69 per share, a 38 percent decrease from the prior-year quarter.  Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains (losses) and other items.  The decrease in operating earnings per share from the prior-year quarter reflects a lower Commercial underwriting margin and a previously announced increase in pension expense partially offset by the impact of a lower number of shares outstanding year-over-year. The lower Commercial underwriting margin was due to a significant increase in Commercial medical costs which was partially offset by an increase in health care premiums.  Net income was $326.2 million, or $.73 per share, a 26 percent increase from the prior-year quarter, which included net realized capital losses of $.48 per share due to the then-deteriorating global economic conditions
HARTFORD, Conn., October 29, 2009
  Aetna (N
(1)
 
Aetna/2
 
"Our third-quarter financial results reflect a Total Medical Benefit Ratio that is in line with expectations despite a Commercial Medical Benefit Ratio that was higher than projected," said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO.  "The higher-than-expected Commercial MBR was due primarily to greater-than-anticipated costs from the H1N1 flu and COBRA penetration rates.  
 
 
"We expect in 2010 that ongoing uncertainty about the U.S. economy with respect to employment and growth will continue to impact provider and member behavior as well as customer preferences.  Despite this uncertainty, we continue to have a great deal of confidence in our long-term future, given our well-positioned, diverse portfolio of businesses, our customer-focused strategy and our underlying financial strength.
 
Williams continued:  "Looking ahead, as the health care reform debate intensifies, we will continue to be an active, constructive voice for a bipartisan solution that gets and keeps everyone covered, builds on the strengths of the employer-based system, and addresses the underlying cost and affordability of health care.  We believe that the right reforms can yield positive, market based change that improves the health care system for more Americans."
 
Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO, said, "The increase in net income in the third quarter was primarily a result of improved valuations in our investment portfolio.  Going forward, we expect that our ongoing medical cost management and pricing action plans will have a noticeable effect beginning in the first quarter of 2010, with additional financial impact realized during the remaining three quarters of the year.  As we work through the challenges facing us, our financial position, capital structure and liquidity remain strong and we are committed to making sure our operating expense structure is appropriately aligned with the size, profile and needs of our customers.
 
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
Aetna/3
 
 
 
 
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
 
Aetna/4
 
 
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
 
Total company results
 
 
Aetna/5
 
 
The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com.  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
Aetnas conference call to discuss third quarter 2009 results and full-year 2009 guidance will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today.
 
 
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 877-397-0292or 719-325-4781for international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 4099734. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
 
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The
replay access code is 4099734. Telephone replays will be available from 11:00 a.m. ET on Oct. 29, 2009 until midnight ET on Nov. 12, 2009.
 
 
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
 
Aetna/6
 
 
 
Aetna/7 
 
 
Aetna/8 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/9 
 
 
 
Aetna/10 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/11 
 
 
Aetna/12 
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(1)
 
Each of the excluded items is discussed below:
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses.
 
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 7 through 9 and page 11 of this press release.
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2009 assumes approximately 450 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
 
The Commercial MBR for the second quarter of 2009 reflected approximately $65 million pretax of unfavorable development of prior period health care cost estimates.  Including this development, the Commercial MBR for the second quarter of 2009 was 85.9%.
(3)
 
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any.  Refer to a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure on page 9 of this press release.
(4)
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pre-tax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(5)
 
Includes an allowance on reinsurance recoverable and litigation-related insurance proceeds as described in footnote above.
(6)
(1)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment.  It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results.  The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and, beginning in 2009, the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (referred to herein as "pension expense") (the service cost (or operating component) of this expense is allocated to our business segments).  The service cost component allocated to our business segments for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2009  was $10.7 million ($6.9 million after tax) and $32.0 million ($20.7 million after tax), respectively, and $9.5 million ($6.2 million after tax) and $28.3 million ($18.4 million after tax) for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2008, respectively. Prior periods have been reclassified to reflect this change.
(7)
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings information is presented net of income taxes.
(8)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(9)
 
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(10)
 
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetna Rx Home Delivery, our mail order pharmacy, during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(11)
Aetna/13
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers; and increased pharmacy costs); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate) which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulation (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to mandate minimum medical benefit ratios or eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); and the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer.  Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; and reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), Aetnas 2009 Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2009 and Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009 (Aetnas Third Quarter 10-Q), when filed with the SEC.  You also should read Aetnas Third Quarter 10-Q, when filed with the SEC, for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20091118161154.txt.gz
TIME:20091118161154
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
On November 18, 2009, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) announced that it is reducing its workforce by approximately 625 positions effective immediately and anticipates making a similar number of workforce reductions by the end of the first quarter of 2010.  Aetna currently has approximately 35,500 employees. These actions are consistent with Aetnas goal of aligning its cost structure with its membership outlook for 2010 and are in preparation for the impact that health care reform and regulatory changes may have on our business. Aetna expects to incur a fourth quarter 2009 charge of approximately $40 million, after tax, as a result of the November 2009 workforce reductions and ongoing real estate consolidations which are expected to be completed in the fourth quarter of 2009.  Included in this charge is approximately $12 million, after tax, related to severance and benefit costs and approximately $28 million, after tax, related to the consolidation of real estate leases. Aetna expects substantially all of these charges to result in future cash expenditures.
Aetna is not currently able to estimate the amount of the severance and benefits charge from future workforce reductions that it expects to complete by the end of the first quarter of 2010.  Aetna expects to incur such charge in the fourth quarter of 2009.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward looking, including our projections as to the number of positions to be eliminated from Aetnas workforce, the timing of the anticipated future workforce reductions, severance and benefit costs, real estate lease consolidation costs, future cash expenditures and the timing and amount of charges. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control.  Important risk factors could cause actual outcomes and results to differ materially from what is expressed in the information in this Form 8-K, including changes in Aetnas actual tax rate compared to the rate assumed in estimating the charges, changes in the number of severed employees compared to the number assumed in estimating the charges, changes in the amounts payable to severed employees compared to the amounts assumed in estimating the charges, changes in the expenditures associated with vacating leased properties and/or our ability to sublease those properties compared to the amounts assumed in estimating the charges and changes in the timing of the anticipated future workforce reductions. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC).  You also should read Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009, on file with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20091230084857.txt.gz
TIME:20091230084857
EVENTS:	Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
TEXT:
ITEM: Cost Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Explanatory Note
On November 18, 2009, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) filed a Current Report on Form 8-K (the Original Form 8-K) reporting certain reductions and anticipated future reductions in its workforce and ongoing real estate consolidations.  At the time the Original Form 8-K was filed, Aetna was not able to estimate the amount of the severance and benefits charge from future workforce reductions that it expects to complete by the end of the first quarter of 2010 (the Future Reductions).  Aetna is filing this Amendment on Form 8-K/A (this Form 8-K/A) to amend the Original Form 8-K to report the estimated amount of the fourth quarter 2009 charge it expects to incur related to the Future Reductions and to provide updated information regarding the amounts to be incurred related to the completed workforce reductions and ongoing real estate consolidations.  The disclosure contained in Item 2.05 of the Original Form 8-K is hereby replaced in its entirety by the disclosure contained in Item 2.05 of this Form 8-K/A.
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.05 Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities.
On November 18, 2009, Aetna announced that it was reducing its workforce by approximately 625 positions effective immediately and anticipated making a similar number of workforce reductions by the end of the first quarter of 2010 (the Future Reductions).  On November 18, 2009, Aetna had approximately 35,500 employees.  These actions are consistent with Aetnas goal of aligning its cost structure with its membership outlook for 2010 and are in preparation for the impact that health care reform and regulatory changes may have on its business.  Aetna expects to incur a fourth quarter 2009 charge of approximately $60 million to $65 million, after tax, as a result of ongoing real estate consolidations which are expected to be completed in the fourth quarter of 2009, the November 2009 workforce reductions and the Future Reductions.  Included in this charge is approximately $32 million to $37 million, after tax, related to severance and benefit costs and approximately $28 million, after tax, related to the consolidation of real estate leases.  Aetna expects substantially all of these charges to result in future cash expenditures.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT -- Certain information in this Form 8-K/A is forward looking, including our projections as to the number of positions to be eliminated from Aetnas workforce, the timing of the anticipated future workforce reductions, the amount of severance and benefit costs, the amount of real estate lease consolidation costs, the amount of future cash expenditures and the timing and amount of charges.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control.  Important risk factors could cause actual outcomes and results to differ materially from what is expressed in the information in this Form 8-K/A, including changes in Aetnas actual tax rate compared to the rate assumed in estimating the charges, changes in the number of severed employees compared to the number assumed in estimating the charges, changes in the amounts payable to severed employees compared to the amounts assumed in estimating the charges, changes in the expenditures associated with vacating leased properties and/or our ability to sublease those properties compared to the amounts assumed in estimating the charges and changes in the timing of the anticipated future workforce reductions. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC).  You also should read Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009, on file with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100112121017.txt.gz
TIME:20100112121017
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On January 12, 2010, Joseph M. Zubretsky, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna Inc. ("Aetna") will provide a presentation at the 2010 J.P. Morgan Healthcare Conference.  Mr. Zubretsky also will meet with investors and analysts after the presentation.  During this presentation and the subsequent meetings, Aetna intends to reaffirm its previously disclosed full-year 2009 operating earnings guidance of $2.75 per shareand provide its current view that full-year 2010 operating earnings per share is likely to be modestly lower than 2009.
1
Aetnas presentation is scheduled to begin at 1:00 p.m. Eastern time (10:00 a.m. Pacific time).  Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetnas Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor.  A webcast replay will be available on that web site, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 day
s.
A copy of Aetnas presentation is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1, and the information in the presentation as to Aetnas projected 2009 results of operations and financial condition is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 2.02. 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION  Certain information in this Form 8-K and the furnished presentation are forward-looking, including our current estimates, projections and views as to 2009 excess capital generation; 2009 operating earnings per share; 2010 operating earnings per share; weighted average diluted shares; our challenges and opportunities for 2010; our ability to respond to health care reform; our ability to hold assets to maturity; our ability to grow our Medicaid business; pre-tax operating margin and fourth quarter 2009 severance and facility charge.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers; and increased pharmacy costs); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate) which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in federal or state government laws, policies or regulations (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to mandate minimum medical benefit ratios or eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; and
 
 
 
 
 
changes in Aetnas actual tax rate, the number of severed employees, the amounts payable to severed employees, expenditures associated with vacating leased properties, our ability to sublease leased properties and the timing of future workforce reductions, in each case compared to the amounts we assumed in estimating the expected fourth quarter 2009 severance and facility charge.  Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to: adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; and reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means.  For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), and Aetnas 2009 Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009 (Aetnas Third Quarter 10-Q) on file with the SEC.  You also should read Aetnas Third Quarter 10-Q for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Item 2.02 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be or be deemed
to be
incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
The information above in Item 2.02 of this current report, other than the portion of Aetnas presentation thereby incorporated by reference in such Item 2.02, is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 7.01.  A copy of Aetnas presentation is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1, and the information in that presentation other than the information as to Aetnas projected 2009 results of operations and financial condition is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 7.01. 
 
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
         
99.1
Aetna Inc. Presentation slides for the
2010
J.P. Morgan Healthcare Conference dated January 12, 2010
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100205063319.txt.gz
TIME:20100205063319
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 5, 2010, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2009.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
 99.1
   
   
Press release of Aetna Inc. dated February 5, 2010 announcing results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended
    December 31, 2009.
   
   
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
______________________________________________________________________
N Release
ews
 
 
offset by the impact of a lower number of outstanding shares.  The lower Commercial underwriting margin was due to a significant increase in Commercial medical costs which was partially offset by an increase in health care premiums.  The lower Group Insurance operating earnings were due to lower disability underwriting margins from increased long-term disability reserves.  Net income for the fourth quarter was $165.9 million, or $.38 per share.
HARTFORD, Conn., February 5, 2010
 Aetna (
N
YSE: AET) today announced fourth-quarter 2009 operating earnings of $178.6 million, or $.40 per share compared to $.96 per share in the fourth quarter of 2008.  The decrease in operating earnings per share from the prior-year quarter reflects a lower Commercial underwriting margin, lower operating earnings in the Group Insurance business and an increase in pension expense partially
 
Full-year 2009 operating earnings per share decreased 30 percent from full year 2008 to $2.75.  Full-year 2009 net income was $2.84 per share, which was generally in line with 2008.
 
 
Aetna/2
 
 
 
 
 
"As we worked through a very challenging 2009, we took significant actions to improve our operational performance and we are moving in the right direction," said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO.  "Entering 2010, a weak economy and high unemployment levels remain challenging, but we continue to implement strategic initiatives and actions that will help build positive momentum and give us confidence for the long-term future."
 
"Aetna enters 2010 in a strong financial position," said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO.  "Our capital structure, liquidity and operating cash flows continue to be excellent.  Given the ongoing challenges we expect to face, however, we view 2010 as a repositioning year that will not fully reflect the earnings potential of our business.  We project our 2010 operating earnings per share to be in the range of $2.55 to $2.65."
 
 
Aetna/3
 
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
Full-year 2009 operating earnings for Health Care were $1.4 billion, compared with $1.8 billion in 2008.  Full-year operating earnings were lower primarily due to an increase in medical costs that outpaced an increase in premiums.  Full-year medical membership growth was 1.2 million. Full-
 
Aetna/4
 
year 2009 net income was $1.4 billion, compared with $1.5 billion in 2008.  Full-year 2009 Commercial MBR was 84.5 percent, compared with 80.3 percent for 2008.
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
Full-year 2009 operating earnings for Group Insurance were $103.8 million compared with $136.8 million in 2008.  The decrease was primarily due to increased reserves in our disability business in the fourth quarter of 2009.  Full-year net income for 2009 was $145.6 million compared to a net loss of $115.3 million in 2008.
 
Large
Case Pensions business results
manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
Large Case Pensions, which
 
For full-year 2009, Large Case operating earnings of $32.2 million compared with $38.8 million for 2008.  Full-year net income for 2009 was $26.4 million compared with $22.8 million for 2008.
Pensions reported
 
 
Aetna/5
 
Total company results
 
 
 
Aetna/6
 
 
 
Aetnas conference call to discuss fourth quarter and full-year 2009 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET todayThe public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at .  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
.
 
www.aetna.com
 
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 877-856-1960or 719-325-4747for international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 5132468. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
 
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The
replay access code is 5132468. Telephone replays will be available from 11:00 a.m. ET on February 5, 2010 until midnight ET on February 19, 2010.
 
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.1 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see
www.aetna.com
.
 
 
Aetna/7
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/10
 
 
 
 
Aetna/11
 
 
 
Aetna/12
 
 
 
 
Aetna/13
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(1)
 
Each of the excluded items is discussed below:
 
 
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and page 12 of this press release.
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share also exclude any impact of health care reform, which Aetna is not able to project.  Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2010 assumes approximately 430 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
 
(3) 
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses and the ESI settlement noted in above.  Refer to tables on pages 9, 10 and 12 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses and the ESI settlement to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(1)
 
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any.  Refer to a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure on page 10 of this press release.
(4)
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pre-tax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(5)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment.  It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results.  The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and, beginning in 2009, the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (referred to herein as "pension expense") (the service cost and prior service cost (or operating component) of this expense is allocated to our business segments).  The service cost component allocated to our business segments for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2009  was $10.6 million ($7.0 million after tax) and $42.6 million ($27.7 million after tax), respectively, and $9.5 million ($6.2 million after tax) and $37.8 million ($24.6 million after tax) for the three and twelve months ended December 31, 2008, respectively. Prior periods have been reclassified to reflect this change.
(6)
Aetna/14
 
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings information is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(8)
 
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(9)
 
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetna Rx Home Delivery, our mail order pharmacy, during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(10)
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers; and increased pharmacy costs); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate) which can significantly and adversely affect Aetnas business and profitability; failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to mandate minimum medical benefit ratios or eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); continued volatility and further deterioration of the U.S. and global capital markets, including fluctuations in interest rates, fixed income and equity prices and the value of financial assets, along with the general deterioration in the commercial paper, capital and credit markets, which can adversely impact the value of Aetnas investment portfolio, Aetnas profitability by reducing net investment income and/or Aetnas financial position by causing us to realize additional impairments on our investments; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; and the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer.  Other important risk factors include, but are not limited to:  adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; and reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2008 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), Aetnas 2009 Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2009 (Aetnas Third Quarter 10-Q), on file with the SEC.  You also should read the 2008 Annual Report and Aetnas 2009 Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q on file with the SEC and Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100318084516.txt.gz
TIME:20100318084516
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01   Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 18, 2010, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) issued a press release announcing that it will hold a conference call with investors on Friday March 19, 2010, at 8:30 a.m. Eastern Time rather than conduct an in-person meeting in New York City as originally planned  Aetna also announced that during that call it will provide guidance on certain first quarter 2010 metrics and reaffirm its previously disclosed full year 2010 operating earnings per-share guidance of $2.55 to $2.65.A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 7.01 by reference.
, due to the current political environment.
(1)
  
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- The projections contained in this report, including Aetnas full year 2010 operating earning per-share and weighted average diluted shares guidance, are forward-looking. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including the outcome of the health care reform debate; adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to mandate minimum medical benefit ratios or eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing CEO succession and retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings.  For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K (the 2009 Annual Report) on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).  You also should read the 2009 Annual Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
 
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
The following exhibit is furnished herewith:
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
_________________________________________________________
News Release
 Aetna (NYSE: AET) announced today that it will hold a conference call with investors on Friday, March 19, 2010 rather than conduct an in-person meeting in New York City, as originally planned, due to the current political environment.
HARTFORD, CT., March 18, 2010
During the newly scheduled conference call, to be held at 8:30 a.m. E.T., Executive Vice President and CFO Joseph M. Zubretsky will provide guidance on certain first quarter 2010 metrics and reaffirm the companys previously disclosed full-year 2010 operating earnings per-share guidance of $2.55 to $2.65.  
(1)
The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at .  The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 877-604-9674 or719-325-4755for international callers.  The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call.  The access code is 1337467.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations. 
www.aetna.com
 
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers.  The replay access code is 1337467.
Anyone listening to the presentation is encouraged to read Aetnas 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.  Information reconciling certain financial and other measures that may be disclosed in the call to relevant GAAP measures will be available prior to the call via the Investor Information portion of Aetnas website.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.1 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care.  Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans.  Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates.  For more information, see .
www.aetna.com
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- The projections contained in this press release, including Aetnas full year 2010 operating earnings per-share and weighted average diluted shares guidance, are forward-looking. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including the outcome of the health care reform debate; adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative proposals that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as initiatives to mandate minimum medical benefit ratios or eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing CEO succession and retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings.  For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K (the 2009 Annual Report) on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).  You also should read the 2009 Annual Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100409085851.txt.gz
TIME:20100409085851
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 8 - Other Events
Items 8.01 - Other Events.
On April 9, 2010, Aetna Inc. ("Aetna") issued a press release announcing that the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services notified Aetna of its intent to impose intermediate sanctions suspending the enrollment of and marketing to new members of all Aetna Medicare Advantage and Standalone Prescription Drug Plan Contracts, effective April 21, 2010.  A copy of that press release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and incorporated herein by reference.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this Current Report, including the timing of resolution of issues raised by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services ("CMS"), is forward-looking. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including the implementation of health care reform legislation; adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative measures that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios or eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the m edical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy, regulatory restrictions and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initi atives simultaneously; managing CEO succession and retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS review and sanctions, litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K (the "2009 Annual Report") on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). You also should read the 2009 Annual Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
The following exhibit is furnished herewith:
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
__________________________________________________________
News Release
 Aetna (NYSE:AET) announced today that the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS) notified the company of its intent to impose intermediate sanctions suspending the enrollment of and marketing to new members of all Aetna Medicare Advantage and Standalone Prescription Drug Plan Contracts, effective April 21, 2010.  The sanctions relate to compliance with certain Medicare Part D requirements, primarily those relating to changes in the drugs covered by certain plans from 2009 to 2010.
HARTFORD, Conn., April 9, 2010
The suspension does not affect current Aetna Medicare enrollees.  Aetna is cooperating fully with CMS on its review, and is working to resolve the issues CMS has raised as soon as possible.
Compliance problems are unacceptable to Aetna; the issues raised to us by CMS have our utmost attention, said Aetna President Mark T. Bertolini.  Aetna takes our obligations to our Medicare beneficiaries seriously, and our priority is to help ensure they have access to high-quality care, excellent service and needed medications.  We are working with CMS to resolve these matters, and we also will be doing proactive outreach to impacted members to resolve these issues.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.1 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see
www.aetna.com
.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release, including the timing of resolution of issues raised by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS), is forward-looking. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including the implementation of health care reform legislation; adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative measures that would affect our business model and/or limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing and other proposals, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios or eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws, that would increase potential litigation exposure or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is us ed in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy, regulatory restrictions and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operat ional initiatives simultaneously; managing CEO succession and retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS review and sanctions, litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K (the "2009 Annual Repor t") on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"). You also should read the 2009 Annual Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100429064137.txt.gz
TIME:20100429064137
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
 
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On April 29, 2010, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended March 31, 2010.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
 
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
_________________________________________________________
News Release
 
YSE: AET) today announced first-quarter 2010 operating earnings per share of $.98.  Operating earnings, excluding prior-period development, totaled $337.4 million or $.77 per share, compared to $467.1 million or $1.01 per share in the first quarter of 2009.  Excluding the effect of the prior-period development, operating earnings per share decreased 24 percent from 2009 due t o lower Commercial underwriting margins and lower Insured membership partially offset by a lower number of shares outstanding.  Aetna reported favorable prior-period development of $143 million in the first quarter of 2010, compared with $38 million of unfavorable prior-period development in the first quarter of 2009.  Net income, which includes net realized capital gains and litigation-related insurance proceeds, was $562.6 million, or $1.28 per share.
HARTFORD, Conn., April 29, 2010
 Aetna (N
(1)
(2)
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/2
nm (not meaningful)
*
 
 
"Our first-quarter operating results reflect the impact of the significant actions we have taken to improve our performance, as demonstrated by the better-than-expected Commercial medical benefit ratio," said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO.  "Lower medical costs for Aetna allow us to continue to invest in innovation and offer our customers greater value through more affordable products.
 
"As we continue to focus on performance improvement, challenges remain.  Economic pressures are still being felt by employers and consumers and are having an impact on enrollment and health care costs.  We remain focused on achieving operating excellence, meeting the needs of our customers and preparing for opportunities from changes in the market stemming from health care reform.  We are confident in our long-term future."
 
"We are working through the economic and other challenges from a position of strength as evidenced by our strong capital position, excellent operating cash flows and improved investment performance," said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO.  "Our first-quarter results reflect our initiatives to improve medical quality and cost as well as the impact of favorable prior-period reserve development.  We now project full-year 2010 operating earnings per share to be in the range of $2.75 to $2.85." 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/3
 
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
 
Aetna/4
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
 
Total company results
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/5
 
 
 
Aetnas conference call to discuss quarter 2010 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today.  The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
first
 
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 877-795-3610 or 719-325-4871 for international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 5410384. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 5410384. Telephone replays will be available from 11:00 a.m. ET on April 29, 2010 until midnight ET on May 13, 2010
.
 
 
 
 
Aetna/6
 
About Aetna
 
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.1 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
 
 
 
 
Aetna/7
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/10
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/11
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/12
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/13
 
per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measur e reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(1)
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings
 
The following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
 
 
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and 12 of this press release.
 
Operating earnings, excluding prior-period development; operating earnings per share, excluding prior-period development; health care costs, excluding prior-period development; and medical benefit ratios, excluding prior-period development; each exclude the items noted in above, if applicable, and any significant development of prior-period health care cost estimates.
(2)
(1)
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share also exclude any impact of health care reform except as set forth below and/or of future development of prior-period health care costs estimates, which Aetna is not able to project.  Projected operating earnings per share for th e full year 2010 reflect our current projection for 2010 spending to prepare for health care reform, approximately 430 million weighted average diluted shares and the impact of favorable first quarter 2010 development of prior-period health care costs estimates.
(3)
 
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in above.  Refer to tables on pages 9, 10 and 12 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(4)
(1)
 
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any.  Refer to a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure on page 10 of this press release.
(5)
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pre-tax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings, and operating earnings, excluding prior-period development information is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment.  It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results.  The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses.
(8)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(9)
 
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(10)
 
Represents members who purchased medications through our mail order pharmacy operations during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(11)
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/14
 
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios.  Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next eight years, and we wi ll be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform.  Many significant parts of the legislation require further guidance and clarification in the form of regulations.  As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known until those regulations are enacted, which we expect to occur over the next several years.  Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative measures that would affect our business model, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve desired rate increa ses and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy, regulatory restrictions and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing CEO succession and retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS review and sanctions, litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory autho rities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), and Aetnas 2010 Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010 (Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q), when filed with the SEC. You also should read Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q, when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial conditio n.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100524160603.txt.gz
TIME:20100524160603
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07   Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
Aetna Inc.s (Aetnas) Annual Meeting of Shareholders was held on May 21, 2010.  Shareholders voted on the matters set forth below.
1. Election of Director nominees.  Each of the nominees listed below was elected as a Director of Aetna until the next Annual Meeting and until their successors are duly elected and qualified based on the following votes:
 
 
2. The proposal to approve the appointment of KPMG LLP as the independent registered public accounting firm for Aetna and its subsidiaries for 2010 was approved based on the following votes:
 
 
 
3. The proposal to approve the proposed Aetna Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan was approved based on the following votes:
 
 
 
4. The proposal to approve the proposed Aetna Inc. 2010 Non-Employee Director Compensation Plan was approved based on the following votes:
 
 
 
5. The proposal to approve the continued use of certain performance criteria under the Aetna Inc. 2001 Annual Incentive Plan was approved based on the following votes:
 
 
 
 
 
6. A shareholder proposal relating to cumulative voting in the election of Directors was not approved based on the following votes:
 
 
 
7. A shareholder proposal to adopt a policy that the Chairman of Aetnas Board of Directors be an independent director who has not previously served as an executive officer of Aetna was not approved based on the following votes:
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100617083101.txt.gz
TIME:20100617083101
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01   Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 17, 2010, Joseph M. Zubretsky, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna Inc. (Aetna or the Company), will provide a presentation at the Goldman Sachs 31 Annual Global Healthcare Conference.  Mr. Zubretsky also will meet with investors and analysts on June 17, 2010.  During this presentation and these meetings, Aetna intends to disclose that (a) the Company projects that its second quarter 2010 operating earnings per share will be greater than the current analysts consensus estimate of $0.68 per share, driven by better than projected underwriting margin, largely attributable to favorable developm ent of first quarter 2010 health care cost estimates; and (b) the Company will update its full-year 2010 guidance metrics on its second quarter 2010 earnings conference call.
st
(1)
Aetnas presentation is scheduled to begin at 1:00 p.m. Eastern time (10:00 a.m. Pacific time).  Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetnas Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor.  A webcast replay will be available on that web site, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 days.
  Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  
(1)
 
 
-- -- Certain information in this current report is forward-looking, including Aetnas projections as to second quarter 2010 operating earnings per-share.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next eight years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation require further guidance and clarification in the form of regulations. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known until those regulations are enacted, which we expect to occur over the next several years. Other important risk factors include unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment pa tterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative measures that would affect our business model, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; failure to achieve de sired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy, regulatory restrictions and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing CEO succession and retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS review and sanctions, litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION
This list of important risk factors is not intended to be exhaustive.  Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K, including the Forward Looking Information/Risk Factors section; Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010 ("Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q"), including the Forward Looking Information/Risk Factors section; and other documents filed by Aetna with the Securities and Exchange Commission include both expanded discussion of these factors and additional risk factors and uncertainties that could preclude Aetna from realizing the forward-looking statements and/or may materially affect Aetna.  You also should read Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.    
 
 
 
The information in this current report shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100727201624.txt.gz
TIME:20100727201624
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 27, 2010, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended June 30, 2010.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
_________________________________________________________
News Release
 
YSE: AET) today announced second-quarter 2010 operating earnings of $450.2 million, or $1.05 per share, an increase of 54 percent over 2009.  The increase was largely the result of a higher Commercial underwriting margin from favorable prior-period reserve development and improved underlying performance, partially offset by lower Commercial Insured membership.  Second-quarter results included favorable prior - -period reserve development of $0.30 per share, primarily from first quarter 2010 incurred health care costs.  Excluding prior-period reserve development, second quarter 2010 operating earnings per share were $0.75.
HARTFORD, Conn., July 27, 2010
 Aetna (N
(1)
(2)
 
For the first half of 2010, operating earnings per share were $2.03, including $0.22 per share of favorable prior-period reserve development from 2009 incurred health care costs.
 
 
Aetna/2
 
 
"Our second-quarter results reflect the positive impact of disciplined, focused initiatives to improve our performance, said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO. "Going forward, our focus on performance improvement will enable us to continue to make investments that help address the challenges our customers facewith respect to affordability and quality in health care.
 
 
Aetna's leadership in helping to build a better, more information-driven health care marketplacehas been a fundamental dimension of ourstrategy during the past decade, and it continues to evolve. For example, last quarter we expanded the availability of our payment estimator, an innovative decision support tool, to our entire customer base. This will create a unique level of cost transparency for our customers at a time when they face significant challenges."
 
 
 
Our improved performance in the first half of 2010, along with a strong capital position, gives us confidence in our ability to execute on our goals, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO. We expect the remainder of 2010 will reflect the impact of business investments for future profitable growth, as well as the need to prepare for health care reform and regulatory changes. As a result, we now project full-year 2010 operating results per share to be in the range of $3.05 to $3.15.
 
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
Aetna/3
 
 
 
 
Aetna/4
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
 
Total company results
 
 
 
Aetna/5
 
 
Aetnas conference call to discuss second quarter 2010 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET on Wednesday, July 28th.  The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
 
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 800-946-0706 or 719-457-2629 for international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 7054750. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 7054750. Telephone replays will be available from 11:00 a.m. ET on July 28, 2010 until midnight ET on August 11, 2010
.
 
About Aetna
 
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 35.8 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
 
 
 
Aetna/6
 
 
 
 
Aetna/7
 
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
 
 
Aetna/10
 
 
 
 
Aetna/11
 
 
 
Aetna/12
 
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(1)
 
The following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 7 through 9 and 11 of this press release.
 
Certain metrics are adjusted to exclude noted development of prior-period health care cost estimates. These metrics include operating earnings, operating earnings per share and medical benefit ratios.
(2)
 
(3)
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share also exclude one-time costs associated with our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation, which we expect to incur in the second half of 2010.  Projected ope rating earnings per share for the full year 2010 reflect approximately 426 million weighted average diluted shares.
 
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losse and other items, if any.  Refer to a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure on page 9 of this press release.
(5)
s
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pre-tax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings, and operating earnings, excluding prior-period development information is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment.  It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results.  The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses.
(8)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(9)
 
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(10)
 
Represents members who purchased medications through our mail order pharmacy operations during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(11)
 
 
Aetna/13
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, weighted average diluted shares and the impact of our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation and our preparations for health care reform and regulatory changes. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios.  Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next eig ht years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform.  Many significant parts of the legislation require further guidance and clarification in the form of regulations.  As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known until those regulations are enacted, which we expect to occur over the next several years.  Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative measures that would affect our business model, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emp tion of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to the slowing economy, regulatory restrictions and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing CEO succession and retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS review and sanctions, litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by vario us regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. Important risk factors that could materially affect statements made concerning our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation include without limitation the timely receipt of necessary regulatory and other approvals, which could be delayed for a variety of reasons related or not related to the agreement itself, and the ability to successfully implement the CVS Caremark agreement on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement.  For more discussion of important risk fact ors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010, each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), and Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010 (Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q), when filed with the SEC. You also should read Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q, when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20100830160704.txt.gz
TIME:20100830160704
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
Item 1.01  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On August 24, 2010, Aetna Inc. (the Company) executed a Pricing Agreement (the Pricing Agreement) with Barclays Capital Inc., RBS Securities Inc., and UBS Securities LLC, as representatives of the underwriters named in Schedule I thereto (together, the Underwriters), pursuant to which the Company agreed to issue and sell to the Underwriters $750 million aggregate principal amount of its 3.95% senior notes due September 1, 2020 (the Senior Notes).  The Pricing Agreement incorporated by reference the terms of an Underwriting Agreement (the Underwriting Agreement) of the Company dated August 24, 2010.  The sale of the Senior Notes was registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission in a Registration Statement on Form S-3, File No. 333-155961. 0; The Senior Notes were offered pursuant to a prospectus dated December 5, 2008 and a prospectus supplement dated August 24, 2010.  The closing of the sale of the Senior Notes occurred on August 27, 2010.
 
The Underwriting Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report, and the Pricing Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 1.2 to this Current Report, are incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 1.01.
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01  Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On August 27, 2010, the Company issued a press release announcing the completion of the offering and sale of the Senior Notes.  A copy of the press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report.
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01  Other Events.
 
In connection with the offering and sale of the Senior Notes, an officers certificate of the Company was executed to establish and designate the Senior Notes and the terms and characteristics of the Senior Notes (the Officers Certificate).  The Senior Notes were issued, and the Officers Certificate was executed, pursuant to the Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, as successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee.
 
The Officers Certificate is filed as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report and is incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 8.01.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
 
 
 
 
 
To the Underwriters
to be named in the applicable
Pricing Agreement
supplemental hereto
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
From time to time, Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), proposes to enter into one or more Pricing Agreements (each a ) in the form of Annex I hereto, with such additions and deletions as the parties thereto may determine, and, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and therein, to issue and sell to the firms named in Schedule I to the applicable Pricing Agreement (such firms constituting the  with respect to such Pricing Agreement and the securities specified therein) certain debt securities of the Company (the ) specified in Schedule II to such Pricing Agreement (with respect to such Pricing Agreement, the ), less the Designated Securities covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts (as defined in Section 4 hereof), if any, as provided in Section 4 hereof and as may be specified in Schedule II to such Pricing Agreement (with respect to such Pricing Agreement, any Designated Securities to be covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts being herein sometimes referred to as  and the Designated Securities to be purchased by the Underwriters (after giving effect to the deduction, if any, for Contract Securities) being herein sometimes referred to as ).
Company
Pricing Agreement
Underwriters
Securiti es
Designated Securities
Contract Securities
Underwriters Securities
 
The terms and rights of any particular issuance of Designated Securities shall be as specified in the Pricing Agreement relating thereto and in or pursuant to the indenture (the ) identified in Schedule II to such Pricing Agreement.
Indenture
 
1.      Particular sales of Designated Securities may be made from time to time to the Underwriters of such Securities, for whom the firms designated as representatives of the Underwriters of such Securities in the Pricing Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
relating thereto will act as representatives (the ). The term  also refers to a single firm acting as sole representative of the Underwriters and to Underwriters who act without any firm being designated as their representative. Except as incorporated by reference into a Pricing Agreement, this Agreement shall not be construed as an obligation of the Company to sell any of the Securities or as an obligation of any of the Underwriters to purchase any of the Securities. The obligation of the Company to issue and sell any of the Securities and the obligation of any of the Underwriters to purchase any of the Securities shall be evidenced by the Pricing Agreement with res pect to the Designated Securities specified therein. Each Pricing Agreement shall specify, among other things, the aggregate principal amount of such Designated Securities, the initial public offering price of such Designated Securities, the purchase price to the Underwriters of such Designated Securities, the names of the Underwriters of such Designated Securities, the names of the Representatives of such Underwriters, the principal amount of such Designated Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter and whether any of such Designated Securities shall be covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts, and shall set forth the date, time and manner of delivery of such Designated Securities and payment therefor. A Pricing Agreement shall be in the form of an executed writing (which may be in counterparts), and may be evidenced by an exchange of telegraphic communications or any other rapid transmission device designed to produce a written record of communications transmitted. The obligations of the Underwriters und er this Agreement and each Pricing Agreement shall be several and not joint.
Representatives
Representatives
 
2.      The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the ), a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-155961), including a prospectus (the  ), relating to certain securities, including the Securities, to be issued from time to time by the Company.  The Company has also filed, or proposes to file, with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424 under the Act a prospectus supplement specifically relating to the Designated Securities (the  ).  The registration statement, as amended at the time it becomes effective with respect to the Designated Securities, including the information, if any, deemed pursuant to Rule 430B or 430C under the Act to be part of the registration statement at the time of such effectiveness, is referred to herein as the  ; and as used herein, the term  means the Basic Prospectus as supplemented by the prospectus supplement specifically relating to the Designated Securities in the form first used (or made available upon request of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the Act) in connection with confirmation of sales of the Designated Securities and the term   means any preliminary prospectus supplement specifically relating to the Designated Securities, as identified in Schedule III to the Pricing Agreement for the Designated Securities, together with the Basic Prospectus.  References herein to the Registration
Commission
Act
Basic
Prospectus
Prospectus
Supplement
Registration
Statement
Prospectus
Preliminary
Prospectus
 
 
2
 
 
Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein.  The terms ,  and  as used herein with respect to the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed by the Company under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the  ) subsequent to the date of the Pricing Agreement which are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein.
supplement
amendment
amend
Exchange
Act
 
At or prior to the time when sales of the Designated Securities will be first made (as specified in Schedule III to the Pricing Agreement for the offering of Designated Securities, the  ), the Company will prepare certain information (collectively, and together with any Preliminary Prospectus, the ) which information will be identified in Schedule III to the Pricing Agreement for such offering of Designated Securities.
Time
of
Sale
Time of Sale Information
3.      The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each of the Underwriters that:
 
(a)      The Registration Statement is an automatic shelf registration statement as defined under Rule 405 of the Act that has been filed with the Commission not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been received by the Company.  No stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of, or suspending the effectiveness of, the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been issued by the Commission, and, to the knowledge of the Company, no proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Act against the Company or relate d to the offering of the Designated Securities has been initiated or threatened by the Commission.
 
(b)      The Registration Statement and the Prospectus conform, and any further amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus will conform, in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the ), and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and do not and will not, as of the applicable effective date as to the Registration Statement and any amendment thereto and as of the applicable filing date as to the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein (i) in the case o f the Registration Statement, not misleading and (ii) in the case of the Prospectus, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
Trust Indenture Act
provided,
 
 
3
 
 
 
, that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter of Designated Securities through the Representatives for use in the Prospectus as amended or supplemented relating to such Designated Securities;
however
 
(c)      The Time of Sale Information did not as of the Time of Sale contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; , , that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter of Designated Securities through the Representatives for use in such Time of Sale Information relating to such Designated Securities;
provided
however
 
(d)      The Company is a well known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Act) and is not an ineligible issuer pursuant to Rules 164, 405 and 433 under the Act.  Any free writing prospectus that the Company is required to file pursuant to Rule 433(d) (as defined in Rule 405 under the Act) with respect to the Designated Securities (an ) has been, or will be, filed with the Commission in accordance with the requirements of the Act.  Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus complies or will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Act, did not or does not include any information that conflicts with the information contained in the Registration Stateme nt and, when taken together with the Preliminary Prospectus, did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that the Company makes no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information relating to any Underwriter furnished to the Company in writing by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.  Except for any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus identified in Schedule III to the Pricing Agreement, and electronic road shows, if any, furnished to the Representatives before first use, the Company has not used or approved, and will not, without the Representatives prior consent, use or approve, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus;
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
provided
 
(e)      The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly subsisting as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania; the Company is duly qualified to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the
 
 
4
 
 
conduct of its business or its ownership or leasing of property requires such qualification, except where the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole;
 
(f)      The Designated Securities have been duly authorized by the Company; and, when the Designated Securities are issued, executed, authenticated, delivered and paid for pursuant to this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to such Designated Securities and the Indenture and, in the case of any Contract Securities, pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts with respect to such Contract Securities, such Designated Securities will have been duly issued, executed and delivered and will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity);
 
(g)      The Indenture, which will be substantially in one of the forms filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement, has been duly authorized by the Company and, at the Time of Delivery (as defined in Section 5 hereof) for such Designated Securities, the Indenture will be duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act and, assuming due authorization, execution and delivery by the trustee under such Indenture (the ), the Indenture will constitute a valid and legally binding instrument of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity); and the Indenture conforms, and the Designated Securities will conform, in all material respects, to the descriptions thereof contained in the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented with respect to such Designated Securities;
Trustee
 
(h)      The issuance and sale of the Designated Securities and the compliance by the Company with all of the provisions of the Designated Securities, the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and any Pricing Agreement, and the consummation of the transactions herein and therein contemplated will not (1) conflict with or result in a breach or violation by the Company of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default by the Company under, any
 
 
5
 
 
indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other similar agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party or by which the Company is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company is subject, except, in all such cases, for such conflicts, breaches, violations or defaults as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, or would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities, or (2) result in any violation of (A) the provisions of the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company or (B) any statute of the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or any order, rule or regulation of any court or governmental agency or body of t he United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties; , that in the case of clause (B) of this paragraph 3(h), this representation and warranty shall not extend to such violations as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities; , that insofar as this representation and warranty relates to the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Indenture, this Agreement, the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, and the Designated Securities, such performance is subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency , reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity);
provided, however
provided further
 
(i)      No consent, approval, authorization, order, registration, filing or qualification of or with any court or governmental agency or body of the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania is required for the issuance and sale of the Designated Securities by the Company or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or any Pricing Agreement or the Indenture or any Delayed Delivery Contract except such as have been, or will have been, prior to the Time of Delivery, obtained under the Act and the Trust Indenture Act and such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations, filings or qualifications as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws or insurance securities laws of any such jurisdiction in connection with the purchase and dist ribution of the Designated Securities by the Underwriters, and except those which, if not obtained, will not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities by the Company;
 
 
6
 
 
 
(j)      In the event any of the Designated Securities are purchased pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts, each of such Delayed Delivery Contracts has been duly authorized by the Company and, when executed and delivered by the Company and the purchaser named therein, will constitute a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity); and any Delayed Delivery Contracts will conform, in all material respects, to the descriptions thereof contained in the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented with respect to such Designated Securities; and
 
(k)      Aetna Life Insurance Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Connecticut; all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Aetna Life Insurance Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable, and are owned directly or indirectly by the Company.
 
(l)      The financial statements and the related notes thereto included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus comply in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Act and the Exchange Act, as applicable, and present fairly the financial position of the Company and its subsidiaries as of the dates indicated and the results of their operations and the changes in their cash flows for the periods specified; except as disclosed therein, such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods covered thereby; the supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference  in the Registration Statement present fairl y the information required to be stated therein; and the other financial information included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus has been derived from the accounting records of the Company and its subsidiaries and presents fairly the information shown thereby.
 
(m)    The Company and its subsidiaries maintain an effective system of disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commissions rules and forms,
 
 
7
 
 
including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Companys management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.  The Company and its subsidiaries have carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as required by Rule 13a-15 of the Exchange Act.
 
(n)      The Company and its subsidiaries maintain systems of internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act and have been designed by, or under the supervision of, their respective principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including, but not limited to, internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) trans actions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain asset accountability; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.  Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there are no material weaknesses in the Companys internal controls.
 
4.       Upon the execution of the Pricing Agreement applicable to any Designated Securities, the several Underwriters propose to offer such Underwriters Securities for sale upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Prospectus as amended or supplemented.
 
The Company may specify in Schedule II to the Pricing Agreement applicable to any Designated Securities that the Underwriters are authorized to solicit offers to purchase Designated Securities from the Company pursuant to delayed delivery contracts (), substantially in the form of Annex II hereto but with such changes therein as the Representatives and the Company may authorize or approve. If so specified, the Underwriters will endeavor to make such arrangements and, as compensation therefor, the Company will pay to the Representatives, for the accounts of the Underwriters, at the Time of Delivery, such commission, if any, as may be set forth in such Pricing Agreement. Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, are to be with investors of the types d escribed in the Time of Sale Information and subject to other conditions therein set forth. The Underwriters will not have any responsibility with respect to the validity or performance of any Delayed Delivery Contracts.
Delayed Delivery Contracts
 
 
8
 
 
 
The principal amount of Contract Securities to be deducted from the principal amount of Designated Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter as set forth in Schedule I to the Pricing Agreement applicable to such Designated Securities shall be, in each case, the principal amount of Contract Securities which the Company has been advised by the Representatives have been attributed to such Underwriter, that, if the Company has not been so advised, the amount of Contract Securities to be so deducted shall be, in each case, that proportion of Contract Securities which the principal amount of Designated Securities to be purchased by such Underwriter under such Pricing Agreement bears to the total principal amount of the Designated Securities (rounded as the Representatives m ay determine). The total principal amount of Underwriters Securities to be purchased by all the Underwriters pursuant to such Pricing Agreement shall be the total principal amount of Designated Securities set forth in Schedule I to such Pricing Agreement less the principal amount of the Contract Securities so set forth. If the Company determines to enter into Delayed Delivery Contracts, the Company will deliver to the Representatives not later than 3:30 p.m., New York City time, on the third business day preceding the Time of Delivery specified in the applicable Pricing Agreement (or such other time and date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing) a written notice setting forth the principal amount of Contract Securities.
provided
 
5.      Underwriters Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter pursuant to the Pricing Agreement relating thereto, in definitive form to the extent practicable, and in such authorized denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request upon at least twenty-four hours prior notice to the Company, shall be delivered by or on behalf of the Company to the Representatives for the account of such Underwriter, against payment by such Underwriter or on its behalf of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer to a bank account specified by the Company and specified in Schedule II to the Pricing Agreement, in federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, all at the place and the time and date specified in such Pricing Agreement or at such other place and time an d date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing, such time and date being herein called the  for such Securities.
Time of Delivery
 
Concurrently with the delivery of and payment for the Underwriters Securities, the Company will deliver to the Representatives, for the accounts of the Underwriters, a check payable to the order of the party designated in the Pricing Agreement relating to such Securities in the amount of any compensation payable by the Company to the Underwriters in respect of any Delayed Delivery Contracts as provided in Section 4 hereof and the Pricing Agreement relating to such Securities.
 
6.      The Company agrees with each of the Underwriters of any Designated Securities:
 
 
9
 
 
 
(a)      To prepare the Prospectus as amended and supplemented in relation to the applicable Designated Securities and to file such Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than the Commissions close of business on the second business day following the execution and delivery of the Pricing Agreement relating to the applicable Designated Securities or, if applicable, such other time as may be required by Rule 424 (b) and Rule 430B or 430C under the Act; to file any free writing prospectus to the extent required by Rule 433 under the Act; to advise the Representatives promptly of any proposal to (i) use or approve any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or (ii) amend or supplement the Registration Statement or Prospectus as amended or supplemented, in each case after the date of the Pricin g Agreement relating to such Designated Securities and prior to the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, and to afford the Representatives a reasonable opportunity to comment on any such proposed Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement or Prospectus; for so long as the delivery of a prospectus is required under the Act in connection with the offering or sale of the Designated Securities, to advise the Representatives promptly of the issuance by the Commission of (A) any request by the Commission to amend or supplement the Registration Statement or Prospectus, (B) any stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of any prospectus relating to the Designated Securities, (C) any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act or (D) the suspension of the qualification of such Designated Securities for offering or sale in any jurisd iction or of the initiation of any proceeding for any such purpose; and, in the event of the issuance of any such stop order or of any such order preventing or suspending the use of any prospectus relating to the Designated Securities or suspending any such qualification, to use promptly its best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order;
 
(b)      Promptly from time to time to endeavor to take such action as the Representatives may reasonably request to qualify such Designated Securities for offering and sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions of the United States as the Representatives may reasonably request and such other jurisdictions as the Company and the Representatives may agree and to comply with such laws so as to permit the continuance of sales and dealings therein in such jurisdictions for as long as may be necessary to complete the distribution of such Designated Securities, that in connection therewith the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction, and that in connection therewith the Company shall not be required to qualify such Designated Securities for offering and sale under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction for a period in excess of nine months after the initial time
provided
provided
further
 
 
10
 
 
of issue of the Prospectus as amended or supplemented relating to such Designated Securities;
 
(c)      To furnish the Underwriters with copies of the Prospectus as amended or supplemented and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (if applicable) in such quantities as the Representatives may from time to time reasonably request, and, if the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof the notice required under Rule 173 of the Securities Act) is required at any time in connection with the offering or sale of the Designated Securities and if at such time any event shall have occurred as a result of which the Prospectus or any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, taken together with the Preliminary Prospectus, as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circums tances under which they were made when such Prospectus (or in lieu thereof the notice required under Rule 173 of the Securities Act) or any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus is delivered, not misleading, or, if for any other reason it shall be necessary during such same period to amend or supplement the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in order to comply with the Act or the Exchange Act, to notify the Representatives and to file such document and to prepare and furnish without charge to each Underwriter and to any dealer in securities as many copies as the Representatives may from time to time reasonably request of any amended Prospectus or a supplement to the Prospectus which will correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance; that in case any Underwriter is required under the Act to deliver a prospectus (or in lieu thereof the notice required under Rule 173 of the Securities Act) in connection with the offering or sale of the Designated Securities at any time more than nine months after the date of the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, the costs of such preparation and furnishing of such amended or supplemented Prospectus shall be borne by the Underwriters of such Designated Securities;
provided, however,
 
(d)      If the Time of Sale Information is being used to solicit offers to buy the Designated Securities at a time when the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers, and (A) any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which the Time of Sale Information as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading or (B) it is necessary to amend or supplement the Time of Sale Information to comply with law, to immediately notify the Representatives thereof and forthwith prepare and, subject to Section 6(a), file with the Commission (to the extent required) and furnish to the Underwriters an d to such dealers as the Representatives may designate,
 
 
11
 
 
such amendments or supplements to the Time of Sale Information as may be necessary so that the statements in the Time of Sale Information as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such Time of Sale Information is delivered, be misleading or so that the Time of Sale Information will comply with law;
 
(e)      To prepare a final term sheet, containing solely a description of the Designated Securities, substantially in the form of Schedule IV to the Pricing Agreement and approved by the Representatives, and to file such term sheet pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act within the time period prescribed by such rule.
 
(f)      To make generally available to the Companys securityholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than eighteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c)), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158); and
 
(g)      During the period beginning on the date of the Pricing Agreement for such Designated Securities and continuing to and including the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, not to offer, sell, contract to sell or otherwise dispose of in the United States any debt securities of the Company which mature more than one year after such Time of Delivery and which are substantially similar to such Designated Securities, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.
 
7.      The Company covenants and agrees with the several Underwriters that the Company will pay or cause to be paid the following: (i) the fees, disbursements and expenses of the Companys counsel and accountants in connection with the registration of the Designated Securities under the Act and all other expenses in connection with the Companys preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any Time of Sale Information and, subject to the proviso of Section 6(c), the Prospectus and amendments and supplements thereto and the mailing and delivery of copies thereof to the Underwriters and dealers; (ii) all expenses in connection with the qualifi cation of the Designated Securities for offering and sale under state securities laws as provided in Section 6(b) hereof, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection with such qualification and in connection with the Blue Sky and legal investment surveys; (iii) any fees charged by securities rating services for rating the Designated Securities; (iv) any filing fees incident to any required review by FINRA Regulation, Inc. of the terms of the sale of the Designated Securities; (v) any cost of preparing certificates or other evidences of the
 
 
12
 
 
Securities or any costs of The Depository Trust Company; (vi) the fees and expenses of any Trustee and any agent of any Trustee and the fees and disbursements of counsel for any Trustee in connection with any Indenture and the Designated Securities; and (vii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of the Companys obligations hereunder and under any Delayed Delivery Contracts which are not otherwise specifically provided for in this Section. It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section, Section 10 and Section 14 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees of their counsel, transfer taxes on resale of any of the Designated Securities by them, and any advertising expenses connected with any offers they may make.
 
The foregoing provisions of this Section 7 shall be without prejudice to the Companys rights under any separate agreements between the Company and its attorneys, accountants and vendors with respect to such fees, disbursements, expenses and costs.
 
8.      Each Underwriter hereby represents and agrees that:
 
(a)      It has not and will not use, authorize use of, refer to, or participate in the planning for use of, any free writing prospectus, as defined in Rule 405 under the Act (which term includes use of any written information furnished to the Commission by the Company and not incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and any press release issued by the Company) other than (i) one or more term sheets relating to the Designated Securities which are not Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses and which contain preliminary terms of the Designated Securities and related customary information not inconsistent with the final term sheet filed by the Company pursuant to Section 6(e) hereof, (ii) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus listed on Schedule III to the applicable Pricing Agreement or p repared pursuant to Section 6(d) above, or (iii) any free writing prospectus prepared by such Underwriter and approved by the Company in advance in writing (each such free writing prospectus referred to in clauses (i) or (iii), an );
Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus
 
(b)      It has not and will not distribute any Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus in a manner reasonably designed to lead to its broad unrestricted dissemination, and it will not otherwise be required to file any Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus with the Commission, in accordance with Rule 433 under the Act, as a result of any action taken or caused to be taken by such Underwriter, unless such action is consented to in advance by the Company;
 
(c)      It has not and will not, without the prior written consent of the Company, use any free writing prospectus that contains the final terms of the Designated Securities unless such terms previously have been included in a free writing prospectus filed with the Commission;
provided
 
 
13
 
 
that Underwriters may use a term sheet substantially in the form of Schedule IV to the applicable Pricing Agreement, together with related customary information not inconsistent with the Prospectus, without the consent of the Company; and
 
(d)      Any Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus used or referred to by it complied or will comply in all materials respects with the Act.
 
9.      The obligations of the Underwriters of any Designated Securities under the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated Securities shall be subject, in the discretion of the Representatives, to the condition that all representations and warranties and other statements of the Company included in or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated Securities are, at and as of the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, true and correct, the condition that the Company shall have performed in all material respects all of its obligations hereunder theretofore to be performed, and the following additional conditions:
 
(a)      The Prospectus as amended or supplemented and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus relating to the applicable Designated Securities shall have been filed with the Commission under the Act within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by the rules and regulations under the Act; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceeding for that purpose shall have been initiated or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission;
 
(b)      Counsel for the Underwriters shall have furnished to the Representatives such opinion or opinions, dated the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, with respect to the incorporation of the Company, the validity of the Indenture, the Designated Securities, the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus as amended or supplemented and other related matters as the Representatives may reasonably request, and such counsel shall have received such papers and information as it may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters;
 
(c)      The Companys Senior Corporate Counsel or such other internal counsel as shall be reasonably acceptable to the Representatives (the ), shall have furnished to the Representatives such counsels written opinion, dated the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that:
Internal Counsel
 
(i)      Aetna Life Insurance Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Connecticut; all of the outstanding shares of capital
 
 
14
 
 
stock of Aetna Life Insurance Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable, and are owned directly or indirectly by the Company;
 
(ii)      To the best of such counsels knowledge and other than as set forth or contemplated in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and/or the Prospectus, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or threatened involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries of a character required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus which are not adequately disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus;
 
(iii)     The issuance and sale of the Designated Securities and the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Designated Securities, the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities will not (1) conflict with or result in a breach or violation by the Company of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default by the Company under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other similar agreement or instrument known to such counsel to which the Company is a party or by which the Company is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company is subject, except, in all such cases, for such conflicts, breaches, violations or defaults as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole and would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities or (2) result in any violation of any statute of the United States or any order, rule or regulation known to such counsel of any court or governmental agency or body of the United States having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties, except with respect to clause (2), such violations as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, or would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities (and except that for purposes of this paragraph (iii) such counsel need not express any opinion as to any violation of any fraudulent transfer laws or other antifraud laws or as to any violation of any securities or insurance laws or as to any transactions of the type described in the Prospectus under the caption ERISA Matters; that insofar as performance by the Company of its obligations under the Indenture, the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement, the Pricing Agreement relating
provided further
 
 
15
 
 
to the Designated Securities, and the Designated Securities is concerned, such counsel need not express any opinion as to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally or to general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity));
 
(iv)     The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented (other than the financial statements and related notes, information as to reserves, the financial statement schedules and the other financial and statistical data included therein or omitted therefrom, as to which such counsel need express no opinion), when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder;
 
(v)      Under the federal laws of the United States, no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration, filing or qualification of or with any court or governmental agency or body is required for the issuance and sale of the Designated Securities in accordance with the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities, except for such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations, filings or qualifications as have been obtained under the Act and the Trust Indenture Act in connection with the purchase and sale and distribution of the Designated Securities by the Underwriters, and except those which, if not obtained, will not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; that such counsel need not express any opinion as to any transactions of the type described in the Prospectus under the caption ERISA Matters; and
provided
 
(vi)     In the event any of the Designated Securities are to be purchased pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts, each of such Delayed Delivery Contracts conforms in all material respects to the description thereof in the Prospectus as amended or supplemented.
 
In addition, such counsel shall state that such counsel does not know of any contract or other document (i) of a character required to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement or to any of the documents incorporated by
 
 
16
 
 
reference into the Prospectus as amended or supplemented which is not so filed, (ii) required to be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus as amended or supplemented which is not so incorporated by reference or (iii) required to be described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus as amended or supplemented which is not so described.
 
In rendering the opinion required by subsection (c) of this Section, the Internal Counsel may state that he is admitted to the Bar of the State of Connecticut and that his opinion is limited to the laws of the State of Connecticut and the federal laws of the United States of America. The Internal Counsel may rely (A) as to any matter to which you consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld), to the extent specified in such opinion, upon the opinions of other counsel in good standing whom such counsel believes to be reliable, that the Internal Counsel shall state that he and you are justified in relying on such opinions and (B) as to matters of fact, upon certificates of officers and representatives of the Company and of public officials, and may state that he has not verified independently the accuracy or completeness of information or documents furnished to such counsel with respect to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus.
provided
 
(d)      Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel for the Company, shall have furnished to the Representatives its written opinion, dated the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that:
 
(i)      The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly subsisting as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania;
 
(ii)      This Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
 
(iii)     The Designated Securities have been duly authorized by the Company; assuming the due authentication of the Underwriters Securities by the Trustee, the Underwriters Securities have been duly issued, executed and delivered by the Company; and assuming the due authentication of the Contract Securities by the Trustee, the Contract Securities, if any, have been duly issued, executed and delivered by the Company;
 
(iv)     The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
 
(v)      The issuance and sale of the Designated Securities and the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Designated Securities, the Indenture, each of the Delayed
 
 
17
 
 
Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities will not result in any violation of (1) the provisions of the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company or (2) any statute of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or any order, rule or regulation known to such counsel of any court or governmental agency or body of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties, except with respect to clause (2), such violations as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole and would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities (and except that for purposes of this paragraph (v) such counsel need not express any opinion as to any violation of any fraudulent transfer laws or other antifraud laws or as to any violation of any federal and state securities laws or Blue Sky or insurance or insurance securities laws; , that insofar as performance by the Company of its obligations under the Indenture, the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement, the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, and the Designated Securities is concerned, such counsel need not express any opinion as to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally or to general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity));
provided
further
 
(vi)    Under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration, filing or qualification of or with any court or governmental agency or body is required for the issuance and sale of the Designated Securities in accordance with the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities except for such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations, filings or qualifications as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws or insurance or insurance securities laws in connection with the purchase and sale and distribution of the Designated Securities by the Underwriters, and except those which, if not obtained, will not have a material adverse effect on the fin ancial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; and
 
 
18
 
 
 
(vii)   In the event any of the Designated Securities are to be purchased pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts, each such Delayed Delivery Contract has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
 
In rendering the opinion required by subsection (d) of this Section, Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP may state that its opinion is limited to the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.
 
(e)      Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP, special counsel for the Company, shall have furnished to the Representatives its written opinion, dated the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that:
 
(i)      This Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
 
(ii)     The Designated Securities have been duly authorized by the Company; assuming the due authentication of the Underwriters Securities by the Trustee, the Underwriters Securities are duly issued, executed and delivered, and constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity); assuming the due authentication of the Contract Securities b y the Trustee, the Contract Securities, if any, when issued, executed and delivered and when paid for in accordance with the Indenture and the Delayed Delivery Contracts will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity); and the Designated Securities and the Indenture conform in all material respects to the descriptions thereof in the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented;
 
 
19
 
 
 
(iii)     The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and, assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery thereof by the Trustee, the Indenture constitutes a valid and legally binding instrument of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity); and the Indenture has been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act;
 
(iv)    In the event any of the Designated Securities are to be purchased pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts, each such Delayed Delivery Contract has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and, assuming such Delayed Delivery Contract has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the purchaser named therein, and the Securities to be delivered thereunder have been paid for by the purchaser named therein, such Delayed Delivery Contract constitutes a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remed ies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity); and any Delayed Delivery Contracts conform in all material respects to the description thereof in the Prospectus as amended and supplemented; and
 
(v)     Nothing has come to the attention of such counsel to cause it to believe that (1) the Registration Statement, as amended, and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented (other than the financial statements and related notes, the financial statement schedules and the other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which such counsel need express no opinion), do not comply as to form in all material respects with the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder, (2) any part of the Registration Statement (other than the financial statements and related notes, the financial statement schedules and the other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or
 
 
20
 
 
omitted therefrom, as to which such counsel need express no belief), at the time such part became effective, insofar as it relates to the offering of Designated Securities, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (3) that the Time of Sale Information (other than as set forth in (2) above), at the Time of Sale, contained an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading or (4) the Prospectus as amended or supplemented, as of its date and the Time of Delivery (other than as set forth in (2) above), contained or contains an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or omits to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
With respect to clause (v) of subsection (e) of this Section, Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP may state that its opinion and belief are based upon its participation in the preparation of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus (other than the documents incorporated by reference therein) and any amendments or supplements thereto and review and discussion of the contents thereof (including the documents incorporated by reference therein), but are without independent check or verification except as specified. In rendering the opinion required by subsection (e) of this Section, Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP may state that it is admitted to the Bar of the State of New York and its opinion is limited to the laws of the State of New York and the federal laws of the United States of America. Davis Polk & War dwell LLP may rely upon the accuracy of matters (A) involving the application of laws of any jurisdiction other than the United States or the State of New York and, to the extent specified in such opinion, upon the opinions of other counsel reasonably satisfactory to you (including without limitation, (x) as to matters of Pennsylvania law, on the opinion of Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel to the Company, and (y) as to matters of Connecticut law, on the opinion of the Internal Counsel), and (B) of fact upon certificates of officers and representatives of the Company and of public officials.
 
(f)      At the Time of Sale and the Time of Delivery for the Designated Securities, KPMG LLP, independent public accountants for the Company, shall have furnished to the Representatives a letter dated the respective dates of delivery thereof, to the effect set forth in Annex III hereto and as to such other matters as the Representatives may reasonably request and in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, that the letter shall use a cut-off date not earlier than the date of the Pricing Agreement;
provided
 
 
21
 
 
 
< /div>
(g)      Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Information, there shall not have been any adverse change or a development involving a prospective material adverse change in the financial position, stockholders equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as a whole, otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Time of Sale Information, the effect of which, in any such case described above, is in the reasonable judgment of the Representatives, so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering, sale or the delivery of the Underwriters Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus;
 
(h)      On or after the date of the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Companys debt securities by either Standard & Poors Ratings Services or Moodys Investors Service, Inc.and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, or has negatively changed its outlook with respect to, its rating of any of the Company's debt securities or preferred stock;
 
 
(i)      On or after the date of the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, there shall not have occurred any of the following: (i) a suspension or material limitation in trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) trading of any securities issued or guaranteed by the Company shall have been suspended on any exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities in New York declared by either Federal or New York state authorities; or (iv) any outbreak or material escalation of hostilities or any material change in the financial markets or any calamity or crisis involving the United States or the declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war, if the effect of any of the above specified events, in the reasonable judgment of the Repres entatives, makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering, sale or delivery of the Underwriters Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus; and
 
(j)      The Company shall have furnished or caused to be furnished to the Representatives at the Time of Delivery for the Designated Securities a certificate or certificates of officers of the Company as to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company herein at and as of such Time of Delivery, as to the performance by the Company of all of its obligations hereunder to be performed at or prior to such Time of Delivery, as to the matters set forth in subsections (a) and (g) of this Section and as to such other matters as the Representatives may reasonably request.
 
 
22
 
 
10.                  (a)     The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Preliminary Prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to b e stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein (i) in the case of the Registration Statement, not misleading and (ii) in the case of any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, and will reimburse each Underwriter for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred; , , that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in any Preliminary Prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter of Designated Securities through the Representatives for inclusion therein.
provided
however
 
(b)      Each Underwriter severally will indemnify and hold harmless the Company against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Preliminary Prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein (i) in the case of the Registration Statement, not m isleading and (ii) in the case of any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or
 
 
23
 
 
supplement thereto, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives for inclusion therein; and will reimburse the Company for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred.
 
(c)      Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under such subsection. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party (who shall not, except with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party), and, after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal expenses of other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation, unless such indemnifying party and indemnified party are named parties to any such action (including any impleaded parties) and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them. In no event shall any indemnifying party be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances. In no event shall an indemnifying party be liable with respect to any action or claim settled without its written consent. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding.
 
 
24
 
 
(d)      If the indemnification provided for in this Section 10 is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to therein, then each indemnifying party, in lieu of indemnifying such indemnified party, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters of the Designated Securities on the other from the offering of the Designated Securities to which such loss, claim, damage or liability (or action in respect thereof) relates. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law or if the indemnified party failed to give the notice required under subsection (c) above, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters of the Designated Securities on the other in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and such Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from such offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Com pany bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by such Underwriters. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company on the one hand or such Underwriters on the other and the parties relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this subsection (d) were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this subsection (d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or ac tions in respect thereof) referred to above in this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the applicable Designated Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of
 
 
25
 
 
any damages (other than amounts paid or incurred without the consent of the indemnifying party as provided in this Section 10) which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The obligations of the Underwriters of Designated Securities in this subsection (d) to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations with respect to such Securities and not joint. No indemnifying party will be liable for contribution with respect to any acti on or claim settled without its written consent.
 
(e)      The obligations of the Company under this Section 10 shall be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have and shall extend or not extend, as the case may be, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the Act; and the obligations of the Underwriters under this Section 10 shall be in addition to any liability which the respective Underwriters may otherwise have and shall extend or not extend, as the case may be, upon the same terms and conditions, to each officer and director of the Company and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of t he Act.
 
11.                   (a)     If any Underwriter shall default in its obligation to purchase the Underwriters Securities which it has agreed to purchase under the Pricing Agreement relating to such Underwriters Securities, the Representatives may in their discretion arrange for themselves or another party or other parties to purchase such Underwriters Securities on the terms contained herein. If within thirty-six hours after such default by any Underwriter the Representatives do not arrange for the purchase of such Underwriters Securities, then the Company shall be entitled to a further period of thirty-six hours within which to procure another party or other parties reasonably satisfactory t o the Representatives to purchase such Underwriters Securities on such terms. In the event that, within the respective prescribed period, the Representatives notify the Company that they have so arranged for the purchase of such Underwriters Securities, or the Company notifies the Representatives that it has so arranged for the purchase of such Underwriters Securities, the Representatives or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Time of Delivery for such Underwriters Securities for a period of not more than seven days in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Time of Sale Information, the Registration Statement or the Prospectus as amended or supplemented, or in any other documents or arrangements, and the Company agrees to file promptly any amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus which in the opinion of the Representatives may thereby be made necessary. The term  as used in this Agreement shall include any person
Underwriter
 
 
26
 
 
substituted under this Section with like effect as if such person had originally been a party to the Pricing Agreement with respect to such Designated Securities.
 
(b)      If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Underwriters Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate amount of such Underwriters Securities which remains unpurchased does not exceed one-tenth of the aggregate principal amount of the Designated Securities, then the Company shall have the right to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase the principal amount of Underwriters Securities which such Underwriter agreed to purchase under the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated Securities and, in addition, to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase its pro rata share (based on the principal amount of Designated Securities which suc h Underwriter agreed to purchase under such Pricing Agreement) of the Underwriters Securities of such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters for which such arrangements have not been made; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
 
(c)      If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Designated Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate principal amount of Designated Securities which remains unpurchased exceeds one-tenth of the aggregate principal amount of the Designated Securities, as referred to in subsection (b) above, or if the Company shall not exercise the right described in subsection (b) above to require non-defaulting Underwriters to purchase Designated Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters, then the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated Securities shall thereupon terminate, without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter or the Company, except for the expenses to be borne by the Company and the Underwriters as provided in Section 7 hereof and the indemnity and contribution agreements in Section 10 hereof; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
 
12.      The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the several Underwriters, as set forth in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of them, respectively, pursuant to this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation (or any statement as to the results thereof) made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or any controlling person of any Underwriter, or the Company or any officer or director or controlling person of the Company, and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Designated Securities.
 
13.      The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Underwriters are acting solely as a principal and in the capacity of an arms length contractual
 
 
27
 
 
counterparty to the Company with respect to the offering of Securities contemplated hereby (including in connection with determining the terms of the offering) and not as a financial advisor or a fiduciary to, or an agent of, the Company or any other person.  Additionally, neither the Representatives nor any other Underwriter is advising the Company or any other person as to any legal, tax, investment, accounting or regulatory matters in any jurisdiction.  The Company represents that it has consulted with its own advisors concerning such matters and acknowledges that it is and shall be responsible for making its own independent investigation and appraisal of the transactions contemplated hereby, and that the Underwriters shall have no responsibility or liability to the Company with respect thereto. Any review by t he Underwriters of the Company, the transactions contemplated hereby or other matters relating to such transactions will be performed solely for the benefit of the Underwriters and shall not be on behalf of the Company.  The Company agrees that it will not claim that the Underwriters or any of them has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to the Company in connection with such transactions or the process leading thereto.
 
14.      If any Pricing Agreement shall be terminated pursuant to Section 11 hereof, the Company shall not then be under any liability to any Underwriter with respect to the Designated Securities covered by such Pricing Agreement except as provided in Section 7 and Section 10 hereof; but, if for any other reason Underwriters Securities are not delivered by or on behalf of the Company as provided herein, the Company will reimburse the Underwriters through the Representatives for all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses approved in writing by the Representatives, including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel, reasonably incurred by the Underwriters in making preparations for the purchase, sale and delivery of such Designated Securities, but the Company shall then be under no further liability to any Underwriter with respect to such Designated Securities except as provided in Section 7 and Section 10 hereof.
 
15.      In all dealings hereunder, the Representatives of the Underwriters of Designated Securities shall act on behalf of each of such Underwriters, and the parties hereto shall be entitled to act and rely upon any statement, request, notice or agreement on behalf of any Underwriter made or given by such Representatives jointly or by such of the Representatives, if any, as may be designated for such purpose in the Pricing Agreement.
 
All statements, requests, notices and agreements hereunder shall be in writing, and if to the Underwriters shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex or facsimile transmission to the address of the Representatives as set forth in the Pricing Agreement; and if to the Company shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex or facsimile transmission to the address of the Company set forth in the Registration Statement; Attention: Corporate Secretary; , , that any notice to an Underwriter pursuant to Section 10(b) hereof shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex or facsimile transmission to such Underwriter at its address set forth in its Underwrite rs Questionnaire, or telex constituting such
provided
however
 
 
28
 
 
Questionnaire, which address will be supplied to the Company by the Representatives upon request. Any such statements, requests, notices or agreements shall take effect upon receipt thereof.
 
16.      This Agreement and each Pricing Agreement shall be binding upon, and inure solely to the benefit of, the Underwriters, the Company and, to the extent provided in Section 10 and Section 12 hereof, the officers and directors of the Company and each person who controls the Company or any Underwriter, and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns, and no other person shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement or any such Pricing Agreement. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed a successor or assign by reason merely of such purchase.
 
17.      Time shall be of the essence for each Pricing Agreement. As used herein,  shall mean any day when the Commissions office in Washington, D.C. is open for business.
business day
 
18.      THIS AGREEMENT AND EACH PRICING AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
 
29
 
 
 
This Agreement and each Pricing Agreement may be executed by any one or more of the parties hereto and thereto in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such respective counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
 
 
30
 
 
ANNEX I
 
 
[Insert Representatives]
As Representatives of the several
Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
 
____________, 20
__
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and in the Underwriting Agreement, dated ____________, 2010 (the ), to issue and sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the ) the debt securities specified in Schedule II hereto (the ). Each of the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety, and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions ha d been set forth in full herein; and each of the representations and warranties set forth therein shall be deemed to have been made at and as of the date of this Pricing Agreement. Each reference to the Representatives herein and in the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement so incorporated by reference shall be deemed to refer to you. Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Underwriting Agreement are used herein as therein defined. The Representatives designated to act on behalf of each of the Underwriters of the Designated Securities pursuant to Section 15 of the Underwriting Agreement and the address of the Representatives referred to in such Section 15 are set forth at the end of Schedule II hereto.
Company
Underwriting Agreement
Underwriters
Designated Securities
 
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, the Company agrees to issue and to sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the time and place and at the purchase price to the Underwriters set forth in Schedule II hereto, the principal amount of Designated Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto, less the principal amount of Designated Securities covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, as may be specified in Schedule II hereto.
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof, including the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of the Underwriters is or will be pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of
 
 
 
 
 
Agreement among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request.
 
Accepted as of the date hereof:
 
[Insert Representatives]
 
On behalf of each of the
Underwriters
 
 
 
2 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
TITLE OF DESIGNATED SECURITIES:
 
[ %] [Floating Rate] [Zero Coupon] [Senior]
[Subordinated]
[Notes] [Debentures] due
 
AGGREGATE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT:
 
[$] [Foreign Currency]
 
PRICE TO PUBLIC:
 
__% of the principal amount of the Designated Securities, plus accrued interest from                      to                  [and accrued amortization, if any, from                      to                  ]
 
PURCHASE PRICE BY UNDERWRITERS:
 
__% of the principal amount of the Designated Securities, plus accrued interest from                      to                  [and accrued amortization, if any, from                      to                 ]
 
SPECIFIED FUNDS FOR PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE:
 
Immediately Available Funds
 
INDENTURE:
 
[Senior][Subordinated] Debt Indenture dated as of    , 200, between the Company, and U.S. Bank National Association, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as Trustee, as supplemented by the ____________ Indenture Supplement dated _______________, 200_ to the [Senior][Subordinated] Debt Indenture
                                                                             
 
 
MATURITY:
 
INTEREST RATE:
 
[ %] [Zero Coupon] [See Floating Rate Provisions]
 
INTEREST PAYMENT DATES:
 
[months and dates]
 
 
 
 
 
 
REDEMPTION PROVISIONS:
 
[No provisions for redemption]
 
[The Designated Securities may be redeemed, [otherwise than through the sinking fund], in whole or in part at the option of the Company, in the amount of [$ ] or an integral multiple thereof, [on or after _________, ____________ at the following redemption prices (expressed in percentages of principal amount). If [redeemed on or before ________, _____________, ___, % and if] redeemed during the 12-month period beginning ___, _______________:
 
 
and thereafter at 100% of their principal amount, together in each case with accrued interest to the redemption date.]
 
[on any interest payment date falling on or after _____, _____, at the election of the Company, at a redemption price equal to the principal amount thereof, plus accrued interest to the date of redemption.]
 
[Other possible redemption provisions, such as mandatory redemption upon occurrence of certain events or redemption for changes in tax law]
 
[Restriction on refunding]
 
SINKING FUND PROVISIONS:
 
[No sinking fund provisions]
 
[The Designated Securities are entitled to the benefit of a sinking fund to retire [$ ] principal amount of Designated Securities on in each of the years through at 100% of their principal amount plus accrued interest][, together with [cumulative] [noncumulative] redemptions at the option of the Company to retire an additional [$ ] principal amount of Designated Securities in the years through at 100% of their principal amount plus accrued interest].
 
[If Securities may be put to the issuer by holders, insert ______]
 
OPTIONAL REPAYMENT PROVISIONS:
 
Securities are repayable on , [insert date and years], at the option of the holder, at their principal amount with accrued interest.
 
[If securities are Floating Rate debt securities, insert ______]
 
 
2
 
 
 
FLOATING RATE PROVISIONS:
 
Initial annual interest rate will be % through __________, _________ (and thereafter will be adjusted (monthly] [on each , and ] [to an annual rate of % above the average rate for -[year] [month] [securities] [certificates of deposit] issued by and [insert names of banks] [and the annual interest rate [thereafter] [from through ] will be the interest yield equivalent of the weekly average per annum market discount rate for month Treasury bills plus % of Interest Differential (the excess, if any, of (i) then current weekly average per annum secondary market yield for -month certificates of deposit over (ii) then current interest yield equivalent of the weekly average per annum market discount rate for     -month Treasury bills); [from and thereafter the rate will be the then current interest yield equivalent plu s % of Interest Differential].
 
TIME OF DELIVERY:
 
CLOSING LOCATION:
 
DELAYED DELIVERY:
 
[None] [Underwriters commission shall be __% of the principal amount of Designated Securities for which Delayed Delivery Contracts have been entered into. Such commission shall be payable to the order of ____]
 
NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF REPRESENTATIVES:
 
Designated Representatives:
 
Address for Notices, etc.:
 
[OTHER TERMS]:
 
 
3
 
 
 
 
 
 
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates.  Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering.  You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at   Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling [] at[].
www.sec.gov.
 
 
 
 
ANNEX II
 
 
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue
Hartford, CT 06156
 
Attention: ____________
 
_____________, _____
 
Dear Sirs:
 
 
 
principal amount of the Companys debt securities (the ) offered by the Companys Prospectus dated _____________, as amended or supplemented, receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged, at a purchase price of __% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued interest from the date from which interest accrues as set forth below, and on the further terms and conditions set forth below, and on the further terms and conditions set forth in this contract.
Designated Securities
 
The undersigned will purchase the Designated Securities from the Company on the delivery date or dates and in the principal amount or amounts set forth below:
 
EACH SUCH DATE ON WHICH DESIGNATED SECURITIES ARE TO BE PURCHASED HEREUNDER IS HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AS A 
DELIVERY DATE.
 
Payment for the Designated Securities which the undersigned has agreed to purchase on each Delivery Date shall be made to the Company in Federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, by wire transfer to a bank account specified by the Company, on such Delivery Date upon delivery to the
 
 
 
 
 
undersigned of the Designated Securities then to be purchased by the undersigned in definitive fully registered form and in such denominations and registered in such names as the undersigned may designate by written, telex or facsimile communication addressed to the Company not less than five full business days prior to such Delivery Date.
 
The obligation of the undersigned to take delivery of and make payment for Designated Securities on each Delivery Date shall be subject to the condition that the purchase of Designated Securities to be made by the undersigned shall not on such Delivery Date be prohibited under the laws of the jurisdiction to which the undersigned is subject. The obligation of the undersigned to take delivery of and make payment for Designated Securities shall not be affected by the failure of any purchaser to take delivery of and make payment for Designated Securities pursuant to other contracts similar to this contract.
 
The undersigned understands that Underwriters (the ) are also purchasing Designated Securities from the Company, but that the obligations of the undersigned hereunder are not contingent on such purchases.  Promptly after completion of the sale of Designated Securities to the Underwriters, the Company will mail or deliver to the undersigned at its address set forth below notice to such effect, accompanied by a copy of the opinion of counsel for the Company delivered to the Underwriters in connection therewith.
Underwriters
 
The undersigned represents and warrants that, as of the date of this contract, the undersigned is not prohibited from purchasing the Designated Securities hereby agreed to be purchased by it under the laws of the jurisdictions to which the undersigned is subject.
 
This contract will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors, but will not be assignable by either party hereto without the written consent of the other.
 
This contract may be executed by either of the parties hereto in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
 
It is understood that the acceptance by the Company of any Delayed Delivery Contract (including this contract) is in the Companys sole discretion and that, without limiting the foregoing, acceptances of such contracts need not be on a first-come, first-served basis. If this contract is acceptable to the Company, it is requested that the Company sign the form of acceptance below and mail or deliver one of the counterparts hereof to the undersigned at its address set forth below. This will become a binding contract between the Company and the undersigned when such counterpart is so mailed or delivered by the Company.
 
 
2
 
 
 
 
3
 
ANNEX III
 
 
Pursuant to Section 9(f) of the Underwriting Agreement, KPMG LLP shall furnish letters to the Underwriters with respect to the Company to the effect that:
 
(a)           They are the independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within the meaning of the Act and the applicable published rules and regulations thereunder adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission () and the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) ();
SEC
PCAOB
 
(b)           In their opinion, the financial statements and any supplementary financial information and schedules audited by them and included in the Registration Statement comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the Act and the related published rules and regulations published by the SEC; and they have made a review of the consolidated interim financial statements for the three-month periods ended [], as indicated in their reports thereon in the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the period ended [];
 
(c)           On the basis of limited procedures, not constituting an audit in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, consisting of a reading of the unaudited financial statements and other information referred to below, a reading of the latest available interim financial statements of the Company and its subsidiaries, inspection of the minute books of the Company and its subsidiaries since the date of the latest audited financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, inquiries of officials of the Company and its subsidiaries responsible for financial and accounting matters and such other inquiries and procedures as may be specified in such letter, nothing came to their attention that caused them to believe that:
 
(i)         the unaudited condensed consolidated statements of income, consolidated balance sheets and consolidated statements of cash flows included or incorporated by reference in the Companys Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the three-month periods ended [] incorporated by reference in the Prospectus do not comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable accounting requirements of the Act as it applies to Form 10-Q and the related rules and regulations adopted by the SEC and the PCAOB;
 
(ii)        as of a specified date not more than three business days prior to the date of such letter, there have been any changes in the consolidated common stock (other than issuances of common stock pursuant to employee benefit plans, upon exercise of options and stock
 
1 
 
 
 
appreciation rights, upon earn-outs of performance shares and upon conversions of convertible securities which were outstanding on the date of the latest balance sheet included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus), any increases in the debt of the Company or any decreases in consolidated assets or shareholders equity of the Company, in each case as compared with amounts shown in the latest balance sheet included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus, except in each case for changes or increases which the Prospectus discloses have occurred or may occur or which are described in such letter; or
 
(v)        for the period from the date of the latest financial statements included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus to the last day of the month immediately preceding the date of such letter for which monthly financial statements are available, if any, there were any decreases in consolidated revenues or net income, in each case as compared with the comparable period of the preceding year, except in each case for decreases which the Prospectus discloses have occurred or may occur or which are described in such letter;
 
(d)           In addition to the audit referred to in their report(s) included or incorporated by reference in the Prospectus and the limited procedures, inspection of minute books, inquiries and other procedures referred to above, the representatives of the Underwriters (the )
they have carried out certain specified procedures, not constituting an audit in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, with respect to certain amounts, percentages and financial information specified by
Representatives
which are derived from the general accounting records of the Company and its subsidiaries, which appear in the Prospectus (excluding documents incorporated by reference), or in Part II of, or in exhibits and schedules to, the Registration Statement specified by the Representatives or in documents incorporated by reference in the Prospectus specified by the Representatives, and have compared certain of such amounts, percentages and financial information with the accounting records of or schedules prepared by the Company and its subsidiaries and have found them to be in agreement.
 
With respect to any Designated Securities, all references in this Annex III to the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to the Prospectus as amended or supplemented (including the documents incorporated by reference therein) in relation to the applicable Designated Securities for purposes of the letter delivered at the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 2
 
 

Exhibit 1.2
 
Barclays Capital Inc.
RBS Securities Inc.
UBS Securities LLC
 
As Representatives of the several
Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
 
August 24, 2010
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and in the Underwriting Agreement dated as of August 24, 2010 (the ), to issue and sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the ) the debt securities specified in Schedule II hereto (the ). Each of the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety, and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein; and each of the representations and warranties set forth therein shall be deemed to have been made at and as of the date of this Pricing Agreement. Each reference to the Representatives herein and in the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement so incorporated by reference shall be deemed to refer to you. Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Underwriting Agreement are used herein as therein defined. The Representatives designated to act on behalf of each of the Underwriters of the Designated Securities pursuant to Section 15 of the Underwriting Agreement and the address of the Representatives referred to in such Section 15 are set forth at the end of Schedule II hereto.
Company
Underwriting Agreement
Underwriters
Designated Securities
 
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, the Company agrees to issue and to sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the time and place and at the purchase price to the Underwriters set forth in Schedule II hereto, the principal amount of Designated Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto.
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof, including the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of the Underwriters is or will be pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of
 
 
 
 
 
 
Agreement Among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request.
 
 
2
 
 
 
3
 
 
Accepted as of the date hereof:
 
Barclays Capital Inc.
RBS Securities Inc.
UBS Securities LLC
 
On behalf of each of the
Underwriters
 
 
4
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
TITLE OF DESIGNATED SECURITIES:
 
3.95% Senior Notes due September 1, 2020 (hereinafter referred to as the )
Notes
 
AGGREGATE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT:
 
$750,000,000
 
PRICE TO PUBLIC:
 
98.859% of the principal amount of the Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from August 27, 2010.
 
PURCHASE PRICE BY UNDERWRITERS:
 
98.209% of the principal amount of the Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from August 27, 2010.
 
SPECIFIED FUNDS FOR PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE:
 
Immediately Available Funds
 
INDENTURE:
 
Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001, between the Company, and U.S. Bank National Association, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as Trustee.
 
MATURITY:
 
September 1, 2020
 
INTEREST RATE:
 
3.95% per annum
 
INTEREST PAYMENT DATES:
 
Each March 1 and September 1, beginning March 1, 2011.  In any case where any interest payment date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
 
 
 
 
 
 
REDEMPTION PROVISIONS:
 
Optional Redemption
The Notes will be redeemable at any time, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
 means, with respect to any redemption date for any portion of the Notes,
Treasury Rate
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
 
2
 
 
 
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 means, with respect to any redemption date for any Notes, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 means each of Barclays Capital Inc., RBS Securities Inc. and UBS Securities LLC.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a  ), the Company will substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 days but no more than 60 days before the redemption date to each holder of Notes to be redeemed.
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the redemption price, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or portions of the Notes called for redemption on and after the redemption date.
 
Repurchase Upon a Change of Control
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Notes in full, as described under Optional Redemption above, the Company will make an offer to each holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such holders Notes at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ).Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to holders of Notes
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
 
 
3
 
 
describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Notes on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Notes and described in such notice.
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act, and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes by virtue of such conflicts.
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Notes upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Notes properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Notes and the Senior Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Notes unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Notes at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 means the Notes are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
 
 
4
 
 
 
from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Notes, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Notes by any such Rating Agency rema ins under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the rating agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control h as occurred at the time of the rating event).
, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of our intention to effect a Change of Control;
provided, however
 means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition, 
Change of Control
provided, however
voting stock
 
 
5
 
 
contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Notes; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Notes or fails to make a rating of the Notes publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
Rating Agencies
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
SINKING FUND PROVISIONS:
 
No sinking fund provisions
 
 
6
 
 
 
TIME OF DELIVERY:
 
9:00 a.m. Eastern time on August 27, 2010
 
CLOSING LOCATION:
 
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, 125 Broad Street, New York, New York 10004
 
NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF REPRESENTATIVES:
 
Barclays Capital Inc.
745 Seventh Avenue
New York, New York 10019
RBS Securities Inc..
600 Washington Blvd
Stamford, Connecticut 06901
UBS Securities LLC
677 Washington Boulevard
Stamford, Connecticut 06901
 
7
 
 
 
 
Time of Sale
3:06 p.m. on August 24, 2010
Time of Sale Information
Preliminary Prospectus dated August 24, 2010
Free Writing Prospectus dated August 24, 2010
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna Inc. has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and the other documents Aetna Inc. has filed with the SEC for more complete information about Aetna Inc. and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, copies of the prospectus and the prospectus supplement may be obtained from Barclays Capital Inc. by calling (888) 603-5847, RBS Securities Inc. by calling (866) 884-2071 or UBS Securities LLC by calling (877) 827-6444, ext. 561 3884.
 
 
 
 2

 
Exhibit 4.1
Kim A. Keck, Vice President, Head of Corporate Finance and Investor Relations, and Alfred P. Quirk, Jr., Vice President, Finance and Treasurer, each of Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), pursuant to Sections 201 and 301 of the Senior Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2001 (the ), between the Company, as issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the ), and pursuant to resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors of the Company on September 28, 2007 and the Delegation of Authority of Ronald A. Williams, Chairman and Chief Exe cutive Officer of the Company, dated August 20, 2010 (collectively, the  ), hereby certify that there are hereby approved and established pursuant to the Indenture a series of securities (the ) of the Company whose terms shall be as set forth in Annex A attached hereto.
Company
Indenture
Trustee
Company
Resolutions
Securities
 
Each of the undersigned officers (i) has read the applicable provisions of the Indenture, (ii) has reviewed the forms and terms of the Securities, (iii) in the opinion of each of the undersigned, has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable the undersigned to express an informed opinion as to whether or not the applicable covenants and conditions of the Indenture have been complied with, (iv) hereby certifies that the applicable covenants and conditions of the Indenture have been complied with and (v) hereby certifies that the forms and terms of the Securities comply with the Indenture.
 
Capitalized terms used but not defined herein have the meanings ascribed thereto in the Indenture.
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, we have hereunto signed our names as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
 
 ANNEX A
1
.       The Securities shall be known and designated as the 3.95% Senior Notes due September 1, 2020 of the Company (the ).
Securities
2
.       The aggregate principal amount of the Securities which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is initially limited to $750,000,000 (except for such Securities authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, other Securities pursuant to Sections 304, 305, 306, 906 or 1107 of the Indenture and except for any Securities which, pursuant to Section 303 of the Indenture, are deemed never to have been authenticated and delivered thereunder).  Additional Securities may be authenticated and delivered from time to time as contemplated in Section 301 of the Indenture.
3
.       The Stated Maturity of the principal of the Securities shall be September 1, 2020.
4
.       The Securities shall bear interest at the rate of 3.95% per annum, which will accrue from August 27, 2010, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, as the case may be, payable semi-annually on March 1 and September 1 in each year, commencing March 1, 2011, to the Person in whose name such Securities (or one or more predecessor Securities) are registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date next preceding the Interest Payment Date.  Each March 1 and September 1 shall be an  for such Securities, and the February 15 or August 15 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding an Interest Payment Date shall be the  for the interest payable on such Interest Payment Date.  In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
Interest Payment Date
Regular Record Date
5
.       The Securities are unsecured.
6
.       Payment of the principal of and interest on the Securities will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York; provided, however, that at any time that the Securities are not represented by Global Securities, at the option of the Company, payment of interest may be made by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as such address shall appear in the Security Register.
7
.      The Securities will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, at any time, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
 
 
 
3
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Securities,
Treasury Rate
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Securities that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Securities.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 
 
 
4
 
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Securities, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 means each of Barclays Capital Inc., RBS Securities Inc. and UBS Securities LLC.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a  ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each holder of the Securities.
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Securities called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
8
.       If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Securities in full, the Company will make an offer to each Holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Securities at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ).Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to Holde rs of Securities describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Securities on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Securities and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ), and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not
Exchange Act
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities by virtue of such conflicts.
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Securities upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Securities properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Securities and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Securities unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase th e Securities at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 means the Securities are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Securities, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Securities by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the rating agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
 means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition, 
Change of Control
provided, however
voting stock
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Securities; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 
 
 
7
 
 
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Securities or fails to make a rating of the Securities publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
Rating Agencies
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 9
.       The Company shall not be obligated to redeem or purchase the Securities pursuant to any sinking fund or analogous provision, or at the option of any Holder thereof, except as provided above.
10
.     The Securities shall be issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
11
.     The Securities shall be issued in the form of one or more Global Securities registered in the name of The Depository Trust Company () or its nominee, to be deposited with, or on behalf of, The Depository Trust Company, New York, New York.
DTC
12
.     U.S. Bank National Association shall act as paying agent and registrar with respect to the Securities.
13
.     The Securities shall be in such form or forms as may be approved by the officers of the Company as provided in the Company Resolutions, such approval to be evidenced by any such officers manual or facsimile signature on the Securities, provided that such form or forms of the Securities are not inconsistent with the requirements of the Indenture or the Company Resolutions and are substantially in the form or forms attached hereto as Exhibits A-1 and A-2.
 
8
 
 
 
Exhibit A-1
THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF.  THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO, OR REGISTERED OR EXCHANGED FOR SECURITIES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF, ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF, AND NO SUCH TRANSFER MAY BE REGISTERED EXCEPT IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE.  EVERY SECURITY AUTHENTICATED AND DELIVERED UPON REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER OF, OR IN EXCHANGE FOR OR IN LIEU OF, THIS SECURITY SHALL BE A GLOBAL SECURITY SUBJECT TO THE FOREGOING, EXCEPT IN SUCH LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES.
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation (""), to Aetna Inc. or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
DTC
CUSIP: 00817Y AH1
ISIN: US00817YAH18
 
 
 
AETNA INC., a Pennsylvania corporation (herein called the ), which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of FIVE HUNDRED MILLION Dollars ($500,000,000) upon presentation and surrender of this Security on September 1, 2020, and to pay interest thereon from August 27, 2010 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually on March 1 and September 1 in each year, commencing March 1, 2011, at the rate of 3.95% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made
Company
 
 
 
9
 
 
 
available for payment.  The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the February 15 or August 15 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date.  Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Securities of this series not less than 10 calendar days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture.  In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on this Security will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts.
Reference is hereby made to the further provisions of this Security set forth on the reverse hereof, which further provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as if set forth at this place.  Such provisions include, without limitation, provisions relating to redemption of this Security by the Company.
Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee referred to on the reverse hereof by manual signature, this Security shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
 
 
 
10
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
Dated: August 27, 2010
 
 
 
 
[SEAL]
Attest:
 
 
 
 
This is one of the Securities of the series designated under, and referred to in, the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
 
 
 
 
11
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the ), issued and to be issued in one or more series under a Senior Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2001 (herein called the ), between the Company, as issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association (as successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company), as Trustee (herein called the , which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respectiv e rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered.  This Security is one of the series designated on the face hereof, initially limited in aggregate principal amount to $750,000,000, subject to future issuances of additional Securities pursuant to Section 301 of the Indenture.
Securities
Indenture
Trustee
The Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, at any time, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Securities,
Treasury Rate
 
 
 
12
 
 
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Securities to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Securities to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Securities, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 means each of Barclays Capital Inc., RBS Securities Inc. and UBS Securities LLC.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a  ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each Holder of the Securities of this series.
 
 
 
13
 
 
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Securities of this series called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
If this Security is redeemed in part only, a new Security or Securities of this series and of like tenor for the unredeemed portion hereof will be issued in the name of the Holder hereof upon the cancellation hereof.
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Securities in full, the Company will make an offer to each Holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Securities at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of Securities describin g the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Securities on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required hereby and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ), and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities by virtue of such conflicts.
Exchange Act
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Securities upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Securities properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Securities and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Securities unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase th e Securities at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
 
 
14
 
 
 means the Securities are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Securities, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Securities by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the rating agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of
Change of Control
 
 
 
15
 
 
 
the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
provided, however
voting stock
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Securities; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Securities or fails to make a rating of the Securities publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the
Rating Agencies
 
 
 
16
 
 
 
Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
If an Event of Default with respect to Securities of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Securities of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture.
The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the rights of the Holders of the Securities of each series to be affected under the Indenture at any time by the Company and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities at the time Outstanding of each series to be affected.  The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of specified percentages in principal amount of the Securities of each series at the time Outstanding, on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series, to waive compliance by the Company with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and thei r consequences.  Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Security shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Security and of any Security issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange hereof or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Security.
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Security or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the transfer of this Security is registrable in the Security Register upon surrender of this Security for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Company in any place where the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security are payable, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or such Holders attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Securities of this series and of like tenor, of authorized denominations and for the same aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
The Securities of this series are issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.  As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, Securities of this series are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of Securities of this series and of
 
 
 
17
 
 
 
like tenor of a different authorized denomination, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company or the Trustee may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, other than exchanges pursuant to Section 304, 906 or 1107 of the Indenture not involving any transfer.
Prior to due and proper presentment of this Security for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name this Security is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Security is overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
The Indenture provides that the Company, at the Companys option, (a) will be discharged from any and all obligations in respect of the Securities (except for certain obligations to register the transfer or exchange of Securities, replace stolen, lost or mutilated Securities, maintain paying agencies and hold moneys for payment in trust) or (b) need not comply with certain restrictive covenants of the Indenture, in each case if the Company deposits, in trust, with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations which through the payment of interest thereon and principal thereof in accordance with their terms will provide money, in an amount sufficient to pay all the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on, the Securities on the dates such payments are due in accordance with the terms of such Securities, and certain other conditions are satisfied.
No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, or interest on this Security, or for any claim based hereon, or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture or any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer, employee, agent or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
All terms used in this Security which are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
 
 
 
18
 
 
Exhibit A-2
THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF.  THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO, OR REGISTERED OR EXCHANGED FOR SECURITIES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF, ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF, AND NO SUCH TRANSFER MAY BE REGISTERED EXCEPT IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE.  EVERY SECURITY AUTHENTICATED AND DELIVERED UPON REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER OF, OR IN EXCHANGE FOR OR IN LIEU OF, THIS SECURITY SHALL BE A GLOBAL SECURITY SUBJECT TO THE FOREGOING, EXCEPT IN SUCH LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES.
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation (""), to Aetna Inc. or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
DTC
CUSIP: 00817Y AH1
ISIN: US00817YAH18
 
 
AETNA INC., a Pennsylvania corporation (herein called the ), which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of TWO HUNDRED FIFTY MILLION Dollars ($250,000,000) upon presentation and surrender of this Security on September 1, 2020, and to pay interest thereon from August 27, 2010 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually on March 1 and September 1 in each year, commencing March 1, 2011, at the rate of 3.95% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made
Company
 
 
 
 
19
 
 
 
available for payment.  The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the February 15 or August 15 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date.  Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Securities of this series not less than 10 calendar days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture.  In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on this Security will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts.
Reference is hereby made to the further provisions of this Security set forth on the reverse hereof, which further provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as if set forth at this place.  Such provisions include, without limitation, provisions relating to redemption of this Security by the Company.
Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee referred to on the reverse hereof by manual signature, this Security shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
 
 
 
20
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
Dated:   August 27, 2010
 
 
 
 
 
[SEAL]
Attest:
 
 
 
 
This is one of the Securities of the series designated under, and referred to in, the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
 
 
 
 
21
 
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the ), issued and to be issued in one or more series under a Senior Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2001 (herein called the ), between the Company, as issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association (as successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company), as Trustee (herein called the , which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respectiv e rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered.  This Security is one of the series designated on the face hereof, initially limited in aggregate principal amount to $750,000,000, subject to future issuances of additional Securities pursuant to Section 301 of the Indenture.
Securities
Indenture
Trustee
The Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, at any time, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Securities,
Treasury Rate
 
 
 
22
 
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Securities to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Securities to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Securities, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 means each of Barclays Capital Inc., RBS Securities Inc. and UBS Securities LLC.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a  ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each Holder of the Securities of this series.
 
 
 
23
 
 
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Securities of this series called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
If this Security is redeemed in part only, a new Security or Securities of this series and of like tenor for the unredeemed portion hereof will be issued in the name of the Holder hereof upon the cancellation hereof.
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Securities in full, the Company will make an offer to each Holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Securities at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of Securities describin g the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Securities on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required hereby and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the ), and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities by virtue of such conflicts.
Exchange Act
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Securities upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Securities properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Securities and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Securities unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase th e Securities at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
 
 
24
 
 
 means the Securities are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Securities, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Securities by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the rating agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of
Change of Control
 
 
 
25
 
 
 
the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
provided, however
voting stock
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Securities; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Securities or fails to make a rating of the Securities publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the
Rating Agencies
 
 
 
26
 
 
 
Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
If an Event of Default with respect to Securities of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Securities of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture.
The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the rights of the Holders of the Securities of each series to be affected under the Indenture at any time by the Company and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities at the time Outstanding of each series to be affected.  The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of specified percentages in principal amount of the Securities of each series at the time Outstanding, on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series, to waive compliance by the Company with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and thei r consequences.  Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Security shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Security and of any Security issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange hereof or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Security.
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Security or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the transfer of this Security is registrable in the Security Register upon surrender of this Security for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Company in any place where the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security are payable, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or such Holders attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Securities of this series and of like tenor, of authorized denominations and for the same aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
The Securities of this series are issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.  As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, Securities of this series are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of Securities of this series and of l
 
 
 
27
 
 
 
ike tenor of a different authorized denomination, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company or the Trustee may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, other than exchanges pursuant to Section 304, 906 or 1107 of the Indenture not involving any transfer.
Prior to due and proper presentment of this Security for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name this Security is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Security is overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
The Indenture provides that the Company, at the Companys option, (a) will be discharged from any and all obligations in respect of the Securities (except for certain obligations to register the transfer or exchange of Securities, replace stolen, lost or mutilated Securities, maintain paying agencies and hold moneys for payment in trust) or (b) need not comply with certain restrictive covenants of the Indenture, in each case if the Company deposits, in trust, with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations which through the payment of interest thereon and principal thereof in accordance with their terms will provide money, in an amount sufficient to pay all the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on, the Securities on the dates such payments are due in accordance with the terms of such Securities, and certain other conditions are satisfied.
No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, or interest on this Security, or for any claim based hereon, or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture or any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer, employee, agent or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
All terms used in this Security which are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
 
 
 
28 
 

Exhibit 99.1
News Release
 Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced that it has completed a public offering of $750 million of its 3.95 percent Senior Notes due in 2020.  The company intends to use the net proceeds from the offering for general corporate purposes, including the repayment of its short-term or long-term debt.
HARTFORD, Conn., AUGUST 27, 2010
 
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 35.8 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see
www.aetna .com
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20101020170009.txt.gz
TIME:20101020170009
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On October 19, 2010, Aetna Inc.s (Aetnas) Board of Directors (the Board) named Ronald A. Williams Aetnas executive Chairman of the Board effective November 29, 2010.  Mr. Williams, age 60, has been Aetnas Chief Executive Officer since February 14, 2006 and its Chairman since October 1, 2006.  Mr. Williams will retire from Aetna and the Board in April, 2011.  Following his retirement from Aetna, Mr. Williams has agreed to provide consulting services to Aetna and the Aetna Foundation, Inc. (the Foundation) as described below.
On October 19, 2010, the Board named Mark T. Bertolini Aetnas President and Chief Executive Officer effective November 29, 2010.  Mr. Bertolini also is expected to become Aetnas Chairman upon Mr. Williams retirement in 2011.  Mr. Bertolini became President of Aetna on July 24, 2007, having served as Executive Vice President and head of Aetna Business Operations and other increasingly responsible executive roles since joining Aetna in February, 2003.  Prior to joining Aetna, Mr. Bertolini held executive positions with CIGNA Corporation and the NYLCare business of New York Life Insurance Company and served as chief executive officer of SelectCare, Inc., a Michigan managed care organization.
Mr. Bertolini, age 54, also will be elected to the Board effective November 29, 2010, for a term running until Aetnas 2011 Annual Meeting of Shareholders.  The Board believes that Mr. Bertolini will bring to the Board extensive health care industry expertise, with over 25 years in the health care business.  He has strong leadership skills and business experience, demonstrated as President of Aetna and in prior executive-level positions.  With the addition of Mr. Bertolini, the Board will consist of 14 directors.  As of the date of this Current Report on Form 8-K, the Board Committee or Committees on which Mr. Bertolini will serve have not been determined.  As an employee director, Mr. Bertolini will receive no additional compensation for membership on the Board or any of its Committees.< /font>
In connection with Mr. Bertolinis appointment, on October 19, 2010, Aetna and Mr. Bertolini entered into an Amended and Restated Employment Agreement (the Agreement).  The Agreement was approved by Aetnas Board.
The key terms of Mr. Bertolinis Agreement are as follows:
 
 
 
In connection with his appointment as President and Chief Executive Officer, Aetnas Committee on Compensation and Organization approved a grant to Mr. Bertolini of additional Performance Stock Units for the 2010-2011 performance cycle.  The grant will be effective on the date Mr. Bertolini assumes the position of President and Chief Executive Officer.  The number of units to be delivered will be calculated on that date assuming an original grant date value of $327,281.  The number of units granted will be determined using the closing price of Aetnas common shares on the grant date.
On October 19, 2010, in connection with Mr. Williams appointment to the role of executive Chairman of the Board effective November 29, 2010, Aetna and Mr. Williams entered into an amendment to his employment agreement (the Amendment).  The key terms of the Amendment are as follows:
In addition, on October 19, 2010, Aetna and Mr. Williams entered into a consulting agreement (the Consulting Agreement) the term of which will commence upon Mr. Williams retirement in April 2011.  The key terms of the Consulting Agreement are as follows:
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20101103063013.txt.gz
TIME:20101103063013
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 3, 2010, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended September 30, 2010.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

 
_________________________________________________________
News Release
 
 
 
 
 
YSE: AET) today announced third-quarter 2010 operating earnings of $419.6 million, or $1.00 per share, an increase of 45 percent per share over 2009.  The increase was largely the result of a higher commercial underwriting margin from improved underlying performance and favorable prior-period reserve development, partially offset by lower Commercial Insured membership.  Third-quarter results included favorable prior-period reserve development of $.16 per sha re, primarily from second quarter 2010 incurred health care costs.  Excluding prior-period reserve development, third quarter 2010 operating earnings per share were $.84.
HARTFORD, Conn., November 3, 2010
 Aetna (N
(1)
(2)
 
 
Aetna/2
 
 
Aetna's third-quarter results reinforce our significant performance improvement in 2010 after an unusually weak 2009, said Ronald A. Williams, chairman and CEO. Our strong operating results were driven by a reduction in utilization of health care services after the surge we saw in 2009, combined with appropriate pricing and effective medical quality and cost management.  Going forward, Aetna is focused on creating value for customers with innovative products and services that drive cost transparency and member engagement while improving quality.
 
Said Mark T. Bertolini, president, We recognize that our customers, now more than ever, need our help controlling medical costs.  We offer the right benefit designs, effective provider networks, health and wellness programs, and unique information tools to help our members think and act like consumers when purchasing health care. In addition, we are committed to investing in new business opportunities and diversified revenue streams that will drive ongoing growth.
 
 
As a result of our better-than-projected performance in the first three quarters, including favorable prior-period development, we now project full-year 2010 operating earnings per share to be approximately $3.60  said Joseph M. Zubretsky, executive vice president and CFO.  Going forward, our strong capital structure and liquidity continue to provide us with financial strength and flexibility to help fuel future growth.
 
 
Aetna/3 
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/4 
 
 
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
 
 
Total company results
 
 
 
Aetna/5 
 
 
Aetnas conference call to discuss third quarter 2010 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
 
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 888-430-8705 or 719-325-2388 for international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 3805457. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 3805457. Telephone replays will be available from 11:00 a.m. ET on November 3, 2010 until midnight ET on November 17, 2010
.
 
 
 
Aetna/6 
 
About Aetna
 
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 35.4 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, gover nmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
 
 
 
Aetna/7 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
 
Aetna/9 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/10 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/11 
 
 
 
Aetna/12 
 
 
Aetna/13 
Operating earnings exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses . Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(1)
 
The following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
 
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and 12 of this press release.
 
Certain metrics are adjusted to exclude noted development of prior-period health care cost estimates. These metrics include operating earnings, operating earnings per share and medical benefit ratios.
(2)
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share also exclude one-time costs associated with our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation, which we expect to incur in the fourth quarter of 2010. Pr ojected operating earnings per share for the full year 2010 reflect approximately 423 million weighted average diluted shares.
(3)
 
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in above. Refer to tables on pages 9, 10 and 12 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(4)
(1)
 
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any.  Refer to a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure on page 10 of this press release.
(5)
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pre-tax ope rating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes. Operating earnings, and operating earnings, excluding prior-period development information is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses.
(8)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(9)
 
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(10)
 
Represents members who purchased medications through our mail order pharmacy operations during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(11)
 
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation. Health care refor m will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios.  Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next eight years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform.  Many significant parts of the legislation require further guidance and clarification in the form of regulations.  As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known until those regulations are enacted, which we expect to occur over the next several years.  Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative measures that would affect our business model, li mit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the timely receipt of regulatory and other approvals necessary to implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation, which could be delayed for a variety of reasons related or not related to the agreement itself, and the ability to successfully implement the CVS Caremark agreement on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, sim plify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing CEO succession and retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS review and sanctions, litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts o f terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Aetnas Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2010 and June 30, 2010, each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), and Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010 (Aetnas Third Quarter 10-Q), when filed with the SEC. You also should read Aetnas Third Quarter 10-Q, when filed with the SEC, for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20101203160329.txt.gz
TIME:20101203160329
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 5 -- Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02     Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On October 21, 2010, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) announced that Joseph M. Zubretsky would be appointed Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer effective November 29, 2010.  In connection with that appointment, on December 2, 2010, the Committee on Compensation and Organization of Aetnas Board of Directors approved the following compensation changes for Mr. Zubretsky:
The restricted stock units (RSUs) were granted under Aetnas 2010 Stock Incentive Plan, have a grant date of December 2, 2010 and will vest in a single group three years from the date of grant.  The RSUs will not vest if Mr. Zubretsky retires or otherwise voluntarily terminates his employment prior to the vesting date or upon certain other events as provided in Aetnas 2010 Stock Incentive Plan and the applicable RSU award agreement.  No dividends or dividend equivalents will be paid on the unvested RSUs.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20101203160614.txt.gz
TIME:20101203160614
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Explanatory Note
Aetna Inc. ("Aetna") hereby amends its Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 20, 2010 in this Current Report on Form 8-K/A to set forth the committees of Aetna's Board of Directors (the "Board") to which Mark T. Bertolini has been named.
Section 5 -- Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02     Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On October 20, 2010, Aetna announced that Mark T. Bertolini would be elected to its Board effective November 29, 2010.  On December 3, 2010, Mr. Bertolini was appointed to the Investment and Finance Committee and its Executive Committee.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110110160139.txt.gz
TIME:20110110160139
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 10 and 11, 2011, Joseph M. Zubretsky, Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna Inc. (Aetna) will meet with investors and analysts, before and after a presentation he will provide at the 2011 J.P. Morgan HealthCare Conference (the Conference) on January 11, 2011.  During these meetings and presentation, Aetna intends to reaffirm its previously disclosed projected full-year 2010 operating earnings of approximately $3.60 per share, reflecting continued favorable commercial underwriting performance.  Additionally, during these meetings and presentation, Aetna expects to disclose the following full-year 2010 financial metrics:
1
Aetnas presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 1:00 p.m. Eastern time (10:00 a.m. Pacific time).  Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetnas Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor.  A webcast replay will be available on that web site, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 days.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION  Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to our 2010 operating earnings and commercial underwriting performance; our 2011 challenges and opportunities; and the impact of the Medicity acquisition on our 2011 operating earnings.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next seven years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation require further guidance and clarification in the form of regulations. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known until those regulations are enacted, which we expect to occur over the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative measures that would affect our business model, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated mini mum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contract ing with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the slowing economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic markets where membership is
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to successfully implement the CVS Caremark agreement on a timely basis and in a cost efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing retention of key executive talent; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services ("CMS") review and sanctions, litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Aetnas Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2010, June 30, 2010 and September 30, 2010, each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should rea d Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010 for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Item 2.02 shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
The information above in Item 2.02 of this current report, other than the information as to Aetnas projected 2010 results of operations and financial condition, is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 7.01.  In addition, during the meetings and presentation referenced in Item 2.02, Mr. Zubretsky will discuss the following challenges and opportunities that Aetna projects for 2011.  Aetnas projected challenges include:  lower account retention and economic attrition, no projected prior period reserve yields, normalized utilization, impact of sanctions imposed by CMS, and health care reform.  Aetnas projected opportunities include:  continued pricing discipline, expen se actions to adjust Aetnas cost structure to its membership projections, the favorable impact of previously announced changes to its pension plan, lower commission structure, medical management and quality initiatives, including provider re-contracting, and the impact of capital actions.  Mr. Zubretsky also will discuss the projected neutral impact of the acquisition of Medicity on Aetnas 2011 operating earnings and disclose that the Medicity acquisition was financed using available cash.
development, lower investment
 
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110204063748.txt.gz
TIME:20110204063748
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 4, 2011, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2010.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
_____________________________________________________________________________________
News Release
 
 
 
 
YSE: AET) today announced fourth-quarter 2010 operating earnings of $255.0 million, or $.63 per share, a per share increase of 58 percent over 2009.  Full-year share, a per share increase of 34 perc ent over 2009. The increase in both the fourth quarter and full-year 2010 operating earnings were largely the result of higher Commercial underwriting margins driven by management actions to appropriately price the business, and lower utilization, as well as a reduced number of shares outstanding, partially offset by lower Commercial Insured membership.  Full-year 2010 operating earnings also reflect favorable prior-period reserve development.  Net income for the fourth quarter was $215.6 million, or $.53 per share, including $.10 per share of net realized capital gains and other items.  Full-year net income was $1.8 billion, or $4.18 per share, a per share increase of 47 percent over 2009.
HARTFORD, Conn., February 4, 2011
 Aetna (N
(1)
2010 operating earnings were $1.6 , or $3.68 per
billion
 
 
 
Aetna/2
 
 
 
Aetnas strong operating results in 2010 demonstrate the significant performance improvement we have made by remaining disciplined while focusing on customer needs, said Ronald A. Williams, chairman. As it becomes even more imperative to address quality and affordability in health care, Aetna will play an increasingly important role. I am confident that we are well-positioned with the right management team and long-term strategy to capitalize on the domestic and global opportunities in health care.
 
Our companys success, as always, is centered on creating value for our customers by offering innovative products and services that improve quality and help manage costs through integrated benefit designs and member engagement, said Mark T. Bertolini, CEO and president.  Even as we continue to navigate through a difficult economy, we are squarely focused on making investments in our business that can help meet the needs of current and future customers.
 
 
 
Aetna/3
 
Aetnas strategic approach to capital management and diversification is centered on creating value for shareholders by deploying our strong cash flows to reinvest in our business, make acquisitions and return capital to shareholders, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, senior executive president and CFO.  Our acquisition of Medicity, the innovative transaction with Vitality Re and the increased dividend announced separately today underscore our commitment to enhancing total return to our shareholders.
vice
 
Aetna projects full-year 2011 operating earnings per share of $3.70 to $3.80,
(2)
 Zubretsky added.
 
 
Health Care business results
:
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported
 
 
 
Aetna/4
 
 
 
Full-year 2010 operating earnings for Health Care were $1.7 billion, compared with $1.4 billion in 2009.  The increase in operating earnings was primarily due to higher Commercial underwriting margins driven by management actions to appropriately price the business, lower utilization and favorable prior period reserve development, partially offset by lower Commercial Insured membership in 2010. Our underwriting margins in 2010 and 2009 included $76 million after tax of favorable prior-period reserve development and $75 million after tax of unfavorable prior-period reserve development, respectively.  Full-year 2010 net income was $1.8 billion, compared to $1.4 billion in 2009.  Full-year 2010 Commercial MBR was 80.6 percent, compared to 84.5 percent for 2009.
 
 
 
Aetna/5
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
Full-year 2010 operating earnings for Group Insurance were $128.0 million, compared with $103.8 million in 2009.  The increase was primarily due to a decrease in operating expenses as well as improved underwriting margins in our disability products, partially offset by lower underwriting margins in our long-term care and life products. Full-year 2010 net income was $179.6 million, compared to $145.6 million in 2009.
 
 
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
 
Full-year 2010 operating earnings for Large Case Pensions were $27.8 million, compared with $32.2 million for 2009.  The decrease is consistent with the run-off nature of this segment. Full-year 2010 net income was $29.0 million, compared to $26.4 million for 2009.
 
 
 
Aetna/6
 
 
For full-year 2010, the operating expense ratio increased to 19.3 percent from 18.2 percent for 2009 reflecting seasonal spending and the implementation of the agreement with CVS Caremark and other major programs.  Including net realized capital gains and other items, these percentages were 19.0 percent and 18.4 percent for full-year 2010 and 2009, respectively.
(4)
 
 
 
Aetna/7
 
Aetnas conference call to discuss fourth quarter 2010 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com.  Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
 
The
conference call also can be accessed by dialing 877-548-7906 or 719-325-4869 for international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 3403615.  Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 3403615. Telephone replays will be available from 11:00 a.m. ET on February 4, 2011 until 11 p.m. ET on February 18, 2011
.
 
 
About Aetna
 
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 35.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care.  Aetna offers a broad range of traditional and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans.  Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates.  For more information, see www.aetna.com.
 
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
 
 
 
Aetna/10
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/11
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/12
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/13
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/14
Operating business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(1)
earnings and operating earnings per share exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying
 
The following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 9 through 11 and 13 of this press release.
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2011 reflect approximately 384 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)  
 
  Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses and the 2009 ESI settlement as noted in above.  Refer to tables on pages 10, 11 and 13 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(3)
(1)
 
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any.  For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 11 of this press release.
(4) 
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(5)   
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(6)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses.
(7) 
 
  Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(8)
 
  Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(9)
 
Represents members who purchased medications through Aetnas mail order pharmacy operations during the quarterly period and are included in pharmacy membership above.
(10)
 
 
 
Aetna/15
 
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares, and the timing and amount of any future dividends.  Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetnas future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows.  Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios.  Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next seven years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform.  Many significant parts of the legislation, including medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law.  As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years.  Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform, changes in health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner a nd to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the sanctions imposed on us by CMS, the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputat ional issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K (Aetnas 2009 Annual Report) and Aetnas Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2010, June 30, 2010 and September 30, 2010 (Aetnas Quarterly Reports), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC).  You also should read Aetnas 2009 Annual Report and Aetna ;s 2010 Quarterly Reports on file with the SEC and Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110228160816.txt.gz
TIME:20110228160816
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On February 25, 2011, the Board of Directors (the Board) of Aetna Inc. (Aetna) elected Mark T. Bertolini, age 54, Chairman of the Board and Chairman of the Boards Executive Committee, each effective April 8, 2011, upon the retirement of Ronald A. Williams, Aetnas current executive Chairman.
 
Aetna previously reported in its Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 20, 2010, that Mr. Williams would retire from Aetna and from the Board in April 2011.  On February 25, 2011, Aetna announced that Mr. Williams retirement would be effective April 8, 2011.
 
Also on February 25, 2011, the Board voted to reduce the size of the Board from 14 directors to 13 directors, effective April 8, 2011, upon Mr. Williams retirement from the Board.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110428065923.txt.gz
TIME:20110428065923
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 28, 2011, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

_____________________________________________________________________________________________________
News Release
 
 
YSE: AET) today announced first-quarter 2011 operating earnings of $560.2 million, or $1.43 per share, a per share increase of 46 percent over 2010. The increase in the first quarter operating earnings was largely the result of higher Commercial underwriting margins from favorable development of prior-period health care cost estimates and improved underlying performance, partially offset by lower Commercial Insured membership.  First-quarter results included favorable prior-period reserve development of $.29 per share, primarily from fourth quarter 2010 incurred health care costs.  First-quarter net income per share was $1.50.
HARTFORD, Conn., April 28, 2011
 Aetna (N
(1)
 
 
 
Aetna/2
We are pleased that the strong momentum we achieved last year continues into 2011, said Chairman, CEO and President Mark T. Bertolini. Our core businesses are performing well with disciplined pricing and new product designs.  We are generating excitement in the marketplace about the integrated solutions that Aetna, Medicity and ActiveHealth Management bring to health care seeking to create Accountable Care Organizations (ACOs).  We expect the ACO relationship we recently established with Carilion Clinic to be the first in a series of ACO announcements in the coming months. 
competitive
providers
 
Our financial position, capital structure, and liquidity all continue to be very strong, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, senior executive vice president and CFO. The solid performance of our core business continues to generate significant cash flow to fund our investments in profitable growth opportunities, such as the acquisitions of Medicity and Prodigy Health Group.
 
 We now project full-year 2011 operating earnings per share of $4.20 to $4.30.
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
Aetna/3
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
 
 
Aetna/4 
 
 
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
 
Total company results
 
 
 
Aetna5
/
 
Aetnas conference call to discuss first quarter 2011 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
 
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 800-500-0920 or 719-457-2657 for international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 1857627. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 1857627. Telephone replays will be available from 11 a.m. ET on April 28, 2011 until 11 p.m. ET on May 12, 2011
.
 
 
 
Aetna/6
 
About Aetna
 
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 33.8 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.  To learn more about Aetnas innovative online tools, visit www.aetnatools.com.
 
 
 
 
Aetna/7
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
 
 
 
Aetna/10
 
 
 
Aetna/11
 
 
 
Aetna/12
 
 
 
 
Aetna/13
 
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
 
The following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and 12 of this press release.
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2011 reflect approximately 384 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
 
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in above.  Refer to tables on pages 9, 10 and 12 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(3)
(1)
 
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any.  For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 10 of this press release.
(4)
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(5)
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(6)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses.
(7)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(8)
 
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(9)
 
 
 
Aetna/14
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetnas future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios.  Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next seven years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform.  Many significant parts of the legislation, including medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law.  As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years.  Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform, changes in health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity and other acquired businesses) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the sanctions imposed on us by CMS, the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC).  You also should read Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2011, when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110520092827.txt.gz
TIME:20110520092827
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
Item 1.01  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
On May 17, 2011, Aetna Inc. (the Company) executed a Pricing Agreement (the Pricing Agreement) with Goldman, Sachs & Co., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated, as representatives of the underwriters named in Schedule I thereto (together, the Underwriters), pursuant to which the Company agreed to issue and sell to the Underwriters $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 4.125% senior notes due June 1, 2021 (the Senior Notes).  The Pricing Agreement incorporated by reference the terms of an Underwriting Agreement (the Underwriting Agreement) of the Company dated as of August 24, 2010.  The sale of the Senior Notes was registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission in a Registration Statement on Form S-3, File No. 333-155961.  The Senior Notes were offered pursuant to a prospectus dated December 5, 2008 and a prospectus supplement dated May 17, 2011.  The closing of the sale of the Senior Notes occurred on May 20, 2011.
In connection with the offering and sale of the Senior Notes, a supplemental indenture of the Company was executed with U.S. Bank National Association, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the Trustee), to establish and designate the Senior Notes and the terms and characteristics of the Senior Notes (the Supplemental Indenture).  The Supplemental Indenture was executed pursuant to the Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 between the Company and the Trustee (the Base Indenture).  The Senior Notes were issued pursuant to the Base Indenture, as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture.
The Underwriting Agreement, which was filed as Exhibit 1.1 to Aetna Inc.s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 30, 2010, the Pricing Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report, the Supplemental Indenture, which is filed as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report, and the Base Indenture, which was filed Exhibit 4.1 to Aetna Inc.s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed on May 10, 2001, are each incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 1.01.
Section 2 Financial Information
 
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The description contained under Item 1.01 above is incorporated by reference in its entirety into this Item 2.03.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibits are filed as part of this Current Report:
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
 
 
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
 
As Representatives of the several
Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
 
May 17, 2011
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and in the Underwriting Agreement dated as of August 24, 2010 (the ), to issue and sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the ) the debt securities specified in Schedule II hereto (the ). Each of the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety, and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein; and each of the representations and warranties set forth therein shall be deemed to have been made at and as of the date of this Pricing Agreement. Each reference to the Representatives herein and in the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement so incorporated by reference shall be deemed to refer to you. Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Underwriting Agreement are used herein as therein defined. The Representatives designated to act on behalf of each of the Underwriters of the Designated Securities pursuant to Section 15 of the Underwriting Agreement and the address of the Representatives referred to in such Section 15 are set forth at the end of Schedule II hereto.
Company
Underwriting Agreement
Underwriters
Designated Securities
 
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, the Company agrees to issue and to sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the time and place and at the purchase price to the Underwriters set forth in Schedule II hereto, the principal amount of Designated Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto.
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof, including the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of the Underwriters is or will be pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Agreement Among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request.
 
 
 
2
 
 
 
 
 
[Signature Page to the Pricing Agreement]
 
 
 
 
 
Accepted as of the date hereof:
 
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
 
On behalf of each of the
Underwriters
 
By: Goldman, Sachs & Co.
By:
/s/ Goldman, Sachs & Co. 
        (Goldman, Sachs & Co.)
 
 
By: J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
 
By:
                                                
Name:
Title:   
 
 
By: Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
 
By:
                                                 
Name:  
Title:    
 
 
]
Pricing Agreement
[
 
 
 
 
 
Accepted as of the date hereof:
 
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
 
On behalf of each of the
 
Underwriters
 
By: Goldman, Sachs & Co.
By:  ___________________________
        (Goldman, Sachs & Co.)
By: J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
By:
   /s/ Robert Bottamedi                          
Name: Robert Bottamedi
Title:   Vice President
By: Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
By: ____________________________
Name:  
Title:    
]
Pricing Agreement
[
 
 
 
 
Accepted as of the date hereof:
 
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
 
On behalf of each of the
 
Underwriters
 
By: Goldman, Sachs & Co.
By:_____________________________
        (Goldman, Sachs & Co.)
By: J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
By: _____________________________
Name:
Title:   
By: Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
By: __
/s/ Yurij Slyz                                       
Name:  Yurij Slyz
Title:    Executive Director
 
]
Pricing Agreement
[
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
TITLE OF DESIGNATED SECURITIES:
 
4.125% Senior Notes due June 1, 2021 (hereinafter referred to as the )
Notes
 
AGGREGATE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT:
 
$500,000,000
 
PRICE TO PUBLIC:
 
98.601% of the principal amount of the Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from May 20, 2011.
 
PURCHASE PRICE BY UNDERWRITERS:
 
97.951% of the principal amount of the Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from May 20, 2011.
 
SPECIFIED FUNDS FOR PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE:
 
Immediately available funds delivered to the bank account as specified in the cross-receipt to the Underwriters
 
INDENTURE:
 
Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001, between the Company, and U.S. Bank National Association, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as Trustee (the ), as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture dated as of May 20, 2011, between the Company and the Trustee (as so supplemented, the ).
Base Indenture
Indenture
 
MATURITY:
 
June 1, 2021
 
INTEREST RATE:
 
4.125% per annum
 
INTEREST PAYMENT DATES:
 
Each December 1 and June 1, beginning December 1, 2011.  In any case where any interest payment date is not a Business Day, then payment of
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
 
REDEMPTION PROVISIONS:
 
Optional Redemption
At any time prior to March 1, 2021 (three months prior to the maturity date of the Notes), the Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
 
At any time on or after March 1, 2021 (three months prior to the maturity date of the Notes), the Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
 
 means, with respect to any redemption date for any portion of the Notes,
Treasury Rate
 
 
2
 
 
 
Comparable Treasury Issue, calculated using a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for that redemption date.
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 means, with respect to any redemption date for any Notes, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 means each of Goldman, Sachs & Co., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a  ), the Company will substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 days but no more than 60 days before the redemption date to each holder of Notes to be redeemed.
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the redemption price, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or portions of the Notes called for redemption on and after the redemption date.
 
Repurchase Upon a Change of Control
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Notes in full, as described under Optional
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
Redemption above, the Company will make an offer to each holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such holders Notes at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ).Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to holders of Notes describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Notes on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Notes and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act, and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes by virtue of such conflicts.
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Notes upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Notes properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Notes and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Notes unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Notes at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
 
 
4
 
 
 
 means the Notes are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Notes, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Notes by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the rating agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of our intention to effect a Change of Control;
provided, however
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the
Change of Control
provided, however
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
voting stock
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Notes; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Notes or fails to make a rating of the Notes publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
Rating Agencies
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
SINKING FUND PROVISIONS:
 
No sinking fund provisions
 
TIME OF DELIVERY:
 
9:00 a.m. Eastern time on May 20, 2011
 
CLOSING LOCATION:
 
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, 125 Broad Street, New York, New York 10004
 
NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF REPRESENTATIVES:
 
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
200 West Street
New York, New York 10282-2198
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
383 Madison Avenue
New York, New York 10179
Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated
1585 Broadway
New York, New York 10036
OTHER TERMS:
The holders of the Notes will not have the benefit of clause (5) of Section 501 of the Base Indenture entitled Events of Default.
The holders of the Notes will not have the benefit of Section 1005 of the Base Indenture entitled Limitations on Liens on Common Stock of Principal Subsidiaries.
 
 
7
 
 
 
Time of Sale
2:17 p.m. on May 17, 2011
Time of Sale Information
Preliminary Prospectus dated May 17, 2011
Free Writing Prospectus dated May 17, 2011
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
[intentionally omitted]
 
Aetna Inc. has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and the other documents Aetna Inc. has filed with the SEC for more complete information about Aetna Inc. and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, copies of the prospectus and the prospectus supplement may be obtained from Goldman, Sachs & Co. by calling 1-866-471-2526, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC by calling (212) 834-4533 or Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated by calling 1-866-718-1649.
 
 
 
2

 
Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
 
Page
 
ARTICLE 1
D
EFINITIONS
Exhibit A  Form of Security
 
 
i
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE (this ), dated as of May 20, 2011, between AETNA INC., a corporation duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania (the ), having its principal office at 151 Farmington Avenue, Hartford, Connecticut 06156 and U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the ).
Supplemental Indenture
Company
Trustee
 
 
WHEREAS, the Company and the Trustee entered into a Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 (the  , and as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, the ) providing for the issuance from time to time of the Companys debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness (the ), to be issued in one more series as in the Base Indenture provided;
Base
Indenture
Indenture
Securities
 
WHEREAS, Sections 201 and 301 of the Base Indenture provide that the Company and the Trustee may establish the terms of a new series of Securities in an indenture supplemental to the Base Indenture;
 
WHEREAS, Section 901 of the Base Indenture provides that the Company and the Trustee may enter into an indenture supplemental to the Base Indenture, without the consent of any Holders, to eliminate any of the provisions of the Base Indenture in respect of a new series of Securities so established pursuant to Section 301 of the Base Indenture;
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors of the Company on September 28, 2007 and the Delegation of Authority of Mark T. Bertolini, Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President of the Company, dated May 11, 2011 (collectively, the ), the Company has approved to be established a new series of Securities, designated as its 4.125% Senior Notes due June 1, 2021 (the ) as in this Supplemental Indenture provided; and
Company Resolutions
Notes
 
WHEREAS, all requirements necessary to make this Supplemental Indenture a valid, binding and enforceable instrument in accordance with its terms and to make the Notes, when executed, authenticated and delivered by the Company, the valid, binding and enforceable obligations of the Company have been done and performed.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and mutual covenants herein contained and intending to be legally bound, the parties to this Supplemental Indenture hereby agree as follows:
 
 
1
 
 
 
Section 1.01
.  Definitions.
 
(a)      Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Base Indenture.
 
(b)      The following terms shall have the meanings assigned to them in this Section 1.01(b):
 
 has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Base Indenture
 
 means the Notes are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Notes, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Notes by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the Rating Agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the
Change of Control
 
 
2
 
 
Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
provided, however
voting stock
 
 has the meaning stated in Section 2.07(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Offer
 
 has the meaning stated in Section 2.07(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Payment
 
 has the meaning stated in Section 2.07(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Payment Date
 
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 
 means the Person named as the Company in the first paragraph of this Supplemental Indenture until a successor Person shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Indenture, and thereafter Company shall mean such successor Person.
Company
 
 has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Company Resolutions
 
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing
Comparable Treasury Issue
 
 
3
 
 
new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed.
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Notes, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Notes; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 
 means The Depository Trust Company.
DTC
 
 means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and any successor statute thereto.
Exchange Act
 
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 
 has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Indenture
 
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Notes
 
 has the meaning stated in the definition of Reference Treasury Dealer in this Section 1.01(b).
Primary Treasury Dealer
 
 
4
 
 
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Notes or fails to make a rating of the Notes publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
Rating Agencies
 
 means each of Goldman, Sachs & Co., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary Treasury Dealer
 
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
 
 has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture and more particularly means any Securities authenticated and delivered under the Indenture, including, without limitation, the Notes.
Securities
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
 has the meaning stated in the first paragraph of this instrument.
Supplemental Indenture
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Notes,
Treasury Rate
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 
 means the Person named as the Trustee in respect of the Notes in the first paragraph of this Supplemental Indenture until a successor Trustee in respect of the Notes shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Indenture, and thereafter Trustee shall mean or include such Person who is then a Trustee in respect of the Notes.
Trustee
 
Section 1.02Each reference to a particular section set forth in this Supplemental Indenture shall, unless the context otherwise requires, refer to this Supplemental Indenture.  Each reference to a particular section of the Base Indenture shall refer to that particular section of the Base Indenture.
.  Section References.  
 
 
 
Section 2.01The Notes shall be issued as a series of Securities under the Base Indenture as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, which such series shall be known and designated as the 4.125% Senior Notes due June 1, 2021 of the Company.  The Notes shall be unsecured.  The Notes shall be executed, authenticated and delivered in accordance with the provisions of the Indenture.  The aggregate principal amount of the Notes which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is initially limited to $500,000,000 (except for such Notes authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, other Notes pursuant to Sections 304, 305, 306, 906 or 1107 of the Base Indenture and except for any Notes which, pursuant to Section 303 of the Base Indenture, are deemed never to have been authenticated and delivered thereunder).  Additional Notes may be authenticated and delivered from time to time as contemplated in Section 301 of the Base Indenture; that if the additional Notes are not fungible with the Notes for United States Federal income tax purposes, the additional Notes will
.  Issue of Notes.  
provided
 
 
6
 
 
have a separate CUSIP number.  The entire amount of Notes may immediately be executed by the Company and delivered to the Trustee and shall be authenticated by the Trustee and delivered to or upon the order of the Company pursuant to Section 303 of the Base Indenture.
 
Section 2.02The Stated Maturity of the principal of the Notes shall be June 1, 2021.
.  Stated Maturity.  
 
Section 2.03
.  Notes Issuable as Global Securities.
 
(a)      The Notes shall be issued in the form of one or more Global Securities registered in the name of DTC or its nominee, to be deposited with, or on behalf of, DTC, New York, New York.
 
(b)      The Notes shall be in such form or forms as may be approved by the officers of the Company as provided in the Company Resolutions, such approval to be evidenced by any such officers manual or facsimile signature on the Notes, provided that such form or forms of the Notes are not inconsistent with the requirements of the Indenture or the Company Resolutions and are substantially in the form or forms attached hereto as .
Exhibit A
 
Section 2.04The Notes shall bear interest at the rate of 4.125% per annum, which will accrue from May 20, 2011, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, as the case may be, payable semi-annually on December 1 and June 1 in each year, commencing December 1, 2011, to the Person in whose name such Notes (or one or more predecessor Notes) are registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date next preceding the Interest Payment Date.  Each December 1 and June 1 shall be an  for such Notes, and the November 15 or May 15 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding an Interest Payment Date shall be the  for the interest payable on such Interest Payment Date.  In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
.  Interest and Payment.  
Interest Payment Date
Regular Record Date
 
Section 2.05Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on the Notes will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York; , , that at any time that the Notes are not represented by Global Securities, at the option of the Company, payment of interest may be made by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as such address shall appear in the Security Register.
.  Payment of Interest.  
provided
however
 
Section 2.06
.  Optional Redemption
 
 
7
 
 
(a)      At any time prior to March 1, 2021, the Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
 
(i)      100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be redeemed,
 
or
 
(ii)      the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled payments of principal and interest on the Notes to be redeemed from the Redemption Date to the date of Maturity for the Notes discounted to the Redemption Date on a semiannual basis (assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months) at the Treasury Rate plus 20 basis points,
 
, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
plus
 
(b)      At any time on or after March 1, 2021, the Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 
(c)      Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each holder of the Notes to be redeemed.
 
(d)      Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes or portions of the Notes called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
 
Section 2.07
.  Change of Control Offer to Purchase.
 
(a)      If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Notes in full pursuant to Section 2.06, the Company will make an offer to each Holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Notes at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ).Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of Notes describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Notes on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
 
 
8
 
 
than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Notes and described in such notice.
 
(b)      The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes by virtue of such conflicts.
 
(c)      The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Notes upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Notes properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Notes and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Notes unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Notes at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
 
(d)      On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
(i)      accept or cause a third party to accept for payment all Notes or portions of Notes properly tendered pursuant to the Change of Control Offer;
 
(ii)      deposit or cause a third party to deposit with the Paying Agent an amount equal to the Change of Control Payment in respect of all Notes or portions of Notes properly tendered; and
 
(iii)     deliver or cause to be delivered to the Trustee the Notes properly accepted, together with an officers certificate stating the principal amount of Notes or portions of Notes being purchased.
 
Section 2.08
.  Applicability of Certain Provisions of the Base Indenture in Respect of the Notes.
 
(a)      The Event of Default specified in Section 501(5) of the Base Indenture shall not apply to the Notes.
 
 
9
 
 
(b)      Section 1005 of the Base Indenture shall not apply to the Notes.
 
Section 2.09U.S. Bank National Association shall act as Paying Agent and registrar with respect to the Notes.
.  Registrar and Paying Agent.  
 
Section 2.10The Company shall not be obligated to redeem or purchase the Notes pursuant to any sinking fund or analogous provision, or at the option of any Holder thereof, except as provided in Section 2.07 of this Supplemental Indenture.
.  No Sinking Fund.  
 
Section 2.11The Notes shall be issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
.  Minimum Denominations.  
 
 
 
Section 3.01This Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder of Securities heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered under the Indenture shall be bound hereby.
.  Relation to Indenture.  
 
Section 3.02Except as expressly supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, the Base Indenture shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with the provisions thereof, and the Base Indenture is in all respects hereby ratified and confirmed. This Supplemental Indenture and all its provisions shall be deemed a part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
.  Continued Effect.
 
Section 3.03All of the covenants, stipulations, promises and agreements in this Supplemental Indenture by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns whether so expressed or not.
.  Provisions Binding on Companys Successors.  
 
Section 3.04
.  Certain Trustee Matters.
 
(a)      The recitals contained herein shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for their correctness.
 
(b)      The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Supplemental Indenture or the Notes or the proper authorization or the due execution hereof or thereof by the Company.
 
Section 3.05This Supplemental Indenture and the Notes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of New York.
.  Governing Law.  
 
 
10
 
 
Section 3.06This Supplemental Indenture may be signed in various counterparts which together will constitute one and the same instrument.
.  Counterparts.  
 
 
11
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
 
 
[Signature Page to Supplemental Indenture]
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
 
[Signature Page to Supplemental Indenture]
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit A
 
 
THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF.  THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO, OR REGISTERED OR EXCHANGED FOR SECURITIES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF, ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF, AND NO SUCH TRANSFER MAY BE REGISTERED EXCEPT IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE.  EVERY SECURITY AUTHENTICATED AND DELIVERED UPON REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER OF, OR IN EXCHANGE FOR OR IN LIEU OF, THIS SECURITY SHALL BE A GLOBAL SECURITY SUBJECT TO THE FOREGOING, EXCEPT IN SUCH LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES.
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation (), to Aetna Inc. or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
DTC
CUSIP: []
ISIN: []
 
 
AETNA INC., a Pennsylvania corporation (herein called the ), which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of FIVE HUNDRED MILLION Dollars ($500,000,000) upon presentation and surrender of this Security on June 1, 2021, and to pay interest thereon from May 20, 2011 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually
Company
 
 
A-1
 
 
on December 1 and June 1 in each year, commencing December 1, 2011, at the rate of 4.125% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made available for payment.  The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the November 15 or May 15 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date.  Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Securities of this series not less than 10 calendar days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture.  In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on this Security will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts.
Reference is hereby made to the further provisions of this Security set forth on the reverse hereof, which further provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as if set forth at this place.  Such provisions include, without limitation, provisions relating to redemption of this Security by the Company.
Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee referred to on the reverse hereof by manual signature, this Security shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
 
 
A-2
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
Dated: May 20, 2011
 
 
 
[SEAL]
Attest:
__________________
Judith H. Jones
 
A-3
 
 
TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF AUTHENTICATION
This is one of the Securities of the series designated under, and referred to in, the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
 
 
A-4
 
(Back of Security)
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the ), issued and to be issued in one or more series under a Senior Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2001 (herein called the  ), between the Company, as issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association (as successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company), as Trustee (herein called the , which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture dated as of May 20, 2011, between the Company and the Trustee (together with the Base Indenture, the ), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered.  This Security is one of the series designated on the face hereof, initially limited in aggregate principal amount to $500,000,000, subject to future issuances of additional Securities pursuant to Section 301 of the Base Indenture.
Securities
Base
Indenture
Trustee
Indenture
 
 
At any time prior to March 1, 2021, the Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
 
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 
At any time on or after March 1, 2021, the Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities to be redeemed, plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Securities,
Treasury Rate
 
 
A-5
 
 
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Securities to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Securities to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Securities, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 
 means each of Goldman, Sachs & Co., J.P. Morgan Securities, LLC and Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a  ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 
 
A-6
 
 
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
 
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each Holder of the Securities to be redeemed.
 
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Securities or portions of the Securities called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
 
If this Security is redeemed in part only, a new Security or Securities of this series and of like tenor for the unredeemed portion hereof will be issued in the name of the Holder hereof upon the cancellation hereof.
 
 
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Securities in full, as described under Optional Redemption above, the Company will make an offer to each Holder (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Securities at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of Securities describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Securities on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required hereby and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
 
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and any successor statute thereto (the ), and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the
Exchange Act
 
 
A-7
 
 
Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities by virtue of such conflicts.
 
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Securities upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Securities properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Securities and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Securities unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Securities at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
 
On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
 
 
 
 means the Securities are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Securities, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Securities by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 
 
A-8
 
 
Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the Rating Agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
 
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
Change of Control
provided, however
voting stock
 
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Securities;
Continuing Directors
 
 
A-9
 
 
or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
 
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Securities or fails to make a rating of the Securities publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be.
Rating Agencies
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
 
The Indenture contains certain covenants that, among other things, limit the ability of the Company to consolidate, merge or sell all or substantially all of its assets.  These covenants are subject to a number of important qualifications and exceptions.  Section 1005 of the Base Indenture, including, without limitation, the limitation on liens on the Common Stock of Principal Subsidiaries set forth therein, does not apply to the Securities of this series.
 
 
If an Event of Default with respect to Securities of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Securities of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture.  The
 
 
A-10
 
 
Event of Default set forth in Section 501(5) of the Base Indenture, including, without limitation, the cross-acceleration provisions thereof, does not apply to the Securities of this series.
 
 
The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the rights of the Holders of the Securities of each series to be affected under the Indenture at any time by the Company and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities at the time Outstanding of each series to be affected.  The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of specified percentages in principal amount of the Securities of each series at the time Outstanding, on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series, to waive compliance by the Company with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and their consequences.  Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Security shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Security and of any Security issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange hereof or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Security.
 
 
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Security or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
 
As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the transfer of this Security is registrable in the Security Register upon surrender of this Security for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Company in any place where the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security are payable, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or such Holders attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Securities of this series and of like tenor, of authorized denominations and for the same aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
 
The Securities of this series are issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.  As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, Securities of this series are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of
 
 
A-11
 
 
Securities of this series and of like tenor of a different authorized denomination, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
 
No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company or the Trustee may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, other than exchanges pursuant to Section 304, 906 or 1107 of the Base Indenture not involving any transfer.
 
Prior to due and proper presentment of this Security for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name this Security is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Security is overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
 
The Indenture provides that the Company, at the Companys option, (a) will be discharged from any and all obligations in respect of the Securities (except for certain obligations to register the transfer or exchange of Securities, replace stolen, lost or mutilated Securities, maintain paying agencies and hold moneys for payment in trust) or (b) need not comply with certain restrictive covenants of the Indenture, in each case if the Company deposits, in trust, with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations which through the payment of interest thereon and principal thereof in accordance with their terms will provide money, in an amount sufficient to pay all the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on, the Securities on the dates such payments are due in accordance with the terms of such Securities, and certain other conditions are satisfied.
 
No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, or interest on this Security, or for any claim based hereon, or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture or any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer, employee, agent or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
 
All terms used in this Security which are defined in the Indenture shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
 
 
A-12
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110523145513.txt.gz
TIME:20110523145513
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
Section 5 - Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On May 20, 2011, Aetna Inc.s (Aetnas) shareholders approved an amendment to the Aetna Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan to increase the number of shares authorized to be issued under such Plan.  The amended Aetna Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended May 20, 2011, is filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Current Report and is incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 5.02.
Also on May 20, 2011, Aetnas shareholders approved the Aetna Inc. 2011 Employee Stock Purchase Plan dated as of May 20, 2011 (the ESPP).  The ESPP is filed as Exhibit 10.2 to this Current Report and is incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 5.02.
Item 5.07   Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
Aetnas Annual Meeting of Shareholders was held on May 20, 2011.  Shareholders voted on the matters set forth below.
1. Election of Director nominees.  Each of the nominees listed below was elected as a Director of Aetna until the next Annual Meeting and until their successors are duly elected and qualified based on the following votes:
2. The proposal to approve the appointment of KPMG LLP as the independent registered public accounting firm for Aetna and its subsidiaries for 2011 was approved based on the following votes:
 
 
3. The proposal to approve the proposed amendment to the Aetna Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan to increase the number of shares authorized to be issued under the Plan was approved based on the following votes:
 
 
4. The proposal to approve the proposed Aetna Inc. 2011 Employee Stock Purchase Plan was approved based on the following votes:
 
 
 
 
 
 
5. The non-binding advisory vote on executive compensation was approved based on the following votes:
 
6. The non-binding advisory vote on the frequency of the vote on executive compensation was voted on as follows:
 
7. A shareholder proposal relating to cumulative voting in the election of Directors was not approved based on the following votes:
 
8. A shareholder proposal requesting that the Board of Directors adopt a policy that the Chairman of Aetna Inc.s Board of Directors be an independent director who has not previously served as an executive officer of Aetna was approved based on the following votes:
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)  Exhibits.
The following exhibits are filed as part of this Current Report:
* Compensatory plan or arrangement.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.1
As Amended May 20, 2011
SECTION 1.     PURPOSE.
The purposes of this Plan are to promote the interests of the Company and its shareholders and align the interests of shareholders and Participants by:
(i) motivating Participants through Awards tied to total return to shareholders (i.e., stock price appreciation and dividends);
(ii) attracting and retaining high performing individuals as Participants;
(iii) enabling Participants to acquire additional equity interests in the Company; and
(iv) providing compensation opportunities dependent upon the Companys performance relative to its competitors and changes in its own performance over time.
SECTION 2.     DEFINITIONS.
 shall mean any corporation or other entity (other than the Company or one of its Subsidiaries) in which the Company directly or indirectly owns at least twenty percent (20%) of the combined voting power of all classes of stock of such entity or at least twenty percent (20%) of the ownership interests in such entity.
AFFILIATE
 shall mean a grant or award under the Plan, as evidenced in a written document delivered to a Participant as provided in Section 12(b).
AWARD
 shall mean the Board of Directors of the Company.
BOARD
 shall mean (i) the willful failure by the Participant to perform substantially the Participants duties as an employee of the Company (other than due to physical or mental illness) after reasonable notice to the Participant, (ii) the Participants engagement in serious misconduct that is injurious to the Company, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate, (iii) the Participants conviction of, or entrance of a plea of nolo contendere to, a crime that constitutes a felony, (iv) the breach by the Participant of any written covenant or agreement not to compete with the Company, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate or (v) the breach by the Participant of his or her duty of loyalty to the Company which shall include, without limitation, (A) any disclosure by the Participant of any confidential information pertaining to the Company, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate, (B) any harmful interference by the Participant in the business or operations of the Company, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate, (C) any attempt by the Participant directly or indirectly to induce any employee, insurance agent, insurance broker or broker-dealer of the Company, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate to be employed or perform services elsewhere, (D) any attempt by the Participant directly or indirectly to solicit the trade of any customer or supplier, or prospective customer or supplier, of the Company or (E) any breach or violation of the Companys Code of Conduct.
CAUSE
 shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the regulations thereunder.
CODE
 shall mean a committee of the Board as may be designated by the Board to administer the Plan, which shall consist of at least three directors of the Company chosen by the Board each of whom has satisfied such criteria for independence as the Board may establish and such additional regulatory or listing requirements as the Board may determine to be applicable or appropriate.
COMMITTEE
 shall mean the common shares, $.01 par value, of the Company.
COMMON STOCK
 shall mean Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation.
COMPANY
 shall mean each employee of the Company, its Subsidiaries or its Affiliates, but shall not include directors who are not employees of such entities. Any individual the Company
ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE
 
1
 
 
 
 
designates as, or otherwise determines to be, an independent contractor shall not be considered an Eligible Employee, and such designation or determination shall govern regardless of whether such individual is ultimately determined to be an employee pursuant to the Code or any other applicable law.
 
 shall mean, for purposes of determining whether a termination of employment has occurred under the Plan, continuous and regular salaried employment with the Company, a Subsidiary or an Affiliate, which shall include (unless the Committee shall otherwise determine) any period of paid time off, any approved leave of absence or any salary continuation or severance pay period and, at the discretion of the Committee, may include service with any former Subsidiary or Affiliate of the Company. For this purpose, regular salaried employment means scheduled employment of at least 20 hours per week.
EMPLOYMENT
 shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time.
EXCHANGE ACT
 shall mean those persons who are officers of the Company within the meaning of Rule 16a-l(f) of the Exchange Act.
EXECUTIVE OFFICER
 shall mean on any date, with respect to a share of Common Stock, the closing price of a share of Common Stock as reported by the Consolidated Tape of New York Stock Exchange Listed Shares on such date, or, if no shares were traded on such Exchange on such date, on the next date on which the Common Stock is traded on such Exchange.
FAIR MARKET VALUE
 shall mean any stock dividend, extraordinary cash dividend, recapitalization, reorganization, merger, consolidation, split-up, spin-off, combination, exchange of shares, offering to purchase Common Stock at a price substantially below fair market value, or other similar event.
FUNDAMENTAL CORPORATE EVENT
 shall mean an Award of Common Stock granted under Section 7 which may become vested and nonforfeitable upon the passage of time and/or the attainment, in whole or in part, of performance objectives determined by the Committee.
INCENTIVE STOCK
 shall mean an option which is intended to meet the requirements of Section 422 of the Code.
INCENTIVE STOCK OPTION
 shall mean an Award of a contractual right granted under Section 7 to receive Common Stock (or, at the discretion of the Committee, cash based on the Fair Market Value of the Common Stock) which may become vested and nonforfeitable upon either the passage of time and/or the attainment, in whole or in part, of performance objectives determined by the Committee.
INCENTIVE UNIT
 shall mean an Option which is not intended to be an Incentive Stock Option.
NONSTATUTORY STOCK OPTION
 shall mean the right granted under Section 5 to purchase the number of shares of Common Stock specified by the Committee, at a price and for the term fixed by the Committee in accordance with the Plan and subject to any other limitations and restrictions as this Plan and the Committee shall impose, and shall include both Incentive Stock Options and Nonstatutory Stock Options.
OPTION
 shall mean any right granted under Section 8.
OTHER STOCK-BASED AWARD
 shall mean an Eligible Employee who is selected by the Committee to receive an Award under the Plan and any recipient of a Substitute Award.
PARTICIPANT
 shall mean the Aetna Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan, described herein, and as may be amended from time to time.
PLAN
 shall mean the period during which a grant of Incentive Stock or Incentive Units is subject to forfeiture.
RESTRICTED PERIOD
 shall mean Section 409A of the Code and the regulations issued thereunder, as may be amended from time to time.
SECTION 409A
 or  shall mean a right granted under Section 6.
STOCK APPRECIATION RIGHT
SAR
 
2
 
 
 
 shall mean any entity of which the Company possesses directly or indirectly fifty percent (50%) or more of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock of such entity.
SUBSIDIARY
 shall mean an Award granted in assumption of, or in substitution for, an outstanding award previously granted by a company acquired by the Company or with which the Company combines.
SUBSTITUTE AWARD
SECTION 3.     ADMINISTRATION.
The Plan shall be administered by the Committee.  The Committee shall have the responsibility of construing and interpreting the Plan and of establishing and amending such rules and regulations as it deems necessary or desirable for the proper administration of the Plan. Any decision or action taken or to be taken by the Committee, arising out of or in connection with the construction, administration, interpretation and effect of the Plan and of its rules and regulations, shall, to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, be within its absolute discretion (except as otherwise specifically provided herein) and shall be conclusive and binding upon all Participants and any person claiming under or through any Participant.
Subject to the terms of the Plan and applicable law, and in addition to other express powers and authorizations conferred on the Committee by the Plan, the Committee shall have full power and authority to: (i) designate Participants; (ii) determine the type or types of Awards, if any, to be granted to an Eligible Employee; (iii) determine the number of shares of Common Stock to be covered by, or with respect to which payments, rights, or other matters are to be calculated in connection with, Awards; (iv) determine the terms and conditions of any Award; (v) determine whether, to what extent, and under what circumstances Awards may be settled or exercised in cash, Common Stock, other securities, other Awards or other property, or canceled, forfeited, or suspended and the method or methods by which Awards may be settled, exercised, canceled, forfeited, or suspended; (vi) determine whether, to what extent, and under what circumstances, cash, Common Stock, other securities, other Awards, other property, and other amounts payable with respect to an Award shall be deferred either automatically or at the election of the holder thereof or of the Committee; (vii) interpret and administer the Plan and any instrument or agreement relating to, or Award made under, the Plan; (viii) establish, amend, suspend, or waive such rules and regulations and appoint such agents as it shall deem appropriate for the proper administration of the Plan; and (ix) make any other determination and take any other action that the Committee deems necessary or desirable for the administration of the Plan (including authorizing another committee of the Board to designate Participants or make Awards under the Plan within limits prescribed by the Committee).
Except with respect to any action or adjustment taken in connection with a Fundamental Corporate Event, any amendment or action that would, directly or indirectly, reduce the exercise price of any outstanding option or SAR previously granted under the Plan, including through an exchange or cancellation of awards for cash or other awards, shall be subject to the approval of the Companys shareholders.
SECTION 4.     SHARES AVAILABLE FOR
AWARDS.
(a)   The maximum number of shares of Common Stock in respect of which Awards may be made under the Plan shall be a total of  shares of Common Stock. Shares of Common Stock may be made available from the authorized but unissued shares of the Company or from shares held in the Companys treasury and not reserved for some other purpose. In the event that any Award is paid solely in cash, no shares shall be deducted from the number of shares available for issuance by reason of such Award. Shares of Common Stock subject to Awards that are forfeited, terminated, canceled or settled, in whole or in part, without the delivery of Common Stock under the Plan will again be available for Awards under the Plan, as will shares of Common Stock tendered (either actually or by attestation) to the Company in satisfaction or partial satisfaction of the exercise price of any Award under the Plan, and shares withheld by the Company to pay applicable withholding in accordance with Section 12.
Shares Available for Issuance.
15,750,000
(b)   In the event that the Committee shall determine that any Fundamental Corporate Event affects the Common Stock such that an adjustment is required to preserve, or to prevent enlargement of, the benefits or potential benefits made available under this Plan, then the
Adjustment for Corporate Transactions.
 
3
 
 
 
 
Committee shall, in such manner as the Committee may deem equitable, adjust any or all of (i) the number and kind of shares which thereafter may be awarded or optioned and sold or made the subject of Awards under the Plan, (ii) the number and kinds of shares subject to outstanding Awards and (iii) the grant, exercise or conversion price with respect to any of the foregoing. Additionally, the Committee may make provisions for a cash payment to a Participant or a person who has an outstanding Award; provided, however, that to the extent such an Award constitutes deferred compensation within the meaning of Section 409A, no such provision for a cash payment shall change the timing of payment of such Award unless such change is permitted under Section 409A. However, the number of shares subject to any Award shall always be a whole number.
SECTION 5.     STOCK OPTIONS.
(a)   Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee shall have the authority to grant Options to an Eligible Employee and to determine (i) the number of shares to be covered by each Option, (ii) subject to Section 5(b), the exercise price of the Option and (iii) the conditions and limitations applicable to the exercise of the Option. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall the Committee grant any Participant Options (i) for more than 2,000,000 shares of Common Stock in respect of any year in which the Plan is in effect, as such number may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4(b) or (ii) with a term of exceeding 10 years. In the case of Incentive Stock Options, the terms and conditions of such grants shall be subject to and comply with Section 422 of the Code and the regulations thereunder.
Grant.
(b)   Except in the case of a Substitute Award, the exercise price of an Option shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value on the date of grant.
Exercise Price.
(c)   Each Option shall be exercised at such times and subject to such terms and conditions as the Committee may specify at the time of the applicable Award or thereafter. No shares shall be delivered pursuant to any exercise of an Option unless arrangements satisfactory to the Committee have been made to assure full payment of the exercise price therefor. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, payment of the exercise price may be made in cash or its equivalent or, if and to the extent permitted by the Committee, by exchanging shares of Common Stock owned by the optionee (which are not the subject of any pledge or other security interest or which, in the case of Incentive Stock, are fully vested) either actually or by attestation, or by a combination of the foregoing, provided that the combined value of all cash and cash equivalents and the Fair Market Value of any such Common Stock so tendered to the Company, valued as of the date of such tender, is at least equal to such exercise price.
Exercise.
(d)   The aggregate Fair Market Value (determined as of the date the Incentive Stock Option is granted) of the Common Stock with respect to which Incentive Stock Options are exercisable for the first time by an Eligible Employee during any calendar year (counting Incentive Stock Options under this Plan and under any other stock option plan of the Company or a subsidiary) shall not exceed $100,000. If an Option intended to be an Incentive Stock Option is granted to an Eligible Employee and the Option may not be treated in whole or in part as an Incentive Stock Option pursuant to the $100,000 limitation, the Option shall be treated as an Incentive Stock Option to the extent it may be so treated under the limitation and as a Nonstatutory Stock Option as to the remainder. For purposes of determining whether an Incentive Stock Option would cause the limitation to be exceeded, Incentive Stock Options shall be taken into account in the order granted. The annual limit set forth above shall not apply to Nonstatutory Stock Options.
Incentive Stock Option Annual Limit.
SECTION 6.     STOCK APPRECIATION RIGHTS.
(a)   The Committee shall have the authority to grant Stock Appreciation Rights in tandem with an Option, in addition to an Option, or freestanding and unrelated to an Option. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall the Committee grant any Participant Stock Appreciation Rights (i) for more than 2,000,000 shares of Common Stock in respect of any year in which the Plan is in effect, as such number may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4(b), and (ii) with a term exceeding 10 years (or the term of the underlying Incentive Stock Option in the case of a Stock Appreciation Right
Grant of Stock Appreciation Rights.
 
4
 
 
 
 
granted in tandem with an Incentive Stock Option). Stock Appreciation Rights granted in tandem with an Option may be granted either at the same time as the Option or at a later time.
(b)   The exercise price of a Stock Appreciation Right shall not be less than 100% of the Fair Market Value of a share of Common Stock on the date the Stock Appreciation Right was granted; provided that if a Stock Appreciation Right is granted retroactively in tandem with or in substitution for an Option, the exercise price may be the exercise price of the Option to which it is related.
Exercise Price.
(c)   A Stock Appreciation Right shall entitle the Participant to receive from the Company an amount equal to the excess of the Fair Market Value of a share of Common Stock on the date of exercise of the Stock Appreciation Right over the base price thereof. The Committee shall determine the time or times at which or the event or events (including, without limitation, a change of control) upon which a Stock Appreciation Right may be exercised in whole or in part, the method of exercise and whether such Stock Appreciation Right shall be settled in cash, shares of Common Stock or a combination of cash and shares of Common Stock; , , that unless otherwise specified by the Committee at or after grant, a Stock Appreciation Right granted in tandem with an Option shall be exercisable at the same time or times as the related Option is exercisable.
Exercise of Stock Appreciation Rights.
provided
however
SECTION 7.     INCENTIVE AWARDS.
(a)   Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee shall have the authority to grant time vesting and/or performance vesting Incentive Stock or Incentive Units to any Eligible Employee and to determine (i) the number of shares of Incentive Stock and/or the number of Incentive Units to be granted to each Participant and (ii) the other terms and conditions of such Awards; provided that, to the extent necessary to comply with applicable law, Incentive Stock shall only be awarded to an Eligible Employee who has been employed for such minimum period of time as shall be determined by the Committee. The Restricted Period related to Incentive Stock or Incentive Units shall lapse upon the passage of time and/or the determination by the Committee that the performance objectives established by the Committee have been attained, in whole or in part. The maximum number of shares of Common Stock that may be subject to any performance-based Awards of Incentive Stock and/or Incentive Units (whether payable in cash or shares) granted to an Executive Officer with respect to any year in which the Plan is in effect shall not exceed 2,000,000 shares, as such number may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4(b). If the award is intended to qualify under Section 162(m) of the Code, the performance objectives with respect to an Award made to an Executive Officer shall be related to at least one of the following criteria, which may be determined solely by reference to the performance of the Company, a Subsidiary or an Affiliate (or any business unit thereof) or based on comparative performance relative to other companies: (i) net income; (ii) earnings before income taxes; (iii) earnings per share; (iv) return on shareholders equity; (v) expense management; (vi) profitability of an identifiable business unit or product; (vii) ratio of claims to revenues; (viii) revenue growth; (ix) earnings growth; (x) total shareholder return; (xi) cash flow; (xii) return on assets; (xiii) pretax operating income; (xiv) net economic profit (operating earnings minus a charge for capital); (xv) customer satisfaction; (xvi) provider satisfaction; (xvii) employee satisfaction; (xviii) quality of networks; (xix) strategic innovation or (xx) any combination of the foregoing.
Incentive Stock and Incentive Units.
SECTION 8.     OTHER STOCK-BASED AWARDS.
The Committee shall have authority to grant to eligible Employees an Other Stock-Based Award, which shall consist of any right which is (i) not an Award described in Sections 5 through 7 above and (ii) an Award of Common Stock or an Award denominated or payable in, valued in whole or in part by reference to, or otherwise based on or related to, Common Stock (including, without limitation, securities convertible into Common Stock), as deemed by the Committee to be consistent with the purposes of the Plan; provided that any such rights must comply, to the extent deemed desirable by the Committee, with Rule 16b-3 under the Exchange Act and applicable law. Subject to the terms of the Plan and any applicable Award Agreement, the Committee shall determine the terms and conditions of any such Other Stock-Based Award.
 
5
 
 
 
SECTION 9.     DIVIDENDS AND DIVIDEND
EQUIVALENTS.
The Committee may provide that any Award shall include dividends or dividend equivalents, payable in cash, Common Stock, securities or other property on a current or deferred basis, including payment contingencies provided, however, in no event shall any such dividend or dividend equivalent become payable prior to the date on which an award is vested in accordance with its terms. The preceding sentence to the contrary not withstanding, no dividends or dividend equivalents will be payable on options or stock appreciation rights.
SECTION 10.     STOCK IN LIEU OF CASH.
The Committee may grant Awards in lieu of all or a portion of compensation or an Award otherwise payable in cash to an Executive Officer pursuant to any bonus or incentive compensation plan of the Company.
SECTION 11.     DEFERRAL.
The Committee shall have the discretion to determine whether, to what extent, and under what circumstances cash, shares of Common Stock, other securities, other Awards, other property, and other amounts payable with respect to an Award shall be deferred either automatically or at the election of the Participant or of the Committee. The timing of any elective deferral shall comply with Section 409A. At the time of any automatic or elective deferral, the time and form of payment shall be established consistent with the requirements of Section 409A. If the time or form of payment is not so established, the form of payment shall be a lump sum and the time of payment shall be the date the Participant experiences a separation from service within the meaning of Section 409A. Gains from the exercise of Options and Stock Appreciation Rights shall not be eligible for automatic or elective deferral.
SECTION 12.     GENERAL PROVISIONS.
(a)   The Company shall have the right to deduct from all amounts paid to a Participant in cash (whether under this Plan or otherwise) any taxes required by law to be withheld in respect of Awards under this Plan. In the case of any Award satisfied in the form of Common Stock, no shares shall be issued unless and until arrangements satisfactory to the Company shall have been made to satisfy any withholding tax obligations applicable with respect to such Award.
Withholding.
(b)   Each Award hereunder shall be evidenced in writing. The written agreement shall be delivered to the Participant and shall incorporate the terms of the Plan by reference and specify the terms and conditions thereof and any rules applicable thereto.
Award Agreement.
(c)   Unless the Committee shall permit (on such terms and conditions as it shall establish) an Award to be transferred to a member of the Participants immediate family or to a trust or similar vehicle for the benefit of such immediate family members (collectively, the Permitted Transferees), no Award shall be assignable or transferable except by will or the laws of descent and distribution, and except to the extent required by law, no right or interest of any Participant shall be subject to any lien, obligation or liability of the Participant. All rights with respect to Awards granted to a Participant under the Plan shall be exercisable during the Participants lifetime only by such Participant or, if applicable, the Permitted Transferees or the Participants legal representative.
Nontransferability.
(d)   The grant of an Award shall not be construed as giving a Participant the right to be retained in the employ of the Company, any Subsidiary or any Affiliate. Further, the Company and each Subsidiary and Affiliate expressly reserves the right at any time to dismiss a Participant free from any liability, or any claim under the Plan, except as provided herein or in any Award Agreement.
No Right to Employment.
(e)   No Participant or Eligible Employee shall have any claim to be granted any Award under the Plan, and there is no obligation of uniformity of treatment of Participants and Eligible Employees. Subject to the provisions of the Plan and the applicable Award, no person shall have any rights as a shareholder with respect to any shares of Common Stock to be issued under the Plan prior to the issuance thereof.
No Rights to Awards, No Shareholder Rights.
 
6
 
 
 
 
(f)   The validity, construction, interpretation, administration and effect of the Plan and of its rules and regulations, and rights relating to the Plan, shall be determined solely in accordance with the laws of the State of Connecticut.
Applicable Law.
(g)   The Plan shall be effective upon approval by the Companys shareholders.
Effective Date.
(h)   The Board or the Committee may terminate or suspend the Plan at any time, but the termination or suspension will not adversely affect any vested Awards then outstanding under the Plan. No Award may be granted under the Plan after May 21, 2020 or such earlier date as the Plan is terminated by action of the Board or the Committee. The Plan may be amended or terminated at any time by the Board, except that no amendment may be made without shareholder approval if the Committee determines that such approval is necessary to comply with any tax or regulatory requirement, including any approval requirement which is a prerequisite for exemptive relief from Section 16 of the Exchange Act, for which or with which the Committee determines that it is desirable to qualify or comply; and, the Committee may amend the term of any Award or Option granted, retroactively or prospectively, but no amendment may adversely affect any vested Award or Option without the holders consent.
Amendment or Termination of Plan.
(i)   The Plan, the granting and exercising of Awards thereunder, and the other obligations of the Company under the Plan, shall be subject to all applicable federal and state laws, rules, and regulations, and to such approvals by any regulatory or governmental agency as may be required. The Company, in its discretion, may postpone the granting and exercising of Awards, the issuance or delivery of Common Stock under any Award or any other action permitted under the Plan to permit the Company, with reasonable diligence, to complete such stock exchange listing or registration or qualification of such Common Stock or other required action under any federal or state law, rule, or regulation and may require any Participant to make such representations and furnish such information as it may consider appropriate in connection with the issuance or delivery of Common Stock in compliance with applicable laws, rules, and regulations. The Company shall not be obligated by virtue of any provision of the Plan to recognize the exercise of any Award or to otherwise sell or issue Common Stock in violation of any such laws, rules, or regulations; and any postponement of the exercise or settlement of any Award under this provision shall not extend the term of such Awards, and neither the Company nor its directors or officers shall have any obligations or liability to the Participant with respect to any Award (or stock issuable thereunder) that shall lapse because of such postponement.
Compliance with Legal and Exchange Requirements.
 
(j)   If any provision of this Plan shall be held invalid or unenforceable, such invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect any other provisions hereof, and this Plan shall be construed and enforced as if such provision had not been included.
Severability of Provisions.
(k)   Any benefit payable to or for the benefit of a minor, an incompetent person or other person incapable of providing a receipt therefore shall be deemed paid when paid to such persons guardian or to the party providing or reasonably appearing to provide for the care of such person, and such payment shall fully discharge any liability or obligation of the Committee, the Board, the Company and all other parties with respect thereto.
Incapacity.
(l)   The headings and captions herein are provided for reference and convenience only, shall not be considered part of this Plan, and shall not be employed in the construction of this Plan.
Headings and Captions.
(m)   All Awards granted under the Plan are intended to be either exempt from the requirements of Section 409A or, if not exempt, to satisfy the requirements of Section 409A. The provisions of the Plan and any Awards granted under the Plan shall be construed in a manner consistent with such intent. In addition, notwithstanding any other provision of this Plan or an Award agreement to the contrary, the Company will not pay or accelerate the payment of any amount that constitutes deferred compensation within the meaning of Section 409A, in violation of Section 409A. To the extent any amount of deferred compensation as defined in Section 409A would otherwise vest and become payable upon a Change in Control or upon a disability, as set forth herein or in an Award Agreement, any such Award may vest but payment shall not be accelerated unless the Change in Control or the disability also satisfies the definition of change in control or disability as set forth in Section 409A.
Compliance with Section 409A.
7
 
 
 
 
Any amount that constitutes deferred compensation within the meaning of Section 409A and is payable under the Plan solely by reason of a Participants termination of employment shall be payable only if the Participant has experienced a separation from service within the meaning of Section 409A, provided that if the Participant is a specified employee within the meaning of Section 409A at the time of such separation from service, as determined by the Company in accordance with Section 409A, no payments shall be made before the six-month anniversary of the Participants separation from service, at which time all payments that would otherwise have been made during such six-month period shall be paid to the Participant in a lump sum.
 
8

6
Exhibit 10.2
  The purpose of the Plan is to provide employment incentive through a capital accumulation opportunity, link employee and shareholder interests, and provide an opportunity for employees of the Company and its Participating Subsidiaries to purchase Common Stock through payroll deductions.
1. PURPOSE OF THE PLAN.
2. DEFINITIONS.
means the Companys Board of Directors.
Board
means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
means the happening of any of the following:
Change-In-Control
(i) When any person as defined in Section 3(a)(9) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act), and as used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) thereof, including a group as defined in Section 13(d) of the Exchange Act but excluding the Company and any Subsidiary thereof and any employee benefit plan sponsored or maintained by the Company or any Subsidiary (including any trustee of such plan acting as trustee), directly or indirectly, becomes the beneficial owner (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act, as amended from time to time), of securities of the Company representing 20 percent or more of the combined voting power of the Companys then outstanding securities;
(ii) When, during any period of 24 consecutive months, the individuals who, at the beginning of such period, constitute the Board (the Incumbent Directors) cease for any reason other than death to constitute at least a majority thereof, provided that a Director who was not a Director at the beginning of such 24-month period shall be deemed to have satisfied such 24-month requirement (and be an Incumbent Director) if such Director was elected by, or on the recommendation of or with the approval of, at least two-thirds of the Directors who then qualified as Incumbent Directors either actually (because they were Directors at the beginning of such 24-month period) or by prior operation of this paragraph (ii); or
(iii) The occurrence of a transaction requiring shareholder approval for the acquisition of the Company by an entity other than the Company or a Subsidiary through purchase of assets, or by merger, or otherwise.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall a Change-in-Control be deemed to have occurred (i) as a result of the formation of a Holding Company, or (ii) with respect to any Employee, if such Employee is part of a group, within the meaning of Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act as in effect on the effective date, which consummates the Change-in-Control transaction. In addition, for purposes of the definition of Change-in-Control a person engaged in business as an underwriter of securities shall not be deemed to be the beneficial owner of, or to beneficially own, any securities acquired through such persons participation in good faith in a firm commitment underwriting until the expiration of forty days after the date of such acquisition.
means the Boards Committee on Compensation and Organization or such other committee of the Board designated by the Board to administer the Plan.
Committee
means the common shares, $.01 par value of the Company.
Common Stock
means Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation.
Company
means annual base salary during a Purchase Period and does not include any bonus, severance or overtime payment, disability payment, contributions to an employee benefit plan or other similar payment or contribution.
Compensation
 
1
 
 
 
means the absence of any interruption or termination of service as an Employee. Continuous Status as an Employee shall not be considered interrupted in the case of (i) sick leave, (ii) military leave, (iii) any other leave of absence approved by the Company, provided that such leave is for a period of not more than ninety (90) days, unless reemployment upon the expiration of such leave is guaranteed by contract or statute, or unless provided otherwise pursuant to Company policy adopted from time to time, or (iv) in the case of transfers between locations of the Company or between the Company and its Participating Subsidiaries.
Continuous Status As An Employee
means any person, including an officer, who is an employee of the Company or one of its Participating Subsidiaries for tax purposes and who is employed at least twenty-one (21) days prior to the Grant Date of an Offering (or such shorter period as the Company, in its sole discretion, may determine).
Employee
means the last day of an Offering as designated by the Committee, which, in any event, shall not be more than twenty-seven (27) months after the Grant Date.
Expiration Date
shall mean on any date, with respect to a share of Common Stock, the closing price of a share of Common Stock as reported by the Consolidated Tape of New York Stock Exchange Listed Shares on such date, or, if no shares were traded on such Exchange on such date, on the next date on which the Common Stock is traded.
Fair Market Value
means an entity that becomes a holding company for the Company or its business as part of any reorganization, merger, consolidation or other transaction, provided that the outstanding shares of common stock of such entity and the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities of such entity entitled to vote generally in the election of directors is, immediately after such reorganization, merger, consolidation or other transaction, beneficially owned, directly or indirectly, by all or substantially all of the individuals and entities who were the beneficial owners of the outstanding shares of common stock and the combined voting power of the outstanding voting securities, respectively, of the Company immediately prior to such reorganization, merger, consolidation or other transaction in substantially the same proportions as their ownership, immediately prior to such reorganization, merger, consolidation or other transaction, of such outstanding voting stock.
Holding Company
means the first business day of each Purchase Period of the Plan.
Grant Date
means the grant of Purchase Rights under the Plan.
Offering
means the Subsidiaries that have been designated by the Committee or the Board from time to time in its sole discretion as eligible to participate in one or more Offerings under the Plan; provided however that the Board shall only have the discretion to designate Subsidiaries if the grant of Purchase Rights to such Subsidiary Employees pursuant to the Plan would not cause the Company to incur material adverse accounting charges.
Participating Subsidiary
means the Aetna Inc. 2011 Employee Stock Purchase Plan, a plan intended to qualify under Section 423 of the Code.
Plan
means the period of an Offering beginning on the Grant Date and ending on the Expiration Date.
Purchase Period
means rights to purchase shares of Common Stock under the Plan on the terms or conditions set forth herein and as determined by the Committee as provided hereunder.
Purchase Rights
means any company in an unbroken chain of companies beginning with (and including) the Company in which each company other than the last company in the unbroken chain owns stock possessing 50% or more of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock in one of the other companies in such chain.
Subsidiary
  The Committee shall administer the Plan. The Committee shall have full power and authority to construe and interpret the Plan and may from time to time adopt such rules and regulations for carrying out the Plan, as it may deem best. Decisions of the Committee shall be final, conclusive and binding upon all parties, including the Company, its shareholders and its employees.
3. ADMINISTRATION OF THE PLAN.
 
2
 
 
 
The Committee may in its sole discretion determine from time to time that the Company shall grant Purchase Rights under an Offering to all of the then eligible Employees, provided, however, that it shall be under no obligation to do so.
  The individuals who shall be eligible to receive grants of Purchase Rights under an Offering shall be all Employees of the Company or of any Participating Subsidiary who are so employed by the Company or Participating Subsidiary on the Grant Date of such Offering; provided, however, that no individual shall be eligible to effect a purchase under an Offering if immediately thereafter and after giving effect thereto, the aggregate value or voting power of all shares of stock of the Company and any Subsidiary then owned by such individual, either directly or indirectly, within the meaning of the applicable sections of the Code and including all shares of stock with respect to which such individual holds options, would equal or exceed in the aggregate 5% of the total value or combined voting power of all classes of stock of the Company or any Subsidiary.
4. PARTICIPATION IN THE PLAN.
5. STOCK.
(a) The stock subject to an Offering shall be authorized but unissued shares of Common Stock. Subject to adjustment in accordance with the provisions of paragraph 11(f) hereof, the total number of shares of Common Stock which may be the subject of Offerings under the Plan shall not exceed in the aggregate 5,000,000 shares.
(b) In the event that any shares of Common Stock, which are the subject of an Offering, are not purchased, such unpurchased shares of Common Stock may again be available for subsequent Offerings.
6. NUMBER OF SHARES THAT AN EMPLOYEE MAY PURCHASE.
(a) An eligible Employee may elect to purchase through payroll deductions under an Offering a number of whole shares of Common Stock determined by the Committee from time to time.
(b) The number of whole shares of Common Stock that a participating Employee may purchase on the Expiration Date shall be determined by dividing such Employees contributions accumulated prior to such Expiration Date and retained in such Employees account as of the Expiration Date by the applicable purchase price; provided, however, that such purchase shall be subject to the limitations set forth in this Section 6.
(c) The maximum number of shares that each eligible Employee may purchase under an Offering equals $25,000 divided by the fair market value of the Common Stock on the first day of the Offering.
(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of the Plan, no eligible Employee may elect to purchase under Offerings in any single calendar year a number of whole shares of Common Stock which, together with all other shares in the Company and Subsidiaries which the Employee may be entitled to purchase in such year pursuant to an Offering and under any other employee stock purchase plan, as defined in Section 423 of the Code, has an aggregate fair market value (measured in each case as of the Grant Date) in excess of $25,000.
7. PARTICIPATION.
(a) An eligible Employee may become a participant in the Plan by completing a subscription agreement and any other required documents provided by the Company and submitting them in the form and manner designated by the Company.
(b) Unless otherwise determined by the Company, payroll deductions in respect of an Offering shall commence on the first full payroll period beginning on or after the Grant Date of such Offering and shall end on the last payroll period ending prior to the Expiration Date of such Offering, unless sooner terminated by the participating Employee as provided in Section 10.
8. METHOD OF PAYMENT OF CONTRIBUTIONS.
(a) A participating Employee shall elect to have payroll deductions made on each payday during the Offering in whole percentages from one percent (1%) to, and not exceeding, ten percent (10%) of such participating Employees Compensation during the Offering. All payroll deductions made by a participating
 
3
 
 
 
 
Employee shall be credited to his or her account under the Plan. A participating Employee may not make any additional payments into such account.
(b) A participating Employee may discontinue his or her participation in the Plan as provided in Section 10.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent necessary to comply with Section 423(b)(8) of the Code and Section 6 hereof, the Company may cause a participants payroll deductions to be decreased in respect of an Offering year to zero percent (0%).
  Unless a participating Employee withdraws from the Plan as provided in Section 10, his or her right to purchase whole shares in any Offering will be exercised automatically on each Expiration Date of an Offering, and the maximum number of whole shares subject to the Purchase Right will be purchased at the applicable purchase price with the accumulated contributions in his or her account.
9. EXERCISE OF PURCHASE RIGHTS.
 
10. VOLUNTARY WITHDRAWALS; TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT.
(a) A participating Employee may withdraw all but not less than all the contributions credited to his or her account under the Plan at any time prior to the Expiration Date of an Offering by notifying the Company in the form and manner designated by the Company. All of the participating Employees contributions credited to his or her account will be paid to him or her not later than sixty (60) days after receipt of his or her notice of withdrawal and his or her Purchase Right for the then current Offering will be automatically terminated, and no further contributions for the purchase of Common Stock will be permitted or made during the Offering.
(b) Upon termination of the participating Employees Continuous Status as an Employee prior to the Expiration Date of an Offering for any reason, whether voluntary or involuntary, including retirement or death, the contributions credited to his or her account will be returned to him or her or, in the case of his or her death, to the Employees estate, and his or her Purchase Right will be automatically terminated.
(c) A participating Employees withdrawal from an Offering will not have any effect upon his or her eligibility to participate in a succeeding Offering or in any similar plan that may hereafter be adopted by the Company.
11. TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF OFFERINGS.
(a) General:
The Offerings shall be in such form as the Committee shall from time to time approve, and shall contain such terms and conditions as the Committee shall prescribe not inconsistent with the Plan.
(b) Purchase Price:
The purchase price per share will be established by the Committee for each offering but in no event will the purchase price per share be less than 85% of the lower of the Fair Market Value of a share of Common Stock on the Grant Date and the Expiration Date.
(c) Term of Offerings:
Each Offering shall commence on the Grant Date and terminate, subject to earlier termination by the Committee, on the Expiration Date.
(d) Employees Purchase Directions:
Each Offering shall provide that the participating Employee at the conclusion of the Purchase Period may purchase all of the whole shares purchasable in such Offering with the contributions credited to such Employees account unless such Employee shall, in the manner provided for in the Offering, notify the Company as set forth in Section 10 that the Employee does not desire to purchase any of such shares.
 
4
 
 
 
 
(e) Change-in-Control:
Upon a Change-in-Control, the Expiration Date shall be deemed to have occurred immediately prior to such Change-in-Control and, unless an Employee shall have withdrawn from the Plan as provided in Section 10, all then outstanding Purchase Rights shall be deemed to have been exercised on such Expiration Date as provided in Section 9.
(f) Adjustments:
In the event that the Committee shall determine that any stock dividend, extraordinary cash dividend, recapitalization, reorganization, merger, consolidation, split-up, spin-off, combination, exchange of shares, offering to purchase Common Stock at a price substantially below Fair Market Value, or other similar event affects the Common Stock such that an adjustment is required in order to preserve or prevent an enlargement of the benefits or potential benefits intended to be made available under this Plan, then the Committee shall, in its sole discretion, and in such manner as the Committee may deem equitable, adjust any or all of (1) the number and kind of shares which thereafter may be made the subject of Offerings under the Plan, (2) the number and kind of shares subject to outstanding Offerings and (3) the purchase price with respect to any of the foregoing and/or, if deemed appropriate, make provision for a cash payment to a person who has outstanding Purchase Rights provided, however, that the number of shares subject to any such Purchase Rights shall always be a whole number.
(g) Assignability:
No rights hereunder shall be assignable or transferable.
(h) Employees Agreement:
If, at the time of the purchase of shares which are covered by Purchase Rights under an Offering, in the opinion of counsel for the Company, it is necessary or desirable, in order to comply with any applicable laws or regulations relating to the sale of securities, that the Employee purchasing such shares shall agree that such Employee will purchase such shares for investment and not with any present intention to resell the same, the Employee will, upon the request of the Company, execute and deliver to the Company an agreement to such effect. The Company may also require that a legend setting forth such investment intention be stamped or otherwise written on the certificates for shares purchased pursuant to the Plan.
(i) Rights as a Shareholder:
An Employee who has been granted Purchase Rights hereunder shall have no rights as a shareholder with respect to shares covered by such Purchase Rights until the date of the issuance of the shares to the Employee. No adjustment will be made for dividends or other rights for which the record date is prior to the date of such issuance. For purposes of the Plan, the Company, in lieu of the issuance of certificates, may utilize a book entry account system for recording ownership of shares of Common Stock, subject to the rules generally applicable to such system.
(j) Interest:
No interest shall accrue on payroll deductions made under or pursuant to the Plan or any Offering hereunder.
  No grant of Purchase Rights shall be made after July 1, 2016.
12. TERM OF PLAN.
  The Plan is wholly discretionary in nature. As such, the Board may, in its sole discretion, from time to time alter, amend, suspend, or discontinue the Plan or alter or amend any and all Purchase Rights or terminate any Offering; provided, however, that no such action of the Board may, without the approval of the shareholders, make any amendment for which shareholder approval is necessary to comply with any tax or regulatory requirement with which the Committee has determined it is necessary or advisable to have the Company comply. Subject to the limitations in this Section 13 relating to shareholder approval, the Committee may, in its sole discretion, make such amendment or modification to the Plan or
13. AMENDMENTS.
 
5
 
 
 
 
any Purchase Rights granted hereunder as is necessary or desirable to comply with, or effectuate administration of, the Plan under the laws, rules or regulations of any foreign jurisdiction, the laws of which may be applicable to the Plan or its participants hereunder.
  The proceeds received by the Company from the sale of the Common Stock pursuant to an Offering will be used for general corporate purposes.
14. APPLICATION OF FUNDS.
  The Plan and all Offerings shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania without regard to the choice of law rules thereunder.
15. GOVERNING LAW.
  The terms and conditions of Purchase Rights granted hereunder to, and the purchase of shares of Common Stock by, persons subject to Section 16 of the Exchange Act shall comply with the applicable provisions of Rule 16b-3 thereunder. The Plan shall be deemed to contain, and such Purchase Rights shall contain, and the shares of Common Stock issued upon exercise thereof shall be subject to, such additional conditions and restrictions as may be required by such Rule 16b-3 to qualify for the maximum exemption from such Section 16 with respect to Plan transactions.
16. ADDITIONAL RESTRICTIONS OF
RULE 16b-3.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110727064726.txt.gz
TIME:20110727064726
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02   Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 27, 2011, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended June 30, 2011.  A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01   Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
_________________________________________________________
News Release
 
 
 
YSE: AET) today announced second-quarter 2011 operating earnings of $522.8 million, or $1.35 per share, a per share increase of 29 percent over 2010. The increase in the second quarter operating earnings was largely the result of higher Commercial underwriting margins from improved underlying performance, partially offset by the effect of lower Commercial Insured membership in 2011.  Second-quarter results included favorable prior-period reserve development of $.31 per share, primarily from first quarter 2011 incurred health care costs.  Second-quarter net income per share was $1.39.
HARTFORD, Conn., July 27, 2011
 Aetna (N
(1)
 
For the first half of 2011, operating earnings per share were $2.78, including $.32 per share of favorable prior-years reserve development primarily from 2010 incurred health care costs.  Net income per share was $2.88 for the first half of 2011.
 
 
 
 
Aetna/2
 
 
 
Aetna's second-quarter financial results reflect strong operating fundamentals across the enterprise, said Mark T. Bertolini, chairman, CEO and president. "Three main factors account for our success: disciplined pricing and medical cost management; lower than anticipated utilization of health care services by our members; and strong cash flow generation. The result has been better-than-projected financial results in the first half of 2011.
 
"Our long-term strategy remains focused on delivering profitable growth and consistent performance through a diversified portfolio of businesses.  Our business units are generally performing very well as we acquire new capabilities to enhance our value proposition.  I am pleased with the initial progress of our Accountable Care Solutions model for collaboration with high-quality health systems such as Carilion Clinic, Heartland Health and Emory Healthcare. We believe this new model will help create the transformational change people are looking for in health care, said Bertolini. 
 
Our strong financial position and prudent capital management have allowed us to capitalize on marketplace opportunities," said Joseph M. Zubretsky, senior executive vice president and CFO. "We have deployed capital to fund several strategic acquisitions in recent quarters, as well as share repurchases and an increased dividend.  We believe we can benefit both our customers and shareholders by continuing to invest to strengthen our core business and create new growth opportunities
.
 
"Based on our results and our outlook for the balance of the year, we now project full-year 2011 operating earnings per share of $4.60 to $4.70.
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/3
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
 
 
 
Prior-period reserve development for the second quarter of 2011 relates primarily to first quarter 2011 incurred health care costs.
 
 
 
 
Aetna/4
 
 
Prior-years reserve development was $196.6 million and $150.3 million in the first half of 2011 and 2010, respectively.  2011 prior-years reserve development relates primarily to 2010 incurred health care costs, and 2010 prior-years reserve development relates primarily to 2009 incurred health care costs.
 
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
 
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
  
 
 
 
Aetna/5
Total company results
 
Aetnas conference call to discuss second quarter 2011 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetnas Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetnas Investor Information web site.
 
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 800-753-0420 or 913-312-0687 forinternational callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 1077594. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/6
 
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or 719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 1077594. Telephone replays will be available from 11 a.m. ET on July 27, 2011 until 11 p.m. ET on August 10, 2011.
 
 
About Aetna
 
 
Aetna is one of the nations leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.5 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
 
 
 
 
Aetna/7
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/8
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/9
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/10
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/11
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/12
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/13
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful mparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period.  Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
co
 
The following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and 12 of this press release.
 
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, including any charge relating to our voluntary early retirement program, from net income.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Projected operating earnings per share 2011 reflect approximately 384 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
for the full year
 
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in above.  Refer to the tables on pages 9, 10 and 12 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(3)
(1)
 
The operating expense ratio reflects the inclusion of the Corporate Financing segment in operating expenses and excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any.  For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 10 of this press release.
(4)
 
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetnas profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetnas pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetnas performance, including performance versus competitors.
(5)
 
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes.  Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(6)
 
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses.
(7)
 
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetnas Commercial medical membership.
(8)
 
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetnas dental provider network for a nominal fee.
(9)
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna/14
 
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, the impact of our Accountable Care Solutions model and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetnas future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios.  Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next seven years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform.  Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges and the implementation of medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law.  As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years.  Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform, changes in health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group and other businesses we acquire) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC) and Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011 (Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q), when filed with the SEC.  You also should read Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110802135049.txt.gz
TIME:20110802135049
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Explanatory Note
Aetna Inc. (Aetna) hereby amends its Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 23, 2011 in this Current Report on Form 8-K/A to disclose Aetnas Board of Directors (the Board) determination with respect to the frequency of future shareholder non-binding advisory votes on the compensation of Aetnas named executive officers.  No other changes have been made to the Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 23, 2011.
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.07   Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
Aetnas Board has considered the shareholder vote regarding the frequency of future shareholder advisory votes on the compensation of Aetnas named executive officers and, at a meeting of the Board of Directors on July 29, 2011, adopted the shareholders recommendation of an annual advisory vote on the compensation of Aetna's named executive officers until the next shareholder vote on this matter, which will occur no later than Aetnas Annual Meeting of shareholders in 2017, or until the Board of Directors otherwise determines that a different frequency for such advisory vote would be in the best interests of Aetnas shareholders.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110802135703.txt.gz
TIME:20110802135703
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.02   Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On July 29, 2011, the Aetna Inc. (Aetna) Board of Directors (the Board) appointed Fernando Aguirre a Director of Aetna effective immediately.  Mr. Aguirres term will run until Aetnas 2012 Annual Meeting of Shareholders.  Mr. Aguirre, 53, is Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Chiquita Brands International, Inc.  With the appointment of Mr. Aguirre, Aetnas Board consists of thirteen directors.
Mr. Aguirre was also appointed to the Boards Audit Committee and Medical Affairs Committee.
The Board affirmatively determined in its business judgment that Mr. Aguirre is independent as defined in the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) listing standards and under Aetnas Director Independence Standards and that any relationship with Aetna or its subsidiaries (either directly or as a partner, shareholder or officer of any organization that has a relationship with Aetna or its subsidiaries) is immaterial under the independence test thresholds contained in the NYSE listing standards and under Aetnas Director Independence Standards.  In addition, the Board determined in its business judgment that Mr. Aguirre meets the independence, financial literacy and expertise requirements for audit committee members set forth in the NYSE listing standards and that, based on his background and experience, Mr. Aguirre has the requisite attributes of an audit committee financial expert as defined by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
Aetna will compensate Mr. Aguirre in the manner and amounts and pursuant to the plans applicable to all Aetna Directors as described in the 2011 Aetna Inc.  Notice of Annual Meeting and Proxy Statement, including fees related to service on Board committees.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20110913080125.txt.gz
TIME:20110913080125
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
During the remainder of September 2011, Aetna Inc. (Aetna or we) expects to participate in presentations and meetings with investors and analysts, including a presentation by Joseph M. Zubretsky, Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna, at the Morgan Stanley Global Healthcare Conference (the Conference) in New York, New York that is scheduled for September 13, 2011. During the presentation and these meetings, Aetna intends to disclose that:
Additionally, during the presentation and these meetings, Aetna expects to discuss the following challenges and opportunities that Aetna projects for 2012. Aetna's projected 2012 challenges include:
Aetna's projected 2012 opportunities include:
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 8:35 a.m. Eastern time on September 13, 2011. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 days.
(1)
Projected operating earnings per share for full-year 2011 assumes approximately 384 million weighted average diluted shares. Projected operating earnings per share exclude net realized capital gains of $39.7 million reported by Aetna in the six months ended June 30, 2011. Projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any net realized capital gains or losses, the one-time charge associated with Aetna's pending Voluntary Early Retirement Program and additional other items, if any, occurring after June 30, 2011.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. Net realized capital gains and losses and the Voluntary Early Retirement Program charge do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION - Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to our full-year 2011 reported operating earnings per share and our challenges and opportunities for 2012. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next seven years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges and the implementation of medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform, changes in health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group and other businesses we acquire) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011 (Aetna's Second Quarter 10-Q), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's Second Quarter 10-Q for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20111027063623.txt.gz
TIME:20111027063623
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 27, 2011, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended September 30, 2011. A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA REPORTS
THIRD
-QUARTER 2011 RESULTS
HARTFORD, Conn., 
October 27, 2011
- Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced
third
-quarter 2011 operating earnings
(1)
of
$528.4 million
, or
$1.40
per share, a per share increase of
40 percent
over 2010. The increase in third quarter operating earnings was largely the result of strong performance across all product lines from lower than projected utilization and disciplined execution of our pricing and medical cost management strategies, partially offset by the effect of lower commercial insured membership in 2011.
Third
-quarter operating earnings included favorable prior-period reserve development of approximately
$117 million
, after tax. The significant majority of this development is a result of current year performance, mainly attributable to second quarter 2011 incurred health care costs.
Third
-quarter net income per share, which includes a one-time
$.24
per share charge associated with the previously announced voluntary early retirement program, was
$1.30
, a per share increase of
9 percent
over 2010.
Aetna/ 2
For the
nine
months ended September 30, 2011, operating earnings per share and net income per share were both
$4.19
. Operating earnings per share for the
nine
months ended
September 30, 2011
includes
$.37
per share of favorable prior-year reserve development substantially from 2010 incurred health care costs.
These results are a continuation of our strong operating performance in the first and second quarters, driven largely by lower-than-projected utilization, our pricing discipline and our medical cost management strategies, said Mark T. Bertolini, Aetna chairman, CEO and president. In our core health operations, we're excited about the prospects for our Medicare business, which posted another strong quarter. Aetna Medicare will gain even more momentum with the completion of the Genworth Medicare Supplement acquisition and our recent launch of a co-branded CVS Part D plan.
In our emerging businesses, we are advancing new models of payment reform in our relationships with providers as part of our strategy to create shareholder value by leveraging new capabilities and technology assets to strengthen our core health business. Building on our success with the provider systems we have mentioned previously, our Accountable Care Solutions business has a strong pipeline of new opportunities. We are excited about working with providers to offer a variety of low-cost local-market options, including narrow networks. Provider collaboration is key to our strategy for addressing the new health-care marketplace in 2014 and beyond, said Bertolini.
Aetna/ 3
Our strong performance and excellent capital position allow Aetna to continue to invest in our future and ensure that we serve the needs of our customers through advanced technologies, products and services, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, Aetna senior executive vice president and CFO. Through October, we have deployed approximately $1.6 billion in capital for acquisitions that strategically strengthen Aetna across the enterprise. The PayFlex and Medicare Supplement acquisitions will enhance our core capabilities, while the purchase earlier in the year of Medicity already has helped to fuel our growth in the accountable-care space. At the same time, we have deployed $1.2 billion through September 30 to repurchase 31 million of our shares.
With the favorable performance in the first nine months, we are increasing our full-year 2011 operating earnings projection to $5.00 per share. Our initial projection is that we will be able to generate full-year 2012 operating earnings of at least $4.80 per share.
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
Aetna/ 4
Favorable prior-year reserve development was
$218 million
and $142 million for the
nine
months ended
September 30, 2011
and 2010, respectively.
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Aetna/ 5
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
Total company results
Aetna/ 6
Aetna's conference call to discuss
third
quarter 2011 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetna's Investor Information web site.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 888-401-4685 or +1-719-457-2710 for
international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 7249513. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or +1-719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 7249513. Telephone replays will be available from 11 a.m. ET on October 27, 2011 until 11 p.m. ET on November 10, 2011.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
Aetna/ 7
Aetna/ 8
Aetna/ 9
Aetna/ 10
Aetna/ 11
Aetna/ 12
Aetna/ 13
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
The following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and 12 of this press release.
(2)
Projected operating earnings per share exclude any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, from net income. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2011 reflect approximately 381 million weighted average diluted shares.
(3)
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in
(1)
above. Refer to the tables on pages 9, 10 and 12 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(4)
The operating expense ratio reflects the inclusion of the Corporate Financing segment in operating expenses and excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any. For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 10 of this press release.
(5)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetna's profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetna's pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetna's performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes. Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses.
(8)
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetna's Commercial medical membership.
(9)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetna's dental provider network for a nominal fee.
Aetna/ 14
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, the future performance of Aetna Medicare, the impact of certain acquisitions on our core capabilities and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next seven years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges and the implementation of medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform, changes in health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011, each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC), and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2011
(Aetna's 
Third
Quarter 10-Q), when filed with the SEC. You also should read Aetna's
Third
Quarter 10-Q when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20111214161725.txt.gz
TIME:20111214161725
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On December 15, 2011, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) will hold an investor conference (the Conference) at The Pierre in New York City. During the conference, Aetna executives will discuss the company's strategy, performance and outlook, including reviewing business trends and specific initiatives related to its various business units. In addition, at the Conference Aetna management intends to disclose, among other things, that:
The Conference is scheduled to begin at 8:45 a.m. Eastern time on December 15, 2011. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation and to access the slides for the presentations via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 days. Website addresses are included for reference only. The information contained on Aetna's website is not part of this Form 8-K and is not incorporated by reference into this Form 8-K.
(1)
Projected operating earnings per share for full-year 2011 and 2012 assume approximately 380.5 million and 353.0 million weighted average diluted shares, respectively. Projected operating earnings per share exclude the one-time charge associated with Aetna's voluntary early retirement program of $89.1 million and net realized capital gains of $90.8 million reported by Aetna in the nine months ended September 30, 2011. Projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any net realized capital gains or losses and additional other items, if any, occurring after September 30, 2011.  Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period.  Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. Net realized capital gains and losses and the voluntary early retirement program charge do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION - Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to our medical membership, our full-year 2011 and full-year 2012 operating earnings per share and our weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next seven years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges and the implementation of medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform, changes in health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other means; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K, Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011 and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2011 (Aetna's Third Quarter 10-Q), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's Third Quarter 10-Q for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120109161923.txt.gz
TIME:20120109161923
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On January 9, 2012 and January 10, 2012, Mark T. Bertolini, Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President of Aetna Inc. (Aetna) will meet with investors and analysts before and after a presentation he will provide at the 2012 J.P. Morgan HealthCare Conference (the Conference) on January 10, 2012. During these meetings and presentation, Aetna intends to reaffirm its previously disclosed projected full-year 2011 operating earnings of $5.15 per share
(1)
, including approximately $0.37 per share in prior-year development. Additionally, during these meetings and presentation, Aetna expects to reaffirm the following previously disclosed projections:
 
 
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 1:00 p.m. Eastern time (10:00 a.m. Pacific time). Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available on that web site, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 days.
(1)
Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude net realized capital gains of $90.8 million ($139.7 million pretax) reported by Aetna for the nine months ended September 30, 2011, and the one-time charge of $89.1 million ($137.0 million pretax) that Aetna recorded in the three and nine months ended September 30, 2011 relating to the voluntary early retirement program announced in July 2011. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share also exclude any net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, since September 30, 2011, from net income. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings and operating earnings per share are also the measures reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2011 reflect approximately 380.5 million weighted average diluted shares.
 
(2)
Projected revenue excludes net realized capital gains of $139.7 million reported by Aetna for the nine months ended September 30, 2011. Projected revenue also excludes any net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, since September 30, 2011 from total revenue. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses, and therefore cannot reconcile projected revenue to projected total revenue in any period.
 
(3)
Projected excess cash flow available to the parent after payment of estimated fixed charges, shareholder dividends, issuance and/or maturity of debt, and inclusive of estimated available cash from employee stock programs.
The paragraph entitled CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION in Item 7.01 of this current report, below, is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 2.02.  
The information in this Item 2.02 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
The information above in Item 2.02 of this current report, other than the information as to Aetna's projected 2011 results of operations and financial condition, is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 7.01.  In addition, during the meetings and presentation referenced in Item 2.02, Aetna expects to reaffirm the following previously disclosed projections:
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION - Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to our operating earnings per share, revenue, operating earnings, net subsidiary dividends, excess cash flow, medical membership (including Medicare membership and its components), our weighted average diluted shares and prior-year reserve development. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges and the implementation of medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform, changes in health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of the H1N1 or other flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in
medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from data security breaches or other causes; the ability to improve relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K, Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011 and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2011 (Aetna's Third Quarter 10-Q), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Third Quarter 10-Q for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120201063213.txt.gz
TIME:20120201063213
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 1, 2012, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2011. A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA REPORTS
FOURTH
-QUARTER AND
FULL-YEAR
2011 RESULTS
HARTFORD, Conn., 
February 1, 2012
- Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced
fourth
-quarter 2011 operating earnings
(1)
of $
354.3 million
, or $
.97
per share, a per share increase of
54 percent
over 2010.
Full-year
2011 operating earnings
(1)
were $
1.97 billion
, or $
5.17
per share, a per share increase of
40 percent
over 2010. The increases in both the
fourth
quarter and full year 2011 operating earnings were largely the result of strong performance across all product lines. Fourth-quarter 2011 operating earnings included favorable prior-period reserve development of approximately $63 million after tax. Net income for the
fourth
quarter was
$372.6 million
, or
$1.02
per share, including $
.05
per share of net realized capital gains.
Full-year
net income was
$1.99 billion
, or
$5.22
per share, a per share increase of
25 percent
over 2010.
Aetna/
2
Our excellent operating performance caps off a strong year for Aetna, our customers and our shareholders, said Mark T. Bertolini, Aetna chairman, CEO and president. During 2011, we made strategic investments in acquisitions and technologies that created a unique set of capabilities to both extend Aetna's core health business and poise us to capitalize on exciting new consumer and provider opportunities emerging in the marketplace.
Our goal is to evolve to a more consumer-centric company that provides health solutions to help people live healthier lives. We are combining our innovative health benefits, cutting-edge technologies and collaborative provider relationships to create a health system that is higher quality, more connected, convenient and cost-effective. Aetna's Accountable Care Solutions (ACS) business is using our new capabilities to bring providers and patients closer together, with our latest community launches in St. Joseph, Missouri; Phoenix; and San Diego. Our most recent win is with the State of Maine, where we have been awarded both an administrative services contract covering the State's 33,000 employees and their families and a contract to develop ACO models across the State. This success underscores the strength of our core business and how our ACS investments are enhancing that core, said Bertolini.
Aetna/
3
In the fourth quarter and throughout the year, Aetna's commercial underwriting performance benefited from low medical utilization, our pricing discipline, our medical cost management strategies and our unit cost controls," said Joseph M. Zubretsky, Aetna senior executive vice president and CFO. Aetna's strong operating results and significant capital generation allow us to continue investing for the future.
In 2012 we are again looking for ways to enhance shareholder value through effective capital deployment. We recently closed the Vitality Re III reinsurance transaction for catastrophe risk protection, which frees up capital that can be used in an accretive manner. With this transaction and our substantial operating cash flows, we now expect to have $1.35 billion of deployable capital for 2012, said Zubretsky.
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
Aetna/
4
Full-year
2011 operating earnings for Health Care were
$1.96 billion
, compared with
$1.65 billion
in 2010. The increase in operating earnings was largely the result of strong performance across all product lines, a continued result of low medical utilization, disciplined execution of our pricing and medical cost management strategies and unit cost controls. Our underwriting margins in 2011 and 2010 included $207 million before tax and $118 million before tax of favorable prior-years reserve development, respectively.
Full-year
2011 net income was
$1.95 billion
, compared to
$1.81 billion
in 2010. Full-year 2011 Commercial MBR was 77.9 percent, compared to 80.6 percent for 2010.
Aetna/
5
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Full-year
2011 operating earnings for Group Insurance were
$153.0 million
, compared with
$128.0 million
in 2010. The increase was primarily due to higher underwriting margins on our life and disability products partially offset by lower underwriting margins on our long-term care products.
Full-year
2011 net income was
$181.8 million
, compared to
$179.6 million
in 2010.
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
Full-year
2011 operating earnings for Large Case Pensions were
$20.7 million
, compared with
$27.8 million
for 2010. The decrease is consistent with the run-off nature of this segment.
Full-year
2011 net income was
$21.8 million
, compared to
$29.0 million
for 2010.
Total company results
Aetna/
6
For
full-year
2011, the operating expense ratio
(4)
increased to
19.8 percent
from
19.3 percent
in 2010 primarily reflecting the addition of fee-based businesses with operating expenses higher than the company average. Including net realized capital gains and other items, these ratios were
20.1 percent
and
19.0 percent
for the full years 2011 and 2010, respectively.
Aetna/
7
Aetna's conference call to discuss
fourth
-quarter 2011 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetna's Investor Information website.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 888-503-8171 or +1-719-457-2713 for
international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 4812761. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or +1-719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 4812761. Telephone replays will be available from 11 a.m. ET on February 1, 2012, until 11 p.m. ET on February 14, 2012.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.4 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities and health care management services for Medicaid plans. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, providers, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
Aetna/
8
Aetna/
9
Aetna/
10
Aetna/
11
Aetna/
12
Aetna/
13
Aetna/
14
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
The following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 9 through 11 and 13 of this press release.
(2)
Projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses or any such other items and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2012 reflect approximately 353 million weighted average diluted shares.
(3)
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in
(1)
above. Refer to the tables on pages 10, 11 and 13 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(4)
The operating expense ratio reflects the inclusion of the Corporate Financing segment in operating expenses and excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any. For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 11 of this press release.
(5)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetna's profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetna's pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetna's performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes. Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses.
(8)
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetna's Commercial medical membership.
(9)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetna's dental provider network for a nominal fee.
Aetna/
15
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, deployable capital and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges and the implementation of medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of or rate of increase in the unemployment rate); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform, changes in health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K and Aetna's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended June 30, 2011 and September 30, 2011 (Aetna's "Quarterly Reports"), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC). You also should read Aetna's 2010 Annual Report and Aetna's 2011 Quarterly Reports on file with the SEC and Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120228162839.txt.gz
TIME:20120228162839
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 5 - Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.03 Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
On February 24, 2012, the Aetna Inc. (the "Company") Board of Directors (the "Board") amended Section 2.06 of the Company's Amended and Restated By-Laws (the "By-Laws") to permit the Lead Director to call special meetings of the Board.  A copy of the By-Laws as amended is filed as Exhibit 3.1 hereto and incorporated herein by reference.   
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

Effective February 24, 2012
AMENDED AND RESTATED
BY-LAWS
of
AETNA INC.
(a Pennsylvania business corporation)
Article 1. MEETINGS OF SHAREHOLDERS
Section 1.01.
Place of Meetings
. Meetings of shareholders of the Corporation shall be held at such place, within the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or elsewhere, as may be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors. If no place is so fixed for a meeting, it shall be held at the Corporation's then principal executive office.
Section 1.02.
Annual Meeting
.
(a)
    
General Rule
. There shall be an annual meeting of shareholders, held at such time as the Board of Directors shall prescribe, at which the shareholders shall elect such number of members of the Board of Directors as are to be elected at that meeting in accordance with the Corporation's articles of incorporation, and transact only such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
(b)
    
Business to be Conducted
. To be properly brought before an annual meeting, business must be (i) specified in the notice of meeting, (ii) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or the Chairman, or (iii) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by a shareholder.
(c)
    
Shareholder Proposals
. For business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a shareholder pursuant to clause (iii) of Section 1.02(b), the business must be lawful and appropriate for consideration at the meeting, and the shareholder must have given written notice of such shareholder's intent to present the business, either by personal delivery or by United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Corporate Secretary not later than 90 calendar days prior to the date such annual meeting is to be held; provided, however, that notice by a shareholder shall be timely in any event if received not later than the close of business on the 10
th
calendar day following the day on which public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made. A shareholder's notice shall include as to each matter the shareholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting the business at the annual meeting, (ii) the name
and address of the shareholder, (iii) evidence of the class and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation that are beneficially owned by the shareholder and (iv) any material interest of the shareholder in such business.
1
(d)
    
Determination of Propriety of Business
. Notwithstanding anything in these by-laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at an annual meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 1.02. The chairman of the annual meeting shall determine whether each item of business has been properly brought before the annual meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 1.02, and whether each item of business is lawful and appropriate for consideration by shareholders at the annual meeting. If the chairman of the annual meeting shall determine that an item of business has not been properly brought before the annual meeting or is not lawful and appropriate for consideration at the annual meeting, the chairman shall so declare to the annual meeting, and any such business shall not be transacted at the annual meeting.
Section 1.03.
Nominations of Directors
.
(a)
    
General Rule
. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors of the Corporation may be made by the Board of Directors or by any shareholder entitled to vote for the election of Directors that complies with the provisions of Section 1.03(b).
(b)
    
Shareholder Nominations
. Any shareholder entitled to vote for the election of Directors at an annual or special meeting at which one or more Directors are to be elected may nominate persons for election as Directors only if written notice of such shareholder's intent to make such nomination is given, either by personal delivery or by United States mail, postage prepaid, to the Corporate Secretary not later than 90 calendar days prior to the date such meeting is to be held; provided, however, that notice by the shareholder shall be timely in any event if received not later than the close of business on the 10
th
calendar day following the day on which public disclosure of the date of such meeting was made. A shareholder's notice shall include: (i) as to each person whom the shareholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a Director, (A) the name, age, business address and residence address of the person, (B) the principal occupation or employment of the person, (C) the class and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation that are beneficially owned by the person and (D) any other information relating to the person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for election of Directors, or is otherwise required, in each case pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (including without limitation the person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a Director if elected); and (ii) as to the shareholder giving the notice, (A) the name and address of the shareholder and (B) evidence of the class and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation that are beneficially owned by the shareholder.
(c)
    
Determination of Propriety of Nominations
. The chairman of the meeting shall determine whether a nomination of a person for election as a Director by a shareholder has been properly made in accordance with the procedures prescribed in this Section 1.03. If the chairman of the meeting shall determine that such a nomination has not been properly made, the chairman of the meeting shall so declare to the meeting, and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
2
Section 1.04.
Special Meetings
.
(a)
    
General Rule
. Special meetings of shareholders may be called (i) by the shareholders to the extent permitted by the Corporation's articles of incorporation or (ii) at any time by the Board of Directors, the Chairman or the President of the Corporation. Each special meeting of shareholders shall be held at such place, within the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or elsewhere, as may be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors. If no place is so fixed for a special meeting of shareholders, it shall be held at the Corporation's then principal executive office. The only business to be conducted at a special meeting of shareholders shall be that set forth in the notice of such meeting.
(b)
    
Shareholder Petition
.
Shareholders entitled to cast the number of votes specified in the Corporation's articles of incorporation may call a special meeting of shareholders by delivery, either by personal delivery or by United States mail, postage pre-paid, to the Corporate Secretary of a written petition signed by each of such shareholders that includes (i) a brief description of the business to be conducted at a special meeting and the reasons for conducting the business at a special meeting; (ii) the name and address of each shareholder who has signed the petition; (iii) evidence of the class and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation that are beneficially owned by each shareholder who has signed the petition; and (iv) any material interest of any shareholder who has signed the petition in the business described in the petition. It shall be the duty of the Corporate Secretary to fix the date and time of any shareholder-called special meeting, which shall be held not more than 120 days after the Corporate Secretary's receipt of a petition that complies with this Section 1.04(b).
(c)
    
Shareholder Proposals
. The business to be conducted at a special meeting must be lawful and appropriate for consideration at the meeting and must be (i) set forth in the notice of special meeting at the direction of the Board of Directors or (ii) specified in a petition that complies with Section 1.04(b).
(d)
    
Determination of Propriety of Business
. Notwithstanding anything in these by-laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at a special meeting except in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 1.04. The chairman of each special meeting shall determine whether each item of business satisfies the requirements of Section 1.04(c). If the chairman of a special meeting shall determine that an item of business does not satisfy the requirements of Section 1.04(c), the chairman shall so declare to the special meeting, and any such business shall not be transacted at the special meeting.
Section 1.05.
Notice of Meetings
. Except as otherwise provided in Section 1707 of the Pennsylvania Business Corporation Law of 1988, as amended, notice of every meeting of shareholders shall be given in any manner permitted by law by or at the direction of the Corporate Secretary or such other person as is authorized by the Board of Directors to each shareholder of record entitled to receipt thereof, at least 10 calendar days prior to the day named for the meeting, unless a greater period of notice is required by law in a particular case.
3
Section 1.06.
Organization
. At every meeting of the shareholders, the Chairman, or in the absence of the Chairman, a person chosen by the Board of Directors, shall act as chairman of the meeting; and the Corporate Secretary, or in the absence of the Corporate Secretary, a person appointed by the chairman of the meeting, shall act as secretary of the meeting. The order of and the rules for conducting business at all meetings of the shareholders shall be determined by the chairman of the meeting.
Section 1.07.
Voting
. Except as otherwise specified herein or in the Corporation's articles of incorporation or required by law, whenever any corporate action is to be taken by vote of shareholders, it shall be authorized by a majority of the votes cast by all shareholders entitled to vote thereon and, if any shareholders are entitled to vote thereon as a class, upon receiving a majority of the votes cast by the shareholders entitled to vote as a class.
Article 2. DIRECTORS
Section 2.01.
Number
. The number of Directors of the Corporation shall be not less than three nor more than twenty-one, and shall be designated from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5.02, the Board of Directors shall not have the right to amend or repeal this Section 2.01, or adopt a new by-law, if such amendment, repeal or adoption would alter the minimum or maximum number of Directors specified in the preceding sentence.
Section 2.02.
Vacancies
. Vacancies on the Board of Directors may be filled at any time by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Directors then in office, though less than a quorum, except as otherwise provided in the Corporation's articles of incorporation with respect to the rights of the holders of any series or class of shares to elect Directors under specified circumstances. Directors may be elected by the shareholders to fill a vacancy, regardless of how the vacancy has been created, only if and when authorized by a resolution of the Board of Directors.
Section 2.03.
Resignations
. Any Director may resign at any time by giving written notice to the Board of Directors, the Chairman, the President or the Corporate Secretary. The resignation shall be effective upon receipt thereof or at such subsequent time as may be specified in the notice of resignation. Unless otherwise specified in the applicable notice of resignation, the acceptance of a resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
Section 2.04.
Annual Meeting of the Board
. Immediately after each annual election of Directors, the Board of Directors shall meet for the purpose of organization, election of officers, and the transaction of other business. Notice of the annual meeting need not be given. In the absence of a quorum at such time, the annual meeting may be held at any other time and place specified in a notice given as provided in Section 2.06 for special meetings of the Board of Directors.
4
Section 2.05.
Regular Meetings of the Board
. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at such time and place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors. Notice of regular meetings need not be given. At any regular meeting the Board of Directors may transact such business as may be brought before the meeting.
Section 2.06.
Special Meetings of the Board
. Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by the Chairman, the President, the Lead Director or not less than one-third of the Directors then in office, and shall be held at such time and place as may be designated in the notice of the meeting. Notice to each Director of each special meeting of the Board shall be given by or at the direction of the person or persons calling the meeting no later than the calendar day before the day of the meeting.
Section 2.07.
Compensation
. The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of Directors for their services as Directors, and a Director may be a salaried officer of the Corporation.
Article 3.
COMMITTEES
Section 3.01.
Establishment and Authority
. The Board of Directors may establish, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Directors then in office, one or more committees to consist of one or more Directors of the Corporation. Any committee, to the extent provided by the Board of Directors, shall have and may exercise all of the powers and authority of the Board of Directors except that any committee other than the Executive Committee shall not have any power or authority as to the following: (i) the submission to shareholders of any action requiring approval of shareholders under the Pennsylvania Business Corporation Law of 1988, as amended; (ii) the creation or filling of vacancies in the Board of Directors; (iii) the adoption, amendment or repeal of these by-laws; (iv) the amendment or repeal of any resolution of the Board of Directors that by its terms is amendable or repealable only by the Board of Directors; or (v) action on matters committed by these by-laws or resolution of the Board of Directors exclusively to another committee of the Board of Directors.
Section 3.02.
Organization
. The Board of Directors may designate, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Directors then in office, any member of a committee as chair of that committee, may appoint any officer of the Corporation (or his or her designate) as secretary of that committee and may designate or provide for the designation of one or more Directors as alternate members of that committee who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of that committee upon such notice and in such manner as may be provided in the vote designating the applicable alternate members. Each committee shall meet at the call of its chair, the Chairman, the President, the Corporate Secretary or any two members of the committee. The presence of a majority of the members of a committee shall be necessary to constitute a quorum. Regular minutes of the proceedings of each committee shall be reported to the Board. The members of each committee shall continue in office for such term as may be provided in the vote designating them as members (which term shall not exceed their respective terms of office as Directors) and until their successors are duly designated, unless sooner discharged.
5
Article 4.
OFFICERS
Section 4.01.
Election or Appointment
. The officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairman, elected by the Board of Directors from their own number, a President, a Corporate Secretary and a Treasurer appointed by the Board. The Board may also appoint one or more Vice Chairmen, Executive Vice Presidents and Senior Vice Presidents. The Board shall fix, or authorize any officer or officers to fix, the compensation of any such officer. In addition, the Board may appoint, and fix the compensation of, and may authorize any officer or officers to appoint, and to fix the compensation of, such additional officers as the Board or such authorized officer or officers deem necessary for the proper conduct of the business of the Corporation.
Section 4.02.
Resignations
. Any officer may resign at any time by giving written notice to the Board of Directors, the Chairman, the President or the Corporate Secretary. The resignation shall be effective upon receipt thereof or at such subsequent time as may be specified in the notice of resignation. Unless otherwise specified in the applicable notice of resignation, the acceptance of a resignation shall not be necessary to make it effective.
Section 4.03.
Chairman
. The Chairman shall be the chief executive officer of the Corporation unless the Board vests that position in another officer. The chief executive officer shall be responsible, under the direction of the Board, for the general supervision, management and control of the affairs and property of the Corporation. The Chairman shall serve as an ex-officio member of all committees appointed by the Board except as may be otherwise provided in these by-laws or in the resolution establishing a committee. The Chairman shall preside at all meetings of the shareholders, the Board and all committees appointed by the Board of which the Chairman is a member, except as may otherwise be provided in the resolution establishing a committee. The Chairman, and the chief executive officer if they are not the same person, shall have such other authority and responsibility and perform such other duties as may from time to time be delegated by the Board.
Section 4.04.
Authority of Officers
. Officers shall be subject to the direction of, and shall have the authority and perform such duties as may be assigned from time to time by, the Board of Directors or the chief executive officer.
Article 5.
MISCELLANEOUS
Section 5.01.
Use of Conference Telephone Equipment
. Unless the Board of Directors determines otherwise in a particular case, one or more persons may participate in any meeting of the Board of Directors by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other; however, the use of such equipment is not a matter of right for any person. A person may participate in a meeting of the shareholders by means of such equipment only as authorized by the Board of Directors in a particular case. Authorized participation in a meeting by means of such equipment shall constitute presence in person at the meeting.
6
Section 5.02.
Amendments
. These by-laws may be amended or repealed, or new by-laws may be adopted, either (i) by an affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of shares entitled to vote thereon, voting as a single class, at a meeting of the shareholders in the call for which written notice of the proposed action shall have been given, or (ii) with respect to those matters that are not by statute committed exclusively to the shareholders and regardless of whether the shareholders have previously adopted or approved the by-law being amended or repealed, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Directors then in office, upon written notice to each Director of the action proposed to be taken. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, Sections 1.02, 1.03, 1.04, 2.01, 2.02 and 2.06 and this Section 5.02 may be amended or repealed or a new by-law adopted that is inconsistent with any of those sections by vote of the shareholders only if the amendment, repeal or adoption of a new by-law is approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the votes that all voting shareholders, voting as a single class, are entitled to cast thereon, at a meeting of the shareholders in the call for which written notice of the proposed action shall have been given. Any change in these by-laws shall take effect when adopted unless otherwise provided in the resolution effecting the change. No provision of these by-laws shall vest any property right in any shareholder as such.
7


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120312165026.txt.gz
TIME:20120312165026
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
During the remainder of March 2012, Aetna Inc. (Aetna or we) expects to participate in presentations and meetings with investors and analysts, including a presentation by Joseph M. Zubretsky, Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna, at the Barclays Capital 2012 Global Healthcare Conference (the Conference) in Miami, Florida that is scheduled for March 13, 2012. During the presentation and these meetings, Aetna intends to disclose that, based on actual results and performance in January and February of 2012:
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 9:00 a.m. Eastern time on March 13, 2012. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 days.
(1)
Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items, and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share or projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2012 reflect approximately 353.0 million weighted average diluted shares.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION - Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, operating earnings, weighted average diluted shares, reserves, medical cost trends, and our estimates and views regarding our business and the environment in which we operate our business. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, premium rate review, the scope of essential health benefits, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including the CMS risk adjustment audits of certain of our Medicare contracts, guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120328160934.txt.gz
TIME:20120328160934
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 1 - Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On March 27, 2012, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) entered into an unsecured $1.5 billion, five-year revolving credit agreement (the New Credit Agreement) with JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (JPMCB), as administrative agent, and the 20 lender parties thereto led by JPMCB, Bank of America, N.A., and Citibank N.A. The New Credit Agreement replaces Aetna's $1.5 billion five-year revolving credit agreement, dated as of March 27, 2008, among Aetna, JPMCB, as administrative agent, and the 21 lender parties thereto (the Prior Credit Agreement). The Prior Credit Agreement was Exhibit 99.1 to Aetna's Form 8-K filed on April 1, 2008 and was scheduled to expire on March 27, 2013. The Prior Credit Agreement was terminated on March 27, 2012.
The New Credit Agreement is summarized in Item 2.03 of this report, which is incorporated by reference into this Item 1.01.
The administrative agent and certain of the lender parties to the New Credit Agreement perform normal banking, investment banking and/or advisory services for Aetna and its affiliates from time to time for which they have received customary fees and expenses.
A copy of the New Credit Agreement is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference.
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
Aetna entered into the New Credit Agreement on March 27, 2012. The New Credit Agreement provides for the granting of revolving loans and the issuance of letters of credit at Aetna's request, up to a maximum aggregate amount outstanding of $1.5 billion. Aetna has the option to expand the lenders' aggregate commitments under the New Credit Agreement to a maximum of $2.0 billion, subject to certain conditions precedent. The maximum aggregate amount of outstanding letters of credit under the New Credit Agreement is limited to $200 million. Outstanding letters of credit count as usage of the available commitments under the New Credit Agreement.
The New Credit Agreement expires March 27, 2017; however that expiration date may be extended by one year on each March 27 for the commitments under the New Credit Agreement represented by lenders consenting to such extension, subject to certain conditions precedent. Various interest rate options are available under the New Credit Agreement. Any revolving borrowings mature on the termination date of the New Credit Agreement. Aetna pays facility fees on the lenders' aggregate commitments under the facility ranging from 0.070% to 0.150% per annum, depending on Aetna's long-term senior unsecured debt rating. The facility fee at March 27, 2012 is at an annual rate of 0.100%.
The New Credit Agreement contains customary representations, warranties and covenants, including a financial covenant, for a transaction of this type. Under the terms of the New Credit Agreement, Aetna is required to maintain its ratio of total debt to adjusted consolidated capitalization as of the end of each fiscal quarter ending after March 27, 2012 at or below 0.50 to 1.00. For this purpose, adjusted consolidated capitalization means the sum of Aetna's consolidated shareholders' equity, excluding any adjustment recorded to reflect the overfunded or underfunded status of Aetna's defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans in accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board Accounting Standards Codification 715 -
Compensation - Retirement Benefits,
and any net unrealized capital gains and losses, plus total debt.
The New Credit Agreement also contains customary events of default, including a cross default provision and a change of control provision. If an event of default occurs that is not otherwise waived or cured, lenders holding a specified percentage of the commitments or outstanding loans may terminate the obligations of the lenders to make loans under the New Credit Agreement and the obligations of the issuing banks to issue letters of credit and/or may declare the loans outstanding under the New Credit Agreement to be due and payable. Such termination and acceleration will occur automatically in the event of a bankruptcy default.
The foregoing summary of the New Credit Agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the New Credit Agreement, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this report and is incorporated herein by reference. You are encouraged to read the New Credit Agreement.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
    
99.1     $1,500,000,000 Five-Year Credit Agreement Dated as of March 27, 2012.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

EXECUTION VERSION
$1,500,000,000
FIVE-YEAR CREDIT AGREEMENT
Dated as of March 27, 2012
among
AETNA INC.,
as Borrower,
The Lenders Listed Herein,
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent,
BANK OF AMERICA, N.A. and
CITIBANK, N.A.,
as Co-Syndication Agents
and
WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION and
U.S. BANK, N.A.
as Documentation Agents
______________________________
J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES INC.,
CITIGROUP GLOBAL MARKETS INC.
and
MERILL LYNCH, PIERCE, FENNER AND SMITH INCORPORATED
as Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Bookrunners
    
i
TABLE OF CONTENTS *
Page
ARTICLE I
Definitions
ARTICLE II
The Credits
ARTICLE III
Conditions
* The table of Contents is not a part of the Agreement.
ii
ARTICLE IV
Representations and Warranties
ARTICLE V
Covenants
ARTICLE VI
Defaults
ARTICLE VII
The Agent
iii
ARTICLE VIII
Change in Circumstances
ARTICLE IX
Miscellaneous
iv
Schedules and Exhibits
1
FIVE-YEAR CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of March 27, 2012, among AETNA INC., the LENDERS listed on the signature pages hereof or from time to time party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as administrative agent.
The Borrower (such term and each other capitalized term used and not otherwise defined herein having the meaning assigned to it in Article I), has requested the Lenders to extend credit to enable the Borrower to borrow on a revolving credit basis a principal amount not in excess of $1,500,000,000 at any time outstanding. The Borrower has also requested the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit in an aggregate face amount at any time outstanding not in excess of $200,000,000 to support payment obligations of the Borrower, and has requested the Swingline Lender to agree to make Swingline Loans to the Borrower in a maximum aggregate principal amount outstanding at any time not in excess of $100,000,000. The proceeds of borrowings hereunder and the Letters of Credit will be used for general corporate purposes of the Borrower.
The Lenders are willing to establish the credit facility provided for herein on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein.
Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
ARTICLE I
Definitions
SECTION 1.01.
Definitions
.  The following terms, as used herein, have the following meanings:
Absolute Rate Auction
 means a solicitation of Money Market Quotes setting forth Money Market Absolute Rates pursuant to Section 2.03.
Adjusted Consolidated Capitalization
 means, as of any date, the sum of (i) Total Debt as of such date and (ii) Adjusted Consolidated Net Worth as of such date.
Adjusted Consolidated Net Worth
 means at any date, the total consolidated shareholders' equity of the Borrower determined as of such date in accordance with GAAP, adjusted to exclude (i) any adjustment recorded to reflect the overfunded or underfunded status of the Borrower's defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans in accordance with ASC 715 and (ii) any net unrealized capital gains and losses.
Administrative Questionnaire
 means, with respect to each Lender, the administrative questionnaire in the form submitted to such Lender by the Agent and submitted to the Agent (with a copy to the Borrower) duly completed by such Lender.
Affiliate
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
2
Agent
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder, and its successors in such capacity.
Applicable Lending Office
 means, with respect to any Lender, (i) in the case of its Base Rate Loans, its Domestic Lending Office, (ii) in the case of its EuroDollar Loans, its EuroDollar Lending Office and (iii) in the case of its Money Market Loans, its Money Market Lending Office.
Applicable Percentage
 means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lender's Commitment. If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentage shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
ASC 715
 means Accounting Standards Codification No. 715, 
Compensation-Retirement Benefits
 issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board of the Financial Accounting Foundation in July 2009, as amended or succeeded by subsequent pronouncements, if applicable.
Assignment and Assumption
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.05), and accepted by the Agent, in the form of Exhibit F or any other form approved by the Agent.
ASU Topic 840
 means Accounting Standards Update (ASU) Leases (Topic 840) issued August 17, 2010.
Augmenting Lender
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.10.
Bankruptcy Event
 means, with respect to any Person, that such Person has become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee, administrator, custodian, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business appointed for it, or, in the good faith determination of the Agent, has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in, any such proceeding or appointment;
provided
that a Bankruptcy Event shall not result solely by virtue of any ownership interest, or the acquisition of any ownership interest, in such Person by a Governmental Authority;
provided
,
however
, that such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Person with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States of America or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Person (or such Governmental Authority) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any agreements made by such Person.
Base Rate
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the highest of (i) the Prime Rate for such day, (ii) the sum of 1/2 of 1% plus the Federal Funds Rate for such day and (iii) the sum of 1% plus the London Interbank Offered Rate on such day (or if such day is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, the immediately preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day) for a deposit in Dollars with a maturity of one month. Solely for purposes of clause (iii) above and the last sentence of this definition of Base Rate, the London Interbank Offered Rate on any day means the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if
3
necessary, to the nearest 1/100 of 1%) appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or any successor page) as the London interbank offered rate for deposits in Dollars at 11:00 A.M. (London time) on such day, or if such day is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, on the immediately preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day, for a period equal to one month;
provided
that if for any reason such rate is not available, the term London Interbank Offered Rate for purposes of clause (iii) above and the last sentence of this definition of Base Rate shall mean the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100 of 1%) offered by the principal London office of the Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market for deposits in Dollars at approximately 11:00 A.M. (London time) on such day, or if such day is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, on the immediately preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day, for a period equal to one month. Any change in the Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Rate or the London Interbank Offered Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Rate or the London Interbank Offered Rate.
Base Rate Loan
 means (i) a Committed Loan which bears interest at the Base Rate pursuant to the applicable Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Interest Rate Election or the provisions of Article VIII, (ii) a Swingline Loan or (iii) an overdue amount which was a Base Rate Loan immediately before it became overdue.
Base Rate Margin
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.11(a).
Borrower
 means Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation, and its successors.
Borrowing
 means a borrowing hereunder consisting of (a) Loans made to the Borrower at the same time by the Lenders pursuant to Article II or (b) a Swingline Loan. A Borrowing is a Base Rate Borrowing if such Loans are Base Rate Loans, a EuroDollar Borrowing if such Loans are EuroDollar Loans and a Money Market Borrowing if such Loans are Money Market Loans.
Commitment
 means, with respect to each Lender, the amount set forth opposite the name of such Lender on Schedule 2.01 hereto, as such amount may be terminated or reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.09, increased pursuant to Section 2.10, terminated pursuant to Section 8.07 or changed pursuant to Section 8.06 or 9.05.
Commitment Increase
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.10(b).
Commitment Letter
 means the letter dated February 28, 2012, among the Borrower, the Agent, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Bank of America, N.A., Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated (MLPFS) and Citigroup Global Markets Inc. (CGMI).
Fee Letters
 means, collectively, (i) the letter dated February 28, 2012, among the Borrower, the Agent and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, (ii) the letter dated February 28, 2012, among the Borrower, Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
4
Incorporated and Bank of America, N.A. and (iii) the letter dated February 28, 2012, between the Borrower and Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
Committed Loan
 means a loan made by a Lender pursuant to Section 2.01;
provided
that, if any such loan or loans (or portions thereof) are combined or subdivided pursuant to a Notice of Interest Rate Election, the term Committed Loan shall refer to the combined principal amount resulting from such combination or to each of the separate principal amounts resulting from such subdivision, as the case may be. For the avoidance of doubt, a Swingline Loan is not a Committed Loan.
Consenting Lender
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.08(d).
Consolidated Subsidiary
 means, at any date, any Subsidiary or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the Borrower in its consolidated financial statements in accordance with GAAP if such statements were prepared as of such date.
Continuing Director
 means, at any time, a director who (i) was a director of the Borrower on the Effective Date or (ii) was nominated or elected as a director by vote of a majority of the persons who were Continuing Directors at the time of such nomination or election.
Control
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. 
Controlling
 and 
Controlled
 have meanings correlative thereto.
Credit Exposure
 means, as to any Lender, the sum of the aggregate principal amount of its outstanding Committed Loans, its LC Exposure and its Swingline Exposure.
Declining Lender
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.08(d).
Defaulting Lender
 means any Lender that: (a) has failed, within two Domestic Business Days of the date required to be funded or paid, (i) to fund any portion of any of its Loans, (ii) to fund any portion of its participation in any Letter of Credit or Swingline Loan or (iii) to pay to the Agent, any Issuing Bank or any other Lender any other amount required to be paid by such Lender hereunder; (b) has notified the Borrower, the Agent, any Issuing Bank or any other Lender in writing, or has made a public statement to the effect, that such Lender does not intend or expect to comply with (i) any one or more of its funding obligations under this Agreement or (ii) its funding obligations under any other syndicated credit agreement in which it commits to extend credit; (c) has failed, within three Domestic Business Days after request by the Borrower, the Agent, any Issuing Bank or any other Lender to provide a certification in writing from an authorized officer of such Lender that such Lender will comply with its obligations (and, as of the date of such certificate, is financially able to meet such obligations) to fund prospective Loans and participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans,
provided
that such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (c) upon the receipt by such requesting Person and the Agent of such certification in form
5
and substance satisfactory to such requesting Person and the Agent; or (d) has become, or is a Subsidiary of any parent company that has become, the subject of a Bankruptcy Event.
Default
 means any condition or event which constitutes an Event of Default or which with the giving of notice or lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Disclosure Documents
 means (a) the Confidential Information Memorandum dated February 2012 previously delivered to the Lenders; (b) the Borrower's Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the period ended December 31, 2011; and (c)  the Borrower's Current Reports on Form 8-K filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on or before March 23, 2012.
Dollars
 and the sign 
$
 mean lawful currency of the United States of America.
Domestic Business Day
 means any day except a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized by law to close.
Domestic Lending Office
 means, as to each Lender, its office located at its address set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire (or identified in its Administrative Questionnaire as its Domestic Lending Office) or such other office as such Lender may hereafter designate as its Domestic Lending Office by notice to the Borrower and the Agent.
Effective Date
 means the date this Agreement becomes effective in accordance with Section 3.01.
ERISA
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
ERISA Group
 means all members of a controlled group of corporations and all trades or businesses (whether or not incorporated) under common control which, together with the Borrower, are treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code.
EuroDollar Business Day
 means any Domestic Business Day on which commercial banks are open for international business (including dealings in dollar deposits) in London.
EuroDollar Lending Office
 means, as to each Lender, its office, branch or Affiliate located at its address set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire (or identified in its Administrative Questionnaire as its EuroDollar Lending Office) or such other office, branch or Affiliate of such Lender as it may hereafter designate as its EuroDollar Lending Office by notice to the Borrower and the Agent.
6
EuroDollar Loan
 means (i) a Committed Loan which bears interest at a EuroDollar Rate pursuant to the applicable Notice of Committed Borrowing or a Notice of Interest Rate Election or (ii) an overdue amount which was a EuroDollar Loan immediately before it became overdue.
EuroDollar Margin
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.11(b).
EuroDollar Rate
 means a rate of interest determined pursuant to Section 2.11(b) on the basis of the London Interbank Offered Rate.
EuroDollar Reserve Percentage
 means, for any day, that percentage (expressed as a decimal) which is in effect on such day, as prescribed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor), for determining the maximum reserve requirement for a member bank of the Federal Reserve System in New York City with deposits exceeding five billion dollars in respect of Eurocurrency liabilities (or in respect of any other category of liabilities which includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on EuroDollar Loans is determined or any category of extensions of credit or other assets which includes loans by a nonUnited States office of any Lender to United States residents).
Event of Default
 has the meaning set forth in Section 6.01.
Existing Credit Agreement
 means the $1,500,000,000 Amended and Restated Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2008 (as further amended from time to time), among the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
Existing Maturity Date
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.08(d).
Extension Date
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.08(d).
FATCA
 means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Internal Revenue Code inclusive, as in effect on the date of this Agreement (or any amended or successor version that is substantively comparable and not materially more onerous to comply with) and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
Federal Funds Rate
 means, for any day, the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100th of 1%) equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Domestic Business Day next succeeding such day;
provided
that (i) if such day is not a Domestic Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Domestic Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Domestic Business Day, and (ii) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Domestic Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate quoted to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. on such day on such transactions as calculated by the Agent, such calculation to be supplied to the Borrower upon the Borrower's request.
7
Fitch
 means Fitch, Inc.
Fixed Rate Loans
 means Euro-Dollar Loans or Money Market Loans (excluding Money Market LIBOR Loans bearing interest at the Base Rate for the reason stated in Section 8.01) or any combination of the foregoing.
GAAP
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
Governmental Authority
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including the European Union, the European Central Bank, the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision or any supra-national body exercising such powers or functions of government).
Group of Loans
 or 
Group
 means at any time a group of Loans consisting of (i) all Committed Loans which are Base Rate Loans at such time or (ii) all Committed Loans which are EuroDollar Loans having the same Interest Period at such time;
provided
that, if Committed Loans of any particular Lender are converted to or made as Base Rate Loans pursuant to Article VIII, such Loans shall be included in the same Group or Groups of Loans from time to time as they would have been in if they had not been so converted or made.
Guarantee
 of or by any Person (the 
guarantor
) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness of any other Person (the 
primary obligor
) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness of the payment thereof, including pursuant to any synthetic lease arrangement, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness;
provided
that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Indebtedness
 of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding current accounts payable and accrued obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business), (e) all Indebtedness of others
8
secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all obligations of such Person as an account party to reimburse amounts drawn under any letter of credit or letter of guaranty that constituted Indebtedness of such Person under clause (f) above prior to drawing thereunder and (h) all obligations of such Person in respect of leases required to be accounted for as capital leases under GAAP;
provided
that any obligations of such Person in connection with repurchase agreements and/or securities lending arrangements shall not constitute Indebtedness.
Interest Period
 means:
(a)
with respect to each Base Rate Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the period commencing on the date of such Loan and ending on the next succeeding Quarterly Date;
provided
that any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date;
(b)
with respect to each EuroDollar Loan, a period commencing on the date of Borrowing specified in the applicable Notice of Committed Borrowing or on the date specified in the applicable Notice of Interest Rate Election and ending one, two, three or six months thereafter, as the Borrower may elect in the applicable Notice or such longer period as mutually agreed to by the Borrower and all of the Lenders;
provided
that:
(i)
any Interest Period which would otherwise end on a day which is not a EuroDollar Business Day shall, subject to clause (b)(iii) below, be extended to the next succeeding EuroDollar Business Day;
(ii)
any Interest Period which begins on the last EuroDollar Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall, subject to clause (b)(iii) below, end on the last EuroDollar Business Day of a calendar month; and
(iii)
any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date.
(c)
with respect to each Money Market LIBOR Loan, the period commencing on the date of Borrowing and ending such whole number of months thereafter as the Borrower may elect in accordance with Section 2.03;
provided
that:
(i)
any Interest Period which would otherwise end on a day which is not a EuroDollar Business Day shall, subject to clause (c)(iii) below, be extended to the next succeeding EuroDollar Business Day;
(ii)
any Interest Period which begins on the last EuroDollar Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest
9
Period) shall, subject to clause (c)(iii) below, end on the last EuroDollar Business Day of a calendar month; and
(iii)
any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date;
(d)
with respect to each Money Market Absolute Rate Loan, the period commencing on the date of Borrowing and ending such number of days thereafter (but not less than seven days) as the Borrower may elect in accordance with Section 2.03;
provided
that:
(i)
any Interest Period which would otherwise end on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day shall, subject to clause (d)(ii) below, be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day; and
(ii)
any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date.
Internal Revenue Code
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or any successor statute.
Invitation for Money Market Quotes
 means an invitation from the Agent to the Lenders to submit Money Market Quotes pursuant to Section 2.03(c).
Issuing Bank
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A., Citibank, N.A. and each other Person that shall have become an Issuing Bank hereunder as provided in Section 2.05(j), each in its capacity as an issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder. Each Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term Issuing Bank shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank Agreement
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.05(j).
LC Commitment
 means, (i) as to each of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A. and Citibank, N.A., $75,000,000, and (ii) as to each other Issuing Bank, the commitment of such Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit pursuant to Section 2.05 as set forth in its Issuing Bank Agreement.
LC Disbursement
 means a payment made by an Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Exposure
 means, at any time, the sum of (i) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (ii) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time. The LC Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time. Unless otherwise specified herein, the amount of a Letter of Credit at any time shall be deemed to be the stated amount of such
10
Letter of Credit in effect at such time; provided, however, that with respect to any Letter of Credit that, by its terms or the terms of any document related to the issuance of such Letter of Credit, provides for one or more automatic increases in the stated amount thereof, the amount of such Letter of Credit shall be deemed to be the maximum stated amount of such Letter of Credit after giving effect to all such increases, whether or not such maximum stated amount is in effect at such time.
Lender
 means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 who are parties to this Agreement and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to Sections 2.08(d), 8.06 or 2.10 or pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that shall have ceased to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or Section 8.06 or Section 8.07 or whose Commitment shall have been terminated pursuant to Section 2.08(d) as a result of being a Declining Lender. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term Lender includes the Swingline Lender.
Letter of Credit
 means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Level I Period
 means any period during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) A+ by S&P and/or (ii) A1 by Moody's and/or (iii) A+ by Fitch;
provided
that if S&P or Moody's or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level II Period
 means any period (other than a Level I Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) A by S&P and/or (ii) A2 by Moody's and/or (iii) A by Fitch;
provided
that if S&P or Moody's or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level III Period
 means any period (other than a Level I Period or a Level II Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) A- by S&P and/or (ii) A3 by Moody's and/or (iii) A- by Fitch;
provided
that if S&P or Moody's or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level IV Period
 means any period (other than a Level I Period, Level II Period or Level III Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings which are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) BBB+ by S&P and/or (ii) Baa1 by Moody's and/or (iii) BBB+ by Fitch;
provided
that if S&P or Moody's or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
11
Level V Period
 means any period other than a Level I Period, Level II Period, Level III Period or Level IV Period.
Leverage Ratio
 means, as of any date, the ratio of (a) Total Debt as of such date to (b) Adjusted Consolidated Capitalization as of such date.
LIBOR Auction
 means a solicitation of Money Market Quotes setting forth Money Market Margins based on the London Interbank Offered Rate pursuant to Section 2.03.
Lien
 means, with respect to any asset, any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset.
Loan
 means a Base Rate Loan (including any Swingline Loan), a EuroDollar Loan or a Money Market Loan and Loans means any combination of the foregoing.
London Interbank Offered Rate
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.11(b).
Material Subsidiary
 means a Consolidated Subsidiary of the Borrower that, as of the time of determination of whether such Consolidated Subsidiary is a Material Subsidiary, accounted on a consolidated basis for 10% or more of the total assets of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries (i) as of December 31, 2011, or, thereafter, (ii) as of the most recent date for which a consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower has been delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b);
provided
that, for purposes of Article VI, if any event or combination of events described in Sections 6.01(g) and 6.01(h) occur with respect to any one or more Consolidated Subsidiaries that are not Material Subsidiaries but in the aggregate would constitute a Material Subsidiary if such Consolidated Subsidiaries constituted a single Consolidated Subsidiary, then such Consolidated Subsidiaries shall be deemed collectively to constitute a Material Subsidiary for purposes of such Sections.
Maturity Date
 means March 27, 2017, as such date may be extended pursuant to Section 2.08(d), or, if such day is not a EuroDollar Business Day, the next preceding EuroDollar Business Day.
MNPI
 means material non-public information concerning the Borrower and its Subsidiaries or the respective securities of any of the foregoing.
Money Market Absolute Rate
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.03(d).
Money Market Absolute Rate Loan
 means a loan made or to be made by a Lender pursuant to an Absolute Rate Auction.
Money Market Lending Office
 means, as to each Lender, its Domestic Lending Office or such other office or branch of such Lender as it may hereafter designate as its Money Market Lending Office by notice to the Borrower and the Agent;
12
provided
that any Lender may from time to time by notice to the Borrower and the Agent designate separate Money Market Lending Offices for its Money Market LIBOR Loans, on the one hand, and its Money Market Absolute Rate Loans, on the other hand, in which case all references herein to the Money Market Lending Office of such Lender shall be deemed to refer to either or both of such offices, as the context may require.
Money Market LIBOR Loan
 means a loan made or to be made by a Lender pursuant to a LIBOR Auction (including such a loan bearing interest at the Base Rate for the reason stated in Section 8.01).
Money Market Loan
 means a Money Market LIBOR Loan or a Money Market Absolute Rate Loan.
Money Market Margin
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.03(d).
Money Market Quote
 means an offer by a Lender to make a Money Market Loan in accordance with Section 2.03.
Money Market Quote Request
 means a request by the Borrower to the Lenders to make Money Market Loans in accordance with Section 2.03(b).
Moody's
 means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Non-Defaulting Lender
 means, at any time, any Lender that is not a Defaulting Lender at such time.
Notes
 means promissory notes of the Borrower, substantially in the form of Exhibit A hereto, evidencing the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans, and Note means any one of such promissory notes issued hereunder.
Notice of Borrowing
 means a Notice of Committed Borrowing (as defined in Section 2.02), a Notice of Money Market Borrowing (as defined in Section 2.03(f)) or a Notice of Swingline Borrowing (as defined in Section 2.04(b)).
Notice of Interest Rate Election
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.13.
Other Taxes
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.04(a).
Participant
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.05(e).
Participant Register
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.05(e).
PBGC
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation or any entity succeeding to any or all of its functions under ERISA.
Person
 means an individual, a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, an association, a trust or any other entity or organization, including a government or political subdivision or an agency or instrumentality thereof.
13
Plan
 means at any time an employee pension benefit plan which is covered by Title IV of ERISA or subject to the minimum funding standards under Section 412 of the Internal Revenue Code and is either (i) maintained by a member of the ERISA Group for employees of a member of the ERISA Group or (ii) maintained pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or any other arrangement under which more than one employer makes contributions and to which a member of the ERISA Group is then making or accruing an obligation to make contributions or has within the preceding five plan years made contributions.
Platform
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.01(c).
Prime Rate
 means the rate of interest publicly announced by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. in New York City from time to time as its Prime Rate.
Private Side Lender Representatives
 means, with respect to any Lender, representatives of such Lender that are not Public Side Lender Representatives.
Projections
 has the meaning set forth in Section 4.09.
Public Side Lender Representatives
 means, with respect to any Lender, representatives of such Lender that do not wish to receive MNPI.
Quarterly Date
 means the last Domestic Business Day of each March, June, September and December.
Regulation U
 means Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, as in effect from time to time.
Reportable Event
 means any reportable event as defined in Section 4043(c) of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder (other than a Reportable Event as to which the 30-day notice requirement has been waived by applicable regulation) with respect to a Plan (other than a Plan maintained by a member of an applicable ERISA Group that is considered a member of such ERISA Group only pursuant to subsection (m) or (o) of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code).
Request Date
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.08(d).
Required Lenders
 means at any time Lenders having at least 51% of the aggregate amount of the Commitments or, following the complete termination of the Commitments, Lenders having at least 51% of the aggregate amount of the outstanding Committed Loans, Money Market Loans, LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure.
Responsible Financial Officer
 means chief financial officer, treasurer, chief accounting officer or senior corporate finance officer.
Revolving Credit Period
 means the period from the Effective Date to and including the Maturity Date.
14
S&P
 means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a Standard and Poor's Financial Services LLC business.
Senior Unsecured Debt
 means indebtedness for borrowed money that is not subordinated to any other indebtedness for borrowed money and is not secured or supported by a guarantee, letter of credit or other form of credit enhancement.
Subsidiary
 means any corporation or other entity of which securities or other ownership interests having ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or other persons performing similar functions are at the time directly or indirectly owned by the Borrower.
Substitute Lender
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.06.
Swingline Exposure
 means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Lender
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder.
Swingline Loan
 means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.04.
Tax Event
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.04(h).
Taxes
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.04(a).
Total Debt
 means, as of any date, the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries as of such date (whether or not such Indebtedness would be reflected on a consolidated balance sheet prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP), determined on a consolidated basis.
USA Patriot Act
 means the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, as amended or reauthorized from time to time.
SECTION 1.02.
Terms Generally
.  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be
15
construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
 
SECTION 1.03
Accounting Terms and Determinations; GAAP
.  Unless otherwise specified herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted, all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made and all financial statements required to be delivered hereunder shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP as in effect from time to time, applied on a basis consistent (except for changes concurred in by the Borrower's independent public accountants) with the most recent audited consolidated financial statements of the Borrower delivered to the Lenders;
provided
that, if the Borrower notifies the Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change in GAAP shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith. Without limiting the foregoing, for purposes of determining compliance with any provision of this Agreement and any related definitions (including, for the avoidance of doubt, for the purpose of the definitions of Indebtedness and Adjusted Consolidated Net Worth), the determination of whether a lease is to be treated as an operating lease or capital lease shall be made without giving effect to any change in GAAP that becomes effective on or after the Effective Date that would require operating leases to be treated similarly to capital leases, including as a result of the implementation of proposed ASU Topic 840, or any successor or similar proposal.
SECTION 1.04.
Classifications of Borrowings
. Borrowings are classified for purposes of this Agreement either by reference to the pricing of Loans comprising such Borrowings (
e.g.
, a EuroDollar Borrowing is a Borrowing comprised of EuroDollar Loans) or by reference to the provisions of Article II under which participation therein is determined (
i.e.
, a Committed Borrowing is a Borrowing under Section 2.01 in which all Lenders participate in proportion to their Commitments, while a Money Market Borrowing is a Borrowing under Section 2.03 in which the Lender participants are determined on the basis of their bids).
ARTICLE II
The Credits
SECTION 2.01.
Commitments to Lend
.  On the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, each Lender severally agrees to lend to the Borrower, from time
16
to time during the Revolving Credit Period, amounts not to exceed in the aggregate at any one time outstanding (together with its LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure) the amount of such Lender's Commitment. Each Borrowing under this Section 2.01 shall be in an aggregate principal amount of $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000 (except that any such Borrowing may be in the aggregate amount of the unused Commitments or any lesser aggregate amount required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e)) and shall be made from the several Lenders ratably in proportion to their respective Commitments. Within the foregoing limits, the Borrower may borrow under this Section, repay, or to the extent permitted by Section 2.14, prepay Loans and reborrow at any time during the Revolving Credit Period under this Section. Failure by any Lender to make Loans as required under the terms of this Agreement will not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Money Market Loans made by a Lender shall be deemed to use the total Commitments for the purpose of availability, but shall not reduce such Lender's obligation to lend its pro rata share of the total Commitments.
SECTION 2.02.
Notice of Committed Borrowings
.  The Borrower shall give the Agent notice (a 
Notice of Committed Borrowing
) not later than 10:30 A.M. (New York City time) on (x) the date of each Base Rate Borrowing that is not a Swingline Loan and (y) the third EuroDollar Business Day before each EuroDollar Borrowing, specifying:
(a) the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Domestic Business Day in the case of a Base Rate Borrowing and a EuroDollar Business Day in the case of a EuroDollar Borrowing,
(b) the aggregate amount of such Borrowing,
(c) whether the Loans comprising such Borrowing are to be Base Rate Loans or EuroDollar Loans, and
(d) in the case of a Euro-Dollar Borrowing, the duration of the initial Interest Period applicable thereto, subject to the provisions of the definition of Interest Period.
SECTION 2.03.
Money Market Borrowings
.  (a)
The Money Market Option.
In addition to Committed Loans pursuant to Section 2.01 and Swingline Loans pursuant to Section 2.04, the Borrower may, as set forth in this Section, request the Lenders from time to time during the Revolving Credit Period to make offers to make Money Market Loans to the Borrower. The Lenders may, but shall have no obligation to, make such offers and the Borrower may, but shall have no obligation to, accept any such offers in the manner set forth in this Section.
(b)
Money Market Quote Request.
When the Borrower wishes to request offers to make Money Market Loans under this Section, it shall transmit to the Agent by facsimile transmission a Money Market Quote Request substantially in the form of Exhibit B hereto so as to be received no later than 10:00 A.M. (New York City time) on (x) the fourth Euro-Dollar Business Day prior to the date of Borrowing proposed therein,
17
in the case of a LIBOR Auction or (y) the Domestic Business Day next preceding the date of Borrowing proposed therein, in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction (or, in either case, such other time or date as the Borrower and the Agent shall have mutually agreed upon and shall have notified to the Lenders not later than the date of the Money Market Quote Request for the first LIBOR Auction or Absolute Rate Auction for which such change is to be effective) specifying:
(i) the proposed date of Borrowing, which shall be a Euro-Dollar Business Day in the case of a LIBOR Auction or a Domestic Business Day in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction,
(ii) the aggregate amount of such Borrowing, which shall be $15,000,000 or a larger multiple of $1,000,000,
(iii) the duration of the Interest Period applicable thereto, subject to the provisions of the definition of Interest Period, and
(iv) whether the Money Market Quotes requested are to set forth a Money Market Margin or a Money Market Absolute Rate.
The Borrower may request offers to make Money Market Loans for more than one Interest Period in a single Money Market Quote Request. No Money Market Quote Request shall be given within five Euro-Dollar Business Days (or following notice to each of the Lenders, such other number of days as the Borrower and the Agent may agree upon) of any other Money Market Quote Request.
(c)
Invitation for Money Market Quotes.
Promptly upon receipt of a Money Market Quote Request, the Agent shall send to the Lenders by facsimile transmission an Invitation for Money Market Quotes substantially in the form of Exhibit C hereto, which shall constitute an invitation by the Borrower to each Lender to submit Money Market Quotes offering to make the Money Market Loans to which such Money Market Quote Request relates in accordance with this Section.
(d)
Submission and Contents of Money Market Quotes.
(i) Each Lender may submit a Money Market Quote containing an offer or offers to make Money Market Loans in response to any Invitation for Money Market Quotes. Each Money Market Quote must comply with the requirements of this Section 2.03(d) and must be submitted to the Agent by facsimile transmission at its offices specified in or pursuant to Section 9.01 not later than (x) 9:30 A.M. (New York City time) on the third Euro-Dollar Business Day prior to the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of a LIBOR Auction, or (y) 9:30 A.M. (New York City time) on the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction (or, in either case, such other time or date as the Borrower and the Agent shall have mutually agreed and shall have notified to the Lenders not later than the date of the Money Market Quote Request for the first LIBOR Auction or Absolute Rate Auction for which such change is to be effective);
provided
that Money Market Quotes submitted by the Agent (or any Affiliate of the Agent) in the capacity of a Lender may be submitted, and may only be submitted, if the Agent or such Affiliate notifies the Borrower of the terms of the offer or offers contained therein not later than (x) 9:15 A.M.
18
(New York City time) on the third EuroDollar Business Day prior to the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of a LIBOR Auction or (y) 9:15 A.M. (New York City time) on the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction. Subject to Articles III and VI, any Money Market Quote so made shall be irrevocable except with the written consent of the Agent given on the instructions of the Borrower.
(ii) Each Money Market Quote shall be in substantially the form of Exhibit D hereto and shall in any case specify:
(A)
the proposed date of Borrowing,
(B)
the principal amount of the Money Market Loan for which each such offer is being made, which principal amount (x) may be greater than or less than the Commitment of the quoting Lender, (y) must be $15,000,000 or a larger multiple of $1,000,000 and (z) may not exceed the principal amount of Money Market Loans for which offers were requested,
(C)
in the case of a LIBOR Auction, the margin above or below the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate (the 
Money Market Margin
) offered for each such Money Market Loan, expressed as a percentage (rounded to the nearest 1/10,000th of 1%) to be added to or subtracted from such base rate,
(D)
in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction, the rate of interest per annum (rounded to the nearest 1/10,000th of 1%) (the 
Money Market Absolute Rate
) offered for each such Money Market Loan, and
(E)
the identity of the quoting Lender.
A Money Market Quote may set forth up to five separate offers by the quoting Lender with respect to each Interest Period specified in the related Invitation for Money Market Quotes.
(iii) Any Money Market Quote shall be disregarded if it:
(A) is not substantially in conformity with Exhibit D hereto or does not specify all of the information required by Section 2.03(d)(ii);
(B) contains qualifying, conditional or similar language;
(C) proposes terms other than or in addition to those set forth in the applicable Invitation for Money Market Quotes; or
(D) arrives after the time set forth in Section 2.03(d)(i).
(e)
Notice to Borrower.
The Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower of the terms (x) of any Money Market Quote submitted by a Lender that is in accordance with Section 2.03(d) and (y) of any Money Market Quote that amends, modifies or is
19
otherwise inconsistent with a previous Money Market Quote submitted by such Lender with respect to the same Money Market Quote Request. Any such subsequent Money Market Quote shall be disregarded by the Agent unless such subsequent Money Market Quote is submitted solely to correct a manifest error in such former Money Market Quote. The Agent's notice to the Borrower shall specify (A) the aggregate principal amount of Money Market Loans for which offers have been received for each Interest Period specified in the related Money Market Quote Request, (B) the respective principal amounts and Money Market Margins or Money Market Absolute Rates, as the case may be, so offered (including the names of the Lenders) and (C) if applicable, limitations on the aggregate principal amount of Money Market Loans for which offers in any single Money Market Quote for any Interest Period may be accepted.
(f)
Acceptance and Notice by Borrower.
Not later than 10:30 A.M. (New York City time) on (x) the third EuroDollar Business Day prior to the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of a LIBOR Auction or (y) the proposed date of Borrowing, in the case of an Absolute Rate Auction (or, in either case, such other time or date as the Borrower and the Agent shall have mutually agreed upon and shall have notified to the Lenders not later than the date of the Money Market Quote Request for the first LIBOR Auction or Absolute Rate Auction for which such change is to be effective), the Borrower shall notify the Agent of its acceptance or nonacceptance of the offers so notified to it pursuant to Section 2.03(e). In the case of acceptance, such notice (a 
Notice of Money Market Borrowing
) shall specify the aggregate principal amount of offers for each Interest Period that are accepted. The Borrower may accept any Money Market Quote for any Interest Period in whole or in part;
provided
that:
(i) the aggregate principal amount of each Money Market Borrowing may not exceed the applicable amount set forth in the related Money Market Quote Request,
(ii) the principal amount of each Money Market Borrowing must be $15,000,000 or a larger multiple of $1,000,000,
(iii) acceptance of offers may only be made on the basis of ascending Money Market Margins or Money Market Absolute Rates, as the case may be, and
(iv) the Borrower may not accept any offer that is described in Section 2.03(d)(iii) or that otherwise fails to comply with the requirements of this Agreement.
(g)
Allocation by Agent.
If offers are made by two or more Lenders with the same
Money Market Margins or Money Market Absolute Rates, as the case may be, for a greater aggregate principal amount than the amount in respect of which such offers are accepted for the related Interest Period, the principal amount of Money Market Loans in respect of which such offers are accepted shall be allocated by the Agent among such Lenders as nearly as possible (in multiples of such number, not greater than $1,000,000 as the Agent may deem appropriate) in proportion to the aggregate principal amounts of
20
such offers. Determinations by the Agent of the pro rata amounts of Money Market Loans shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error.
(h)
Certain Conditions.
If the Maturity Date shall have been extended pursuant to Section 2.08(d), no Money Market Borrowing shall be requested or made hereunder if, after giving effect thereto, the sum of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit expiring after any Existing Maturity Date and the aggregate principal amount of all Money Market Loans maturing after such Existing Maturity Date would exceed the aggregate Commitments that have been extended to a date after the latest expiration date of such Letters of Credit and the latest maturity of such Money Market Loans.
SECTION 2.04.
Swingline Loans
.  (a) On the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, in addition to other Loans hereunder, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans to the Borrower, from time to time during the Revolving Credit Period, in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding that will not result in (i) the aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Swingline Loans exceeding $100,000,000 or (ii) the sum of the outstanding Committed Loans and Swingline Loans and the LC Exposures exceeding the aggregate Commitments;
provided
that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan. Within the foregoing limits, the Borrower may borrow under this Section, repay or prepay Swingline Loans and reborrow at any time during the Revolving Credit Period under this Section. The Borrower shall give the Agent notice (a Notice of Swingline Borrowing) by telephone not later than 12:00 Noon (New York City time) on the date of each Swingline Loan. Each telephonic Notice of Swingline Borrowing shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or facsimile to the Agent of a written Notice of Swingline Borrowing. Each telephonic or written Notice of Swingline Borrowing shall specify:
(i) the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Domestic Business Day,
(ii) the aggregate amount of such Borrowing, and
(iii) the location and number of the account of the Borrower to which funds are to be disbursed, or, in the case of a Swingline Loan requested to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e), the identity of the Issuing Bank that has made such LC Disbursement.
Promptly following the receipt of a Notice of Swingline Borrowing in accordance with this Section, the Agent shall advise the Swingline Lender of the details thereof. The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the Borrower by means of a wire transfer to the account of the Borrower or to the Issuing Bank specified in such Notice of Swingline Borrowing, as the case may be, by 3:00 P.M., New York City time, on the date of such Swingline Loan specified in such Notice of Swingline Borrowing.
21
(c) The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Agent not later than 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on any Domestic Business Day require the Lenders to acquire participations on such Domestic Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of the Swingline Loans in which the Lenders will be required to participate. Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Agent will give notice thereof to each Lender, specifying in such notice such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay, upon receipt of notice from the Agent as provided above in this Section 2.04(c), to the Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that, in making any Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender shall be entitled to rely, and shall not incur any liability for relying, upon the representation and warranty of the Borrower deemed made pursuant to Section 3.02, unless, at least one Domestic Business Day prior to the time such Swingline Loan was made, the Required Lenders (with a copy to the Agent) or the Agent shall have notified the Swingline Lender in writing that one or more of the conditions precedent set forth in Section 3.02 would not be satisfied if such Swingline Loan were then made (it being understood and agreed that, in the event the Swingline Lender shall have received any such notice, the Swingline Lender shall have no obligation to make any Swingline Loan until and unless the Swingline Lender shall be satisfied that the events and circumstances described in such notice shall have been cured or otherwise shall have ceased to exist). Each Lender further acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this Section 2.04(c) in respect of Swingline Loans is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this Section 2.04(c) by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply,
mutatis
mutandis
, to the payment obligations of the Lenders pursuant to this Section 2.04(c)), and the Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by the Agent from the Lenders. The Agent shall notify the Borrower of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this Section 2.04(c), and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Agent and not to the Swingline Lender. Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Agent; and any such amounts received by the Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Agent to the Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this Section 2.04(c) and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear;
provided
that any such payment so remitted shall be repaid to the Swingline Lender or to the Agent, as applicable, if and to the extent such payment is required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this Section 2.04(c) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to repay such Swingline Loan.
SECTION 2.05.
Letters of Credit
.  (a) 
General.
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit
22
denominated in Dollars for its own account or, as provided below, for the account of a Subsidiary, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the Revolving Credit Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control. The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that (i) Letters of Credit may be issued to support obligations of Subsidiaries of the Borrower as well as the Borrower, (ii) Letters of Credit issued to support obligations of a Subsidiary may state that they are issued for such Subsidiary's account and (iii) regardless of any such statement in any Letter of Credit, the Borrower is the account party in respect of all Letters of Credit and will be responsible for reimbursement of LC Disbursements as provided herein.
(b) 
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver (or transmit by electronic communication or facsimile transmission, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Domestic Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with Section 2.05(c)), the amount of such Letter of Credit in Dollars, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by the applicable Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Bank's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (X) the Agent shall have confirmed, based solely on the information delivered to it pursuant to Section 2.05(k), that (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), (A) after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $200,000,000, (ii) the amount of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by the applicable Issuing Bank will not exceed the LC Commitment of such Issuing Bank and (iii) the sum of the total LC Exposure plus the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans shall not exceed the aggregate amount of the Commitments, and (B) in the event the Maturity Date shall have been extended as provided in Section 2.08(d), the sum of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit expiring after any Existing Maturity Date and the aggregate principal amount of all Money Market Loans maturing after such Existing Maturity Date shall not exceed the aggregate Commitments that have been extended to a date after the latest expiration date of such Letters of Credit and the latest maturity of such Money Market Loans, and (Y) the Issuing Bank shall not have received written notice from any Lender, the Agent or the Borrower, at least one Domestic Business Day prior to the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of the applicable Letter of Credit  (or, in the case of any Letter of Credit providing for automatic renewals, at least five Domestic Business Days before the last day on which such notice
23
may be given to prevent renewal), that one or more applicable conditions contained in Section 3.02 shall not be satisfied.
(c)
Expiration Date.
Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Domestic Business Days prior to the Maturity Date.
(d)
Participations.
By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the applicable Issuing Bank or the Lenders, such Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Agent, for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by such Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in Section 2.05(e), or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this Section 2.05(d) in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
(e)
Reimbursement.
If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 Noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 Noon, New York City time, on (i) the Domestic Business Day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on the day of receipt, or (ii) the Domestic Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt;
provided
that the Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.02 and/or Section 2.04 that such payment be financed with a Base Rate Borrowing in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrower's obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting Base Rate Borrowing. If the Borrower fails to make such payment when due, the Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrower in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrower, in the same manner
24
as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply,
mutatis
mutandis
, to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Agent shall promptly pay to the applicable Issuing Bank the amounts so received by the Agent from the Lenders. For the avoidance of doubt, any Declining Lender that has been replaced by a Substitute Lender pursuant to Section 8.06 prior to the date of reimbursement shall not be required to make any payment to the Agent or the applicable Issuing Bank pursuant to the preceding sentence, regardless of whether the applicable Letter of Credit was issued before or after such Lender has become a Declining Lender. Promptly following receipt by the Agent of any payment from the Borrower pursuant to this Section 2.05(e), the Agent shall distribute such payment to the applicable Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this Section 2.05(e) to reimburse such Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and such Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this Section 2.05(e) to reimburse any Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of Base Rate Loans as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
(f)
Obligations Absolute.
The Borrower's obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in Section 2.05(e) shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by an Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section 2.05(f), constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrower's obligations hereunder. Neither the Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Banks (nor any of their Affiliates, directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors, or their Affiliates' directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors), shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the applicable Issuing Bank;
provided
that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse any Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by such Issuing Bank's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of an Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to
25
have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the applicable Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
(g)
Disbursement Procedures.
The applicable Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. Such Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Agent and the Borrower by telephone (confirmed by facsimile transmission) of such demand for payment and whether such Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder;
provided
that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
(h)
Interim Interest.
If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to Base Rate Loans;
provided
that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to Section 2.05(e), then the last sentence of the first paragraph of Section 2.11(a) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this Section 2.05(h) shall be for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to Section 2.05(e) to reimburse such Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
(i)
Cash Collateralization.
If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Domestic Business Day that the Borrower receives notice from the Agent or the Required Lenders that the Required Lenders are demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this Section 2.05(i), the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Agent, in the name of the Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon;
provided
that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to the Borrower described in Section 6.01(g) or Section 6.01(h). Such deposit shall be held by the Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. The Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Agent and at the Borrower's risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Agent to reimburse each Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not
26
been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of the Required Lenders), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three Domestic Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.
(j)
Designation of Additional Issuing Banks
. From time to time, the Borrower may by notice to the Agent designate as additional Issuing Banks one or more Lenders that agree to serve in such capacity as provided in this Section 2.05(j). The acceptance by a Lender of any appointment as an Issuing Bank hereunder shall be evidenced by an agreement (an 
Issuing Bank Agreement
), which shall be in a form satisfactory to the Borrower and the Agent, shall set forth the LC Commitment of such Lender and shall be executed by such Lender, the Borrower and the Agent. From and after the effective date of each Issuing Bank Agreement, (i) the applicable Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement and (ii) references herein to the term Issuing Bank shall be deemed to include such Lender in its capacity as an Issuing Bank.
(k)
Issuing Bank Reports
. Unless otherwise agreed by the Agent, each Issuing Bank shall report in writing to the Agent (i) on or prior to each Business Day on which such Issuing Bank issues, amends, renews or extends any Letter of Credit, the date of such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension and the aggregate face amount of the Letter of Credit issued, amended, renewed or extended by it and outstanding after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (and whether the amount thereof has changed), it being understood that such Issuing Bank shall not effect any issuance, renewal, extension or amendment resulting in an increase in the amount of any Letter of Credit without first obtaining written confirmation from the Agent that such increase complies with the conditions contained in clauses (A) and (B) of Section 2.05(b), (ii) on each Business Day on which such Issuing Bank makes an LC Disbursement, the date and amount of such LC Disbursement, (iii) on any Business Day on which the Borrower reimburses or fails to reimburse an LC Disbursement required to be reimbursed to such Issuing Bank on such day, the date of such reimbursement or failure and the amount of such LC Disbursement and (iv) on any other Business Day, such other information as the Agent shall reasonably request as to the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank and outstanding on such Business Day.
SECTION 2.06.
Notice to Lenders; Funding of Loans
.  (a)  Upon receipt of a Notice of Borrowing, the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and of such Lender's share (if any) of such Borrowing and such Notice of Borrowing shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower.
(b) Not later than 12:00 Noon (New York City time) on the date of each Borrowing, each Lender participating therein shall make available its share of such Borrowing, in Federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, to the Agent at its address specified in or pursuant to Section 9.01. Unless the Agent
27
determines that any applicable condition specified in Article III has not been satisfied, the Agent will make the funds so received from the Lenders available to the Borrower at the Agent's aforesaid address;
provided
that Base Rate Loans under Section 2.02 made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e) shall be remitted by the Agent to the applicable Issuing Bank.
(c) Unless the Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available to the Agent on the date of such Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.06(b) and the Agent may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower on such date a corresponding amount. If and to the extent that such Lender shall not have so made such share available to the Agent, such Lender and the Borrower severally agree to repay to the Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount together with interest thereon, for each day from the date such amount is made available to the Borrower until the date such amount is repaid to the Agent, at (i) in the case of the Borrower, a rate per annum equal to the higher of the Federal Funds Rate and the interest rate applicable thereto pursuant to Section 2.11 and (ii) in the case of such Lender, the Federal Funds Rate. If such Lender shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount, such amount so repaid shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing for purposes of this Agreement.
SECTION 2.07.
Evidence of Debt
.  (a) Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
(b) The Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the Commitment of each Lender and the amount of each Loan made hereunder by such Lender, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Agent hereunder for the accounts of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
(c) The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to Section 2.07(b) shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein and shall be presumptively correct absent demonstrable error;
provided
that the failure of the Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
(d) Any Lender may request in writing that Loans made by it be evidenced by a Note. In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a Note payable to the order of such Lender in the form of Exhibit A. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such Note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.05) be represented by one or more Notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein.
28
(e) Each Lender agrees that it will cancel and return to the Borrower all Notes then held by it upon the earlier of (i) the Maturity Date;
provided
that no Default shall have then occurred and be continuing or (ii) the date such Lender's Commitment has been terminated and there are no Loans outstanding to or accrued interest owing to such Lender.
SECTION 2.08.
Maturity of Loans
.  (a)  The Committed Loans of each Lender shall mature, and the principal amount thereof shall be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon, on the Maturity Date.
(b) Each Money Market Loan shall mature, and the principal amount thereof shall be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon, on the last day of the Interest Period applicable to such Money Market Loan.
(c) Each Swingline Loan shall mature on the earlier of (i) the first Domestic Business Day that is (A) the 10th Domestic Business Day or the last Domestic Business Day of a month and (B) not fewer than three Domestic Business Days after such Loan shall have been made, or (ii) the Maturity Date.
(d) The Borrower may, by written notice to the Agent (which shall promptly deliver a copy to each of the Lenders) not less than 45 days and not more than 90 days prior to any anniversary of the date hereof, request that the Lenders extend the Maturity Date and the Commitments for an additional period of one year (the date of any such request being called the 
Request Date
). Each Lender shall, by notice to the Borrower and the Agent given not later than the 20th day after the date of the Agent's receipt of the Borrower's extension request, advise the Borrower whether or not it agrees to the requested extension (each Lender agreeing to a requested extension being called a 
Consenting Lender
 and each Lender declining to agree to a requested extension being called a 
Declining Lender
). Any Lender that has not so advised the Borrower and the Agent by such day shall be deemed to have declined to agree to such extension and shall be a Declining Lender. If Lenders constituting the Required Lenders shall have agreed to an extension request, then the Maturity Date shall, as to the Consenting Lenders, be extended to the first anniversary of the Maturity Date theretofore in effect. The decision to agree or withhold agreement to any Maturity Date extension shall be at the sole discretion of each Lender. The Commitment of any Declining Lender shall terminate on the Maturity Date for such Lender in effect immediately prior to giving effect to any such extension (such Maturity Date being called the 
Existing Maturity Date
). The principal amount of any outstanding Loans made by Declining Lenders, together with any accrued interest thereon and any accrued fees and other amounts payable to or for the accounts of such Declining Lenders hereunder, shall be due and payable on the Existing Maturity Date, and on the Existing Maturity Date, the Borrower shall also make such other prepayments of Loans as shall be required in order that, after giving effect to the termination of the Commitments of, and all payments to, Declining Lenders pursuant to this sentence, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans plus the LC Exposure shall not exceed the aggregate amount of the Commitments that shall have been extended beyond the Existing Maturity Date. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section, the Borrower shall have the right, pursuant to Section 8.06, at any time prior to the Existing Maturity Date, to replace a Declining Lender with one or
29
more Lenders or other financial institutions that will agree to a request for the extension of the Maturity Date, and any such replacement Lender shall for all purposes constitute a Consenting Lender. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no extension of the Maturity Date pursuant to this Section shall become effective unless (i) on or prior to the anniversary of the date hereof that immediately follows the Request Date (such date, the 
Extension Date
), the Agent shall have received documents consistent with those delivered with respect to the Borrower under Subsections (b), (c) and (d) of Section 3.01, giving effect to such extension and (ii) on the Extension Date the condition set forth in Section 3.01(e) shall be satisfied (with all references in such Section to the Effective Date being deemed to be references to the Extension Date;
provided
,
however
, that, solely for purposes of this sentence, the date in Section 4.04(b) shall be deemed to be December 31 of the year for which the Borrower shall most recently have filed an Annual Report on Form 10-K with the Securities and Exchange Commission prior to the Request Date, and
provided
further
, that solely for purposes of this sentence, clause (b) of the definition of Disclosure Documents shall be deemed to refer to the Borrower's most recently filed Annual Report on Form 10-K prior to the Request Date and to the Borrower's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q filed for all the quarterly periods, if any, beginning on or after the end of the annual period covered by said Annual Report and ending on or before the Request Date, and clause (c) of such definition shall be deemed to refer to the Borrower's Current Reports on Form 8-K, if any, filed or furnished prior to the Request Date).
SECTION 2.09.
Termination or Reduction of Commitments
.  (a)  The Commitment of each Lender shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
(b) During the Revolving Credit Period the Borrower may, upon at least three Domestic Business Days' notice to the Agent, terminate the Commitments at any time, if no Loans are outstanding at such time and there is no LC Exposure at such time.
(c) During the Revolving Credit Period the Borrower may, upon at least three Domestic Business Days' notice to the Agent, ratably reduce the Commitments from time to time by an aggregate amount of $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000, but only to the extent that the aggregate amount of the Commitments exceeds the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans plus the LC Exposure.
SECTION 2.10.
Increase in Commitments
.  (a)  During the Revolving Credit Period, the Borrower may on one or more occasions, by written notice to the Agent (which shall promptly deliver a copy to each of the Lenders), executed by the Borrower and one or more financial institutions (any such financial institution referred to in this Section being called an 
Augmenting Lender
), which may include any Lender, cause Commitments to be made available by the Augmenting Lenders (or cause the Commitments of the Augmenting Lenders to be increased, as the case may be) in an amount for each Augmenting Lender set forth in such notice;
provided
that (i) the aggregate amount of all such increases pursuant to this Section shall not exceed $500,000,000, (ii) each Augmenting Lender, if not already a Lender hereunder, shall be subject to the approval of the Agent and each Issuing Bank (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld) and (iii) each Augmenting Lender, if not already a Lender hereunder, shall become a party to this Agreement by completing and delivering to the
30
Agent a duly executed accession agreement in a form satisfactory to the Agent and the Borrower. Any such notice shall set forth the amount of the requested increase in the total Commitments (which shall be the lesser of (x) a minimum aggregate amount of $20,000,0000 or any larger multiple of $5,000,000 or (y) the remaining aggregate allowance for such increases) and the date on which such increase is requested to become effective. Increases and new Commitments created pursuant to this Section 2.10(a) shall become effective on the date specified in the notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to the first sentence of this Section 2.10(a). Notwithstanding the foregoing, no increase in the total Commitments (or in the Commitment of any Lender) shall become effective under this Section 2.10(a) unless, (i) on the date of such increase, the conditions set forth in Sections 3.02(b) and 3.02(d) (without giving effect to the parenthetical in Section 3.02(d)) shall be satisfied (as though a Borrowing were being made on such date) and the Agent shall have received a certificate to that effect dated such date and executed by a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower, and (ii) the Agent shall have received (to the extent requested by the Agent reasonably in advance of such date) documents consistent with those delivered under Sections 3.01(c) and 3.01(d) as to the corporate power and authority of the Borrower to borrow hereunder and as to the enforceability of this Agreement after giving effect to such increase.
(b) At the time that any increase in the total Commitments pursuant to Section 2.10(a) (a 
Commitment Increase
) becomes effective, if any Committed Loans are outstanding, the Borrower shall prepay in accordance with Section 2.14 the aggregate principal amount of all Committed Loans outstanding (the 
Initial Loans
);
provided
that (i) nothing in this Section shall prevent the Borrower from funding the prepayment of Initial Loans with concurrent Borrowings hereunder in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, giving effect to the Commitment Increase, and (ii) no such prepayment shall be required to the extent that, after giving effect to the Commitment Increase, each Lender has the same Applicable Percentage as immediately prior to such Commitment Increase.
(c) At the time that any Commitment Increase becomes effective, if any Letters of Credit or Swingline Loans issued or made, as applicable, hereunder remain outstanding, each Lender's participation in such Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans will be adjusted in accordance with such Lender's Applicable Percentage, after giving effect to such Commitment Increase.
SECTION 2.11.
Interest Rates
.  (a) Each Base Rate Loan (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for each day from the date such Loan is made until it becomes due or is prepaid, repaid or converted to a Euro-Dollar Loan, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the Base Rate Margin plus the Base Rate for such day. Such interest shall be payable (i) in the case of a Committed Loan, for each Interest Period on the earlier of (A) the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto or (B)  the Maturity Date; and (ii) in the case of a Swingline Loan, on the day on which the principal of such Loan becomes due as provided in Section 2.08(c). Any overdue principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, overdue interest on any Base Rate Loan shall bear interest, payable on demand, for each day until paid at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Base Rate Margin plus the Base Rate for such day.
31
The 
Base Rate Margin
 applicable to any Base Rate Loan (including each Swingline Loan) outstanding on any day means:
(i) if such day falls within a Level I Period, then 0.000%;
(ii) if such day falls within a Level II Period, then 0.000%;
(iii) if such day falls within a Level III Period, then 0.000%;
(iv) if such day falls within a Level IV Period, then 0.125%; and
(v) if such day falls within a Level V Period, then 0.350%.
(b) Each EuroDollar Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for each Interest Period applicable thereto, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the EuroDollar Margin plus the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate. Such interest shall be payable for each Interest Period on the earliest of (i) the last day thereof, (ii) three months after the initial date thereof and, if such Interest Period is longer than three months, at intervals of three months thereafter or (iii) the Maturity Date.
The 
Euro-Dollar Margin
 applicable to any Euro-Dollar Loan outstanding on any day means:
(i) if such day falls within a Level I Period, then 0.680%;
(ii) if such day falls within a Level II Period, then 0.795%;
(iii) if such day falls within a Level III Period, then 0.900%;
(iv) if such day falls within a Level IV Period, then 1.125%; and
(v) if such day falls within a Level V Period, then 1.350%.
The 
London Interbank Offered Rate
 applicable to any Interest Period means the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100 of 1%) appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or any successor page) as the London interbank offered rate for deposits in Dollars at 11:00 A.M. (London time) two Euro-Dollar Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period for a period equal to such Interest Period;
provided
that, if for any reason such rate is not available, the term 
London Interbank Offered Rate
 applicable to any Interest Period shall mean the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100 of 1%) as offered by the principal London office of the Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market for deposits in Dollars at approximately 11:00 A.M. (London time) two Euro-Dollar Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period for a period equal to such Interest Period.
(c) Any overdue principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, overdue interest on any EuroDollar Loan shall bear interest, payable on demand, for each day from and including the date payment thereof was due to but excluding the date of actual
32
payment, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the EuroDollar Margin plus the higher of (i) the London Interbank Offered Rate applicable to such Loan and (ii) the average (rounded upward, if necessary, to the next higher 1/100 of 1%) of the respective rates per annum at which one day (or, if such amount due remains unpaid more than three Euro-Dollar Business Days, then for such other period of time not longer than three months as the Agent may select) deposits in Dollars in an amount approximately equal to such overdue payment due to the Agent are offered to the Agent in the London interbank market for the applicable period determined as provided above (or, if the circumstances described in Section 8.01 shall exist, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Base Rate Margin plus the Base Rate for such day).
(d) Subject to clause (y) of Section 8.01, each Money Market LIBOR Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for the Interest Period applicable thereto, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the London Interbank Offered Rate for such Interest Period plus (or minus) the Money Market Margin quoted by the Lender making such Loan in accordance with Section 2.03. Each Money Market Absolute Rate Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for the Interest Period applicable thereto, at a rate per annum equal to the Money Market Absolute Rate quoted by the Lender making such Loan in accordance with Section 2.03. Such interest shall be payable for each Interest Period on the earliest of (i) the last day thereof, (ii) three months after the initial date thereof and, if such Interest Period is longer than three months, at intervals of three months thereafter or (iii)  the Maturity Date. Any overdue principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, overdue interest on any Money Market Loan shall bear interest, payable on demand, for each day until paid at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Base Rate Margin plus the Base Rate for such day.
(e) The Agent shall determine (in accordance with this Agreement) each interest rate applicable to the Loans hereunder. The Agent shall give prompt notice to the Borrower and each of the participating Lenders by facsimile transmission of each rate of interest so determined, and its determination thereof shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error.
SECTION 2.12.
Fees
.  (a)
Facility Fee.
The Borrower shall pay to the Agent for the account of the Lenders, ratably in proportion to their Commitments (or, if the Commitments have terminated, ratably in proportion to their outstanding Committed Loans, Money Market Loans, LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure), a facility fee at the rate of (i) 0.070% per annum during each Level I Period, (ii) 0.080% per annum during each Level II Period, (iii) 0.100% per annum during each Level III Period, (iv) 0.125% per annum during each Level IV Period and (v) 0.150% per annum during each Level V Period. Such facility fee shall accrue (i) from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the last day of the Revolving Credit Period, in each case, on the daily average aggregate amount of the Commitments (whether used or unused) and (ii) if any Committed Loan, Money Market Loan, LC Exposure or Swingline Exposure remains outstanding after the Revolving Credit Period (or if any Committed Loan, Money Market Loan, LC Exposure or Swingline Exposure of any Lender remains outstanding after such Lender's Commitment shall have terminated), from and including the last day of the Revolving Credit Period (or the termination of such Commitment) to but excluding the
33
date such Committed Loans or Money Market Loans shall be repaid in full or the date on which such Lender's LC Exposure or Swingline Exposure ceases to exist, as applicable, on the daily average aggregate outstanding principal amount of such Committed Loans, Money Market Loans, LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure.
(b)
Letter of Credit and Fronting Fees
. The Borrower agrees to pay (i)  to the Agent for the account of each Lender a letter of credit fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the Euro-Dollar Margin used to determine the interest rate applicable to EuroDollar Loans on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to each Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate or rates per annum separately agreed upon between the Borrower and such Issuing Bank on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) attributable to Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as such Issuing Bank's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit by such Issuing Bank or the processing of drawings thereunder.
(c)
Payments
. Except as otherwise indicated, accrued facility fees, letter of credit fees and fronting fees under this Section 2.12 shall be payable quarterly in arrears on (i) each Quarterly Date, (ii) the Maturity Date and (iii) if any Loans or LC Exposure remains outstanding after the Revolving Credit Period, the date such Loans shall be repaid in full and such LC Exposure ceases to exist. Any other fees payable to any Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section shall be payable within 10 days after demand.
SECTION 2.13.
Method of Electing Interest Rates
.  (a)  The Loans included in each Committed Borrowing shall bear interest initially at the type of rate specified by the Borrower in the applicable Notice of Committed Borrowing. Thereafter, the Borrower may from time to time elect to change or continue the type of interest rate borne by each Group of Loans (subject in each case to the provisions of Article VIII), as follows:
(i) if such Loans are Base Rate Loans, the Borrower may elect to convert such Loans to Euro-Dollar Loans as of any Euro-Dollar Business Day; and
(ii) if such Loans are Euro-Dollar Loans, the Borrower may (x) elect to convert such Euro-Dollar Loans to Base Rate Loans as of any Domestic Business Day, (y) elect to convert such Euro-Dollar Loans to EuroDollar Loans with an Interest Period different from the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans as of any EuroDollar Business Day or (z) elect to continue such Loans as EuroDollar Loans for an additional
34
Interest Period beginning on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans;
provided
that, if the Borrower elects to convert any Euro-Dollar Loans to Base Rate Loans or to Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period, as of any day other than the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans, the Borrower shall reimburse each Lender in accordance with Section 2.16.
Each such election shall be made by delivering a notice (a 
Notice of Interest Rate Election
) to the Agent (i) at least one Domestic Business Day before such notice is to be effective if the relevant Loans are to be converted into Base Rate Loans or (ii) at least three EuroDollar Business Days before such conversion or continuation is to be effective if such Loans are to be converted into, or continued as, EuroDollar Loans.
A Notice of Interest Rate Election may, if it so specifies, apply to only a portion of the aggregate principal amount of the relevant Group of Loans;
provided
that (i) such portion is allocated ratably among the Loans comprising such Group and (ii) the portion to which such Notice applies, and the remaining portion to which it does not apply, are each $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000.
(b) Each Notice of Interest Rate Election shall specify:
(i) the Group of Loans (or portion thereof) to which such notice applies;
(ii) the date on which the conversion or continuation selected in such notice is to be effective, which shall comply with the applicable clause of Section 2.13(a);
(iii) whether such Group of Loans (or portion thereof) is to be converted to Base Rate Loans or EuroDollar Loans or continued as EuroDollar Loans for an additional Interest Period; and
(iv) if such Loans (or portions thereof) are to be converted to or continued as EuroDollar Loans, the duration of the Interest Period to be applicable thereto immediately after such conversion or continuation.
Each Interest Period specified in a Notice of Interest Rate Election shall comply with the provisions of the definition of Interest Period.
(c) Upon receipt of a Notice of Interest Rate Election from the Borrower pursuant to Section  2.13(a), the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and such notice shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower. If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Notice of Interest Rate Election to the Agent for any Euro-Dollar Loans, such Loans shall be converted into Base Rate Loans on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable thereto.
SECTION 2.14.
Prepayments
.  (a) The Borrower may (i) upon notice to the Agent to be received no later than 10:30 A.M. (New York City time), prepay (A) the
35
Base Rate Loans (including any Swingline Loans) or (B) any Money Market LIBOR Loans which bear interest at the Base Rate at such time for the reason stated in Section 8.01, in whole or in part, on any Domestic Business Day and (ii) upon at least two EuroDollar Business Days' notice to the Agent, prepay any Euro-Dollar Loan, in whole or in part, in amounts aggregating $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000 in the case of partial prepayments, by paying the principal amount to be prepaid together with accrued interest thereon to the date of prepayment;
provided
that a Money Market Loan may not be prepaid without the prior written consent of the Lender that holds such Money Market Loan, other than as contemplated by clause (i) above. Each such optional prepayment shall be applied to prepay ratably the relevant Loans of the several Lenders. Prepayment of a Euro-Dollar Loan on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto shall be subject to Section 2.16.
(b) Upon receipt of a notice of prepayment pursuant to this Section 2.14, the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and of such Lender's ratable share (if any) of such prepayment and such notice shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower.
SECTION 2.15.
General Provisions as to Payments
.  (a)  The Borrower shall make each payment of principal of, and interest on, the Loans, fees and reimbursements of LC Disbursements hereunder, not later than 12:00 Noon (New York City time) on the date when due, in Federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, to the Agent at its address referred to in its Administrative Questionnaire (or to an Issuing Bank, in the case of payments to be made directly to an Issuing Bank as expressly provided herein), without set-off or counterclaim. The Agent will promptly distribute to each Lender its ratable share of each such payment received by the Agent for the account of the Lenders, or to each applicable Issuing Bank in the case of payments for the account of one or more of the Issuing Banks. Whenever any payment of principal of, or interest on, any Base Rate Loans or fees shall be due on a day which is not a Domestic Business Day, the date for payment thereof shall be extended to the next succeeding Domestic Business Day. Whenever any payment of principal of, or interest on, the Euro-Dollar Loans and Money Market LIBOR Loans shall be due on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, the date for payment thereof shall be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day unless such Euro-Dollar Business Day falls in another calendar month or falls after the Maturity Date, in which case the date for payment thereof shall be the next preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day. Whenever any payment of principal of, or interest on, the Money Market Absolute Rate Loans shall be due on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, the date for payment thereof shall be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day. If the date for any payment of principal is extended by operation of law or otherwise, interest thereon shall be payable for such extended time.
(b) Unless the Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Lenders or one or more Issuing Banks hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment in full, the Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment in full to the Agent on such date and the Agent may, in reliance upon such assumption, cause to be distributed to each Lender or each applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, on such due date an amount equal to the
36
amount then due such Lender or such Issuing Bank. If and to the extent that the Borrower shall not have so made such payment, each Lender or each applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, shall repay to the Agent forthwith on demand such amount distributed to such Lender or such Issuing Bank together with interest thereon, for each day from the date such amount is distributed to such Lender or such Issuing Bank until the date such Lender or such Issuing Bank repays such amount to the Agent, at the Federal Funds Rate.
(c) If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of setoff or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans;
provided
that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this Section 2.15(c) shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary (as to which the provisions of this Section 2.15(c) shall apply). The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of setoff and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
SECTION 2.16.
Funding Losses
.  If the Borrower makes any payment of principal with respect to any Fixed Rate Loan or any Fixed Rate Loan is converted to a Base Rate Loan (pursuant to Section 2.13, Section 2.14, Article VI or Article VIII) on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto or the end of an applicable period fixed pursuant to Section 2.11(c), or if any Lender assigns any Fixed Rate Loan as required by Section 8.06 on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto, or if the Borrower fails to borrow or prepay any Fixed Rate Loan after notice has been given to any Lender in accordance with Section 2.06(a) or Section 2.14, the Borrower shall reimburse each Lender within 15 days after demand for any resulting loss or expense incurred by it (or by an existing or prospective Participant in the related Loan), including any loss reasonably incurred in obtaining, liquidating or employing deposits from third parties, but excluding loss of margin for the period after such payment or conversion or assignment or failure to borrow or prepay;
provided
that such Lender shall have delivered to the Borrower a certificate as to the amount of such loss or expense with an explanation of the calculation of such
37
loss or expense, which certificate shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith.
SECTION 2.17.
Computation of Interest and Fees
.  Interest based on the Prime Rate hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year) and paid for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). All other interest, facility fees, letter of credit fees and fronting fees hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and paid for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
SECTION 2.18.
Regulation D Compensation
.  For each day for which a Lender is required to maintain reserves in respect of either (x) 
Eurocurrency Liabilities
 (as defined in all regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) or (y) any other category of liabilities which includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate in Euro-Dollar Loans is determined or any category of extensions of credit or other assets which includes loans by a non-United States office of any Lender to United States residents, such Lender may require the Borrower to pay, contemporaneously with each payment of interest on the Euro-Dollar Loans, additional interest on the related Euro-Dollar Loan of such Lender at a rate per annum determined by such Lender up to but not exceeding the excess of (i) (A) the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate divided by (B) one
minus
the Euro-Dollar Reserve Percentage over (ii) the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate. Any Lender wishing to require payment of such additional interest (x) shall so notify the Borrower and the Agent, in which case such additional interest on the Euro-Dollar Loans of such Lender shall be payable to such Lender at the place indicated in such notice with respect to each Interest Period commencing at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days after the giving of such notice and (y) shall notify the Borrower at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days prior to each date on which interest is payable on the Euro-Dollar Loans of the amount then due to such Lender under this Section. Such Lender's notice to the Borrower shall set forth its calculation of such additional interest and such calculation shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith.
SECTION 2.19.
Defaulting Lenders
.  Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
(a) facility fees shall cease to accrue on the unused Commitment of such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.12(a);
(b) the Commitment and Credit Exposures of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether the Required Lenders or any other requisite Lenders have taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment, waiver or other modification pursuant to Section 9.04);
provided
that any amendment, waiver or other modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or all Lenders affected thereby shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender in accordance with the terms hereof;
38
(c) if any Swingline Exposure or LC Exposure exists at the time such Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender then:
(i) the Swingline Exposure (other than any portion thereof with respect to which such Defaulting Lender already shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Section 2.04(c)) and LC Exposure of such Defaulting Lender (other than any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements with respect to which such Defaulting Lender already shall have funded its participation as contemplated by Sections 2.05(e)) shall be reallocated among the Non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages but only to the extent that the sum of all Non-Defaulting Lenders' Credit Exposures plus such Defaulting Lender's Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure does not exceed the sum of all Non-Defaulting Lenders' Commitments;
(ii) if the reallocation described in clause (i) of this Section 2.19(c) cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrower shall, within two Domestic Business Days following the Borrower's receipt of notice from the Agent, (A) first, prepay the portion of the Defaulting Lender's Swingline Exposure that has not been reallocated and (B) second, at the Borrower's election either (1) cash collateralize for the benefit of the Issuing Banks, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.05(i), or (2) provide a backstop letter of credit in form and issued by a bank reasonably satisfactory to the Issuing Bank with respect to, the portion of the Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure that has not been reallocated for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
(iii) if the Borrower cash collateralizes or provides a backstop letter of credit with respect to any portion of a Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure pursuant to clause (ii) of this Section 2.19(c), the Borrower shall not be required to pay letter of credit fees payable pursuant to Section 2.12(b)(i) to such Defaulting Lender with respect to such portion of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure for so long as such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is cash collateralized or backstopped by a letter of credit;
(iv) if all or any portion of the Swingline Exposure or LC Exposure of a Defaulting Lender is reallocated pursuant to clause (i) above, then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to Sections  2.12(a) and 2.12(b) shall be adjusted to give effect to such reallocation; and
(v) if all or any portion of a Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is neither reallocated nor cash collateralized or backstopped by a letter of credit pursuant to clause (i) or (ii) of this Section 2.19(c), then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of any Issuing Bank or any other Lender hereunder, all facility fees payable under Section 2.12(a) that otherwise would have been
39
payable to such Defaulting Lender with respect to such portion of its LC Exposure, and all letter of credit fees payable pursuant to Section 2.12(b)(i) that otherwise would have been payable to such Defaulting Lender with respect to such portion of its LC Exposure shall be payable to the Issuing Banks (and allocated among them ratably based on the amount of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by each Issuing Bank) until and to the extent that such LC Exposure is reallocated and/or cash collateralized or backstopped by a letter of credit; and
(d) so long as any Lender is a Defaulting Lender, (i) the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any new Swingline Loan and (ii) no Issuing Bank shall be required to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit unless, in each case, the Swingline Lender or Issuing Bank, as applicable, is reasonably satisfied that (x) the related exposure from such new Swingline Loan or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit and the Defaulting Lender's then outstanding Swingline Exposure or LC Exposure, as applicable, will be fully covered by the Commitments of the Non-Defaulting Lenders and/or cash collateralized or backstopped by a letter of credit in accordance with Section 2.19(c), and (y) participating interests in any such new Swingline Loan or in any such issued, amended, renewed or extended Letter of Credit will be allocated among the Non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with Section 2.19(c)(i) (and the Defaulting Lender shall not participate therein).
(e) If the Agent, the Borrower, the Swingline Lender and each Issuing Bank shall agree that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the Swingline Exposures and LC Exposures of the Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such previously Defaulting Lender's Commitment, and on such date such previously Defaulting Lender shall purchase at par such of the Loans of the other Lenders as the Agent shall determine to be necessary in order for such previously Defaulting Lender to hold such Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage.
ARTICLE III
Conditions
SECTION 3.01.
Effectiveness
.  This Agreement shall become effective on the date that all of the following conditions shall have been satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.04):
(a) receipt by the Agent from each of the parties hereto of either (i) a counterpart hereof signed by such party or (ii) facsimile transmission or other written confirmation, in form satisfactory to the Agent, confirming that a counterpart hereof has been signed by such party;
(b) receipt by the Agent of a certificate signed by the Chief Financial Officer or the Vice President, Finance, of the Borrower, dated the Effective Date, to the effect that (i) no Default has occurred and is continuing as of the Effective Date and (ii) the representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in Article IV hereof are true in all material respects on, and as of, the Effective Date;
40
(c) receipt by the Agent of an opinion of William C. Baskin III, Esq., counsel to the Borrower, of Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP, special counsel to the Borrower, and of Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, Pennsylvania counsel to the Borrower, in each case given upon the Borrower's express instructions, substantially in the forms of Exhibits E-1, E-2 and E3 hereto, respectively;
(d) receipt by the Agent of all documents it may reasonably request relating to the existence of the Borrower, the corporate authority for and the validity of this Agreement, and any other matters relevant hereto, all in form and substance satisfactory to the Agent;
(e) the representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in Article IV hereof are true in all material respects on and as of the Effective Date;
(f) receipt by the Lenders of all the financial statements referred to in Section 4.04(a);
(g) (i) all fees, interest and other amounts accrued for the accounts of or owing to the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Agent under the Existing Credit Agreement, whether or not due and payable as of the Effective Date, shall have been paid or shall simultaneously be paid in full, (ii) no Loans or Letters of Credit shall be outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement on the Effective Date and (iii) all commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement shall have been terminated on the Effective Date (and each of the Lenders that is a party to the Existing Credit Agreement hereby waives any requirement of prior notice for such termination); and
(h) the Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable by the Borrower on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-ofpocket expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower; and
(i) Receipt by each Lender of all documentation and other information required by bank regulatory authorities under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA Patriot Act;
provided
that this Agreement shall not become effective or be binding on any party hereto unless all of the foregoing conditions are satisfied not later than April 30, 2012. The Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding on all parties hereto.
SECTION 3.02.
Borrowings
.  The obligation of any Lender (including the Swingline Lender) to make a Loan (including a Swingline Loan) on the occasion of any Borrowing and of any Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
(a) receipt by the Agent of a Notice of Borrowing as required by Section 2.02, 2.03 or 2.04 or receipt by the applicable Issuing Bank of a notice as required by Section 2.05(b), as the case may be;
41
(b) the fact that, immediately before and immediately after such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing;
(c) the fact that immediately after such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of the Loans plus the total LC Exposure will not exceed the aggregate amount of the Commitments;
(d) the fact that the representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in Article IV (other than those set forth in Sections 4.04(b) and 4.05) shall be true on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable; and
(e) the fact that (i) the Borrowing shall have been approved by the Chairman, the President, the Chief Executive Officer, the Executive Vice President, Strategy and Finance or the Chief Financial Officer of the Borrower or any one of their respective designees or (ii) the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of the Letter of Credit shall have been approved by the Executive Vice President, Strategy and Finance, the Chief Financial Officer, the Vice President, Finance, or the Treasurer of the Borrower.
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit hereunder shall be deemed to be a representation and warranty by the Borrower on the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, (i) as to the facts specified in Sections 3.02(b), 3.02(c) and 3.02(d) and as to the facts specified in Section 3.02(e)(i) (in the case of each Borrowing) or 3.02(e)(ii) (in the case of each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit), as applicable, and (ii) that such Borrowing or issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, would not cause the aggregate principal amount outstanding at any time under (x) this Agreement, (y) any other lines of credit heretofore or hereafter established or any other funds heretofore or hereafter borrowed by the Borrower pursuant to the resolutions of the board of directors of the Borrower dated as of October 13, 2000, as amended September 28, 2001, and April 26, 2002, and (z) any unsecured promissory notes of the Borrower issued pursuant to the resolutions of the board of directors of the Borrower dated as of October 13, 2000, as amended September 28, 2001, and April 26, 2002, to exceed $2,500,000,000, as such amount may be increased from time to time by a subsequent resolution of the board of directors of the Borrower,
provided
,
however
, that for purposes of this Agreement such increase will only take effect after a written notice thereof, in form reasonably satisfactory to the Agent, shall be delivered to the Agent by the Chief Financial Officer, the Corporate Secretary, the Assistant Corporate Secretary, the Secretary or the Assistant Secretary of the Borrower or any one of their respective designees.
42
ARTICLE IV
Representations and Warranties
The Borrower represents and warrants that:
SECTION 4.01.
Corporate Existence and Power
.  The Borrower (i) is a Pennsylvania corporation duly incorporated, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Pennsylvania, and (ii) has all corporate powers required to carry on its business as now conducted. Each of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries has all governmental licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals required to carry on its business as now conducted, the failure to obtain which would, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on the Borrower's ability to perform its obligations hereunder or on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
SECTION 4.02.
Corporate and Governmental Authorization; No Contravention
.  The execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of this Agreement are within its corporate powers, have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action, require no action by or in respect of, or advance filing with, any governmental body, agency or official and do not contravene, or constitute a default under, (i) any provision of the certificate of incorporation or by-laws of the Borrower, (ii) any applicable law or regulation or any judgment, injunction, order or decree binding upon the Borrower, or (iii) any material financial agreement or instrument of the Borrower.
SECTION 4.03.
Binding Effect
.  This Agreement constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Borrower and each Note, when executed and delivered in accordance with this Agreement, will constitute a valid and binding obligation of the Borrower, in each case enforceable in accordance with its terms except as may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally and by general principles of equity.
SECTION 4.04.
Financial Information
.  (a)  The Borrower has heretofore furnished to the Agent, for distribution to each of the Lenders, the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower as of December 31, 2011, and related consolidated statements of cash flows, income and retained earnings of the Borrower for the twelvemonth period then ended. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Borrower as of such date and for such period, in accordance with GAAP.
(b) Since December 31, 2011, there has not been nor is there reasonably likely to be any material adverse change in the business, assets, operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole;
provided
that the charges and other information disclosed in the Disclosure Documents shall be deemed not to constitute any such material adverse change.
43
SECTION 4.05.
Litigation
.  Except as disclosed in the Disclosure Documents, there is no action, suit or proceeding pending against, or to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened against or affecting, the Borrower or its Consolidated Subsidiaries before any court or arbitrator or any governmental body, agency or official in which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse decision which could materially adversely affect the business, consolidated financial position or consolidated results of operations of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries taken as a whole or which in any manner draws into question the validity of this Agreement.
SECTION 4.06.
Compliance with ERISA
.  Each member of the ERISA Group has fulfilled its obligations under the minimum funding standards of ERISA and the Internal Revenue Code with respect to each Plan and is not in violation of the presently applicable provisions of ERISA and the Internal Revenue Code where such violation would have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, and has not incurred any material liability to the PBGC or a Plan under Title IV of ERISA;
provided
that this Section 4.06 applies to the members of the ERISA Group only in their capacity as employers and not in any other capacity (such as fiduciaries or service providers to Plans for the benefit of employers of others).
SECTION 4.07.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
.  Each of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries has complied in all material respects with all applicable laws and material agreements binding upon it, except where any failure to comply therewith would not individually or collectively have a material adverse effect on the Borrower's ability to perform its obligations hereunder, and except where necessity of compliance therewith is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings;
provided
,
however
, that the sole representation and warranty with respect to compliance with ERISA is limited to Section 4.06.
SECTION 4.08.
Investment Company Act
.  The Borrower is not an investment company or a company controlled by an investment company within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
SECTION 4.09.
Full Disclosure
.  None of the Disclosure Documents or any other information furnished in writing by or on behalf of the Borrower to the Agent or any Lender for purposes of or in connection with this Agreement (in each case taken as a whole with all other information so furnished) contained, as of the time it was furnished, any material misstatement of fact or omitted as of such time to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein taken as a whole not materially misleading, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made;
provided
that with respect to information consisting of statements, estimates, projections and other forward looking information (collectively, the Projections), the Borrower represents only that such information has been prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed in good faith by the Borrower to be reasonable at the time of preparation thereof (it being understood that the Projections are subject to significant uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond the Borrower's control, and that no assurance can be given that the Projections will be realized).
44
SECTION 4.10.
Taxes
.  The Borrower has filed or caused to be filed all United States Federal income tax returns and all other material tax returns required to be filed by it and has paid or caused to be paid all material taxes required to have been paid by it, except taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Borrower has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP.
ARTICLE V
Covenants
The Borrower agrees that, so long as any Lender has any Commitment hereunder and so long as any Loan is outstanding hereunder, any Letter of Credit remains outstanding or any LC Disbursement has not been reimbursed:
SECTION 5.01.
Information
.  The Borrower will deliver to the Agent, for delivery by the Agent to each of the Lenders:
(a) as soon as available and in any event within 105
days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, the consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower as of the end of such fiscal year and the related consolidated statements of earnings and of cash flows for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on in a manner acceptable to the Securities and Exchange Commission and audited by KPMG LLP or other independent public accountants of nationally recognized standing;
(b) as soon as available and in any event within 55 days after the end of each of the first three quarters of each fiscal year of the Borrower, its Form 10-Q as of the end of such quarter;
(c) simultaneously with the delivery of each set of financial statements referred to in Sections 5.01(a) and 5.01(b), a certificate of a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower (i) stating whether any Default exists on the date of such certificate and, if any Default then exists, setting forth the details thereof and the action which the Borrower is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto and (ii) setting forth calculations demonstrating compliance, as of the date of the most recent balance sheet included in the financial statements being furnished at such time, with the covenants set forth in Sections 5.03 and 5.04(e);
(d) within five days after any officer of the Borrower obtains knowledge of any Default (other than one resulting from a failure to perform the covenant contained in paragraph (i) of this Section), if such Default is then continuing, a certificate of a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower setting forth the details thereof and the action which the Borrower is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto;
(e) promptly upon the mailing thereof to the shareholders of the Borrower generally, copies of all financial statements and reports, and proxy statements so mailed;
45
(f) promptly following a request therefor, any documentation or other information that a Lender reasonably requests in order to comply with its ongoing obligations under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA Patriot Act;
(g) from time to time such additional publicly available information regarding the financial position or business of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries as the Agent, at the request of any Lender, may reasonably request;
(h) prompt written notice after the occurrence of (i) any Reportable Event that, alone or together with any other Reportable Events that have occurred, or (ii) a failure to make a required installment or other payment (within the meaning of Section 412(n)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code) that, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower to the PBGC or to a Plan in an aggregate amount exceeding $50,000,000; and
(i) promptly after Moody's, Fitch or S&P shall have announced a change in the rating established for the Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower, written notice of such rating change.
Information required to be delivered pursuant to this Section shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date on which the Borrower provides notice to the Lenders that such information has been posted on the Borrower's website on the Internet at
http://www.aetna.com
or at
http://www.sec.gov
;
provided
that the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of the information referred to in this Section after the date delivery is required thereunder to any Lender which requests such delivery within 5 Business Days after such request.
SECTION 5.02.
Conduct of Business and Maintenance of Existence and Insurance
.  The Borrower will preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect, and will cause each Material Subsidiary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect, its respective corporate existence;
provided
that the foregoing shall not prohibit (i) the termination of the existence of any Material Subsidiary if the surviving entity (in the case of any such termination resulting from a merger or consolidation) or the entity to which substantially all such Material Subsidiary's assets are transferred (in the case of any other such termination) is or becomes a Material Subsidiary or is the Borrower or (ii) any transaction involving the Borrower in accordance with Section 5.05. The Borrower will also maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies, insurance (including self insurance), if reasonably available, in such amounts and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations.
SECTION 5.03.
Leverage Ratio
.  The Leverage Ratio as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Borrower ending after the date hereof will not exceed 0.50 to 1.00.
SECTION 5.04.
Liens
.  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Consolidated Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness
46
secured by any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, except:
(a) any Indebtedness secured by a Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary existing on the date hereof;
provided
that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only the Indebtedness which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
(b) any Indebtedness secured by a Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary after the date hereof prior to the time such Person becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary;
provided
that (i) such Indebtedness and Lien are not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Consolidated Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only the Indebtedness which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
(c) any Indebtedness secured by purchase money security interests in property or assets or improvements thereto hereafter acquired (or, in the case of improvements, constructed) by the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary;
provided
that (i) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred within 180 days of such acquisition (or construction), (ii) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the lesser of the cost or the fair market value of such property or assets or improvements at the time of such acquisition (or construction) and (iii) such security interests do not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary;
(d) any capitalized lease obligations secured by Liens;
provided
that such Liens do not extend to any property of the Borrower or its Consolidated Subsidiaries other than the property subject to the relevant capital lease; and
(e) Indebtedness secured by Liens that are not otherwise permitted by any of the foregoing provisions of this Section 5.04;
provided
that, at the time that any such Indebtedness is incurred or that any such Lien is granted (and after giving effect thereto), the aggregate outstanding principal amount of all Indebtedness secured by Liens permitted by this Section 5.04(e) shall not exceed 10% of the consolidated shareholders' equity of the Borrower (i) as of December 31, 2011, until the first consolidated financial statements of the Borrower are delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) and, thereafter, (ii) as of the most recent date for which a consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower has been delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b), determined in accordance with GAAP.
47
SECTION 5.05.
Consolidations, Mergers and Sales of Assets
.  The Borrower will not consolidate or merge with or into any other corporation or convey or transfer (or permit the conveyance or transfer of) all or substantially all of the properties and assets of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries to any other Person unless (i) the surviving or acquiring entity is a corporation organized under the laws of one of the United States, (ii) the surviving or acquiring corporation, if other than the Borrower, expressly assumes the performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement and all Notes, and (iii) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Default shall exist.
SECTION 5.06.
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit
.  The proceeds of the Loans made under this Agreement will be used by the Borrower for general corporate purposes. Letters of Credit issued under this Agreement may support obligations of Subsidiaries of the Borrower as well as the Borrower. None of such proceeds or Letters of Credit will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose, whether immediate, incidental or ultimate, of buying or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U.
SECTION 5.07.
Compliance with Laws
.  The Borrower will comply, and will cause its Consolidated Subsidiaries to comply, in all material respects with all applicable laws, except where any failure to comply therewith would not individually or collectively have a material adverse effect on the Borrower's ability to perform its obligations hereunder, and except where the necessity of compliance therewith is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings;
provided
,
however
, that with respect to compliance with ERISA, this Section 5.07 applies to the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries only in their respective capacities as employers and not in any other capacity (such as a fiduciary or service provider to Plans for the benefit of employers of others).
SECTION 5.08.
Inspection of Property, Books and Records
.  The Borrower will keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries (in all material respects) in conformity with GAAP shall be made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. The Borrower will permit representatives of any Lender at such Lender's expense to visit and inspect the Borrower's financial records and properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs and financial condition with the Borrower's officers and (with the participation of or prior notice to such officers) independent public accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested.
SECTION 5.09.
Payment of Obligations
.  The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Consolidated Subsidiaries to, pay its tax liabilities and other material obligations, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) (i) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and (ii) the Borrower or such Consolidated Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP or (b) the failure to make such payments could not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Borrower's ability to perform its obligations hereunder or on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
48
ARTICLE VI
Defaults
SECTION 6.01.
Events of Default
.  If one or more of the following events (
Events of Default
) shall have occurred and be continuing:
(a) the Borrower shall fail to pay when due any principal on any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement;
(b) the Borrower shall fail to pay within five Domestic Business Days of the date when due any fees or any interest on any Loan or LC Disbursement;
(c) the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant contained in Sections 5.01(d), 5.03 and 5.05;
(d) the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform, in any material respect, any covenant or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those covered by Sections 6.01(a), 6.01(b) or 6.01(c) above) and such failure shall have continued for a period of 30 days after written notice thereof has been given to the Borrower by the Agent at the request of any Lender;
(e) any representation, warranty, certification or statement made by the Borrower in this Agreement or in any certificate, financial statement or other document delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made (or deemed made);
(f) the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest) in respect of any indebtedness for borrowed money having an outstanding principal amount of $100,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) or more, when and as the same shall become due and payable; or any event or condition occurs that results in any outstanding indebtedness for borrowed money of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary having an outstanding principal amount of $100,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) or more becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity, or that enables or permits the holder or holders of such indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause such indebtedness to become due prior to its scheduled maturity;
(g) the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary shall commence a voluntary case or other proceeding seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief with respect to itself or its debts under any bankruptcy, insolvency or other similar law now or hereafter in effect or seeking the appointment of a trustee, receiver, liquidator, custodian or other similar official of it or all or substantially all of its property, or shall consent to any such relief or to the appointment of or taking possession by any such official in an involuntary case or other proceeding commenced against it, or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or shall fail generally to pay its debts as they become due, or shall take any corporate action to authorize any of the foregoing;
49
(h) an involuntary case or other proceeding shall be commenced against the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief with respect to it or its debts under any bankruptcy, insolvency or other similar law now or hereafter in effect or seeking the appointment of a trustee, receiver, liquidator, custodian or other similar official of it or all or substantially all of its property, and such involuntary case or other proceeding shall remain undismissed and unstayed for a period of 60 days; or an order for relief shall be entered against the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary under the federal bankruptcy laws as now or hereafter in effect;
(i) any person or group of persons (within the meaning of Section 13 or 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) shall have acquired beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 promulgated by the Securities and Exchange Commission under said Act) of more than 35% of the outstanding shares of common stock of the Borrower; or at any time Continuing Directors shall not constitute a majority of the board of directors of the Borrower;
(j) one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $50,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) shall be rendered against the Borrower, any Consolidated Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 60 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to levy upon assets or properties of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment; or
(k) a Reportable Event or Reportable Events, or a failure to make a required installment or other payment (within the meaning of Section 412(n)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code), shall have occurred with respect to any Plan or Plans that reasonably could be expected to result in liability of the Borrower to the PBGC or to a Plan in an aggregate amount exceeding $50,000,000 and, within 30 days after the reporting of any such Reportable Event to the Agent, the Agent shall have notified the Borrower in writing that (i) the Required Lenders have made a determination that, on the basis of such Reportable Event or Reportable Events or the failure to make a required payment, there are reasonable grounds (A) for the termination of such Plan or Plans by the PBGC, (B) for the appointment by the appropriate United States District Court of a trustee to administer such Plan or Plans or (C) for the imposition of liens in an amount exceeding $25,000,000 in favor of a Plan and (ii) as a result thereof an Event of Default exists hereunder; or a trustee shall be appointed by a United States District Court to administer any such Plan or Plans; or the PBGC shall institute proceedings to terminate any Plan or Plans;
then, and in every such event, the Agent shall (i) if requested by Lenders having more than 50% in aggregate amount of the Commitments, by notice to the Borrower terminate the Commitments and they shall thereupon terminate, and (ii) if requested by Lenders holding more than 50% in aggregate principal amount of the Committed Loans, Money Market Loans, LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure, by notice to the Borrower declare the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) to be, and the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) shall thereupon become, immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived
50
by the Borrower;
provided
that in the case of any of the Events of Default specified in Sections 6.01(g) or 6.01(h) above with respect to the Borrower, without any notice to the Borrower or any other act by the Agent or the Lenders, the Commitments shall thereupon terminate and the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) shall become immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
SECTION 6.02.
Notice of Default
.  The Agent shall give notice to the Borrower under Section 6.01(d) promptly upon being requested to do so by any Lender and shall thereupon notify all the Lenders thereof.
ARTICLE VII
The Agent
SECTION 7.01.
Appointment and Authorization
.  Each Lender and each Issuing Bank irrevocably appoints and authorizes the Agent to take such action as agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under this Agreement as are delegated to the Agent by the terms hereof, together with all such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. The institutions named on the cover page of this Agreement as co-syndication agents and arrangers are not authorized to take any action as agent on behalf of the Agent or on behalf of any Lender, and shall not have any rights, responsibilities, duties or any powers as an agent under this Agreement.
SECTION 7.02.
Agent and Affiliates
.  JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. shall have the same rights and powers under this Agreement as any other Lender and may exercise or refrain from exercising the same as though it were not the Agent, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate of the Borrower as if it were not the Agent hereunder.
SECTION 7.03.
Action by Agent
.  The obligations of the Agent hereunder are only those expressly set forth herein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Agent shall not be required to take any action with respect to any Default, except as expressly provided in Article VI.
SECTION 7.04.
Consultation with Experts
.  The Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it and shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with the advice of such counsel, accountants or experts.
SECTION 7.05.
Liability of Agent
.  Neither the Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents, or employees shall be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in connection herewith (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. Neither the Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents or employees shall be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain, inquire into or verify (i) any statement, warranty or
51
representation made in connection with this Agreement or any Borrowing hereunder; (ii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants or agreements of the Borrower; (iii) the satisfaction of any condition specified in Article III, except receipt of items required to be delivered to the Agent; or (iv) the validity, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement or any other instrument or writing furnished in connection herewith. The Agent shall not incur any liability by acting in reliance upon any notice, consent, certificate, statement, or other writing (which may be a bank wire, facsimile transmission or similar writing) reasonably believed by it to be genuine and to be signed by the proper party or parties.
SECTION 7.06.
Indemnification
.  Each Lender shall, severally and ratably in accordance with its Commitment (or outstanding Loans and LC Exposure, if the Commitments have terminated), indemnify the Agent (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrower) against any cost, expense (including counsel fees and disbursements), claim, demand, action, loss or liability (except such as result from the Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct) that the Agent may suffer or incur in connection with this Agreement or any action taken or omitted by the Agent hereunder.
SECTION 7.07.
Credit Decision
.  Each Lender and each Issuing Bank acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Agent or any other Lender or Issuing Bank, and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender and each Issuing Bank also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Agent or any other Lender or Issuing Bank, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking any action under this Agreement.
SECTION 7.08.
Successor Agent
.  The Agent may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Borrower. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right to appoint a successor Agent approved by the Borrower (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld). If no successor Agent shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders, and approved by the Borrower and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Agent gives notice of resignation, then the retiring Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, appoint a successor Agent, which shall be a commercial bank organized or licensed under the laws of the United States of America or of any State thereof and having a combined capital and surplus of at least two billion dollars. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Agent hereunder by a successor Agent, such successor Agent shall thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights and duties of the retiring Agent, and the retiring Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. After any retiring Agent's resignation hereunder as Agent, the provisions of this Article shall inure to its benefit as to any actions taken or omitted to be taken by it while it was Agent.
SECTION 7.09.
Agent's Fees
.  The Borrower shall pay to the Agent, for its own account, fees in the amounts and at the times previously agreed upon between the Borrower and the Agent.
52
SECTION 7.10.
Other Agents and Arrangers
.  It is agreed that the Co-Syndication Agents and Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Bookrunners named on the cover page of this Agreement shall, in their capacities as such, have no duties or responsibilities under this Agreement or liability in connection with this Agreement. Neither the Agent nor any such Co-Syndication Agent or Joint Lead Arranger and Joint Bookrunner, in its capacity as such, has or is deemed to have any fiduciary relationship with any Lender.
ARTICLE VII
Change in Circumstances
SECTION 8.01.
Basis for Determining Interest Rate Inadequate or Unfair
.  If on or prior to the first day of any Interest Period for any Euro-Dollar Loan or Money Market LIBOR Loan the Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that deposits in dollars (in the applicable amounts) are not generally available in the London interbank market for such period or that the London Interbank Offered Rate cannot be determined in accordance with the definition thereof, the Agent shall forthwith give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders, whereupon until the Agent notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension no longer exist, (i) the obligations of the Lenders to make Euro-Dollar Loans, to convert outstanding Base Rate Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans or to convert outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period shall be suspended, (ii) each outstanding Euro-Dollar Loan or Money Market LIBOR Loan, as the case may be, shall be converted into a Base Rate Loan on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable thereto, and (iii) unless the Borrower notifies the Agent at least two Domestic Business Days before the date of any Euro-Dollar Borrowing or Money Market LIBOR Borrowing, as the case may be, for which a Notice of Borrowing has previously been given that it elects not to borrow on such date, (x) if such Borrowing is a Euro-Dollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall instead be made as a Base Rate Borrowing and (y) if such Borrowing is a Money Market LIBOR Borrowing, the Money Market LIBOR Loans comprising such Borrowing shall bear interest for each day from and including the first day to but excluding the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto at the Base Rate for such day.
SECTION 8.02.
Illegality
.  If, on or after the date of this Agreement, the adoption of any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change in any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency shall make it unlawful or impossible for any Lender (or its Euro-Dollar Lending Office) to make, maintain or fund its Euro-Dollar Loans and such Lender shall so notify the Agent, the Agent shall forthwith give notice thereof to the other Lenders and the Borrower, whereupon until such Lender notifies the Borrower and the Agent that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension no longer exist, the obligation of such Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans, or to convert
53
outstanding Base Rate Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans, or to convert outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period shall be suspended. Before giving any notice to the Agent pursuant to this Section 8.02, such Lender shall designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for giving such notice and will not, in the judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender. If such notice is given, all Euro-Dollar Loans of such Lender then outstanding shall be converted to Base Rate Loans either (a) on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Euro-Dollar Loans if such Lender may lawfully continue to maintain and fund such Loans to such day or (b) immediately if such Lender may not lawfully continue to maintain and fund such Loans to such day.
SECTION 8.03.
Increased Cost and Reduced Return
.  (a)  If any applicable law, rule or regulation (including any treaty having the force of law), or any change in any applicable law, rule or regulation (including any treaty having the force of law), or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or any Issuing Bank with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency, made or adopted after the date hereof shall impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit (including any compulsory loan), insurance assessment or similar requirement (including any such requirement imposed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, but excluding, with respect to any Euro-Dollar Loan, any such requirement with respect to which such Lender is entitled to compensation during the relevant Interest Period under Section 2.18) against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or any Issuing Bank or shall impose on any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or any Issuing Bank or on the United States market for certificates of deposit or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense (including any taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings on its Loans or Letters of Credit or participations in the foregoing, its Commitment or other obligations or its deposits, reserves or other liabilities or capital attributable thereto, but excluding (i) Taxes, as defined in Section 8.04, (ii) taxes specifically excluded from the definition of Taxes in Section 8.04 and (iii) taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges and withholdings that (A) are imposed on such Lender or Issuing Bank by virtue of its inclusion in any category of  banks or financial institutions and (B) the amount of which is not a function, in whole or in part, of the amounts of loans, letters of credit, participations or commitments of the institutions subject thereto or of the funding thereof or the capital required to be maintained with respect thereto) and the result of any of the foregoing is to increase the cost to such Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or such Issuing Bank of making, continuing, converting into or maintaining any Fixed Rate Loan or participating in, issuing, renewing or maintaining any Letter of Credit, or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or such Issuing Bank under this Agreement or under its Note with respect thereto, by an amount reasonably deemed by such Lender or such Issuing Bank to be material, then, within 15 days after demand by such Lender or such Issuing Bank (with a copy to the Agent), the Borrower shall pay to such Lender or such Issuing Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank for such
54
increased cost or reduction.  Such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's notice to the Borrower and the Agent shall set forth an explanation of the foregoing in reasonable detail. 
(b) If any Lender or any Issuing Bank shall have determined that any applicable law, rule or regulation regarding capital adequacy or liquidity, or any change in any such law, rule or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or any request or directive regarding capital adequacy or liquidity (whether or not having the force of law) of any such Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency, made or adopted after the date hereof has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or Issuing Bank's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or Issuing Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by, or participations in Loans or Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or Issuing Bank or such Lender's or Issuing Bank's holding company could otherwise have achieved (taking into consideration such Lender's or Issuing Bank's policies and the policies of such Lender's or Issuing Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy or liquidity), and the amount of such reduction is reasonably determined by such Lender or such Issuing Bank to be material, then within 15 days of the Borrower's receipt of written demand by such Lender or such Issuing Bank (with a copy to the Agent), the Borrower shall pay to such Lender or such Issuing Bank such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Issuing Bank for such reduction in return. Such Lender's or such Issuing Bank's notice to the Borrower and the Agent shall set forth an explanation of the foregoing in reasonable detail.
(c) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Sections 8.03(a) and/or 8.03(b), (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a change in law after the date of this Agreement, whether enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued before or after the date of this Agreement.
(d) Each Lender and Issuing Bank will promptly notify the Borrower and the Agent of any event of which it has knowledge, occurring after the date hereof (other than any event deemed to have occurred after the date hereof solely as a result of Section 8.03(c)), which will entitle such Lender or such Issuing Bank to compensation pursuant to this Section 8.03 and will designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, such compensation and will not, in the judgment of such Lender or such Issuing Bank, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender or such Issuing Bank. Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or Issuing Bank's right to demand such compensation;
provided
that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender
55
or Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or expenses incurred or reductions suffered as a result of any change in law more than 120 days prior to the date that such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the change in law giving rise to such increased costs or expenses or reductions and of such Lender's or Issuing Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor;
provided
further
that, if the change in law giving rise to any such increased costs or expenses or reductions is retroactive, then the 120-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof. A certificate of any Lender or any Issuing Bank claiming compensation under Section 8.03(a) or 8.03(b) and setting forth the additional amount or amounts to be paid to it hereunder and describing the method of calculation thereof shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith. In determining such amount, such Lender or such Issuing Bank may use any reasonable averaging and attribution methods. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section 8.03, (i) no Lender or Issuing Bank shall be entitled to request compensation under this Section 8.03 for any costs imposed on such Lender or such Issuing Bank under the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act or Basel III or any taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings unless it shall be the general policy of such Lender or such Issuing Bank to seek compensation under comparable credit facilities with documentation under which it is entitled to such compensation, and (ii) no Lender or Issuing Bank shall be entitled to request compensation under this Section 8.03 in excess of the amount determined by it in good faith to represent the actual net cost, reduction in amounts received or reduction in return on capital referred to in Section 8.03(a) or 8.03(b), as the case may be, taking into account any tax or other benefits received by it in connection with such cost or reduction.
SECTION 8.04.
Taxes
.  (a)  For purposes of this Section 8.04, the following terms have the following meanings:
Taxes
 means any and all present or future taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings with respect to any payment by the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement or under any Note, and all liabilities with respect thereto,
excluding
(i) in the case of each Lender, each Issuing Bank and the Agent, taxes imposed on its income, and franchise or similar taxes imposed on it, by a jurisdiction under the laws of which such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent (as the case may be) is organized or in which its principal executive office is located or, in the case of each Lender, in which its Applicable Lending Office is located, (ii) in the case of each Lender, any United States Federal withholding tax imposed on such payments but only to the extent that such Lender is subject to United States Federal withholding tax at the time such Lender first becomes a party to this Agreement and (iii) any United States Federal withholding tax imposed under FATCA.
Other Taxes
 means any present or future stamp or documentary taxes and any other excise or property taxes, or similar charges or levies, which arise from any payment made pursuant to this Agreement or under any Note or from the execution or delivery of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement or any Note.
(b) Any and all payments by the Borrower to or for the account of any Lender, any Issuing Bank or the Agent hereunder or under any Note shall be made
56
without deduction for any Taxes or Other Taxes;
provided
that, if a withholding agent shall be required by law to deduct any Taxes or Other Taxes from any such payments, (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section 8.04) such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the withholding agent shall make such deductions, (iii) the withholding agent shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant taxation authority or other authority in accordance with applicable law, and (iv) the withholding agent shall furnish to the Agent, at the Agent's address referred to in Section 9.01, the original or a certified copy of a receipt evidencing payment thereof. Without prejudice to the rights of a Lender or Agent under Section 8.04(c), the Borrower shall timely pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority to the extent required by applicable law.
(c) The Borrower agrees to indemnify each Lender, each Issuing Bank and the Agent for the full amount of Taxes or Other Taxes (including any Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted by any jurisdiction on amounts payable under this Section 8.04) paid by such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent (as the case may be) and any liability (including penalties, interest and expenses, except to the extent attributable to the negligence or misconduct of such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent, as the case may be) arising therefrom or with respect thereto. This indemnification shall be made within 15 days from the date such Lender, such Issuing Bank or the Agent (as the case may be) makes demand therefor.
(d) Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Agent, within 15 days after demand therefor, for (i) any Taxes attributable to such Lender (but only to the extent that the Borrower has not already indemnified the Agent for such Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Borrower to do so), (ii) any taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings attributable to such Lender's failure to comply with the provisions of Section 9.05(e) relating to the maintenance of a Participant Register and (iii) any taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings (other than Taxes, as defined in Section 8.04(a) but without giving effect to clauses (i) and (ii) of the definition of such term, and Other Taxes)) attributable to such Lender, in each case, that are payable or paid by the Agent in connection with this Agreement or any Note, and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes or taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender by the Agent shall be conclusive absent manifest error. Each Lender hereby authorizes the Agent to set off and apply any and all amounts at any time owing to such Lender under this Agreement or any Note or otherwise payable by the Agent to such Lender from any other source against any amount due to the Agent under this Section 8.04(d).
(e) Each Lender that is not a United States Person within the meaning of Section 7701(a)(30) of the Internal Revenue Code, on or prior to the date of its execution and delivery of this Agreement in the case of each Lender listed on the signature pages hereof and on or prior to the date on which it becomes a Lender in the case of each other Lender, shall provide the Borrower and the Agent with (i) two Internal Revenue Service
57
(
IRS
) forms W-8 BEN or any successor form prescribed by the IRS, certifying that such Lender is entitled to benefits under an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party which exempts such Lender from United States Federal withholding tax or reduces the rate of withholding tax on payments of interest and eliminates withholding tax on any fees, or (ii) two IRS forms W-8ECI or any successor form prescribed by the IRS, certifying that the income receivable pursuant to this Agreement is effectively connected with the conduct of a trade or business in the United States. If the form provided by a Lender indicates a United States interest withholding tax rate in excess of zero, withholding tax at such rate shall be considered excluded from 
Taxes
 as defined in Section 8.04(a). Each such Lender undertakes to deliver to each of the Borrower and the Agent (A) a replacement form (or successor form) on or before the date that such form expires or becomes obsolete or after the occurrence of any event requiring a change in the most recent form so delivered by it, and (B) such amendments thereto or extensions or renewals thereof as may reasonably be required (but only so long as such Lender remains lawfully able to do so).
(f) If a payment made to a Lender under this Agreement or any Note would be subject to United States Federal withholding tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Borrower and the Agent at the time or times prescribed by law and at such other time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Agent such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Agent as may be necessary for the Borrower and the Agent to comply with their obligations under FATCA and to determine that such Lender has complied with such Lender's obligations under FATCA or to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment. Solely for purposes of this Section 8.04(f), the term FATCA shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the date of this Agreement.
(g) For any period with respect to which a Lender has failed to provide the Borrower with the appropriate form pursuant to Section 8.04(e) (unless such failure is due to a change in treaty, law or regulation occurring subsequent to the date on which a form originally was required to be provided), such Lender shall not be entitled to indemnification under Section 8.04(c) or Section 8.04(d) with respect to Taxes imposed by the United States;
provided
that if a Lender, which is otherwise exempt from or subject to a reduced rate of withholding tax, becomes subject to Taxes because of its failure to deliver a form required hereunder, the Borrower shall take such steps as such Lender shall reasonably request to assist such Lender to recover such Taxes.
(h) Each Lender will promptly notify the Borrower and the Agent of any event of which it has knowledge, occurring after the date hereof, which will entitle such Lender to make any claim for indemnification in respect of Taxes or Other Taxes pursuant to this Section 8.04 (each, a Tax Event) and will designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, such claim or any other amounts payable by the Borrower under this Section 8.04 and will not, in the judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such
58
Lender. Failure or delay on the part of any Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's right to demand such compensation;
provided
that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender pursuant to this Section for any Taxes incurred more than 120 days prior to the date that such Lender notifies the Borrower of the event giving rise to such Taxes and of such Lender's intention to claim compensation therefor;
provided
further
that, if any change in law giving rise to such Taxes is retroactive, then the 120-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
(i) Solely for purposes of this Section 8.04, the term Lender shall include any Issuing Bank.
SECTION 8.05.
Base Rate Loans Substituted for Affected Euro-Dollar Loans
.  If (i) the obligation of any Lender to make or maintain Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02 or (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03(a) and the Borrower shall, by at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days prior notice to such Lender through the Agent, have elected that the provisions of this Section shall apply to such Lender, then, unless and until such Lender notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension or demand for compensation no longer apply:
(a) all Loans which would otherwise be made by such Lender as (or continued as or converted into) Euro-Dollar Loans shall instead be Base Rate Loans, and
(b) after each of its outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans has been repaid (or converted to a Base Rate Loan), all payments of principal which would otherwise be applied to repay such Euro-Dollar Loans shall be applied to repay its Base Rate Loans instead.
If such Lender notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer apply, the Borrower shall elect that the principal amount of each such Base Rate Loan shall be converted into a Euro-Dollar Loan on the first day of the next succeeding Interest Period applicable to the related Euro-Dollar Loans of the other Lenders.
SECTION 8.06.
Substitution of Lender
.  If (i) the obligation of any Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02, (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03 or 8.04 or (iii) any Lender shall be a Declining Lender pursuant to Section 2.08(d) or a Defaulting Lender, the Borrower shall have the right to seek a substitute financial institution or financial institutions (
Substitute Lenders
) (which may be one or more of the Lenders) to purchase the Loans and assume the Commitment of such Lender (the 
Affected Lender
) under this Agreement and, if the Borrower locates a Substitute Lender, the Affected Lender shall, upon payment to it of the purchase price agreed between it and the Substitute Lender (or, failing such agreement, a purchase price in the amount of the outstanding principal amount of its Loans and accrued interest thereon to the date of payment) plus any amount (other than principal and interest) then due to it or accrued for its account hereunder, assign all its rights and obligations under this Agreement and all of its Notes to the Substitute Lender, and the Substitute Lender shall assume such rights and obligations, whereupon the
59
Substitute Lender shall be a Lender party to this Agreement and shall have all the rights and obligations of a Lender.
SECTION 8.07.
Election to Terminate
.  If during any Level I Period, Level II Period, Level III Period or Level IV Period (i) the obligation of any Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02, (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03 or 8.04 or (iii) a Lender is a Defaulting Lender, the Borrower may elect to terminate this Agreement as to such Lender, and in connection therewith not to borrow any Loan hereunder from such Lender or to prepay any Base Rate Loan made pursuant to Section 8.02 or 8.05 (without altering the Commitments or Loans of the remaining Lenders);
provided
that the Borrower (i) notifies such Lender through the Agent of such election at least two Euro-Dollar Business Days before any date fixed for such borrowing or such a prepayment, as the case may be, and (ii) repays all of such Lender's outstanding Loans, accrued interest thereon and any other amounts then due to such Lender or accrued for its account hereunder concurrently with such termination. Upon receipt by the Agent of such notice, the Commitment of such Lender shall terminate.
ARTICLE IX
Miscellaneous
SECTION 9.01.
Notices
.  (a) Subject to Section 9.01(b), all notices, requests and other communications to any party hereunder shall be in writing (including bank wire, facsimile transmission or similar writing) and shall be given to such party: (x) in the case of the Borrower or the Agent (or the Issuing Bank, if JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A. or Citibank, N.A.), at its address or facsimile number set forth on the signature pages hereof, (y) in the case of any Lender or any Issuing Bank (other than JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Bank of America, N.A. or Citibank, N.A.), at its address or facsimile number set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire (or as otherwise communicated in writing by the applicable Issuing Bank), (z) in the case of any party, such other address or facsimile number as such party may hereafter specify for the purpose by notice to the Agent and the Borrower. All notices from outside the United States to the Borrower shall only be given by facsimile transmission. Each such notice, request or other communication shall be effective (i) if given by facsimile transmission, when such facsimile transmission is transmitted to the number determined pursuant to this Section and the appropriate answerback is received, (ii) if given by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, when such return receipt is signed by the recipient or (iii) if given by any other means, when delivered at the address specified in this Section, or, if such date is not a business day in the location where received, on the next business day in such location;
provided
that notices to the Agent under Article II or Article VIII shall not be effective until received.
(b) Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder (including the delivery of information required by Section 5.01) may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Agent;
provided
that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Agent and the applicable Lender. The Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion,
60
agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it;
provided
that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
(c) The Borrower hereby acknowledges that the Agent will make available to the Lenders materials and/or information provided by or on behalf of the Borrower hereunder (collectively, 
Information Materials
) by posting the Information Materials on IntraLinks or another similar electronic system (the 
Platform
). THE PLATFORM IS PROVIDED AS IS AND AS AVAILABLE. THE AGENT DOES NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS OF THE INFORMATION MATERIALS OR THE ADEQUACY OF THE PLATFORM, AND EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS LIABILITY FOR ERRORS IN OR OMISSIONS FROM THE INFORMATION MATERIALS. NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OF THIRD PARTY RIGHTS OR FREEDOM FROM VIRUSES OR OTHER CODE DEFECTS, IS MADE BY THE AGENT IN CONNECTION WITH THE INFORMATION MATERIALS OR THE PLATFORM. In no event shall the Agent or any of its Affiliates have any liability to the Borrower, any Lender, or any other Person for losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses of any kind (whether in tort, contract or otherwise) arising out of the Borrower's or the Agent's transmission of Information Materials through the Internet, except to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and non-appealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the Agent;
provided
,
however
, that in no event shall the Agent have any liability to the Borrower, any Lender or any other Person for indirect, special, incidental, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages).
SECTION 9.02.
No Waivers
.  No failure or delay by the Agent or any Lender or any Issuing Bank in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder or under any Note shall operate as a waiver thereof nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege. The rights and remedies herein provided shall be cumulative and not exclusive of any rights or remedies provided by law.
SECTION 9.03.
Expenses; Indemnification
.  (a)  The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses of the Agent, including reasonable fees and disbursements of special counsel for the Agent, in connection with the preparation and administration of this Agreement, any waiver or consent hereunder or any amendment hereof or any Default or alleged Default hereunder, (ii) if an Event of Default occurs, all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Agent or any Lender or any Issuing Bank, including fees and disbursements of counsel, in connection with such Event of Default and collection and other enforcement proceedings resulting therefrom, and (iii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by any Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder.
61
(b) The Borrower agrees to indemnify the Agent, each Lender and each Issuing Bank and each of their respective Affiliates (including the institutions named as Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Bookrunners on the cover page of this Agreement), and the directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of each of the foregoing (each, an 
Indemnitee
) and hold each Indemnitee harmless from and against any and all liabilities, claims, losses, damages, penalties, costs and expenses of any kind, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel, which may be incurred by any Indemnitee relating to or arising out of (i) the structuring, arrangement and the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation, execution, delivery and administration of the Commitment Letter, the Fee Letters, this Agreement or any other agreement or instrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties to the Commitment Letter, the Fee Letters, this Agreement or the other documents of their obligations thereunder or the consummation of the any transactions contemplated thereby, (ii) the execution or delivery of this Agreement or the performance of the parties hereto of their respective obligations hereunder, (iii) any actual or proposed use of proceeds of Loans hereunder, (iv) any actual or proposed use of any Letter of Credit issued pursuant to this Agreement (including any refusal by any Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit) or (v) any claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto;
provided
that no Indemnitee shall have the right to be indemnified hereunder for its own gross negligence or willful misconduct as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction. To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of proceeds thereof.
(c) The agreements in this Section 9.03 shall survive the termination of the Commitments and this Agreement, and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of the Loans and all the other amounts due hereunder.
SECTION 9.04.
Amendments and Waivers
.  Any provision of this Agreement or the Notes may be amended or waived if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed by the Borrower and the Required Lenders (and, if the rights or duties of the Agent are affected thereby, by the Agent);
provided
that no such amendment or waiver shall, unless signed by each Lender directly affected thereby, (i) increase or, other than pursuant to Section 2.08(d), decrease the Commitment of any Lender or subject any Lender to any additional obligation, (ii) reduce or forgive the principal of or rate of interest on any Loan or LC Disbursement or any fees hereunder, (iii) postpone the date fixed for any payment of principal of or interest on any Loan or LC Disbursement or any fees hereunder or for any reduction or termination of any Commitment or (iv) change Section 2.09(c) or Section 2.15(c) or any other provision requiring the ratable sharing of payments or reduction of Commitments among the Lenders;
provided
further
that no such amendment or waiver shall (i) unless signed by all the Lenders, amend this Section 9.04 or otherwise change the percentage of the Commitments or of the aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Loans or LC Exposure,
62
or the number of Lenders, which shall be required for the Lenders or any of them to take any action under this Section 9.04 or any other provision of this Agreement; or (ii) amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of Issuing Banks without the prior written consent of each Issuing Bank.
SECTION 9.05.
Successors and Assigns
.  (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of an Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender and each Issuing Bank (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void), except as contemplated by Section 5.05. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of any Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit) and each Indemnitee) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
(b) Any Lender may assign to one or more assignees (other than to the Borrower, any of the Borrower's Affiliates or to any natural Person) all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it);
provided
that (i) each of the Agent, each Issuing Bank and, except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender, the Borrower must give their prior written consent to such assignment (which consents shall not be unreasonably withheld, it being understood that it shall be reasonable for the Borrower to withhold consent if the proposed assignee does not have an investment grade rating), (ii) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment (or, if the Commitments have terminated, the entire amount of its outstanding Committed Loans, Money Market Loans, LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure), the amount of the Commitment (or, if the Commitments have terminated, the amount of the outstanding Committed Loans, Money Market Loans, LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure) of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Agent otherwise consent, (iii) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, except that this clause (iii) shall not apply to rights in respect of outstanding Money Market Loans, (iv) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500 (except that such fee shall not be payable in the case of an assignment by a Lender to one of its Affiliates or to another Lender), and (v) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Agent an Administrative Questionnaire; and
provided
further
that any consent of the Borrower otherwise required under this Section 9.05(b) shall not be required if an Event of Default under Section 6.01(a), Section 6.01(b), Section 6.01(g) or Section 6.01(h) has occurred and is continuing . Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to Section 9.05(d), from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the
63
extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.16, 8.03, 8.05 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.05(b) shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with Section 9.05(e).
(c) The Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in The City of New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans owing to and LC Exposure of, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the 
Register
). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and the Borrower, the Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower, any Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
(d) Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in Section 9.05(b) and any written consent to such assignment required by Section 9.05(b), the Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this Section 9.05(d).
(e) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower, the Issuing Banks or the Agent, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (other than to the Borrower, any of the Borrower's Affiliates or to any natural Person) (a 
Participant
) in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it);
provided
that (i) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (iii) the Borrower, the Agent, the Issuing Banks and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement;
provided
that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.04 that affects such Participant. Subject to
64
Section 9.05(f), the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits, and subject to the obligations, of Sections 2.16, 2.18, 8.03 and 8.04 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to Section 9.05(b). Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as a non-fiduciary agent of the Borrower, maintain a register at one of its offices in the United States on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participant's interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the 
Participant Register
);
provided
that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participant's interest in any Commitments, Loans, Letters of Credit or its other obligations under this Agreement) to any Person except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such Commitment, Loan, Letter of Credit or other obligation is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary. For the avoidance of doubt, the Agent (in its capacity as Agent) shall have no responsibility for maintaining a Participant Register.
(f) A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 8.03 or 8.04 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower's prior written consent or by reason of the provisions of Section 8.02, 8.03 or 8.04 requiring such Lender to designate a different Applicable Lending Office under certain circumstances.
(g) Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest;
provided
that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
SECTION 9.06.
USA Patriot Act
.  Each Lender hereby notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Borrower in accordance with the requirements of the USA Patriot Act. The Borrower hereby agrees to cooperate with each Lender to provide such information promptly following a request therefor from such Lender.
SECTION 9.07.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
.  (a)This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
65
(b) Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims arising out of or relating to this Agreement brought by it or any of its Affiliates shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees, to the fullest extent permitted by law, that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.
(c) Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any court referred to in Section 9.07(b). Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(d) Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
SECTION 9.08.
Counterparts; Integration
.  This Agreement may be signed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile transmission or other electronic transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement and understanding among the parties hereto and supersedes any and all prior agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.
SECTION 9.09.
Headings
.  The headings in this Agreement are for reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement.
SECTION 9.10.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
.  EACH OF THE BORROWER, THE AGENT AND THE LENDERS HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
SECTION 9.11.
Confidentiality
.  (a) Each Lender agrees to maintain and to cause its Affiliates to maintain the confidentiality of all non-public information provided to it by the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or by the Agent on the Borrower's or such Subsidiary's behalf, under this Agreement, and neither it nor any of its Affiliates
66
shall use any such information other than in connection with or in enforcement of this Agreement or in connection with other business now or hereafter existing or contemplated with the Borrower or any Subsidiary; except to the extent such information (i) was or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of disclosure by such Lender or its Affiliates or their respective directors, officers, employees and agents, or (ii) was or becomes available on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries so long as such source is not, to the knowledge of such Lender, prohibited from disclosing such information by a legal, contractual or fiduciary obligation to the Borrower or any of its Affiliates;
provided, however,
that any Lender may disclose such information (A) at the request or pursuant to any requirement of any self-regulatory body, governmental body, agency or official to which such Lender or any of its Affiliates is subject or in connection with an examination of such Lender or Affiliate thereof by any such authority or body; (B) pursuant to subpoena or other court process; (C) when require to do so in accordance with the provisions of any applicable requirement of law; (D) to the extent reasonably required in connection with any litigation or proceeding to which the Agent, any Lender or their respective Affiliates may be party; (E) to the extent reasonably required in connection with the exercise of any remedy hereunder; (F) to such Lender's independent auditors, counsel, and any other professional advisors of such Lender who are advised of the confidentiality of such information; (G) to any Participant or assignee, actual or potential or to any direct or indirect contractual counterparties (or the professional advisors thereto) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations,
provided
that such Person agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to keep such information confidential to the same extent required of the Lenders hereunder; (H) as to any Lender or its Affiliate, as expressly permitted under the terms of any other document or agreement regarding confidentiality to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is party with such Lender or such Affiliate; (I) to its Affiliates and its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, provided that each such Affiliate, director, officer, employee or agent shall keep such information confidential to the same extent required of the Lenders hereunder; (J) to any other party to the Agreement; (K) to any rating agency when required by such rating agency in connection with rating such Lender, provided that, prior to any disclosure, such rating agency shall undertake in writing to preserve the confidentiality of any confidential information relating to the Borrower received by such rating agency from the Agent or any Lender; and (L) disclosure on a confidential basis to the CUSIP Service Bureau or any similar agency in connection with the issuance and monitoring of CUSIP numbers with respect to the Loans. Each Lender shall be responsible for any breach of this Section 9.11 by any of its Affiliates or any of its or its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents.
(b) Each Lender acknowledges that all information, including requests for waivers and amendments, furnished by the Borrower or the Agent pursuant to or in connection with, or in the course of administering, this Agreement will be syndicate-level information, which may contain MNPI. Each Lender represents to the Borrower and the Agent that (i) it has developed compliance procedures regarding the use of MNPI and that it will handle MNPI in accordance with such procedures and applicable law, including Federal, state and foreign securities laws, and (ii) it has identified in its Administrative Questionnaire a credit contact who may receive information that may
67
contain MNPI in accordance with its compliance procedures and applicable law, including Federal, state and foreign securities laws.
(c) The Borrower and each Lender acknowledges that, if information furnished by the Borrower pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement is being distributed by the Agent through the Platform, (i) the Agent may post any information that the Borrower has indicated as containing MNPI solely on that portion of the Platform designated for Private Side Lender Representatives and (ii) if the Borrower has not indicated whether any information furnished by it pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement may contain MNPI, the Agent reserves the right to post such information solely on that portion of the Platform designated for Private Side Lender Representatives. With respect to any information provided by or on behalf of the Borrower, at the reasonable request of the Agent, the Borrower agrees to use commercially reasonable efforts to inform the Agent of whether or not the information provided may contain MNPI, and the Agent shall be entitled to rely on any such communication by the Borrower without liability or responsibility for the independent verification thereof.
SECTION 9.12.
No Fiduciary Relationship
.  The Borrower, on behalf of itself and the Subsidiaries, agrees that in connection with all aspects of the transactions contemplated hereby and any communications in connection therewith, the Borrower, the Subsidiaries and their Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Bank and their Affiliates, on the other hand, will have a business relationship that does not create, by implication or otherwise, any fiduciary duty on the part of the Agent, the Lenders, the Issuing Bank or their Affiliates, and no such duty will be deemed to have arisen in connection with any such transactions or communications.
SECTION 9.13.
Severability.
Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
68
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention : Vice President, Finance
Fax: (860) 273-1314
with a copy to:
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: General Counsel
Fax: (860) 273-8340
69
70
71
SIGNATURE PAGE TO AETNA INC. CREDIT AGREEMENT
* For use by any Lender requiring a second signature line.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120426063043.txt.gz
TIME:20120426063043
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 26, 2012, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended March 31, 2012. A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA REPORTS FIRST-QUARTER 2012 RESULTS
HARTFORD, Conn., 
April 26, 2012
- Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced
first
-quarter 2012 operating earnings
(1)
of $
477.4 million
, or $
1.34
per share. This operating result compares to the $1.14 per share reported in the first quarter of 2011, excluding the impact of favorable prior-years reserve development in 2011. The increase in first-quarter 2012 operating earnings excluding prior-years development is a continuation of our strong operating performance and the positive momentum in our core business. First-quarter 2011 operating earnings including favorable prior-years reserve development of approximately $112 million were $1.43 per share. There was no significant prior-years reserve development in the first quarter of 2012. Net income for the
first
quarter of 2012 was
$511.0 million
, or
$1.43
per share, including $
.09
per share of net realized capital gains. Net income for the
first
quarter of 2011 was
$586.0 million
, or
$1.50
per share, including
$.07
per share of net realized capital gains.
Aetna/
2
Our first-quarter results are a good start to the year, and we expect continued strong performance in 2012, said Mark T. Bertolini, Aetna chairman, CEO and president. We're balancing growth and profitability, and are confident of our ability to increase membership over the course of this year to 18.2 million medical members. We're seeing positive momentum in our 2013 selling season with early National Accounts wins and new business opportunities that are twice what they were a year ago. Customers are beginning to return to Aetna's integrated solutions that deliver better value and health outcomes.
Aetna also is taking concrete steps toward our long-term goal of making health care more accessible and affordable. Already this year, we launched our consumer digital platform to give people a personalized, coherent experience to manage their health. We also were privileged to be awarded Medicaid contracts in Missouri and Ohio to help their at-risk populations access high-quality, cost-effective care, said Bertolini.
Aetna's results in the first quarter are evidence of the rigor with which we manage our business, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, Aetna senior executive vice president and CFO. In addition to strong commercial underwriting margins, Aetna posted 6 percent year-over-year revenue growth. Our financial position, capital structure, and liquidity all continue to be very strong.
We're executing on the core business and expanding our emerging business, where we're advancing our goal of transforming the network model to address the nation's health care cost and quality challenges. Our fast-growing base of opportunities with health systems around the country reflects the value that providers see in Aetna's Accountable Care Solutions business. We believe Aetna's strategy to invest in innovation that improves health care delivery and to capitalize on opportunities for profitable growth will enable us to continue generating operating earnings growth, said Zubretsky.
Aetna/
3
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
Aetna/
4
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily qualified pension plans, reported:
Total company results
Aetna/
5
Aetna's conference call to discuss
first
-quarter 2012 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetna's Investor Information website.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 800-967-7135 or +1-719-457-2710 for
international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 1470071. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or +1-719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 1470071. Telephone replays will be available from 11 a.m. ET on April 26, 2012, until 11 p.m. ET on May 10, 2012.
Aetna/
6
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.1 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities, Medicaid health care management services and health information technology services. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, health care providers, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
Aetna/
7
Aetna/
8
Aetna/
9
Aetna/
10
Aetna/
11
Aetna/
12
Aetna/
13
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
For the periods covered in this press release, the following item is excluded from operating earnings because we believe it neither relates to the ordinary course of our business nor reflects our underlying business performance:
This press release also includes presentations of operating earnings, operating earnings per share, health care costs and medical benefit ratios for the three months ended March 31, 2011 excluding development of prior-years health care cost estimates. Management believes these measures provide a useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period where there are significant differences in prior-years development from period to period.
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and 12 of this press release.
(2)
Projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses or any such other items and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2012 reflect a range of approximately 350 million to 353 million weighted average diluted shares.
(3)
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in
(1)
above. Refer to the tables on pages 9, 10 and 12 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(4)
The business segment operating expense ratio reflects the exclusion of the Corporate Financing segment from operating expenses and excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any. For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 10 of this press release.
(5)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetna's profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetna's pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetna's performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes. Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (benefits).
(8)
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetna's Commercial medical membership.
(9)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetna's dental provider network for a nominal fee.
Aetna/
14
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, medical membership, operating earnings growth and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, the pending U.S. Supreme Court ruling on the constitutionality of health care reform and the 2012 presidential election create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report") on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC) and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 ("Aetna's Quarterly Report") when filed with the SEC. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120504092729.txt.gz
TIME:20120504092729
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
Item 1.01  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On May 1, 2012, Aetna Inc. (the Company) executed a Pricing Agreement (the Pricing Agreement) with Barclays Capital Inc., Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, as representatives of the underwriters named in Schedule I thereto (together, the Underwriters), pursuant to which the Company agreed to issue and sell to the Underwriters $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.750% senior notes due May 15, 2017 and $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 4.500% senior notes due May 15, 2042 (collectively, the Senior Notes).  The Pricing Agreement incorporated by reference the terms of an Underwriting Agreement (the Underwriting Agreement) of the Company dated as of May 1, 2012.  The sale of the Senior Notes was registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission in a Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-178272) (the Registration Statement).  The Senior Notes were offered pursuant to a prospectus dated December 2, 2011 and a prospectus supplement dated May 1, 2012.  The issuance of the Senior Notes is scheduled to close on May 4, 2012.
In connection with the offering and sale of the Senior Notes, on May 4, 2012, a supplemental indenture of the Company was executed with U.S. Bank National Association, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the Trustee), to establish and designate the Senior Notes and the terms and characteristics of the Senior Notes (the Supplemental Indenture).  The Supplemental Indenture was executed pursuant to the Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 between the Company and the Trustee (the Base Indenture).  The Senior Notes were issued pursuant to the Base Indenture, as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture.
The Underwriting Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report, the Pricing Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 1.2 to this Current Report, the Supplemental Indenture, which is filed as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report and the Base Indenture, which was filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Registration Statement filed on December 2, 2011, are each incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 1.01.
Item 8.01.  Other Events.
A copy of the opinion of Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP, special New York counsel to the Company, relating to the legality of the Senior Notes, is filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this Current Report.  A copy of the opinion of Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel to the Company, as to certain matters governed by Pennsylvania law, is filed as Exhibit 5.2 to this Current Report.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibits are filed as part of this Current Report:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
 
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
To the Underwriters
to be named in the applicable
Pricing Agreement
supplemental hereto
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
From time to time, Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the Company), proposes to enter into one or more Pricing Agreements (each a Pricing Agreement) in the form of Annex I hereto, with such additions and deletions as the parties thereto may determine, and, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and therein, to issue and sell to the firms named in Schedule I to the applicable Pricing Agreement (such firms constituting the Underwriters with respect to such Pricing Agreement and the securities specified therein) certain debt securities of the Company (the Securities) specified in Schedule II to such Pricing Agreement (with respect to such Pricing Agreement, the Designated Securities), less the Designated Securities covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts (aherein sometimes referred to as Contract Securities and the Designated Securities to be purchased by the Underwriters (after giving effect to the deduction, if any, for Contract Securities) being herein sometimes referred to as Underwriters Securities).
s defined in Section 4 hereof), if any, as provided in Section 4 hereof and as may be specified in Schedule II to such Pricing Agreement (with respect to such Pricing Agreement, any Designated Securities to be covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts being
 
The terms and rights of any particular issuance of Designated Securities shall be as specified in the Pricing Agreement relating thereto and in or pursuant to the indenture (the Indenture) identified in Schedule II to such Pricing Agreement.
 
 
 
 
1.  Particular sales of Designated Securities may be made from time to time to the Underwriters of such Securities, for whom the firms designated as representatives of the Underwriters of such Securities in the Pricing Agreement relating thereto will act as representatives (the Representatives). The term Representatives also refers to a single firm acting as sole representative of the Underwriters and to Underwriters who act without any firm being designated as their representative. Except as incorporated by reference into a Pricing Agreement, this Agreement shall not be construed as an obligation of the Company to sell any of the Securities or as an obligation of any of the Underwriters to purchase any of the Securities. The obligation of the Company to issue and sell any of the Securities and the obligation of any of the Underwriters to purchase any of the Securities shall be evidenced by the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities specified therein. Each Pricing Agreement shall specify, among other things, the aggregate principal amount of such Designated Securities, the initial public offering price of such Designated Securities, the purchase price to the Underwriters of such Designated Securities, the names of the Underwriters of such Designated Securities, the names of the Representatives of such Underwriters, the principal amount of such Designated Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter and whether any of such Designated Securities shall be covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts, and shall set forth the date, time and manner of delivery of such Designated Securities and payment therefor. A Pricing Agreement shall be in the form of an executed writing (which may be in counterparts), and may be evidenced by an exchange of telegraphic communications or any other rapid transmission device designed to produce a written record of communications transmitted. The obligations of the Underwriters under this Agreement and each Pricing Agreement shall be several and not joint.
 
2.   The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Commission) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the Act), a registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-178272), including a prospectus (the Basic Prospectus), relating to certain securities, including the Securities, to be issued from time to time by the Company.  The Company has also filed, or proposes to file, with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424 under the Act a prospectus supplement specifically relating to the Designated Securities (the Prospectus Supplement).  The registration statement, as amended at the time it becomes effective with respect to the Designated Securities, including the information, if any, deemed pursuant to Rule 430B or 430C under the Act to be part of the registration statement at the time of such effectiveness, is referred to herein as the Registration Statement; and as used herein, the term Prospectus means the Basic Prospectus as supplemented by the prospectus supplement specifically relating to the Designated Securities in the form first used (or made available upon request of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the Act) in connection with confirmation of sales of the Designated Securities and the term Preliminary Prospectus means any preliminary prospectus supplement
 
 
2
 
 
specifically relating to the Designated Securities, as identified in Schedule III to the Pricing Agreement for the Designated Securities, together with the Basic Prospectus.  References herein to the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein.  The terms supplement, amendment and amend as used herein with respect to the Registration Statement, the Basic Prospectus, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed by the Company under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (the Exchange Act) subsequent to the date of the Pricing Agreement which are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein.
 
At or prior to the time when sales of the Designated Securities will be first made (as specified in Schedule III to the Pricing Agreement for the offering of Designated Securities, the Time of Sale), the Company will prepare certain information (collectively, and together with any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information) which information will be identified in Schedule III to the Pricing Agreement for such offering of Designated Securities.
 
3.  The Company represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each of the Underwriters that:
 
(a)  The Registration Statement is an automatic shelf registration statement as defined under Rule 405 of the Act that has been filed with the Commission not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been received by the Company.  No stop order or any order preventing or suspending the use of, or suspending the effectiveness of, the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act has been issued by the Commission, and, to the knowledge of the Company, no proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Act against the Company or related to the offering of the Designated Securities has been initiated or threatened by the Commission.
 
(b)  The Registration Statement and the Prospectus conform, and any further amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus will conform, in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended (the Trust Indenture Act), and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and do not and will not, as of the applicable effective date as to the Registration Statement and any amendment thereto and as of the applicable filing date as to the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein (i) in the case of the Registration Statement, not misleading and (ii) in the case of the Prospectus, in the light of the circumstances
 
 
3
 
 
under which they were made, not misleading; provided, however, that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter of Designated Securities through the Representatives for use in the Prospectus as amended or supplemented relating to such Designated Securities;
 
(c)  The Time of Sale Information did not as of the Time of Sale contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided, however, that this representation and warranty shall not apply to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished in writing to the Company by an Underwriter of Designated Securities through the Representatives for use in such Time of Sale Information relating to such Designated Securities;
 
(d)  The Company is a well-known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 under the Act) and is not an ineligible issuer pursuant to Rules 164, 405 and 433 under the Act.  Any free writing prospectus (as defined in Rule 405 under the Act) that the Company is required to file pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act with respect to the Designated Securities (an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus) has been, or will be, filed with the Commission in accordance with the requirements of the Act.  Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus complies or will comply in all material respects with the requirements of the Act, did not or does not include any information that conflicts with the information contained in the Registration Statement and, when taken together with the Preliminary Prospectus, did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company makes no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information relating to any Underwriter furnished to the Company in writing by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.  Except for any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus identified in Schedule III to the Pricing Agreement, and electronic road shows, if any, furnished to the Representatives before first use, the Company has not used or approved, and will not, without the Representatives prior consent, use or approve, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus;
 
(e)  The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly subsisting as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania; the Company is duly qualified to transact business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction in which the conduct of its business or its ownership or leasing of property requires such qualification, except where the failure to be so qualified or in good standing would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole;
 
 
4
 
(f)  The Designated Securities have been duly authorized by the Company; and, when the Designated Securities are issued, executed, authenticated, delivered and paid for pursuant to this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to such Designated Securities and the Indenture and, in the case of any Contract Securities, pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts with respect to such Contract Securities, such Designated Securities will have been duly issued, executed and delivered and will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity);
 
(g)  The Indenture, which will be substantially in one of the forms filed as an exhibit tization, execution and delivery by the trustee under such Indenture (the Trustee), the Indenture will constitute a valid and legally binding instrument of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity); and the Indenture conforms, and the Designated Securities will conform, in all material respects, to the descriptions thereof contained in the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented with respect to such Designated Securities;
o the Registration Statement, has been duly authorized by the Company and, at the Time of Delivery (as defined in Section 5 hereof) for such Designated Securities, the Indenture will be duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act and, assuming due author
 
(h)  The issuance and sale of the Designated Securities and the compliance by the Company with all of the provisions of the Designated Securities, the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and any Pricing Agreement, and the consummation of the transactions herein and therein contemplated will not (1) conflict with or result in a breach or violation by the Company of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default by the Company under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other similar agreement or instrument to which the Company is a party or by which the Company is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company is subject, except, in all such cases, for such conflicts, breaches, violations or defaults as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, or would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities, or (2) result in any violation of (A) the provisions of the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company or (B) any
 
 
5
 
 
statute of the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or any order, rule or regulation of any court or governmental agency or body of the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties; provided, however,ld not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities; provided further, that insofar as this representation and warranty relates to the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Indenture, this Agreement, the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, and the Designated Securities, such performance is subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity);
that in the case of clause (B) of this paragraph 3(h), this representation and warranty shall not extend to such violations as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or wou
 
(i)  No consent, approval, authorization, order, registration, filing or qualification of or with any court or governmental agency or body of the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania is required for the issuance and sale of the Designated Securities by the Company or the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or any Pricing Agreement or the Indenture or any Delayed Delivery Contract except such as have been, or will have been, prior to the Time of Delivery, obtained under the Act and the Trust Indenture Act and such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations, filings or qualifications as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws or insurance securities laws of any such jurisdiction in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Designated Securities by the Underwriters, and except those which, if not obtained, will not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities by the Company;
 
(j)  In the event any of the Designated Securities are purchased pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts, each of such Delayed Delivery Contracts has been duly authorized by the Company and, when executed and delivered by the Company and the purchaser named therein, will constitute a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to (1) bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, fraudulent transfer, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally and (2) general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity); and any Delayed Delivery Contracts will conform, in all material respects, to the
 
 
6
 
 
descriptions thereof contained in the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented with respect to such Designated Securities; and
 
(k)  Aetna Life Insurance Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Connecticut; all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Aetna Life Insurance Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable, and are owned directly or indirectly by the Company.
 
(l)  The financial statements and the related notes thereto included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus comply in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Act and the Exchange Act, as applicable, and present fairly the financial position of the Company and its subsidiaries as of the dates indicated and the results of their operations and the changes in their cash flows for the periods specified; except as disclosed therein, such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods covered thereby; the supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference  in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein; and the other financial information included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus has been derived from the accounting records of the Company and its subsidiaries and presents fairly the information shown thereby.
 
(m)  The Company and its subsidiaries maintain an effective system of disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commissions rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Companys management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.  The Company and its subsidiaries have carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as required by Rule 13a-15 of the Exchange Act.
 
(n)  The Company and its subsidiaries maintain systems of internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act and have been designed by, or under the supervision of, their respective principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including, but not limited to, internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with managements general or specific authorizations;
 
 
7
 
 
(ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain asset accountability; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with managements general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.  Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there are no material weaknesses in the Companys internal controls.
 
4.  Upon the execution of the Pricing Agreement applicable to any Designated Securities, the several Underwriters propose to offer such Underwriters Securities for sale upon the terms and conditions set forth in the Prospectus as amended or supplemented.
 
The Company may specify in Schedule II to the Pricing Agreement applicable to any Designated Securities that the Underwriters are authorized to solicit offers to purchase Designated Securities from the Company pursuant to delayed delivery contracts (Delayed Delivery Contracts), substantially in the form of Annex II hereto but with such changes therein as the Representatives and the Company may authorize or approve. If so specified, the Underwriters will endeavor to make such arrangements and, as compensation therefor, the Company will pay to the Representatives, for the accounts of the Underwriters, at the Time of Delivery, such commission, if any, as may be set forth in such Pricing Agreement. Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, are to be with investors of the types described in the Time of Sale Information and subject to other conditions therein set forth. The Underwriters will not have any responsibility with respect to the validity or performance of any Delayed Delivery Contracts.
 
The principal amount of Contract Securities to be deducted from the principal amount of Designated Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter as set forth in Schedule I to the Pricing Agreement applicable to such Designated Securities shall be, in each case, the principal amount of Contract Securities which the Company has been advised by the Representatives have been attributed to such Underwriter, provided that, if the Company has not been so advised, the amount of Contract Securities to be so deducted shall be, in each case, that proportion of Contract Securities which the principal amount of Designated Securities to be purchased by such Underwriter under such Pricing Agreement bears to the total principal amount of the Designated Securities (rounded as the Representatives may determine). The total principal amount of Underwriters Securities to be purchased by all the Underwriters pursuant to such Pricing Agreement shall be the total principal amount of Designated Securities set forth in Schedule I to such Pricing Agreement less the principal amount of the Contract Securities so set forth. If the Company determines to enter into Delayed Delivery Contracts, the Company will deliver to the Representatives not later than 3:30 p.m., New York City time, on the third business day preceding the Time of Delivery specified in the applicable Pricing Agreement (or such other time and
 
 
8
 
 
date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing) a written notice setting forth the principal amount of Contract Securities.
 
5.  Underwriters Securities to be purchased by each Underwriter pursuant to the Pricing Agreement relating thereto, in definitive form to the extent practicable, and in such authorized denominations and registered in such names as the Representatives may request upon at least twenty-four hours prior notice to the Company, shall be delivered by or on behalf of the Company to the Representatives for the account of such Underwriter, against payment by such Underwriter or on its behalf of the purchase price therefor by wire transfer to a bank account specified by the Company and specified in Schedule II to the Pricing Agreement, in federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, all at the place and the time and date specified in such Pricing Agreement or at such other place and time and date as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing, such time and date being herein called the Time of Delivery for such Securities.
 
Concurrently with the delivery of and payment for the Underwriters Securities, the Company will deliver to the Representatives, for the accounts of the Underwriters, a check payable to the order of the party designated in the Pricing Agreement relating to such Securities in
the amount of any compensation payable by the Company to the Underwriters in respect of any Delayed Delivery Contracts as provided in Section 4 hereof and the Pricing Agreement relating to such Securities.
 
6.  The Company agrees with each of the Underwriters of any Designated Securities:
 
(a)  To prepare the Prospectus as amended and supplemented in relation to the applicable Designated Securities and to file such Prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act not later than the Commissions close of business on the second business day following the execution and delivery of the Pricing Agreement relating to the applicable Designated Securities or, if applicable, such other time as may be required by Rule 424(b) and Rule 430B or 430C under the Act; to file any free writing prospectus to the extent required by Rule 433 under the Act; to advise the Representatives promptly of any proposal to (i) use or approve any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or (ii) amend or supplement the Registration Statement or Prospectus as amended or supplemented, in each case after the date of the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated Securities and prior to the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, and to afford the Representatives a reasonable opportunity to comment on any such proposed Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement or Prospectus; for so long as the delivery of a prospectus is required under the Act in connection with the offering or sale of the Designated Securities, to advise the Representatives promptly of the issuance by the Commission of (A) any request by the Commission to amend or supplement the Registration Statement or Prospectus, (B) any stop order or any order preventing or suspending
 
 
9
 
 
the use of any prospectus relating to the Designated Securities, (C) any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Act or (D) the suspension of the qualification of such Designated Securities for offering or sale in any jurisdiction or of the initiation of any proceeding for any such purpose; and, in the event of the issuance of any such stop order or of any such order preventing or suspending the use of any prospectus relating to the Designated Securities or suspending any such qualification, to use promptly its best efforts to obtain the withdrawal of such order;
 
(b)  Promptly from time to time to endeavor to take such action as the Representatives may reasonably request to qualify such Designated Securities for offering and sale under the securities laws of such jurisdictions of the United States as the Representatives may reasonably request and such other jurisdictions as the Company and the Representatives may agree and to comply with such laws so as to permit the continuance of sales and dealings therein in such jurisdictions for as long as may be necessary to complete the distribution of such Designated Securities, provided that in connection therewith the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any jurisdiction, and provided further that in connection therewith the Company shall not be required to qualify such Designated Securities for offering and sale under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction for a period in excess of nine months after the initial time of issue of the Prospectus as amended or supplemented relating to such Designated Securities;
 
(c)  To furnish the Underwriters with copies of the Prospectus as amended or supplemented and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (if applicable) in such quantities as the Representatives may from time to time reasonably request, and, if the delivery of a prospectus (or in lieu thereof the notice required under Rule 173 of the Securities Act) is required at any time in connection with the offering or sale of the Designated Securities and if at such time any event shall have occurred as a result of which the Prospectus or any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, taken together with the Preliminary Prospectus, as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such Prospectus (or in lieu thereof the notice required under Rule 173 of the Securities Act) or any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus is delivered, not misleading, or, if for any other reason it shall be necessary during such same period to amend or supplement the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in order to comply with the Act or the Exchange Act, to notify the Representatives and to file such document and to prepare and furnish without charge to each Underwriter and to any dealer in securities as many copies as the Representatives may from time to time reasonably request of any amended Prospectus or a supplement to the Prospectus which will correct such statement or omission or effect such compliance; provided, however, that in case any Underwriter is required under the Act to
 
 
10
 
 
deliver a prospectus (or in lieu thereof the notice required under Rule 173 of the Securities Act) in connection with the offering or sale of the Designated Securities at any time more than nine months after the date of the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, the costs of such preparation and furnishing of such amended or supplemented Prospectus shall be borne by the Underwriters of such Designated Securities;
 
(d)  If the Time of Sale Information is being used to solicit offers to buy the Designated Securities at a time when the Prospectus is not yet available to prospective purchasers, and (A) any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which the Time of Sale Information as then amended or supplemented would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading or (B) it is necessary to amend or supplement the Time of Sale Information to comply with law, to immediately notify the Representatives thereof and forthwith prepare and, subject to Section 6(a), file with the Commission (to the extent required) and furnish to the Underwriters and to such dealers as the Representatives may designate, such amendments or supplements to the Time of Sale Information as may be necessary so that the statements in the Time of Sale Information as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made when such Time of Sale Information is delivered, be misleading or so that the Time of Sale Information will comply with law;
 
(e)  To prepare a final term sheet, containing solely a description of the Designated Securities, substantially in the form of Schedule IV to the Pricing Agreement and approved by the Representatives, and to file such term sheet pursuant to Rule 433(d) under the Act within the time period prescribed by such rule.
 
(f)  To make generally available to the Companys securityholders as soon as practicable, but in any event not later than eighteen months after the effective date of the Registration Statement (as defined in Rule 158(c)), an earnings statement of the Company and its subsidiaries (which need not be audited) complying with Section 11(a) of the Act and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (including, at the option of the Company, Rule 158); and
 
(g)  During the period beginning on the date of the Pricing Agreement for such Designated Securities and continuing to and including the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, not to offer, sell, contract to sell or otherwise dispose of in the United States any debt securities of the Company which mature more than one year after such Time of Delivery and which are substantially similar to such Designated Securities, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.
 
7.  The Company covenants and agrees with the several Underwriters that the Company will pay or cause to be paid the following: (i) the fees,
 
 
11
 
 
disbursements and expenses of the Companys counsel and accountants in connection with the registration of the Designated Securities under the Act and all other expenses in connection with the Companys preparation, printing and filing of the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any Time of Sale ISky and legal investment surveys; (iii) any fees charged by securities rating services for rating the Designated Securities; (iv) any filing fees incident to any required review by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. of the terms of the sale of the Designated Securities; (v) any cost of preparing certificates or other evidences of the Securities or any costs of The Depository Trust Company; (vi) the fees and expenses of any Trustee and any agent of any Trustee and the fees and disbursements of counsel for any Trustee in connection with any Indenture and the Designated Securities; and (vii) all other costs and expenses incident to the performance of the Companys obligations hereunder and under any Delayed Delivery Contracts which are not otherwise specifically provided for in thesignated Securities by them, and any advertising expenses connected with any offers they may make.
nformation and, subject to the proviso of Section 6(c), the Prospectus and amendments and supplements thereto and the mailing and delivery of copies thereof to the Underwriters and dealers; (ii) all expenses in connection with the qualification of the Designated Securities for offering and sale under state securities laws as provided in Section 6(b) hereof, including the reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters in connection with such qualification and in connection with the Blue
is Section. It is understood, however, that, except as provided in this Section, Section 10 and Section 14 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees of their counsel, transfer taxes on resale of any of the D
 
The foregoing provisions of this Section 7 shall be without prejudice to the Companys rights under any separate agreements between the Company and its att
orneys, accountants and vendors with respect to such fees, disbursements, expenses and costs.
 
8.  Each Underwriter hereby represents and agrees that:
 
(a)  It has not and will not use, authorize use of, refer to, or participate in the planning for use of, any free writing prospectus, as defined in Rule 405 under the Act (which term includes use of any written information furnished to the Commission by the Company and not incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and any press release issued by the Company) other than (i) one or more term sheets relating to the Designated Securities which are not Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses and which contain preliminary terms of the Designated Securities and related customary information not inconsistent with the final term sheet filed by the Company pursuant to Section 6(e) hereof, (ii) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus listed on Schedule III to the applicable Pricing Agreement or prepared pursuant to Section 6(d) above, or (iii) any free writing prospectus prepared by such Underwriter and approved by the Company in advance in
 
 
 
12
 
 
writing (each such free writing prospectus referred to in clauses (i) or (iii), an Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus);
 
(b)  It has not and will not distribute any Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus in a manner reasonably designed to lead to its broad unrestricted dissemination, and it will not otherwise be required to file any Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus with the Commission, in accordance with Rule 433 under the Act, as a result of any action taken or caused to be taken by such Underwriter, unless such action is consented to in advance by the Company;
 
(c)  It has not and will not, without the prior written consent of the Company, use any free writing prospectus that contains the final terms of the Designated Securities unless such terms previously have been included in a free writing prospectus filed with the Commission; provided that Underwriters may use a term sheet substantially in the form of Schedule IV to the applicable Pricing Agreement, together with related customary information not inconsistent with the Prospectus, without the consent of the Company; and
 
(d)  Any Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus used or referred to by it complied or will comply in all materials respects with the Act.
 
9.  The obligations of the Underwriters of any Designated Securities under the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated Securities shall be subject, in the discretion of the Representatives, to the condition that all representations and warranties and other statements of the Company included in or incorporated by reference in the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated Securities are, at and as of the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, true and correct, the condition that the Company shall have performed in all material respects all of its obligations hereunder theretofore to be performed, and the following additional conditions:
 
(a) The Prospectus as amended or supplemented and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus relating to the applicable Designated Securities shall have been filed with the Commission under the Act within the applicable time periods prescribed for such filings by the rules and regulations under the Act; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or any part thereof shall have been issued and no proceeding for that purpose shall have been initiated or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened by the Commission;
 
(b) Counsel for the Underwriters shall have furnished to the Representatives such opinion or opinions, dated the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, with respect to the incorporation of the Company, the validity of the Indenture, the Designated Securities, the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus as amended or supplemented and other related matters as the Representatives may reasonably request, and such counsel shall have received
 
 
13
 
 
such papers and information as it may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters;
 
(c) The Companys Senior Corporate Counsel or such other internal counsel as shall be reasonably acceptable to the Representatives (the Internal Counsel), shall have furnished to the Representatives such counsels written opinion, dated the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that:
 
(i)  Aetna Life Insurance Company has been duly incorporated and is validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Connecticut; all of the outstanding shares of capital stock of Aetna Life Insurance Company have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and non-assessable, and are owned directly or indirectly by the Company;
 
(ii)  To the best of such counsels knowledge and other than as set forth or contemplated in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and/or the Prospectus, there are no legal or governmental proceedings pending or threatened involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries of a character required to be disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus which are not adequately disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus;
 
(iii)  The issuance and sale of the Designated Securities and the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Designated Securities, the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities will not (1) conflict with or result in a breach or violation by the Company of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default by the Company under, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other similar agreement or instrument known to such counsel to which the Company is a party or by which the Company is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company is subject, except, in all such cases, for such conflicts, breaches, violations or defaults as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole and would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities or (2) result in any violation of any statute of the United States or any order, rule or regulation known to such counsel of any court or governmental agency or body of the United States having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties, except with respect to clause (2), such violations as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, or would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities (and except that for purposes of this paragraph (iii) such counsel need not express any opinion as to any violation of any fraudulent transfer laws or other antifraud laws or as to any violation of any securities or insurance laws or as to any transactions of the type described in the Prospectus under the caption ERISA Matters; provided further that insofar as performance
 
 
14
 
 
by the Company of its obligations under the Indenture, the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement, the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, and the Designated Securities is concerned, such counsel need not express any opinion as to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or similar laws affecting creditors rights generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally, or concepts of reasonableness or equitable principles of general applicability;
 
(iv)  The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented (other than the financial statements and related notes, information as to reserves, the financial statement schedules and the other financial and statistical data included therein or omitted therefrom, as to which such counsel need express no opinion), when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, complied as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder;
 
(v)  Under the federal laws of the United States, no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration, filing or qualification of or with any court or governmental agency or body is required for the issuance and sale of the Designated Securities in accordance with the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities, except for such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations, filings or qualifications as have been obtained under the Act and the Trust Indenture Act in connection with the purchase and sale and distribution of the Designated Securities by the Underwriters, and except those which, if not obtained, will not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; provided that such counsel need not express any opinion as to any transactions of the type described in the Prospectus under the caption ERISA Matters; and
 
(vi)   In the event any of the Designated Securities are to be purchased pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts, each of such Delayed Delivery Contracts conforms in all material respects to the description thereof in the Prospectus as amended or supplemented.
 
In addition, such counsel shall state that such counsel does not know of any contract or other document (i) of a character required to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement or to any of the documents incorporated by reference into the Prospectus as amended or supplemented which is not so filed, (ii) required to be incorporated by reference into the Prospectus as amended or supplemented which is not so incorporated by reference or (iii) required to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus as amended or supplemented which is not so described.
 
 
15
 
In rendering the opinion required by subsection (c) of this Section, the Internal Counsel may state that he is admitted to the Bar of the State of Connecticut and that his opinion is limited to the laws of the State of Connecticut and the federal laws of the United States of America and that he does not express an opinion as to the effect of the laws of any other jurisdiction. The Internal Counsel may rely (A) as to any matter to which you consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld), to the extent specified in such opinion, upon the opinions of other counsel in good standing whom such counsel believes to be reliable, provided that the Internal Counsel shall state that he and you are justified in relying on such opinions and (B) as to matters of fact, upon certificates of officers and representatives of the Company and certificates of and/or written correspondence with public officials, copies of which have been furnished to you. The Internal Counsel may also state that he has not verified independently the accuracy or completeness of information or documents furnished to such counsel with respect to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus.
 
(d)   Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel for the Company, shall have furnished to the Representatives its written opinion, dated the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that:
 
(i)  The Company has been duly incorporated and is validly subsisting as a corporation in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania;
 
(ii)  This Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
 
(iii)  The Designated Securities have been duly authorized by the Company; assuming the due authentication of the Underwriters Securities by the Trustee, the Underwriters Securities have been duly issued, executed and delivered by the Company; and assuming the due authentication of the Contract Securities by the Trustee, the Contract Securities, if any, have been duly issued, executed and delivered by the Company;
 
(iv)  The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
 
(v)  The issuance and sale of the Designated Securities and the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Designated Securities, the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities will not result in any violation of (1) the provisions of the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company or (2) any statute of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or any order, rule or regulation
 
 
16
 
 
known to such counsel of any court or governmental agency or body of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties, except with respect to clause (2), such violations as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole and would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities (and except that for purposes of this paragraph (v) such counsel need not express any opinion as to any violation of any fraudulent transfer laws or other antifraud laws or as to any violation of any federal and state securities laws or Blue Sky or insurance or insurance securities laws; provided further, that insofar as performance by the Company of its obligations under the Indenture, the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement, the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, and the Designated Securities is concerned, such counsel need not express any opinion as to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium and other similar laws now or hereafter in effect relating to or affecting creditors rights and remedies generally or the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally or to general principles of equity (regardless of whether considered in a proceeding at law or in equity));
 
(vi)  Under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration, filing or qualification of or with any court or governmental agency or body is required for the issuance and sale of the Designated Securities in accordance with the Indenture, each of the Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities except for such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations, filings or qualifications as may be required under state securities or Blue Sky laws or insurance or insurance securities laws in connection with the purchase and sale and distribution of the Designated Securities by the Underwriters, and except those which, if not obtained, will not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; and
 
(vii)  In the event any of the Designated Securities are to be purchased pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts, each such Delayed Delivery Contract has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
 
In rendering the opinion required by subsection (d) of this Section, Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP may state that its opinion is limited to the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.
 
(e)  Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP, special counsel for the Company, shall have furnished to the Representatives its written opinion, dated the Time of Delivery for such Designated Securities, in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect that:
 
 
17
 
(i)  This Agreement and the Pricing Agreement with respect to the Designated Securities have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company;
 
(ii)  The Designated Securities have been duly authorized by the Company; assuming the due authentication of the Underwriters Securities by the Trustee, the Underwriters Securities are duly issued, executed and delivered, and constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency and similar laws affecting creditors rights generally and the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally, concepts of reasonableness and equitable principles of general applicability; assuming the due authentication of the Contract Securities by the Trustee, the Contract Securities, if any, when issued, executed and delivered and when paid for in accordance with the Indenture and the Delayed Delivery Contracts will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency and similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally, concepts of reasonableness and equitable principles of general applicability; and the Designated Securities and the Indenture conform in all material respects to the descriptions thereof in the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus as amended or supplemented;
 
(iii)  The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and, assuming the due authorization, execution and delivery thereof by the Trustee, the Indenture constitutes a valid and legally binding instrument of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency and similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally, concepts of reasonableness and equitable principles of general applicability; and the Indenture became qualified under the Trust Indenture Act upon the filing of the Registration Statement with the Commission pursuant to Rule 462(e) under the Act;
 
(iv)  In the event any of the Designated Securities are to be purchased pursuant to Delayed Delivery Contracts, each such Delayed Delivery Contract has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and, assuming such Delayed Delivery Contract has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the purchaser named therein, and the Securities to be delivered thereunder have been paid for by the purchaser named therein, such Delayed Delivery Contract constitutes a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency and similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally, concepts of reasonableness and equitable principles of general
 
 
18
 
 
applicability; and any Delayed Delivery Contracts conform in all material respects to the description thereof in the Prospectus as amended and supplemented; and
 
(v)  (1) the Registration Statement, as amended, and the Prospectus, as amended or supplemented (other than the financial statements and related notes, the financial statement schedules and the other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which such counsel need express no opinion) appear on their face to be appropriately responsive in all material respects to the requirements of the Act and the applicable rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder and (2) nothing has come to the attention of such counsel to cause it to believe that, insofar as relevant to the offering of Designated Securities: (a) on the date of the applicable Pricing Agreement, the Registration Statement (other than the financial statements and related notes, the financial statement schedules and the other financial data included or incorporated by reference therein or omitted therefrom, as to which such counsel need express no belief) contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading, (b) at the Time of Sale, the Time of Sale Information contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading or (c) the Prospectus as amended or supplemented, as of the date of the applicable Pricing Agreement or as of the applicable Time of Delivery contained or contains any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
With respect to clause (v) of subsection (e) of this Section, Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP may state that its opinion and belief are based upon its participation in the preparation of the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus (other than the documents incorporated by reference therein) and any amendments or supplements thereto and review and discussion of the contents thereof (including the documents incorporated by reference therein), but are without independent check or verification except as specified, and that such counsel expresses no view regarding the financial statements or financial schedules or other financial or accounting data included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or the Statement of Eligibility of the Trustee on Form T-1, or as to the conveyance of the Time of Sale Information or the information contained therein to investors. In rendering the opinion required by subsection (e) of this Section, Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP may state that it is admitted to the Bar of the State of New York and its opinion is limited to the laws of the State of New York and the federal laws of the United States of America. Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP may rely upon the accuracy of matters (A) involving the application of laws of any jurisdiction other than the United States or the State of New York and, to the extent specified in such opinion, upon the opinions of other
 
 
19
 
 
counsel reasonably satisfactory to you (including without limitation, (x) as to matters of Pennsylvania law, on the opinion of Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel to the Company, and (y) as to matters of Connecticut law, on the opinion of the Internal Counsel), and (B) of fact upon certificates of officers and representatives of the Company and of public officials.
 
(f)  At the Time of Sale and the Time of Delivery for the Designated Securities, KPMG LLP, independent public accountants for the Company, shall have furnished to the Representatives a letter dated the respective dates of delivery thereof in form and substance satisfactory to the Representatives, containing statements and information of the type customarily included in accountants comfort letters to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus; provided that such letter shall use a cut-off date not more than three business days prior to the date of such letter;
 
(g)  Since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Time of Sale Information, there shall not have been any material adverse change or a development involving a prospective material adverse change in the financial position, stockholders equity or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries considered as a whole, otherwise than as set forth or contemplated in the Time of Sale Information, the effect of which, in any such case described above, is in the reasonable judgment of the Representatives, so material and adverse as to make it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering, sale or the delivery of the Underwriters Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus;
 
(h)  On or after the date of the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Companys debt securities by either Standard & Poors Ratings Services or Moodys Investors Service, Inc. and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, with possible negative implications, or has negatively changed its outlook with respect to, its rating of any of the Companys debt securities or preferred stock;
 
(i)  On or after the date of the Pricing Agreement relating to the Designated Securities, there shall not have occurred any of the following: (i) a suspension or material limitation in trading in securities generally on the New York Stock Exchange; (ii) trading of any securities issued or guaranteed by the Company shall have been suspended on any exchange; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities in New York declared by either Federal or New York state authorities; or (iv) any outbreak or material escalation of hostilities or any material change in the financial markets or any calamity or crisis involving the United States or the declaration by the United States of a national emergency or war, if the effect of any of the above specified events, in the reasonable
 
 
20
 
 
judgment of the Representatives, makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering, sale or delivery of the Underwriters Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus; and
 
(j)  The Company shall have furnished or caused to be furnished to the Representatives at the Time of Delivery for the Designated Securities a certificate or certificates of officers of the Company as to the accuracy of the representations and warranties of the Company herein at and as of such Time of Delivery, as to the performance by the Company of all of its obligations hereunder to be performed at or prior to such Time of Delivery, as to the matters set forth in subsections (a) and (g) of this Section and as to such other matters as the Representatives may reasonably request.
 
10.   (a) The Company will indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Preliminary Prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein (i) in the case of the Registration Statement, not misleading and (ii) in the case of any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, and will reimburse each Underwriter for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred; provided, however, that the Company shall not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in any Preliminary Prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by any Underwriter of Designated Securities through the Representatives expressly for inclusion therein.
 
(b)  Each Underwriter severally will indemnify and hold harmless the Company against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company may become subject, under the Act or otherwise, insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any Preliminary Prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information,
 
 
21
 
 
the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein (i) in the case of the Registration Statement, not misleading and (ii) in the case of any Preliminary Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in any Preliminary Prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information, the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing  Prospectus, or in each case any amendment or supplement thereto, in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for inclusion therein; and will reimburse the Company for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim as such expenses are incurred.
 
(c)  Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the indemnifying party under such subsection, notify the indemnifying party in writing of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party shall not relieve it from any liability which it may have to any indemnified party otherwise than under such subsection. In case any such action shall be brought against any indemnified party and it shall notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party shall be entitled to participate therein and, to the extent that it shall wish, jointly with any other indemnifying party similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party (who shall not, except with the consent of the indemnified party, be counsel to the indemnifying party), and, after notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense thereof, the indemnifying party shall not be liable to such indemnified party under such subsection for any legal expenses of other counsel or any other expenses, in each case subsequently incurred by such indemnified party, in connection with the defense thereof other than reasonable costs of investigation, unless such indemnifying party and indemnified party are named parties to any such action (including any impleaded parties) and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them. In no event shall any indemnifying party be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one counsel (in addition to local counsel) separate from their own counsel for all indemnified parties in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances. In no event shall an indemnifying party be liable with respect to any action or claim settled without its
 
 
22
 
 
written consent. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding.
 
referred to therein, then each indemnifying party, in lieu of indemnifying such indemnified party, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters of the Designated Securities on the other from the offering of the Designated Securities to which such loss, claim, damage or liability (or action in respect thereof) relates. If, however, the allocation provided by the immediately preceding sentence is not permitted by applicable law or if the indemnified party failed to give the notice required under subsection (c) above, then each indemnifying party shall contribute to such amount paid or payable by such indemnified party in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only such relative benefits but also the relative fault of the Company on the one hand and the Underwriters of the Designated Securities on the other in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof), as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company on the one hand and such Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same proportion as the total net proceeds from such offering (before deducting expenses) received by the Company bear to the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by such Underwriters. The relative fault shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company on the one hand or such Underwriters on the other and the parties relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this subsection (d) were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to above in this subsection (d). The amount paid or payable by an indemnified party as a result of the losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) referred to above in this subsection (d) shall be deemed to include any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such indemnified party in connection with investigating or defending any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (d), no Underwriter shall be
(d)  If the indemnification provided for in this Section 10 is unavailable to or insufficient to hold harmless an indemnified party under subsection (a) or (b) above in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof)
 
 
23
 
 
required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the applicable Designated Securities underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of aeged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The obligations of the Underwriters of Designated Securities in this subsection (d) to contribute are several in proportion to their respective underwriting obligations with respect to such Securities and not joint. No indemnifying party will be liable for contribution with respect to any action or claim settled without its written consent.
ny damages (other than amounts paid or incurred without the consent of the indemnifying party as provided in this Section 10) which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or all
 
(e)  The obligations of the Company under this Section 10 shall be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have and shall extend or not extend, as the case may be, upon the same terms and conditions, to each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the Act; and the obligations of the Underwriters under this Section 10 shall be in addition to any liability which the respective Underwriters may otherwise have a
nd shall extend or not extend, as the case may be, upon the same terms and conditions, to each officer and director of the Company and to each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the Act.
 
11.   (a)       If any Underwriter shall default in its obligation to purchase the Underwriters Securities which it has agreed to purchase under the Pricing Agreement relating to such Underwriters Securities, the Representatives may in their discretion arrange for themselves or another party or other parties to purchase such Underwriters Securities on the terms contained herein. If within thirty-six hours after such default by any Underwriter the Representatives do not arrange for the purchase of such Underwriters Securities, then the Company shall be entitled to a further period of thirty-six hours within which to procure another party or other parties reasonably satisfactory to the Representatives to purchase such Underwriters Securities on such terms. In the event that, within the respective prescribed period, the Representatives notify the Company that they have so arranged for the purchase of such Underwriters Securities, or the Company notifies the Representatives that it has so arranged for the purchase of such Underwriters Securities, the Representatives or the Company shall have the right to postpone the Time of Delivery for such Underwriters Securities for a period of not more than seven days in order to effect whatever changes may thereby be made necessary in the Time of Sale Information, the Registration Statement or the Prospectus as amended or supplemented, or in any other documents or arrangements, and the Company agrees to file promptly any amendments or supplements to the Registration Statement or the Prospectus which in the opinion of the Representatives may thereby be made necessary. The term Underwriter as used in this Agreement shall include any person substituted
 
 
24
 
 
under this Section with like effect as if such person had originally been a party to the Pricing Agreement with respect to such Designated Securities.
 
(b)  If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Underwriters Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate amount of such Underwriters Securities which remains unpurchased does not exceed one-tenth of the aggregate principal amount of the Designated Securities, then the Company shall have the right to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase the principal amount of Underwriters Securities which such Underwriter agreed to purchase under the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated Securities and, in addition, to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase its pro rata share (based on the principal amount of Designated Securities which such Underwriter agreed to purchase under such Pricing Agreement) of the Underwriters Securities of such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters for which such arrangements have not been made; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
 
(c)  If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Designated Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the Representatives and the Company as provided in subsection (a) above, the aggregate principal amount of Designated Securities which remains unpurchased exceeds one-tenth of the aggregate principal amount of the Designated Securities, as referred to in subsection (b) above, or if the Company shall not exercise the right described in subsection (b) above to require non-defaulting Underwriters to purchase Designated Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters, then the Pricing Agreement relating to such Designated
Securities shall thereupon terminate, without liability on the part of any non-defaulting Underwriter or the Company, except for the expenses to be borne by the Company and the Underwriters as provided in Section 7 hereof and the indemnity and contribution agreements in Section 10 hereof; but nothing herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
 
12.  The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company and the several Underwriters, as set forth in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of them, respectively, pursuant to this Agreement, shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation (or any statement as to the results thereof) made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or any controlling person of any Underwriter, or the Company or any officer or director or controlling person of the Company, and shall survive delivery of and payment for the Designated Securities.
 
13.  The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Underwriters are acting solely as a principal and in the capacity of an arms length contractual counterparty to the Company with respect to the offering of Securities
 
 
25
 
 
contemplated hereby (including in connection with determining the terms of the offering) and not as a financial advisor or a fiduciary to, or an agent of, the Company or any other person.  Additionally, neither the Representatives nor any other Underwriter is advising the Company or any other person as to any legal, tax, investment, accounting or regulatory matters in any jurisdiction.  The Company represents that it has consulted with its own advisors concerning such matters and acknowledges that it is and shall be responsible for making its own independent investigation and appraisal of the transactions contemplated hereby, and that the Underwriters shall have no responsibility or liability to the Company with respect thereto. Any review by the Underwriters of the Company, the transactions contemplated hereby or other matters relating to such transactions will be performed solely for the benefit of the Underwriters and shall not be on behalf of the Company.  The Company agrees that it will not claim that the Underwriters or any of them has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to the Company in connection with such transactions or the process leading thereto.
 
14.  If any Pricing Agreement shall be terminated pursuant to Section 11 hereof, the Company shall not then be under any liability to any Underwriter with respect to the Designated Securities covered by such Pricing Agreement except as provided in Section 7 and Section 10 hereof; but, if for any other reason Underwriters Securities are not delivered by or on behalf of the Company as provided herein, the Company will reimburse the Underwriters through the Representatives for all reasonable out-of-pocket hall then be under no further liability to any Underwriter with respect to such Designated Securities except as provided in Section 7 and Section 10 hereof.
expenses approved in writing by the Representatives, including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel, reasonably incurred by the Underwriters in making preparations for the purchase, sale and delivery of such Designated Securities, but the Company s
 
15.  In all dealings hereunder, the Representatives of the Underwriters of Designated Securities shall act on behalf of each of such Underwriters, and the parties hereto shall be entitled to act and rely upon any statement, request, notice or agreement on behalf of any Underwriter made or given by such
 
Representatives jointly or by such of the Representatives, if any, as may be designated for such purpose in the Pricing Agreement.
 
All statements, requests, notices and agreements hereunder shall be in writing, and if to the Underwriters shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex or facsimile transmission to the address of the Representatives as set forth in the Pricing Agreement; and if to the Company shall be delivered or sent by mail, telex or facsimile transmission to the address of the Company set forth in the Registration Statement, Attention: Corporate Secretary. Any such statements, requests, notices or agreements shall take effect upon receipt thereof.
 
 
26
 
16.  This Agreement and each Pricing Agreement shall be binding upon, and inure solely to the benefit of, the Underwriters, the Company and, to then shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement or any such Pricing Agreement. No purchaser of any of the Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed a successor or assign by reason merely of such purchase.
extent provided in Section 10 and Section 12 hereof, the officers and directors of the Company and each person who controls the Company or any Underwriter, and their respective heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns, and no other perso
 
17.  Time shall be of the essence for each Pricing Agreement. As used herein, business day shall mean any day when the Commissions office in Washington, D.C. is open for business.
 
18.  THIS AGREEMENT AND EACH PRICING AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
This Agreement and each Pricing Agreement may be executed by any one or more of the parties hereto and thereto in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such respective counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
 
 
27
 
 
 
 
 
28
 
ANNEX I
 
 
[Insert Representatives]
As Representatives of the several
Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
 
____________, 20 ___
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the Company), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and in the Underwriting Agreement, dated ____________, 20 ___ (the Underwriting Agreement), to issue and sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the Underwriters) the debt securities specified in Schedule II hereto (the Designated Securities). Each of the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety, and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein; and each of the representations and warranties set forth therein shall be deemed to have been made at and as of the date of this Pricing Agreement. Each reference to the Representatives herein and in the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement so incorporated by reference shall be deemed to refer to you. Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Underwriting Agreement are used herein as therein defined. The Representatives designated to act on behalf of each of the Underwriters of the Designated Securities pursuant to Section 15 of the Underwriting Agreement and the address of the Representatives referred to in such Section 15 are set forth at the end of Schedule II hereto.
 
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, the Company agrees to issue and to sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the time and place and at the purchase price to the Underwriters set forth in Schedule II hereto, the principal amount of Designated Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto, less the principal amount of Designated Securities covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, as may be specified in Schedule II hereto.
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof, including the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of the Underwriters is or will be pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of
 
 
29
 
 
Agreement among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request.
 
 
Accepted as of the date hereof:
 
[Insert Representatives]
 
On behalf of each of the
Underwriters
 
 
 
 
 
30
 
 
 
 
 
 
31
 
 
 
TITLE OF DESIGNATED SECURITIES:
 
[ %] [Floating Rate] [Zero Coupon] [Senior]
 
[Subordinated]
 
[Notes] [Debentures] due
 
AGGREGATE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT:
 
[$] [Foreign Currency]
 
PRICE TO PUBLIC:
 
__% of the principal amount of the Designated Securities, plus accrued interest from                to                 [and accrued amortization, if any, from                 to                ]
 
PURCHASE PRICE BY UNDERWRITERS:
 
__% of the principal amount of the Designated Securities, plus accrued interest from                 to                 [and accrued amortization, if any, from                 to                ]
 
SPECIFIED FUNDS FOR PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE:
 
Immediately available funds delivered [to the bank account(s) specified in the cross-receipt to the Underwriters]
 
INDENTURE:
 
[Senior][Subordinated] Debt Indenture dated as of  _______________, 20__  between the Company, and U.S. Bank National Association[, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company], as Trustee, as supplemented by the [Officers Certificate] [Supplemental Indenture] to be dated on or prior to _______________, 20__ [to the [Senior][Subordinated] Debt Indenture]
 
MATURITY:
 
[DATE]
 
INTEREST RATE:
 
[ %] [Zero Coupon] [See Floating Rate Provisions]
 
 
 
 
32
 
 
INTEREST PAYMENT DATES:
 
[months and dates]
 
REDEMPTION PROVISIONS:
 
[No provisions for redemption]
 
[The Designated Securities may be redeemed, [otherwise than through the sinking fund], in whole or in part at the option of the Company, in the amount of [$ ] or an integral multiple thereof, [on or after _________, ____________ at the following redemption prices (expressed in percentages of principal amount). If [redeemed on or before ________, _____________, ___, % and if] redeemed during the 12-month period beginning ___, _______________:
 
YEAR                                           REDEMPTION PRICE
 
and thereafter at 100% of their principal amount, together in each case with accrued interest to the redemption date.]
 
[on any interest payment date falling on or after _____, _____, at the election of the Company, at a redemption price equal to the principal amount thereof, plus accrued interest to the date of redemption.]
 
[Other possible redemption provisions, such as mandatory redemption upon occurrence of certain events or redemption for changes in tax law]
 
[Restriction on refunding]
 
SINKING FUND PROVISIONS:
 
[No sinking fund provisions]
 
[The Designated Securities are entitled to the benefit of a sinking fund to retire [$ ] principal amount of Designated Securities on in each of the years through at 100% of their principal amount plus accrued interest][, together with [cumulative] [noncumulative] redemptions at the option of the Company to retire an additional [$ ] principal amount of Designated Securities in the years through at 100% of their principal amount plus accrued interest].
 
[If Securities may be put to the issuer by holders, insert ______]
 
OPTIONAL REPAYMENT PROVISIONS:
 
Securities are repayable on , [insert date and years], at the option of the holder, at their principal amount with accrued interest.
 
[If securities are Floating Rate debt securities, insert ______]
 
 
33
 
FLOATING RATE PROVISIONS:
 
Initial annual interest rate will be % through __________, _________ (and thereafter will be adjusted (monthly] [on each , and ] [to an annual rate of % above the average rate for -[year] [month] [securities] [certificates of deposit] issued by and [insert names of banks] [and the annual interest rate [thereafter] [from through ] will be the interest yield equivalent of the weekly average per annum market discount rate for month Treasury bills plus % of Interest Differential (the excess, if any, of (i) then current weekly average per annum secondary market yield for -month certificates of deposit over (ii) then current interest yield equivalent of the weekly average per annum market discount rate for     -month Treasury bills); [from and thereafter the rate will be the then current interest yield equivalent plus % of Interest Differential].
 
TIME OF DELIVERY:
 
[TIME] [DATE]
 
CLOSING LOCATION:
 
[ADDRESS]
 
DELAYED DELIVERY:
 
[None] [Underwriters commission shall be __% of the principal amount of Designated Securities for which Delayed Delivery Contracts have been entered into. Such commission shall be payable to the order of ____]
 
NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF REPRESENTATIVES:
 
Designated Representatives:
 
Address for Notices, etc.:
 
[OTHER TERMS]:
 
 
34
 
 
 
 
35
 
 
 
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates.  Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering.  You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov.  Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling [] at [].
 
 
36
 
ANNEX II
 
 
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue
Hartford, CT 06156
 
Attention: ____________
 
_____________, _____
 
Dear Sirs:
 
The undersigned hereby agrees to purchase from Aetna Inc. (the Company), and the Company agrees to sell to the undersigned,
 
$__________
 
principal amount of the Companys debt securities (the Designated Securities) offered by the Companys Prospectus dated _____________, as amended or supplemented, receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged, at a purchase price of __% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued interest from the date from which interest accrues as set forth below, and on the further terms and conditions set forth below, and on the further terms and conditions set forth in this contract.
 
The undersigned will purchase the Designated Securities from the Company on the delivery date or dates and in the principal amount or amounts set forth below:
 
 
EACH SUCH DATE ON WHICH DESIGNATED SECURITIES ARE TO BE PURCHASED HEREUNDER IS HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AS A DELIVERY DATE.
 
Payment for the Designated Securities which the undersigned has agreed to purchase on each Delivery Date shall be made to the Company in Federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, by wire transfer to a bank account specified by the Company, on such Delivery Date upon delivery to the
 
 
37
 
 
undersigned of the Designated Securities then to be purchased by the undersigned in definitive fully registered form and in such denominations and registered in such names as the undersigned may designate by written, telex or facsimile communication addressed to the Company not less than five full business days prior to such Delivery Date.
 
The obligation of the undersigned to take delivery of and make payment for Designated Securities on each Delivery Date shall be subject to the condition that the purchase of Designated Securities to be made by the undersigned shall not on such Delivery Date be prohibited under the laws of the jurisdiction to which the undersigned is subject. The obligation of the undersigned to take delivery of and make payment for Designated Securities shall not be affected by the failure of any purchaser to take delivery of and make payment for Designated Securities pursuant to other contracts similar to this contract.
 
The undersigned understands that Underwriters (the Underwriters) are also purchasing Designated Securities from the Company, but that the obligations of the undersigned hereunder are not contingent on such purchases.  Promptly after completion of the sale of Designated Securities to the Underwriters, the Company will mail or deliver to the undersigned at its address set forth below notice to such effect, accompanied by a copy of the opinion of counsel for the Company delivered to the Underwriters in connection therewith.
 
The undersigned represents and warrants that, as of the date of this contract, the undersigned is not prohibited from purchasing the Designated Securities hereby agreed to be purchased by it under the laws of the jurisdictions to which the undersigned is subject.
 
This contract will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors, but will not be assignable by either party hereto without the written consent of the other.
 
This contract may be executed by either of the parties hereto in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
 
It is understood that the acceptance by the Company of any Delayed Delivery Contract (including this contract) is in the Companys sole discretion and that, without limiting the foregoing, acceptances of such contracts need not be on a first-come, first-served basis. If this contract is acceptable to the Company, it is requested that the Company sign the form of acceptance below and mail or deliver one of the counterparts hereof to the undersigned at its address set forth below. This will become a binding contract between the Company and the undersigned when such counterpart is so mailed or delivered by the Company.
 
 
38
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
39

Exhibit 1.2
 
Barclays Capital Inc.
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
      Incorporated
As Representatives of the several
Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
May 1, 2012
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and in the Underwriting Agreement dated May 1, 2012 (the ), to issue and sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the ) the debt securities specified in Schedule II hereto (the  ). Each of the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety, and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein; and each of the representations and warranties set forth therein shall be deemed to have been made at and as of the date of this Pricing Agreement. Each reference to the Representatives herein and in the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement so incorporated by reference shall be deemed to refer to you. Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Underwriting Agreement are used herein as therein defined. The Representatives designated to act on behalf of each of the Underwriters of the Designated Securities pursuant to Section 15 of the Underwriting Agreement and the address of the Representatives referred to in such Section 15 are set forth at the end of Schedule II hereto.
Company
Underwriting Agreement
Underwriters
Designated
Securities
 
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, the Company agrees to issue and to sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the time and place and at the purchase price to the Underwriters set forth in Schedule II hereto, the principal amount of Designated Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto, less the principal amount of Designated Securities covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, as may be specified in Schedule II hereto.
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters, this letter and such acceptance hereof, including the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of the Underwriters is or will be pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of Agreement among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Accepted as of the date hereof:
 
Barclays Capital Inc.
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
      Incorporated
On behalf of each of the
Underwriters
By: Barclays Capital Inc.
By: Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
By: Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC
By: Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
             Incorporated
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
TITLE OF DESIGNATED SECURITIES:
 
1.750% Senior Notes due May 15, 2017 (hereinafter referred to as the )
2017 Notes
 
4.500% Senior Notes due May 15, 2042 (hereinafter referred to as the , and together with the 2017 Notes, the )
2042 Notes
Notes
 
AGGREGATE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT:
 
2017 Notes:  $250,000,000
 
2042 Notes:  $500,000,000
 
PRICE TO PUBLIC:
 
99.340% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2017 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from May 4, 2012
 
95.774% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2042 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from May 4, 2012
 
PURCHASE PRICE BY UNDERWRITERS:
 
98.740% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2017 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from May 4, 2012
 
94.899% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2042 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from May 4, 2012
 
SPECIFIED FUNDS FOR PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE:
 
Immediately available funds delivered to the bank account(s) specified in the cross-receipt to the Underwriters
 
INDENTURE:
 
Senior Indenture dated as of  March 2, 2001, between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as Trustee (the ), as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture to be dated on or prior to May 4, 2012, between the Company and the Trustee (as so supplemented, the ).
Base Indenture
Indenture
 
 
 
 
 
MATURITY:
 
May 15, 2017 for the 2017 Notes
 
May 15, 2042 for the 2042 Notes
 
INTEREST RATE:
 
1.750% per annum for the 2017 Notes
 
4.500% per annum for the 2042 Notes
 
INTEREST PAYMENT DATES:
 
With respect to the 2017 Notes, each May 15 and November 15, beginning November 15, 2012.
 
With respect to the 2042 Notes, each May 15 and November 15, beginning November 15, 2012.
 
In any case where any interest payment date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
 
REDEMPTION PROVISIONS:
 
Optional Redemption
2017 Notes
 
At any time prior to April 15, 2017 (one month prior to the maturity date of the 2017 Notes), the 2017 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
 
At any time on or after April 15, 2017 (one month prior to the maturity date of the 2017 Notes), the 2017 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2017 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
 
 
 
 
 
2042 Notes
 
At any time prior to November 15, 2041 (six months prior to the maturity date of the 2042 Notes), the 2042 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
 
At any time on or after November 15, 2041 (six months prior to the maturity date of the 2042 Notes), the 2042 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2042 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
 
Certain Definitions
 
 means, with respect to any redemption date for any portion of the Notes of a series,
Treasury Rate
 
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
 
 
 
 
 
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes of the series to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes of such series to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 
 means, with respect to any redemption date for any Notes of a series, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 
 means each of Barclays Capital Inc., Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated. If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a Primary Treasury Dealer), the Company will substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
 
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
 
Notice; Interest
 
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 days but no more than 60 days before the redemption date to each holder of Notes of the series to be redeemed.
 
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the redemption price, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes of the series or the portions of the Notes of the series called for redemption on and after the redemption date.
 
Repurchase Upon a Change of Control
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs with respect to the Notes of a series, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Notes of such series in full, as described under Optional Redemption above, the Company will make an offer to each holder of Notes of such series (the Change of Control Offer) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such holders Notes of such series at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes of such series to be repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the Change of Control Payment). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Notes of a series, the Company will be required to mail a notice to holders of Notes of such series describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Notes of such series on the date specified in the notice (the Change of Control Payment Date), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Notes of such series and described in such notice. The Company will comply with the requirements of
 
 
 
 
 
Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act, and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes of a series as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes of a series, the Company will be required to comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes by virtue of such conflicts.
 
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Notes of a series upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Notes of such series if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Notes of such series properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; provided that for all purposes of the Notes of such series and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Notes of such series unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Notes at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
 
On the Change of Control Payment Date for Notes of a series to be repurchased, the Company will be required, to the extent lawful, to:
 
 
 
 
 means the Notes of a series are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; provided, however, that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Notes of such series, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Notes of such series by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
 
 
 
 
 
the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the Rating Agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
 
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; provided, however, that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition, voting stock means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
Change of Control
 
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Notes; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or
Investment Grade Rating
 
 
 
 
 
higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Notes of a series or fails to make a rating of the Notes of such series publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be, with respect to such series of Notes.
Rating Agencies
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
SINKING FUND PROVISIONS:
 
No sinking fund provisions
 
TIME OF DELIVERY:
 
9:00 a.m. Eastern time on May 4, 2012
 
CLOSING LOCATION:
 
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, 125 Broad Street, New York, New York 10004
 
DELAYED DELIVERY:
 
None
 
NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF REPRESENTATIVES:
 
Barclays Capital Inc.
745 Seventh Avenue
New York, New York 10019
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
388 Greenwich Street
New York, New York 10013
 
 
 
 
Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC
11 Madison Avenue
New York, New York 10010
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
One Bryant Park
New York, New York 10036
OTHER TERMS:
 
The holders of the Notes will not have the benefit of clause (5) of Section 501 of the Base Indenture entitled Events of Default.
 
The holders of the Notes will not have the benefit of Section 1005 of the Base Indenture entitled Limitations on Liens on Common Stock of Principal Subsidiaries.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Time of Sale
 
2:45 p.m. Eastern time on May 1, 2012
 
Time of Sale Information
 
Preliminary Prospectus dated May 1, 2012
 
Free Writing Prospectus dated May 1, 2012
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
[intentionally omitted]
 
The Issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates.  Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the Issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the Issuer and this offering.  You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov.  Alternatively, copies of the prospectus and the prospectus supplement may be obtained from Barclays Capital Inc. by calling 1-888-603-5847, Citigroup Global Markets Inc. by calling 1-877-858-5407, Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC by calling 1-800-221-1037 or Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated by calling 1-800-294-1322.
 
 

Exhibit 4.1
 
EXECUTION VERSION
 
and
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page
 
 
i
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE (this ), dated as of May 4, 2012, between AETNA INC., a corporation duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania (the ), having its principal office at 151 Farmington Avenue, Hartford, Connecticut 06156 and U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the ).
Supplemental Indenture
Company
Trustee
 
 
WHEREAS, the Company and the Trustee entered into a Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 (the  , and as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, the ) providing for the issuance from time to time of the Companys debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness (the ), to be issued in one more series as in the Base Indenture provided;
Base
Indenture
Indenture
Securities
 
WHEREAS, Sections 201 and 301 of the Base Indenture provide that the Company and the Trustee may establish the terms of a new series of Securities in an indenture supplemental to the Base Indenture;
 
WHEREAS, Section 901 of the Base Indenture provides that the Company and the Trustee may enter into an indenture supplemental to the Base Indenture, without the consent of any Holders, to eliminate any of the provisions of the Base Indenture in respect of a new series of Securities so established pursuant to Section 301 of the Base Indenture;
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors of the Company on September 23, 2011 and the Delegation of Authority of Mark T. Bertolini, Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President of the Company, dated April 30, 2012 (collectively, the ), the Company has approved to be established two new series of Securities, designated as its 1.750% Senior Notes due May 15, 2017 (the ) and its 4.500% Senior Notes due May 15, 2042 (the  and together with the 2017 Notes, the ) as in this Supplemental Indenture provided; and
Company Resolutions
2017 Notes
2042 Notes
Notes
 
WHEREAS, all requirements necessary to make this Supplemental Indenture a valid, binding and enforceable instrument in accordance with its terms and to make the Notes, when executed, authenticated and delivered by the Company, the valid, binding and enforceable obligations of the Company have been done and performed.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and mutual covenants herein contained and intending to be legally bound, the parties to this Supplemental Indenture hereby agree as follows:
 
 
1
 
 
 
Section 1.01
.  Definitions.
 
(a)
 
Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein have the respective meanings assigned to them in the Base Indenture.
 
(b)
 
The following terms shall have the meanings assigned to them in this Section 1.01(b):
 
 has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
2017 Notes
 
 has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
2042 Notes
 
 has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Base Indenture
 
 means the Notes of a series are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Notes of such series, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Notes of such series by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the Rating Agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 
 
2
 
 
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
Change of Control
provided, however
voting stock
 
 has the meaning stated in Section 2.07(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Offer
 
 has the meaning stated in Section 2.07(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Payment
 
 has the meaning stated in Section 2.07(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Payment Date
 
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 
 means the Person named as the Company in the first paragraph of this Supplemental Indenture until a successor Person shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Indenture, and thereafter Company shall mean such successor Person.
Company
 
 has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Company Resolutions
 
 
3
 
 
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes of the series to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes of such series to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Notes of a series, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Notes; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 
 means The Depository Trust Company.
DTC
 
 means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and any successor statute thereto.
Exchange Act
 
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 
 has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Indenture
 
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 
4
 
 
 has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Notes
 
 has the meaning stated in the definition of Reference Treasury Dealer in this Section 1.01(b).
Primary Treasury Dealer
 
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Notes of a series or fails to make a rating of the Notes of such series publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be, with respect to such series of Notes.
Rating Agencies
 
 means each of Barclays Capital Inc., Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary Treasury Dealer
 
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
 
 has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture and more particularly means any Securities authenticated and delivered under the Indenture, including, without limitation, the Notes.
Securities
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
 has the meaning stated in the first paragraph of this instrument.
Supplemental Indenture
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Notes of a series,
Treasury Rate
 
 
 
5
 
 
Governors of the Federal Reserve System and which establishes yields on actively traded United States Treasury securities adjusted to constant maturity under the caption Treasury Constant Maturities, for the maturity corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue (if no maturity is within three months before or after the date of Maturity for the Notes of such series, yields for the two published maturities most closely corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue will be determined and the Treasury Rate shall be interpolated or extrapolated from those yields on a straight line basis, rounding to the nearest month), or
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 
 means the Person named as the Trustee in respect of the Notes in the first paragraph of this Supplemental Indenture until a successor Trustee in respect of the Notes shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Indenture, and thereafter Trustee shall mean or include such Person who is then a Trustee in respect of the Notes.
Trustee
 
Section 1.02
Each reference to a particular section set forth in this Supplemental Indenture shall, unless the context otherwise requires, refer to this Supplemental Indenture.  Each reference to a particular section of the Base Indenture shall refer to that particular section of the Base Indenture.
.  Section References.  
 
 
 
Section 2.01
The Notes shall be issued as two series of Securities under the Base Indenture as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, which such series shall be known and designated as the 1.750% Senior Notes due May 15, 2017 and the 4.500% Senior Notes due May 15, 2042 of the Company.  Each series of Notes shall constitute a separate series of Securities for all purposes under the Indenture.  The Notes shall be unsecured. 
.  Issue of Notes.  
 
 
6
 
 
The Notes shall be executed, authenticated and delivered in accordance with the provisions of the Indenture.  The aggregate principal amount of the 2017 Notes which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is initially limited to $250,000,000, and the aggregate principal amount of the 2042 Notes which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is initially limited to $500,000,000 (except, in each case, for such Notes authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, other Notes of the same series pursuant to Sections 304, 305, 306, 906 or 1107 of the Base Indenture and except for any Notes which, pursuant to Section 303 of the Base Indenture, are deemed never to have been authenticated and delivered thereunder).  Additional Notes of a series may be authenticated and delivered from time to time as contemplated in Section 301 of the Base Indenture; that if the additional Notes of a series are not fungible with the Notes of such series for United States Federal income tax purposes, the additional Notes of the series will have a separate CUSIP number.  The entire amount of Notes of each series may immediately be executed by the Company and delivered to the Trustee and shall be authenticated by the Trustee and delivered to or upon the order of the Company pursuant to Section 303 of the Base Indenture.
provided
 
Section 2.02
The Stated Maturity of the principal of the 2017 Notes shall be May 15, 2017 and the Stated Maturity of the principal of the 2042 Notes shall be May 15, 2042.
.  Stated Maturity.  
 
Section 2.03
.  Notes Issuable as Global Securities.
 
(a)
 
The Notes shall be issued in the form of one or more Global Securities registered in the name of DTC or its nominee, to be deposited with, or on behalf of, DTC, New York, New York.
 
(b)
 
The Notes shall be in such form or forms as may be approved by the officers of the Company as provided in the Company Resolutions, such approval to be evidenced by any such officers manual or facsimile signature on the Notes, provided that such form or forms of the Notes are not inconsistent with the requirements of the Indenture or the Company Resolutions and are substantially in the form or forms attached hereto as .
Exhibit A
 
Section 2.04
The 2017 Notes shall bear interest at the rate of 1.750% per annum and the 2042 Notes shall bear interest at the rate of 4.500% per annum, which in each case will accrue from May 4, 2012, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, as the case may be, payable semi-annually on May 15 and November 15 in each year, commencing November 15, 2012, to the Person in whose name such Notes (or one or more predecessor Notes) are registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date next preceding the Interest Payment Date.  Each May 15 and November 15 shall be an  for such Notes, and the May 1 or November 1 (whether or not a Business Day), as the
.  Interest and Payment.  
Interest Payment Date
 
 
7
 
 
case may be, next preceding an Interest Payment Date shall be the  for the interest payable on such Interest Payment Date.  In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
Regular Record Date
 
Section 2.05
Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on the Notes will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York; , , that at any time that the Notes are not represented by Global Securities, at the option of the Company, payment of interest may be made by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as such address shall appear in the Security Register.
.  Payment of Interest.  
provided
however
 
Section 2.06
.  Optional Redemption
 
(a)
 
At any time prior to April 15, 2017, the 2017 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
 
(i)
 
100% of the principal amount of the 2017 Notes to be redeemed, or
 
(ii)
 
the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled payments of principal and interest on the 2017 Notes to be redeemed from the Redemption Date to the date of Maturity for the 2017 Notes discounted to the Redemption Date on a semi-annual basis (assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months) at the Treasury Rate plus 15 basis points,
 
, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
plus
 
(b)
 
At any time on or after April 15, 2017, the 2017 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2017 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 
(c)
 
At any time prior to November 15, 2041, the 2042 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
 
 
8
 
 
(i)
 
100% of the principal amount of the 2042 Notes to be redeemed, or
 
(ii)
 
the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled payments of principal and interest on the 2042 Notes to be redeemed from the Redemption Date to the date of Maturity for the 2042 Notes discounted to the Redemption Date on a semi-annual basis (assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months) at the Treasury Rate plus 25 basis points,
 
, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
plus
 
(d)
 
At any time on or after November 15, 2041, the 2042 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2042 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 
(e)
 
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each holder of the Notes of the series to be redeemed.
 
(f)
 
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes of the series or the portions of the Notes of the series called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
 
Section 2.07
.  Change of Control Offer to Purchase.
 
(a)
 
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs with respect to the Notes of a series, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Notes of such series in full pursuant to Section 2.06, the Company will make an offer to each Holder of Notes of such series (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Notes of such series at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes of such series to be repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Notes of a series, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of Notes of such series describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Notes of such series on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Notes of such series and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
 
 
9
 
 
(b)
 
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes of a series as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes of a series, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes by virtue of such conflicts.
 
(c)
 
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Notes of a series upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Notes of such series if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Notes of such series properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Notes of such series and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Notes of such series unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Notes of such series at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
 
(d)
 
On the Change of Control Payment Date for Notes of a series to be repurchased, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
(i)
 
accept or cause a third party to accept for payment all Notes of such series or portions of Notes of such series properly tendered pursuant to the Change of Control Offer;
 
(ii)
 
deposit or cause a third party to deposit with the Paying Agent an amount equal to the Change of Control Payment in respect of all Notes of such series or portions of Notes of such series properly tendered; and
 
(iii)
 
deliver or cause to be delivered to the Trustee the Notes of such series properly accepted, together with an officers certificate stating the aggregate principal amount of Notes of such series or portions of Notes of such series being purchased.
 
Section 2.08
.  Applicability of Certain Provisions of the Base Indenture in Respect of the Notes.
 
 
10
 
 
(a)
 
The Event of Default specified in Section 501(5) of the Base Indenture shall not apply to the Notes.
 
(b)
 
Section 1005 of the Base Indenture shall not apply to the Notes.
 
Section 2.09
U.S. Bank National Association shall act as Paying Agent and registrar with respect to the Notes.
.  Registrar and Paying Agent.  
 
Section 2.10
The Company shall not be obligated to redeem or purchase the Notes of either series pursuant to any sinking fund or analogous provision, or at the option of any Holder thereof, except as provided in Section 2.07 of this Supplemental Indenture.
.  No Sinking Fund.  
 
Section 2.11
The Notes shall be issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
.  Minimum Denominations.  
 
 
 
Section 3.01
This Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder of Securities heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered under the Indenture shall be bound hereby.
.  Relation to Indenture.  
 
Section 3.02
Except as expressly supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, the Base Indenture shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with the provisions thereof, and the Base Indenture is in all respects hereby ratified and confirmed. This Supplemental Indenture and all its provisions shall be deemed a part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
.  Continued Effect.
 
Section 3.03
All of the covenants, stipulations, promises and agreements in this Supplemental Indenture by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns whether so expressed or not.
.  Provisions Binding on Companys Successors.  
 
Section 3.04
.  Certain Trustee Matters.
 
(a)
 
The recitals contained herein shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for their correctness.
 
(b)
 
The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Supplemental Indenture or the Notes or the proper authorization or the due execution hereof or thereof by the Company.
 
 
11
 
 
Section 3.05
This Supplemental Indenture and the Notes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of New York.
.  Governing Law.  
 
Section 3.06
This Supplemental Indenture may be signed in various counterparts which together will constitute one and the same instrument.
.  Counterparts.  
 
 
12
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
 
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Supplemental Indenture]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Supplemental Indenture]
 
 
 
 
Exhibit A
 
 
THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF.  THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO, OR REGISTERED OR EXCHANGED FOR SECURITIES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF, ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF, AND NO SUCH TRANSFER MAY BE REGISTERED EXCEPT IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE.  EVERY SECURITY AUTHENTICATED AND DELIVERED UPON REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER OF, OR IN EXCHANGE FOR OR IN LIEU OF, THIS SECURITY SHALL BE A GLOBAL SECURITY SUBJECT TO THE FOREGOING, EXCEPT IN SUCH LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES.
 
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation (), to Aetna Inc. or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
DTC
 
 
 
CUSIP: []
ISIN: []
 
 
AETNA INC., a Pennsylvania corporation (herein called the ), which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of [] Dollars ($[]) upon presentation and surrender of this Security on May 15, 20[], and to pay interest thereon from May 4, 2012 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually on May 15 and November 15 in each year, commencing November 15, 2012, at the rate of []%
Company
                  
 
 
A-1
 
 
per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made available for payment.  The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the May 1 or November 1 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date.  Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Securities of this series not less than 10 calendar days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture.  In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
 
Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on this Security will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts.
 
Reference is hereby made to the further provisions of this Security set forth on the reverse hereof, which further provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as if set forth at this place.  Such provisions include, without limitation, provisions relating to redemption of this Security by the Company.
 
Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee referred to on the reverse hereof by manual signature, this Security shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
 
 
A-2
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
 
Dated: May 4, 2012
 
 
[SEAL]
 
Attest:
 
 
 
 
 
A-3
 
 
TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF AUTHENTICATION
 
 
This is one of the Securities of the series designated under, and referred to in, the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
 
 
 
A-4
 
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the ), issued and to be issued in one or more series under a Senior Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2001 (herein called the  ), between the Company, as issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association (as successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company), as Trustee (herein called the , which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture dated as of May 4, 2012, between the Company and the Trustee (together with the Base Indenture, the ), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered.  This Security is one of the series designated on the face hereof, initially limited in aggregate principal amount to $[], subject to future issuances of additional Securities pursuant to Section 301 of the Base Indenture.
Securities
Base
Indenture
Trustee
Indenture
 
 
At any time prior to [], 20[], the Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
 
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 
At any time on or after [], 20[], the Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days nor more than 60 calendar days notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities to be redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Securities of this series,
Treasury Rate
 
 
A-5
 
 
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
 
 means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Securities of this series to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Securities of this series to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
 
 means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Securities of this series, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
 
 means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 
 means each of Barclays Capital Inc., Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated.  If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a
Reference Treasury Dealer
 
 
A-6
 
 
 ), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Primary
Treasury Dealer
 
 means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
 
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each Holder of the Securities of this series to be redeemed.
 
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Securities of this series or the portions of the Securities of this series called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
 
If this Security is redeemed in part only, a new Security or Securities of this series and of like tenor for the unredeemed portion hereof will be issued in the name of the Holder hereof upon the cancellation hereof.
 
 
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs with respect to the Securities of this series, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Securities of this series in full, as described under Optional Redemption above, the Company will make an offer to each Holder of the Securities of this series (the ) to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holders Securities of this series at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities of this series to be repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Securities of this series, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of the Securities of this series describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Securities of this series on the date specified in the notice (the ), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required hereby and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
 
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and any successor statute thereto (the ), and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in
Exchange Act
 
 
A-7
 
 
connection with the repurchase of the Securities of this series as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities of this series, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities of this series by virtue of such conflicts.
 
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Securities of this series upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Securities of this series if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Securities of this series properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Securities of this series and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Securities of this series unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Securities of this series at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third partys scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
 
On the Change of Control Payment Date for the Securities of this series to be repurchased, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
 
 
 
 means the Securities of this series are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
 
 
A-8
 
 
a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Companys intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Securities of this series, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Securities of this series by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the Rating Agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Companys or the Trustees request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
provided, however
 
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Companys voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Companys Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Companys voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no person (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition,  means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing
Change of Control
provided, however
voting stock
 
 
A-9
 
 
similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
 
 means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
 
 means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Securities; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Companys proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
 
 means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
 
 means a rating by Moodys equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moodys), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of Rating Agencies.
Investment Grade Rating
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 means (1) Moodys, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moodys, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Securities of this series or fails to make a rating of the Securities of this series publicly available for reasons outside of the Companys control, a nationally recognized statistical rating organization within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Companys Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moodys, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be, with respect to the Securities of this series.
Rating Agencies
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
 
A-10
 
 
 
The Indenture contains certain covenants that, among other things, limit the ability of the Company to consolidate, merge or sell all or substantially all of its assets.  These covenants are subject to a number of important qualifications and exceptions.  Section 1005 of the Base Indenture, including, without limitation, the limitation on liens on the Common Stock of Principal Subsidiaries set forth therein, does not apply to the Securities of this series.
 
 
If an Event of Default with respect to Securities of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Securities of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture.  The Event of Default set forth in Section 501(5) of the Base Indenture, including, without limitation, the cross-acceleration provisions thereof, does not apply to the Securities of this series.
 
 
The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the rights of the Holders of the Securities of each series to be affected under the Indenture at any time by the Company and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities at the time Outstanding of each series to be affected.  The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of specified percentages in principal amount of the Securities of each series at the time Outstanding, on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series, to waive compliance by the Company with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and their consequences.  Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Security shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Security and of any Security issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange hereof or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Security.
 
 
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Security or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
 
As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the transfer of this Security is registrable in the Security Register upon
 
 
A-11
 
 
surrender of this Security for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Company in any place where the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security are payable, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or such Holders attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Securities of this series and of like tenor, of authorized denominations and for the same aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
 
The Securities of this series are issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.  As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, Securities of this series are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of Securities of this series and of like tenor of a different authorized denomination, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
 
No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company or the Trustee may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, other than exchanges pursuant to Section 304, 906 or 1107 of the Base Indenture not involving any transfer.
 
Prior to due and proper presentment of this Security for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name this Security is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Security is overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
 
The Indenture provides that the Company, at the Companys option, (a) will be discharged from any and all obligations in respect of the Securities (except for certain obligations to register the transfer or exchange of Securities, replace stolen, lost or mutilated Securities, maintain paying agencies and hold moneys for payment in trust) or (b) need not comply with certain restrictive covenants of the Indenture, in each case if the Company deposits, in trust, with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations which through the payment of interest thereon and principal thereof in accordance with their terms will provide money, in an amount sufficient to pay all the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on, the Securities on the dates such payments are due in accordance with the terms of such Securities, and certain other conditions are satisfied.
 
No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, or interest on this Security, or for any claim based hereon, or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture or any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer, employee,
 
 
A-12
 
 
agent or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
 
All terms used in this Security which are defined in the Indenture shall have the respective meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
 
A-13
 

Exhibit 5.1
 
 
The Board of Directors
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue
Hartford, Connecticut 06156
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as special counsel to Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ) in connection with the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-178272) (the ) filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ) pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ), for the registration by the Company of $250,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.750% Senior Notes due May 15, 2017 and $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 4.500% Senior Notes due May 15, 2042 (collectively, the ).  The Notes are to be issued pursuant to a senior debt indenture dated as of March 2, 201 (the ) between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the ), as supplemented by a supplemental indenture to be dated as of May 4, 2012 (together with the Base Indenture, the ) between the Company and the Trustee, and to be sold pursuant to a Pricing Agreement dated as of May 1, 2012 (the ) among the Company and the several underwriters named in Schedule I thereto.
Company
Registration Statement
Commission
Securities Act
Notes
0
Base Indenture
Trustee
Indenture
Pricing Agreement
We, as your counsel, have examined originals or copies of such documents, corporate records, certificates of public officials and other instruments as we have deemed necessary or advisable for the purpose of rendering this opinion.
In rendering the opinions expressed herein, we have, without independent inquiry or investigation, assumed that (i) all documents submitted to us as originals are authentic and complete, (ii) all documents submitted to us as copies conform to authentic, complete originals, (iii) all documents filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement that have not been executed will conform to the forms thereof, (iv) all signatures on all documents that we reviewed are genuine, (v) all natural persons executing documents had and have the legal capacity to do so, (vi) all statements in certificates of public officials and officers of the Company that we reviewed were and are accurate and (vii) all representations made by the Company as to matters of fact in the documents that we reviewed were and are accurate.
 
 
 
 
 
Based upon the foregoing, we advise you that, in our opinion, when the Notes have been duly executed, authenticated, issued and delivered in accordance with the Indenture and the Pricing Agreement against payment therefor, the Notes will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable in accordance with their terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency and similar laws affecting creditors rights generally and the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally, concepts of reasonableness and equitable principles of general applicability.
In connection with the opinion expressed above, we have assumed that (i) the Registration Statement became effective upon filing with the Commission and such effectiveness shall not have been terminated or rescinded; (ii) the Indenture and the Notes are valid, binding and enforceable agreements of each party thereto (other than as expressly covered above in respect of the Company); and (iii) there shall not have occurred any change in law affecting the validity or enforceability of the Notes.  We have also assumed that the execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and the Notes by the Company will not violate any applicable law or public policy or result in a violation of any provision of any instrument or agreement then binding upon the Company, or any restriction imposed by any court or governmental body having jurisdiction over the Company.
We are members of the Bar of the State of New York, and the foregoing opinion is limited to the laws of the State of New York and the federal laws of the United States of America.  Insofar as the foregoing opinion involves matters governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, we have relied, without independent investigation, on the opinion of even date herewith of Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel to the Company, filed with the Registration Statement.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to a report on Form 8-K to be filed by the Company on the date hereof and its incorporation by reference into the Registration Statement.  In addition, we consent to the reference to our name under the caption Validity of the Notes in the prospectus supplement which is a part of the Registration Statement.  In giving this consent, we do not admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act.
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.2
 
 
 
 
 
Barclays Capital Inc.,
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.,
Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC,
and Merrill Lynch, Pierce,
Fenner & Smith Incorporated
as Representatives of the
Underwriters named in Schedule I
to the Pricing Agreement
hereinafter described
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
We have acted as special Pennsylvania counsel to Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), in connection with the execution and delivery of, and the closing held today under, the Underwriting Agreement dated May 1, 2012 (the ) among the Company and , as representatives of the several Underwriters (the ) named in Schedule I of the Pricing Agreement dated May 1, 2012 (the ) among the Company and the Underwriters, providing, collectively, for the issuance and sale by the Company of its 1.750% Senior Notes due May 15, 2017 in the aggregate principal amount of $250,000,000 (the ) and 4.500% Senior Notes due May 15, 2042 in the aggregate principal amount of $500,000,000 (the , and together with the 2017 Notes, the ).  We understand that the Designated Securities are being issued and sold pursuant to the Companys Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-178272) (the ) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ) pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ), the prospectus dated December 2, 2011, included therein, the preliminary prospectus supplement dated May 1, 2012 and the final prospectus supplement dated May 1, 2012 to the prospectus included in the Registration Statement, each as filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act.  This opinion is being delivered to you at the request of the Company pursuant to Section 9(d) of the Underwriting Agreement.  Capitalized terms not defined herein have the meanings specified in the Underwriting Agreement.
Company
Underwriting Agreement
Barclays Capital Inc., Citigroup Global Markets Inc., Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC, and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
Underwriters
Pricing Agreement
2017 Notes
2042 Notes
Designated Securities
Registration Statement
Commission
Securities Act
 
For purposes of this opinion, we have examined originals or copies, certified or otherwise identified to our satisfaction, of the Underwriting Agreement, the Pricing Agreement, the Indenture, the forms of the Designated Securities, the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation and By-laws of the Company, and such corporate records and other agreements, instruments and documents and such certificates of the Company or comparable documents of public officials and officers and representatives of the Company, have made such inquiries of such officers and representatives of the Company and have considered such matters of law as we have deemed appropriate as the basis of the opinions hereinafter set forth.  In all such examinations, we have assumed the genuineness of signatures, the authenticity of documents
 
 
 
 
Barclays Capital Inc.,
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.,
Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC,
and Merrill Lynch, Pierce,
Fenner & Smith Incorporated
May 4, 2012
Page 2
 
submitted to us as originals, the conformity to authentic original documents of documents submitted to us as copies, and the accuracy and completeness of all records and other information made available to us by the Company.  We have also assumed that you and each of the Underwriters have acted in good faith and without notice of any fact that has caused you or any of the Underwriters to reach any conclusion contrary to any of the opinions stated in this letter.
 
As to questions of fact material to this opinion, we have relied upon the accuracy of certificates and other comparable documents of officers and representatives of the Company, upon statements made to us in discussions with the Companys management and upon certificates of public officials.  Except as otherwise expressly indicated, we have not undertaken any independent investigation of factual matters.
 
The opinion in paragraph 1 concerning the corporate existence of the Company is based on a certificate dated April 30, 2012 from the Pennsylvania Department of State.
 
We express no opinion as to the effect on the following opinions of (a) the laws of any jurisdiction other than the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, (b) any state securities laws or blue sky laws, or (c) any insurance, insurance holding company or insurance securities laws.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, we give no opinion as to any federal securities laws.
 
Based on the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications, limitations and assumptions stated herein, we advise you that, in our opinion:
 
1.       The Company has been duly incorporated and remains validly subsisting as a corporation under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.
 
2.       The Underwriting Agreement and the Pricing Agreement have been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
 
3.       The Designated Securities have been duly authorized by the Company; assuming the due authentication of the Designated Securities by the Trustee, the Designated Securities have been duly issued, executed and delivered by the Company.
 
4.       The Indenture has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company.
 
5.       The issuance and sale of the Designated Securities and the performance by the Company of its obligations under the Designated Securities, the Indenture, the Underwriting Agreement and the Pricing Agreement will not result in any violation of (i) the provisions of the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation or the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company or (ii) any statute of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or any order, rule or regulation known to us of any court or governmental agency or body of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania having jurisdiction over the Company or any of its properties, except, with respect
 
 
 
 
Barclays Capital Inc.,
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.,
Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC,
and Merrill Lynch, Pierce,
Fenner & Smith Incorporated
May 4, 2012
Page 3
 
to clause (ii), such violations as would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole and would not have a material adverse effect on the issuance or sale of the Designated Securities.
 
6.       Under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, no consent, approval, authorization, order, registration, filing or qualification of or with any court or governmental agency or body is required for the issuance and sale of the Designated Securities in accordance with the Indenture, the Underwriting Agreement and the Pricing Agreement except for such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders, registrations, filings or qualifications that, if not obtained, would not have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
 
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP and Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP may rely on this opinion as if addressees hereon for the purposes of their opinions dated May 4, 2012 and delivered to you.  We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to a report on Form 8-K to be filed by the Company on the date hereof and its incorporation by reference into the Registration Statement.  In addition, we consent to the reference to our name under the caption Validity of the Notes in the prospectus supplement which is a part of the Registration Statement.  In giving this consent, we do not admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act.  We further advise you that the opinions given herein are given as of the date hereof, limited by facts, circumstances and laws in effect as of such date, and that by rendering these opinions we undertake no obligation to advise you with respect to any changes therein.
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120521162443.txt.gz
TIME:20120521162443
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 5 - Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
Aetna Inc.'s ("Aetna's" or the "Company's") Annual Meeting of Shareholders was held on May 18, 2012. Shareholders voted on the matters set forth below.
1. Election of Director nominees. Each of the nominees listed below was elected as a Director of Aetna until the next Annual Meeting and until their successors are duly elected and qualified based on the following votes:
2. The proposal to approve the appointment of KPMG LLP as the Company's and its subsidiaries' independent registered public accounting firm for 2012 was approved based on the following votes:
3. The proposal to approve the Company's executive compensation on a non-binding advisory basis was approved based on the following votes:
4. A shareholder proposal requesting that the Company annually prepare and make available a report relating to political contributions and expenditures was not approved based on the following votes:
The shareholder proposal relating to cumulative voting in the election of Directors was not presented at the meeting.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120619161611.txt.gz
TIME:20120619161611
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On June 20, 2012, Aetna Inc. ("Aetna" or "we") expects to participate in presentations and meetings with investors and analysts, including a presentation by Joseph M. Zubretsky, Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna, at the Wells Fargo Securities 2012 Healthcare Conference (the "Conference") in Boston, Massachusetts. During the presentation and these meetings, Aetna intends to disclose that, based on actual results and performance in April and May of 2012:
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 9:30 a.m. Eastern time on June 20, 2012. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor, beginning approximately two hours after the event, for 14 days. Website addresses are included for reference only. The information contained on Aetna's website is not part of this Form 8-K and is not incorporated by reference into this Form 8-K.
(1)
Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains of $33.6 million ($51.7 million pretax) reported by Aetna for the three months ended March 31, 2012. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items, and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share or projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION - Certain information in this Form 8-K
is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, progression of operating earnings per share during 2012, Commercial medical cost trend, pricing and forecasting assumptions, reserve adequacy and potential revenue impact of the TRS contract. For
ward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, the pending U.S. Supreme Court ruling on the constitutionality of health care reform and the 2012 presidential election create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report") and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 ("Aetna's Quarterly Report"), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120731063102.txt.gz
TIME:20120731063102
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On July 31, 2012, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended June 30, 2012. A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA REPORTS
SECOND
-QUARTER 2012 RESULTS
HARTFORD, Conn., 
July 31, 2012
- Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced
second
-quarter 2012 operating earnings
(1)
of $
452.0 million
, or $
1.31
per share, compared to the $1.35 per share reported in the
second
quarter of 2011. Favorable before-tax prior-period reserve development in the second quarters of 2012 and 2011 was approximately $38 million and $188 million, respectively. Excluding the after-tax impact of this development, operating earnings were
$427.9 million
and
$401.5 million
in the second quarters of 2012 and 2011, respectively, and increased in 2012 primarily due to higher underwriting margins and increased membership in our Medicare business.
Net income for the
second
quarter of 2012 was
$457.6 million
, or
$1.32
per share, including $
.01
per share of net realized capital gains. Net income for the
second
quarter of 2011 was
$536.7 million
, or
$1.39
per share, including
$.04
per share of net realized capital gains.
Aetna/
2
Aetna's solid second-quarter financial results build upon our strong performance in the first quarter," said Mark T. Bertolini, Aetna chairman, CEO and president. "Our results confirm the confidence we have heading into the second half of the year. Aetna's performance is based on sustained execution on the fundamentals of our business: membership and revenues are growing; we are pricing with discipline; and medical cost trend is in line with our projections.
We continue to project membership growth for 2012, supported by a second-quarter increase of more than 100,000 members across our businesses. We have had some excellent recent mid-year success, with the expansion of our Missouri Medicaid relationship and winning the commercial account for the State of Maine. We are optimistic about our ability to sustain momentum into 2013, with wins such as the new group Medicare opportunity awarded by our long-standing customer Teacher Retirement System of Texas to convert existing commercial members into Medicare Advantage members, said Bertolini.
Based on our second quarter results, we are increasing our full-year 2012 operating earnings guidance to a range of $5.00 to $5.10 per share, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, Aetna senior executive vice president and CFO.   We have generated returns for our shareholders with strong revenue growth, solid margins and disciplined capital deployment.
Aetna/
3
Aetna's investments are aimed at improving health care delivery and producing opportunities for profitable growth.  Our Accountable Care Solutions (ACS) business strategy accomplishes both by collaborating with health systems around the country to promote high quality, efficient care at lower costs and drive member growth for our core businesses. Our latest ACS successes include a joint venture with Inova Health System in Virginia, an expanded technology and care-management relationship with Banner Health Network in Arizona, and accountable care organizations with Hunterdon HealthCare Partners in New Jersey and Aurora Health Care in Wisconsin, said Zubretsky.
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
Aetna/
4
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily for qualified pension plans, reported:
Aetna/
5
Total company results
Aetna's conference call to discuss
second
-quarter 2012 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetna's Investor Information website.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 888-515-2235 or +1-719-457-2632 for
international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 4711629. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
Aetna/
6
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 888-203-1112, or +1-719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 4711629. Telephone replays will be available from 11 a.m. ET on July 31, 2012, until 11 p.m. ET on August 14, 2012.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 36.7 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities, Medicaid health care management services and health information technology services. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, health care providers, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
Aetna/
7
Aetna/
8
Aetna/
9
Aetna/
10
Aetna/
11
Aetna/
12
Aetna/
13
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
For the periods covered in this press release, the following item is excluded from operating earnings because we believe it neither relates to the ordinary course of our business nor reflects our underlying business performance:
This press release also includes presentations of operating earnings for the three months ended June 30, 2012 and 2011 excluding development of prior-period health care cost estimates. Management believes these measures provide a useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance where there are significant differences in prior-period development from period to period.
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 8 through 10 and 12 of this press release.
(2)
Projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses or any such other items and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2012 reflect a range of approximately 344 million to 347 million weighted average diluted shares.
(3)
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in
(1)
above. Refer to the tables on pages 9, 10 and 12 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(4)
The business segment operating expense ratio reflects the exclusion of the Corporate Financing segment from operating expenses and excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any. For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 10 of this press release.
(5)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetna's profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetna's pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetna's performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes. Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. The Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (benefits).
(8)
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetna's Commercial medical membership.
(9)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetna's dental provider network for a nominal fee.
Aetna/
14
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, medical membership and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, particularly the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to repeal, amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, the 2012 presidential and congressional elections, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report") and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC), and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (together with Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q, Aetna's "Quarterly Reports"), when filed with the SEC. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120820064414.txt.gz
TIME:20120820064414
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01.        Other Events.
Aetna Inc. () and Coventry Health Care, Inc. () announced on August 20, 2012 that they have entered into a definitive agreement pursuant to which Aetna will acquire Coventry in a transaction valued at $7.3 billion, including the assumption of Coventry debt.a diversified managed health care company that offers a full portfolio of risk and fee-based products, including Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D programs, Medicaid managed care plans, group and individual health insurance, coverage for specialty services such as workers compensation, and network rental services.  The acquisition is projected to add nearly 4 million medical members and 1.5 million Medicare Part D members to Aetnas membership.  On a pro forma basis, the transaction increases Aetnas share of revenues from Government business to over 30 percent from 23 percent currently.
Aetna
Coventry
(1)
Coventry is
Under the terms of the agreement, which has been approved by the board of directors of each company, Coventry stockholders will receive $27.30 in cash and 0.3885 Aetna common shares for each Coventry share, or $42.08 per share, based on the closing price of Aetna common shares on Friday, August 17, 2012.  Aetna expects to finance the cash portion of the transaction with a combination of cash on hand and by issuing approximately $2.5 billion of new debt and commercial paper.  Excluding transaction and integration costs, the transaction is projected to be modestly accretive to Aetnas operating earnings per share in 2013, $0.45 accretive in 2014 and $0.90 accretive in 2015.
(2)
The Coventry acquisition is expected to:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The transaction is subject toCoventry stockholder approval, as well as other customary closing conditions, including expiration of the federal Hart-Scott-Rodino antitrust waiting period and approvals of state departments of insurance and other regulators.  The acquisition is expected to close in mid-2013.
 
Based on the closing price of Aetna common shares on August 17, 2012. 
(1)
 
 
Projected operating earnings per share excludes from net income any net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of Aetnas business nor reflect Aetnas underlying business performance. Projected operating earnings per share also exclude projected integration and one-time transaction costs related to the acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than the projected integration and one-time transaction costs related to the Coventry acquisition) and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetnas underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetnas business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetnas operations and allocation of resources among Aetnas businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
(2)
 
Important Information For Investors And Stockholders
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval.  Aetna Inc. (Aetna) will file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) a registration statement on Form S-4 containing a proxy statement/prospectus and Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry) will file with the SEC a proxy statement/prospectus, and each of Aetna and Coventry will file other documents with respect to the proposed acquisition of Coventry and a definitive proxy statement/prospectus will be mailed to stockholders of Coventry.  INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF COVENTRY ARE URGED TO READ THE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS AND OTHER DOCUMENTS THAT WILL BE FILED WITH THE SEC CAREFULLY AND IN THEIR ENTIRETY WHEN THEY BECOME AVAILABLE BECAUSE THEY WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION.  Investors and security holders will be able to obtain free copies of the registration statement and the proxy statement/prospectus (when available) and other documents filed with the SEC by Aetna or Coventry through the website maintained by the SEC at .  Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Aetna will be available free of charge on Aetnas internet website at or by contacting Aetnas Investor Relations Department at 860-273-8204.  Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Coventry will be available free of charge on Coventrys internet website at or by contacting Coventrys Investor Relations Department at 301-581-5717.
http://www.sec.gov
http://www.aetna.com
http://www.cvty.com
Aetna, Coventry, their respective directors and certain of their executive officers may be considered participants in the solicitation of proxies in connection with the proposed transaction.  Information about the directors and executive officers of Coventry is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 28, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 6, 2012, and its Current Report on Form 8-K, which was filed with the SEC on May 31, 2012.  Information about the directors and executive officers of Aetna is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 (Aetnas Annual Report), which was filed with the SEC on February 24, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 9, 2012 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q) which was filed with the SEC on July 31, 2012.  Other information regarding the participants in the proxy solicitations and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, will be contained in the proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials to be filed with the SEC when they become available.
 
 
 
 
 
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This report may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. You can generally identify forward-looking statements by the use of forward-looking terminology such as anticipate, believe, continue, could, estimate, expect, explore, evaluate, intend, may, might, plan, potential, predict, project, seek, should, or will, or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology. These forward-looking statements are only predictions and involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond Aetnas and Coventrys control.
Statements in this document regarding Aetna that are forward-looking, including Aetnas projections as to the anticipated benefits of the pending transaction to Aetna, increased membership as a result of the pending transaction, the impact of the pending transaction on Aetnas businesses and share of revenues from Government business, the methods Aetna will use to finance the cash portion of the transaction, the impact of the transaction on Aetnas operating earnings per share, the synergies from the pending transaction, and the closing date for the pending transaction, are based on managements estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control.  Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied; the risk that a regulatory approval that may be required for the proposed acquisition is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated; Aetnas ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; Aetnas ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventrys businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition-related issues; and the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetnas future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows.  Health care reform will significantly impact Aetnas business operations and financial results, including Aetnas medical benefit ratios.  Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and Aetna will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform.  Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of essential benefits, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law.  In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to repeal, amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, the 2012 presidential and congressional elections, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform.  As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years.  Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect Aetnas business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit Aetnas ability to price for the risk it assumes and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in its pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing Aetnas potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); Aetnas ability to differentiate its products and solutions from those offered by its competitors, and demonstrate that its products lead to access to better quality of care by its members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; Aetnas ability to diversify its sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement Aetnas agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; Aetnas ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance its existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of Aetnas health information technology initiatives; Aetnas ability to successfully integrate its businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses Aetna may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of Aetnas payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from its social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services Aetna offers; Aetnas ability to maintain its relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell Aetnas products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in Aetnas financial ratings.  For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetnas Annual Report and Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q) and Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q (together with Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q, Aetnas Quarterly Reports), each on file with the SEC.  You also should read Aetnas Annual Report and Aetnas Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
 
 
 
 
 
Statements in this document regarding Coventry that are forward-looking, including but not limited to the anticipated benefits of the transaction to Coventry, the projected closing date, the closing of the transaction, and the projected membership additions to Aetna, are based on Coventrys managements estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and risks, many of which are beyond the control of Coventrys management, including but not limited to: the failure to receive, on a timely basis or otherwise, the required approvals by Coventrys stockholders and government or regulatory agencies; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed transaction may not be satisfied; Coventrys and Aetnas ability to consummate the proposed transaction; the possibility that the anticipated benefits and synergies from the proposed transaction cannot be fully realized or may take longer to realize than expected; the failure by Aetna to obtain the necessary financing in connection with the proposed transaction; the possibility that costs or difficulties related to the integration of Coventrys and Aetnas operations will be greater than expected; operating costs and business disruption may be greater than expected; the ability of Coventry to retain and hire key personnel and maintain relationships with providers or other business partners pending the consummation of the proposed transaction; and the implementation of health care reform legislation.  Among the risk factors that may materially affect Coventrys business, operations or financial condition are the ability to accurately estimate and control future health care costs; the ability to increase premiums to offset increases in the Coventrys health care costs; general economic conditions and disruptions in the financial markets; changes in legal requirements from recently enacted federal or state laws or regulations, court decisions, or government investigations or proceedings; guaranty fund assessments under state insurance guaranty association law; changes in government funding and various other risks associated with Coventrys participation in Medicare and Medicaid programs; Coventrys ability to effectively implement and manage its Kentucky Medicaid program, including the implementation of appropriate risk adjustment revenue and management of the associated medical cost and the effect on its MLR; a reduction in the number of members in its health plans; its ability to acquire additional managed care businesses and to successfully integrate acquired businesses into its operations; its ability to attract new members or to increase or maintain premium rates; the non-renewal or termination of its government contracts, unsuccessful bids for business with government agencies or renewal of government contracts on less than favorable terms; failure of independent agents and brokers to continue to market its products to employers; a failure to obtain cost-effective agreements with a sufficient number of providers that could result in higher medical costs and a decrease in membership; negative publicity regarding the managed health care industry generally or Coventry in particular; a failure to effectively protect, maintain, and develop its information technology systems; compromises of its data security; periodic reviews, audits and investigations under its contracts with federal and state government agencies; litigation, including litigation based on new or evolving legal theories; volatility in its stock price and trading volume; Coventrys indebtedness, which imposes certain restrictions on its business and operations; an inability to generate sufficient cash to service its indebtedness; Coventrys ability to receive cash from its regulated subsidiaries; and an impairment of Coventrys intangible assets.  For a further discussion of risks and uncertainties, please see the risk factors described in Coventrys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 (Coventry Annual Report), Coventrys Quarterly Report for the quarter ending March 31, 2012 (Coventry First Quarter 10-Q), and Coventrys Quarterly Report for the quarter ending June 30, 2012 (together with Coventrys First Quarter 10-Q, Coventry Quarterly Reports), each on file with the SEC. You should also read the Coventry Annual Report and the Coventry Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Coventrys historical results of operations and financial condition.   Except to the extent required by applicable law, Coventry does not intend to update any such forward looking statements.
 
No assurances can be given that any of the events anticipated by the forward-looking statements will transpire or occur, or if any of them do occur, what impact they will have on the results of operations, financial condition or cash flows of Aetna or Coventry.  Neither Aetna nor Coventry assumes any duty to update or revise forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, as of any future date.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120822061234.txt.gz
TIME:20120822061234
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (General Instruction A.2. below):
see
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
Item 1.01.          Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Merger Agreement
On August 19, 2012, Aetna Inc. (), Coventry Health Care, Inc. () and Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the ), pursuant to which, subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, Merger Sub will be merged with and into Coventry, with Coventry surviving the merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (the ).
Aetna
Coventry
Merger Sub
Merger Agreement
Merger
At the effective time of the Merger, each share of Coventry common stock (other than treasury shares held by Coventry and any shares of Coventry common stock beneficially owned by Aetna, Merger Sub or any person who properly demands statutory appraisal of his or her shares) shall be converted into the right to receive (i) 0.3885 (the ) shares of Aetna common stock (the ) and (ii) $27.30 in cash (the  and, together with the Per Share Stock Consideration, the ), without interest. Each option to purchase shares of Coventry common stock outstanding under any employee benefit plan (each, a ), whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price less than the Equity Award Cash Consideration (as defined below), shall be canceled and converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest, equal to the product of (A) the excess, if any, of (1) the sum of (x) the Per Share Cash Consideration (y) the value equal to the product of the Parent Stock Price (as defined below) the Exchange Ratio (the sum of the amounts in clauses (x) and (y), the ) over (2) the applicable per share exercise price of such Coventry Stock Option (B) the total number of shares of Coventry common stock subject to such Coventry Stock Option. For purposes of the Merger Agreement, the  means the average of the volume weighted averages of the trading prices of Aetna common stock on the New York Stock Exchange (as reported by Bloomberg L.P. or, if not reported therein, in another authoritative source mutually selected by Aetna and Coventry) on each of the five consecutive trading days ending on the trading day that is two trading days prior to the closing date of the Merger During the 60-day period commencing on the date of the Merger Agreement, Aetna, in consultation with Coventry, will consider, after taking into account the terms and conditions of each applicable Coventry Stock Option, the appropriate treatment of each Coventry Stock Option, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price equal to or greater than the Equity Award Cash Consideration.
Exchange Ratio
Per Share Stock Consideration
Per Share Cash Consideration
,
Merger Consideration
Coventry Stock Option
plus
multiplied by
Equity Award Cash Consideration
multiplied
by
Parent Stock Price
.
At the effective time of the Merger, each share of Coventry common stock outstanding that is subject to forfeiture risk under any employee benefit plan and that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the Merger Agreement, is vested or becomes vested as of the effective time of the Merger shall be converted into the right to receive the Merger Consideration. At the effective time of the Merger, each performance share unit and restricted stock unit outstanding under any employee benefit plan (collectively, ) that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the Merger Agreement, is vested or becomes vested as of the effective time of the Merger shall be converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest, equal to the product of the Equity Award Cash Consideration multiplied by the number of shares of Coventry common stock represented by such unit.
Coventry Stock Units
 
 
 
 
 
 
Each Coventry Stock Unit that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the Merger Agreement, is not vested and will not become vested as of the effective time of the Merger shall convert at the effective time of the Merger into a cash-settled restricted stock unit with the number of shares of Aetna common stock underlying such cash-settled restricted stock unit equal to (1) the number of shares of Coventry common stock subject to such Coventry Stock Unit immediately prior to the effective time of the Merger multiplied by (2) the Equity Award Cash Consideration divided by the Parent Stock Price. Each such cash-settled restricted stock unit shall be subject to the same terms and conditions (including service-based vesting) as applied to the corresponding Coventry Stock Unit immediately prior to the Effective Time.
Aetna and Coventry each made customary representations, warranties and covenants in the Merger Agreement, including, among others, covenants by each of Coventry and Aetna to, subject to certain exceptions, conduct its business in the ordinary course during the interim period between the execution of the Merger Agreement and the consummation of the Merger.
The obligation of the parties to consummate the Merger is subject to customary closing conditions, including, among others, the approval and adoption of the Merger Agreement by Coventrys stockholders, the absence of legal impediments to the consummation of the Merger, the receipt of specified governmental consents and approvals, the early termination or expiration of the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended, compliance by Coventry and Aetna in all material respects with their respective obligations under the Merger Agreement and, subject in most cases to exceptions that do not rise to the level of a Material Adverse Effect (as defined in the Merger Agreement), the accuracy of representations and warranties made by Coventry and Aetna, respectively. The obligation of the parties to consummate the Merger is not subject to any financing condition.
The Merger Agreement requires Coventry to convene a stockholders meeting for purposes of obtaining the necessary Coventry stockholder approval and, subject to certain exceptions, Coventry has agreed (i) not to solicit alternative transactions or enter into discussions concerning, or provide information in connection with, any alternative transaction and (ii) that Coventrys board of directors will recommend that Coventrys stockholders approve and adopt the Merger Agreement.
Prior to the approval and adoption of the Merger Agreement by Coventrys stockholders, Coventrys board of directors may, upon receipt of a Superior Proposal (as defined in the Merger Agreement) and in certain other circumstances, change its recommendation that Coventrys stockholders approve and adopt the Merger Agreement, subject to complying with certain notice and other specified conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement, including giving Aetna the opportunity to propose changes to the Merger Agreement in response to such Superior Proposal or other circumstances. If Coventrys board of directors changes its recommendation that Coventrys stockholders approve and adopt the Merger Agreement, Aetna may terminate the Merger Agreement. In addition, Coventry may terminate the Merger Agreement prior to the approval and adoption of the Merger Agreement by Coventrys stockholders to enter into a definitive agreement providing for a Superior Proposal.
 
 
 
The Merger Agreement contains certain other termination rights for each of Coventry and Aetna, including the right of each party to terminate the Merger Agreement if the Merger has not been consummated by the end date of August 19, 2013, subject to each partys right to extend the end date for an additional three months if all closing conditions (other than receipt of antitrust and other specified regulatory approvals) have been satisfied by August 19, 2013. If requested by the other party, each party will consider in good faith agreeing (but will not be obligated to agree) to an additional extension of the end date.
If the Merger Agreement is terminated (i) as a result of a change in the recommendation of Coventrys board of directors that Coventrys stockholders approve and adopt the Merger Agreement, (ii) as a result of the failure of Coventrys stockholders to approve and adopt the Merger Agreement upon a vote taken thereon after Coventrys board of directors has changed its recommendation, (iii) in connection with Coventrys entering into a definitive agreement providing for a Superior Proposal or (iv) in connection with Coventrys material breach of the provisions of the Merger Agreement relating to non-solicitation of alternative transactions, then Coventry would be required to pay Aetna a termination fee of $167.5 million. If the Merger Agreement is terminated because Coventrys stockholders have not approved and adopted the Merger Agreement upon a vote taken thereon and Coventrys board has not changed its recommendation, but a proposal for an alternative transaction was publicly announced and not withdrawn before the Coventry stockholder meeting, then Coventry would be required to pay Aetna 25% of the $167.5 million termination fee (with the remaining 75% payable to Aetna if Coventry enters into an agreement providing for, or consummates, an alternative transaction within 12 months of such termination).
In the event the Merger Agreement is terminated (i) as a result of the failure of the Merger to occur on or before the end date (as it may be extended) due to the failure to achieve antitrust or other specified regulatory approvals, (ii) as a result of a final and non-appealable order or injunction relating to antitrust or other specified regulatory approvals or (iii) as a result of Aetnas failure to take appropriate proceedings to contest an order or injunction in respect of antitrust or other specified regulatory matters within certain specified time periods, then Aetna would be required to pay Coventry a termination fee of $450 million.
The foregoing description of the Merger Agreement does not purport to be complete, and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Merger Agreement, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 2.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. A copy of the Merger Agreement has been included to provide stockholders and other security holders with information regarding its terms and is not intended to provide any factual information about Aetna or Coventry. The representations, warranties and covenants contained in the Merger Agreement have been made solely for the purposes of the Merger Agreement and as of specific dates; were solely for the benefit of the parties to the Merger Agreement; are not intended as statements of fact to be relied upon by Coventrys stockholders and other security holders, but rather as a way of allocating the risk between the parties in the event the statements therein prove to be inaccurate; have been modified or qualified by certain confidential disclosures that were made between the parties in connection with the negotiation of the Merger Agreement, which disclosures are not reflected in the Merger Agreement itself; may no longer be true as of a given date; and may apply standards of materiality in a way that is different from what may be viewed as material by
 
 
 
 
 
stockholders or other security holders. Security holders are not third-party beneficiaries under the Merger Agreement (except with respect to stockholders right to receive the Merger Consideration following the effective time of the Merger) and should not rely on the representations, warranties and covenants or any descriptions thereof as characterizations of the actual state of facts or condition of Coventry Aetna or Merger Sub. Moreover, information concerning the subject matter of the representations and warranties may change after the date of the Merger Agreement, which subsequent information may or may not be fully reflected in Aetnas or Coventrys public disclosures. Aetna acknowledges that, notwithstanding the inclusion of the foregoing cautionary statements, it is responsible for considering whether additional specific disclosures of material information regarding material contractual provisions are required to make the statements in this Form 8-K not misleading.
,
 
Commitment Letter
 
On August 19, 2012, Aetna entered into a commitment letter (the ) pursuant to which Goldman Sachs Bank USA, UBS Securities LLC and UBS Loan Finance LLC (collectively, the ) have committed to provide up to $2.0 billion under a 364-day senior unsecured credit facility to finance the Merger to the extent that Aetna has not issued $2.0 billion in senior notes on or prior to the closing date of the Merger.  The Arrangers commitment to provide the credit facility is subject to several conditions, including, among others, the consummation of the Merger, the nonoccurrence of a Material Adverse Effect (as defined in the Commitment Letter) on Coventry, the negotiation of definitive documentation, the accuracy of certain representations by Aetna and the absence of certain defaults by Aetna, Aetna obtaining credit ratings taking into account the Merger, Aetnas delivery of certain financial statements, Aetna having used commercially reasonable efforts to cause the senior notes to be issued and other customary closing conditions more fully set forth in the Commitment Letter.  The foregoing summary of the Commitment Letter, and the transactions contemplated thereby, does not purport to be complete and is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by, the full text of the Commitment Letter, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 2.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Commitment Letter
Arrangers
 
Important Information For Investors And Stockholders
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval. Aetna Inc. () will file with the Securities and Exchange Commission () a registration statement on Form S-4 containing a proxy statement/prospectus and Coventry Health Care, Inc. () will file with the SEC a proxy statement/prospectus, and each of Aetna and Coventry will file other documents with respect to the proposed acquisition of Coventry and a definitive proxy statement/prospectus will be mailed to stockholders of Coventry. INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF COVENTRY ARE URGED TO READ THE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS AND OTHER DOCUMENTS THAT WILL BE FILED WITH THE SEC CAREFULLY AND IN THEIR ENTIRETY WHEN THEY BECOME AVAILABLE BECAUSE THEY WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION. Investors and security holders will be able to obtain free copies of the registration statement and the proxy statement/prospectus (when available) and other documents filed with the SEC by Aetna or Coventry through the website maintained by the SEC at . Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Aetna will be available free of charge on Aetnas internet website at or by contacting Aetnas Investor Relations Department at 860-273-8204. Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Coventry will be available free of charge on Coventrys internet website at or by contacting Coventrys Investor Relations Department at 301-581-5717.
Aetna
SEC
Coventry
http://www.sec.gov
http://www.aetna.com
http://www.cvty.com
Aetna, Coventry, their respective directors and certain of their executive officers may be considered participants in the solicitation of proxies in connection with the proposed transaction. Information about the directors and executive officers of Coventry is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 28, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 6, 2012, and its Current Report on Form 8-K, which was filed with the SEC on May 31, 2012. Information about the directors and executive officers of Aetna is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 (Aetnas Annual Report), which was filed with the SEC on February 24, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 9, 2012 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q) which was filed with the SEC on July 31, 2012. Other information regarding the participants in the proxy solicitations and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, will be
 
 
 
 
contained in the proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials to be filed with the SEC when they become available.
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This report may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. You can generally identify forwardlooking statements by the use of forward-looking terminology such as anticipate, believe, continue, could, estimate, expect, explore, evaluate, intend, may, might, plan, potential, predict, project, seek, should, or will, or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology. These forward-looking statements are only predictions and involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond Aetnas and Coventrys control.
-
Statements in this report regarding Aetna that are forward-looking, including Aetnas projections as to the anticipated benefits of the pending transaction to Aetna, increased membership as a result of the pending transaction, the impact of the pending transaction on Aetnas businesses and share of revenues from Government business, the methods Aetna will use to finance the cash portion of the transaction, the impact of the transaction on Aetnas operating earnings per share, the synergies from the pending transaction, and the closing date for the pending transaction, are based on managements estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied; the risk that a regulatory approval that may be required for the proposed acquisition is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated; Aetnas ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; Aetnas ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventrys businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition-related issues; and the implementation of health care reform legislation and changes in Aetnas future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact Aetnas business operations and financial results, including Aetnas medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and Aetna will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of essential benefits, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to repeal, amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, the 2012 presidential and congressional elections, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of,
 
 
 
 
 
unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect Aetnas business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit Aetnas ability to price for the risk it assumes and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in its pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing Aetnas potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); Aetnas ability to differentiate its products and solutions from those offered by its competitors, and demonstrate that its products lead to access to better quality of care by its members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; Aetnas ability to diversify its sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement Aetnas agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; Aetnas ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance its existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of Aetnas health information technology initiatives; Aetnas ability to successfully integrate its businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses Aetna may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of Aetnas payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from its social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services Aetna offers; Aetnas ability to maintain its relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell Aetnas products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in Aetnas financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetnas Annual Report and Aetnas Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetnas ) and Aetnas Second Quarter 10-Q
First Quarter 10-Q
 
 
 
 
 
(together with Aetnas First Quarter 10-Q, Aetnas ), each on file with the SEC. You also should read Aetnas Annual Report and Aetnas Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetnas historical results of operations and financial condition.
Quarterly Reports
Statements in this report regarding Coventry that are forward-looking, including but not limited to the anticipated benefits of the transaction to Coventry, the projected closing date, the closing of the transaction, and the projected membership additions to Aetna, are based on Coventrys managements estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and risks, many of which are beyond the control of Coventrys management, including but not limited to: the failure to receive, on a timely basis or otherwise, the required approvals by Coventrys stockholders and government or regulatory agencies; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed transaction may not be satisfied; Coventrys and Aetnas ability to consummate the proposed transaction; the possibility that the anticipated benefits and synergies from the proposed transaction cannot be fully realized or may take longer to realize than expected; the failure by Aetna to obtain the necessary financing in connection with the proposed transaction; the possibility that costs or difficulties related to the integration of Coventrys and Aetnas operations will be greater than expected; operating costs and business disruption may be greater than expected; the ability of Coventry to retain and hire key personnel and maintain relationships with providers or other business partners pending the consummation of the proposed transaction; and the implementation of health care reform legislation. Among the risk factors that may materially affect Coventrys business, operations or financial condition are the ability to accurately estimate and control future health care costs; the ability to increase premiums to offset increases in the Coventrys health care costs; general economic conditions and disruptions in the financial markets; changes in legal requirements from recently enacted federal or state laws or regulations, court decisions, or government investigations or proceedings; guaranty fund assessments under state insurance guaranty association law; changes in government funding and various other risks associated with Coventrys participation in Medicare and Medicaid programs; Coventrys ability to effectively implement and manage its Kentucky Medicaid program, including the implementation of appropriate risk adjustment revenue and management of the associated medical cost and the effect on its MLR; a reduction in the number of members in its health plans; its ability to acquire additional managed care businesses and to successfully integrate acquired businesses into its operations; its ability to attract new members or to increase or maintain premium rates; the non-renewal or termination of its government contracts, unsuccessful bids for business with government agencies or renewal of government contracts on less than favorable terms; failure of independent agents and brokers to continue to market its products to employers; a failure to obtain cost-effective agreements with a sufficient number of providers that could result in higher medical costs and a decrease in membership; negative publicity regarding the managed health care industry generally or Coventry in particular; a failure to effectively protect, maintain, and develop its information technology systems; compromises of its data security; periodic reviews, audits and investigations under its contracts with federal and state government agencies; litigation, including litigation based on new or evolving legal theories; volatility in its stock price and trading volume; Coventrys indebtedness, which imposes certain restrictions on its business and operations; an inability to generate sufficient cash to service its indebtedness; Coventrys
 
 
 
 
 
ability to receive cash from its regulated subsidiaries; and an impairment of Coventrys intangible assets. For a further discussion of risks and uncertainties, please see the risk factors described in Coventrys Annual Report on Form 10K for the year ended December 31, 2011 (), Coventrys Quarterly Report for the quarter ending March 31, 2012 (), and Coventrys Quarterly Report for the quarter ending June 30, 2012 (together with Coventrys First Quarter 10-Q, ), each on file with the SEC. You should also read the Coventry Annual Report and the Coventry Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Coventrys historical results of operations and financial condition. Except to the extent required by applicable law, Coventry does not intend to update any such forwardlooking statements.
Coventry Annual Report
Coventry First Quarter 10-Q
Coventry Quarterly Reports
-
No assurances can be given that any of the events anticipated by the forward-looking statements will transpire or occur, or if any of them do occur, what impact they will have on the results of operations, financial condition or cash flows of Aetna or Coventry. Neither Aetna nor Coventry assumes any duty to update or revise forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, as of any future date.
 
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01.          Other Events.
 
In response to various inquiries, Aetna has reiterated that (i) through the date of the Coventry stockholder vote on the pending transaction, Aetna will be effectively precluded from repurchasing its shares; and (ii) following the date of the Coventry stockholder vote, Aetna will be permitted to repurchase shares subject to its evaluation of market conditions, capital allocation considerations, legal constraints and other relevant factors.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.          Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
 
 
* The schedules and exhibits have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K. Aetna agrees to furnish supplementally a copy of such schedules and exhibits, or any section thereof, to the SEC upon request.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 2.1
 
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
and
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page
 
 
 
i
 
 
 
 
ii
 
 
 
 
iii
 
 
 
 
EXHIBITS
Exhibit A          Certificate of Incorporation of the Surviving Corporation
 
iv
 
 
AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER
AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER (this ) dated as of August 19, 2012 among Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (), Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a Delaware corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Parent (), and Coventry Health Care, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ).
Agreement
Parent
Merger Subsidiary
Company
WHEREAS, the Boards of Directors of Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company have approved and declared advisable this Agreement and the Merger (as defined below); and
WHEREAS, Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company desire to make certain representations, warranties, covenants and agreements specified in this Agreement in connection with the Merger and to prescribe certain conditions to the Merger.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and the representations, warranties, covenants and agreements contained in this Agreement, the parties agree as follows:
ARTICLE 1
D
EFINITIONS
Section 1.01 (a) As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the following meanings:
. Definitions.
 means the Securities Act of 1933.
1933 Act
 means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
1934 Act
 means any inquiry, proposal, indication of interest or offer from any Person or group (as defined in Section 13(d) of the 1934 Act), other than Parent and its Subsidiaries, relating to any (i) direct or indirect acquisition (whether in a single transaction or a series of related transactions) of assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries (including securities of Subsidiaries) equal to 20% or more of the Companys consolidated assets or to which 20% or more of the Companys revenues or earnings on a consolidated basis are attributable, (ii) direct or indirect acquisition (whether in a single transaction or a series of related transactions) of beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Section 13 under the 1934 Act) of 20% or more of any class of equity or voting securities of the Company, (iii) tender offer or exchange offer that, if consummated, would result in any Person or group (as defined in Section 13(d) of the 1934 Act) ), other than Parent and its Subsidiaries, beneficially owning 20% or more of any class of equity or voting securities of the Company or
Acquisition Proposal
 
 
 
 
(iv) merger, consolidation, share exchange, business combination, reorganization, recapitalization, liquidation, dissolution or similar transaction involving the Company which is structured to permit, or involves, the acquisition by any Person or group (as defined in Section 13(d) of the 1934 Act), other than Parent and its Subsidiaries, of beneficial ownership of (A) assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries equal to 20% or more of the Companys consolidated assets or to which 20% or more of the Companys revenues or earnings on a consolidated basis are attributable or (B) 20% or more of any class of equity or voting securities of the Company; in each case, other than the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
 means, with respect to any Person, any other Person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with such Person.
Affiliate
 means, with respect to any Person, any federal, state or local law (statutory, common or otherwise), constitution, treaty, convention, ordinance, code, rule, regulation, Order or other similar requirement (and any federal, state or local directive or other requirement, in each case that relates to Medicare or Medicaid) enacted, adopted, promulgated or applied by a Governmental Authority that is binding upon or applicable to such Person, as the same may be amended from time to time unless expressly specified otherwise in this Agreement. References to Applicable Law or Applicable Laws shall be deemed to include Health Care Laws and any applicable insurance or antitrust law (including any law designed or intended to prohibit, restrict or regulate actions having the purpose or effect of monopolization or restraint of trade).
Applicable Law(s)
 means actuarial standards of practice promulgated by the Actuarial Standards Board for use by actuaries when providing professional services in the United States.
ASOPs
 means a day, other than Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York, New York, Hartford, Connecticut or Bethesda, Maryland are authorized or required by Applicable Law to close.
Business Day
 means the Clean Team Confidentiality Agreement, dated as of July 20, 2012, between Parent and the Company.
Clean Team Confidentiality Agreement
 means the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services.
CMS
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
 means the Companys annual report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011.
Company 10-K
 
2
 
 means the consolidated balance sheet of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2011, and the footnotes to such consolidated balance sheet, in each case set forth in the Company 10-K.
Company Balance Sheet
 means December 31, 2011.
Company Balance Sheet Date
 means the common stock, $0.01 par value, of the Company.
Company Common Stock
 means the Company Disclosure Schedule delivered to Parent on the date of this Agreement.
Company Disclosure Schedule
 means the Owned Intellectual Property and the Licensed Intellectual Property.
Company Intellectual Property
 means any consent, approval, waiver, license, permit, franchise, authorization or Order.
Consent
 means any contract, agreement, obligation, understanding or instrument, lease or license.
Contract
 means the Credit Agreement, dated as of June 22, 2011, among the Company, as Borrower, the lenders named therein, as Initial Lenders, the initial issuing banks named therein, as Initial Issuing Banks, JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent, Citibank, N.A. and Bank of America, N.A. as Syndication Agents and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Citigroup Global Markets Inc. and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated as Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Bookrunners.
Credit Agreement
 means any (i) employee benefit plan as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA, (ii) compensation, employment, consulting, severance, termination protection, change in control, transaction bonus, retention or similar plan, agreement, arrangement, program or policy or (iii) other plan, agreement, arrangement, program or policy providing for compensation, bonuses, profit-sharing, equity or equity-based compensation or other forms of incentive or deferred compensation, vacation benefits, insurance (including any self-insured arrangement), medical, dental, vision, prescription or fringe benefits, life insurance, relocation or expatriate benefits, perquisites, disability or sick leave benefits, employee assistance program, workers compensation, supplemental unemployment benefits or post-employment or retirement benefits (including compensation, pension, health, medical or insurance benefits), in each case whether or not written (x) that is sponsored, maintained, administered, contributed to or entered into by the Company or any of its Affiliates for the current or future benefit of any director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor (including any former director, officer, employee or individual independent
Employee Plan
 
3
 
 
contractor) of the Company of any of its Subsidiaries or (y) for which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has any direct or indirect liability.
 means any Applicable Law relating to (i) the protection, preservation or restoration of the environment (including air, surface water, groundwater, drinking water supply, surface land, subsurface land, plant and animal life or any other natural resource), or (ii) the exposure to, or the use, storage, recycling, treatment, generation, transportation, processing, handling, labeling, production, release or disposal of Hazardous Substances.
Environmental Law
 means all permits, licenses, franchises, consents (including consents required by Contract), variances, exemptions, orders, certificates, approvals and other similar authorizations of Governmental Authorities required by Environmental Law and affecting, or relating to, the business of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
Environmental Permits
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
ERISA
 means, with respect to any entity, any other entity that, together with such entity, would be treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 means any registration, petition, statement, application, schedule, form, declaration, notice, notification, report, submission or other filing.
Filing
 means United States generally accepted accounting principles.
GAAP
 means any transnational, domestic or foreign federal, state or local governmental, regulatory or administrative authority, department, court, agency, commission or official, including any political subdivision thereof, or any non-governmental self-regulatory agency, commission or authority.
Governmental Authority
 means all health benefit programs that are sponsored by a Governmental Authority and that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries participates in, whether pursuant to one or more Contracts with the applicable Governmental Authority or otherwise, including Medicaid (including Temporary Assistance to Needy Families, Child Health Insurance Program, Aged, Blind and Disabled, Supplemental Security Income and long term care), Medicare Advantage (including Special Needs Plans), Medicare Part D, dual eligible initiatives and other demonstration programs.
Government Sponsored Health Care Programs
 means any substance, material or waste that is listed, defined, designated or classified as hazardous, toxic, radioactive, dangerous or a pollutant or contaminant or words of similar meaning under any
Hazardous Substance
 
4
 
 
Environmental Law or are otherwise regulated by any Governmental Authority with jurisdiction over the environment or natural resources, including without limitation petroleum or any derivative or byproduct thereof, radon, radioactive material, asbestos or asbestos containing material, urea formaldehyde, foam insulation or polychlorinated biphenyls.
 means all Applicable Laws relating to: (i) the licensure, certification, qualification or authority to transact business in connection with the provision of, payment for, or arrangement of, health benefits or health insurance, including Applicable Laws that regulate managed care, third-party payors and persons bearing the financial risk for, or providing administrative or other functions in connection with, the provision of, payment for or arrangement of health care services and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all other Applicable Laws relating to Health Care Programs, including Health Care Programs pursuant to which any Regulated Subsidiary is required to be licensed or authorized to transact business; (ii) health care or insurance fraud or abuse, including the solicitation or acceptance of improper incentives involving persons operating in the health care industry, patient referrals or Provider incentives generally, including the following statutes: the Federal anti-kickback law (42 U.S.C.  1320a-7b), the Stark laws (42 U.S.C.  1395nn), the Federal False Claims Act (31 U.S.C.  3729, et seq.), the Federal Civil Monetary Penalties Law (42 U.S.C.  1320a-7a), the Federal Program Fraud Civil Remedies Act (31 U.S.C.  3801 et seq.) and the Federal Health Care Fraud Law (18 U.S.C.  1347); (iii) the provision of administrative, management or other services related to any Health Care Programs, including the administration of health-care claims or benefits or processing or payment for health care services, treatment or supplies furnished by Providers, including the provision of the services of third party administrators, utilization review agents and persons performing quality assurance, credentialing or coordination of benefits; (iv) the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985; (v) ERISA (to the extent impacting any ASO arrangement); (vi) the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003; (vii) the Medicare Improvements for Patients and Providers Act of 2008; (viii) privacy, security, integrity, accuracy, transmission, storage or other protection of information about or belonging to actual or prospective participants in the Companys Health Care Programs or other lines of business, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191), as amended by the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Pub. L. No. 111-5), and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, any Applicable Laws relating to medical information; and (ix) the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Pub. L. 111-148) as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Pub. L. 111-152).
Health Care Laws
 means all lines of business, programs and types of services offered by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, including Government Sponsored Health Care Programs, Commercial Risk (individual,
Health Care Programs
 
5
 
 
small group, large group), Workers Compensation, Federal Employees Health Benefits Program (FEHBP), Administrative Services Only (ASO) and Network Rental.
 means the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of
HSR Act
1976.
 means all of the following, whether or not registered, and all rights therein, arising in the United States or any other jurisdiction throughout the world: (i) trademarks, service marks, trade names, Internet domain names, Internet account names (including social networking and media names), designs, logos, slogans and other indicia of origin, together with all goodwill, registrations and applications relating to the foregoing; (ii) patents and pending patent applications, invention disclosure statements, and all divisions, continuations, continuations-in-part, reissues, reexaminations, and any extensions thereof, any counterparts claiming priority therefrom and like statutory rights; (iii) registered and unregistered copyrights (including those in Software), rights of publicity, all registrations and applications to register the same, and all renewals, extensions, reversions and restorations thereof; (iv) trade secrets, confidential technology and information, know-how, inventions, processes, formulae, algorithms, models and methodologies (collectively, );
Intellectual Property
Trade Secrets
(v) Software; (vi) other similar types of proprietary or intellectual property; and (vii) rights to sue or recover and retain damages, costs and attorneys fees for past, present or future infringement, misappropriation, dilution or other violation of any of the foregoing.
 means all computers, Software, firmware, middleware, servers, workstations, routers, hubs, switches, data communications lines and other information technology equipment, and all associated documentation, owned by, or licensed or leased to, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
IT Assets
 of any Person that is not an individual means the knowledge after reasonable inquiry of the officers of the Company or Parent, as the case may be, as set forth in Section 1.01 of the Company Disclosure Schedule and Section 1.01 of the Parent Disclosure Schedule, respectively.
knowledge
 means all Intellectual Property owned by a Third Party and licensed or sublicensed to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or for which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has obtained a covenant not to be sued.
Licensed Intellectual Property
 means, with respect to any property or asset, any mortgage, lien, license, pledge, charge, security interest, encumbrance or other adverse claim of any kind in respect of such property or asset. For purposes of this Agreement, a Person shall be deemed to own subject to a Lien any property or asset that it has acquired or holds subject to the interest of a vendor or lessor under any
Lien
 
6
 
 
conditional sale agreement, capital lease or other title retention agreement relating to such property or asset.
 means, with respect to any Person, (i) any event, change, effect, development or occurrence that has a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business or results of operations of such Person and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, other than any event, change, effect, development or occurrence to the extent resulting from (A) any changes in general United States or global economic conditions, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on such Person and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which such Person and its Subsidiaries operate, (B) any changes in conditions generally affecting the healthcare, health insurance or managed care industry or any other industry in which such Person or any of its Subsidiaries operate, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on such Person and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which such Person and its Subsidiaries operate, (C) any decline, in and of itself, in the market price or trading volume of such Persons common stock (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude any other party to this Agreement from asserting that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such decline that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, a Material Adverse Effect), (D) any changes in regulatory, legislative or political conditions or in securities, credit, financial, debt or other capital markets, in each case in the United States or any foreign jurisdiction, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on such Person and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes or conditions have on other companies operating in the industries in which such Person and its Subsidiaries operate, (E) any failure, in and of itself, by such Person to meet any internal or published projections, forecasts, estimates or predictions in respect of revenues, earnings or other financial or operating metrics for any period (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude any other party to this Agreement from asserting that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such failure that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, a Material Adverse Effect), (F) the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the public announcement of this Agreement or the Merger, the taking of any action required or expressly contemplated by this Agreement (including pursuant to Section 8.01) or the identity of, or any facts or circumstances relating to any other party to this Agreement or such other partys Subsidiaries, including the impact of any of the foregoing on the relationships,
Material Adverse Effect
 
7
 
contractual or otherwise, of such Person or any of its Subsidiaries with customers, Providers, suppliers, partners, officers or employees (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not apply with respect to any representation or warranty that is intended to address the consequences of the execution, delivery or performance of this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby), (G) any adoption, implementation, promulgation, repeal, modification, amendment, reinterpretation, change or proposal of any Applicable Law of or by any Governmental Authority, except to the extent that such events or changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on such Person and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such events or changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which such Person and any of its Subsidiaries operate, (H) any changes in GAAP (or authoritative interpretations thereof), (I) any changes in geopolitical conditions, the outbreak or escalation of hostilities, any acts of war, sabotage or terrorism, or any escalation or worsening of any such acts of war, sabotage or terrorism threatened or underway as of the date of this Agreement, (J) any taking of any action at the written request of or with the consent of any other party to this Agreement (it being understood and agreed that, with respect to any action taken with such consent, the foregoing shall not preclude any other party to this Agreement from asserting that any facts or occurrences resulting from such action that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, a Material Adverse Effect), (K) any reduction in the credit rating of such Person or any of its Subsidiaries (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude any other party to this Agreement from asserting that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such reduction that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, a Material Adverse Effect), (L) any hurricane, earthquake, flood or other natural disasters, acts of God or any change resulting from weather conditions,
(M) any changes resulting from, arising under or relating to the Supreme Courts decision regarding Nat. Fed. of Indep. Bus. v. Sebelius, Sec. of Dept. of Health & Human Servs., No. 11-393 (2012); Dept. of Health & Human Servs. v. Florida, Nos. 11-398 & 11-400 (2012), including any state determining not to expand its Medicaid Programs pursuant to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, (N) any changes to reimbursement rates or in methods or procedures for determining such rates, any changes to eligibility requirements or any other programmatic changes by any Governmental Authority that, in each case, have general application to other companies providing managed care services similar to the services that are provided by such Person and its Subsidiaries or to other companies operating in the industries in which such Person and its Subsidiaries operate, as applicable, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on such Person and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies
 
8
 
 
operating in the Medicaid or Medicare managed care industry or other industries in which such Person and its Subsidiaries operate, (O) the failure, in and of itself, of such Person or any of its Subsidiaries to obtain the right to provide services in any jurisdiction under a Contract with CMS, any state agency or any other Governmental Authority pursuant to any request for proposal, procurement, re-procurement or similar process or the failure of any such Contract to be renewed upon its expiration (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude any other party to this Agreement from asserting that any facts or occurrences giving rise to such failure that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, a Material Adverse Effect), (P) the effects on such Persons and its Subsidiaries business arising from employee departures that result from the announcement of this Agreement and the Merger or (Q) any litigation or legal proceedings arising from allegations of a breach of fiduciary duty or violation of Applicable Law relating to this Agreement or the Merger.
 means any order, writ, decree, judgment, award, injunction, ruling, settlement or stipulation issued, promulgated, made, rendered or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority (in each case, whether temporary, preliminary or permanent).
Order
 means any and all Intellectual Property owned or purported to be owned by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
Owned Intellectual Property
 means the consolidated balance sheet of Parent as of December 31, 2011, and the footnotes to such consolidated balance sheet, in each case set forth in the Parent 10-K.
Parent Balance Sheet
 means Parents annual report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011.
Parent 10-K
 means December 31, 2011.
Parent Balance Sheet Date
 means the common shares, $0.01 par value, of
Parent Common Stock
Parent.
 means the Parent Disclosure Schedule delivered to the Company on the date of this Agreement.
Parent Disclosure Schedule
 means the average of the volume weighted averages of the trading prices of Parent Common Stock on the NYSE (as reported by Bloomberg L.P. or, if not reported therein, in another authoritative source mutually selected by Parent and the Company) on each of the five consecutive trading days ending on the trading day that is two trading days prior to the Closing Date.
Parent Stock Price
 
9
 
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation.
PBGC
 means (i) any Liens for Taxes not yet due and payable or which are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and with respect to which adequate reserves have been taken, (ii) carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, repairmens or other similar liens, (iii) pledges or deposits in connection with workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security legislation, (iv) gaps in the chain of title evident from the records of the applicable Government Authority maintaining such records, easements, rights-of-way, covenants, restrictions and other encumbrances of record as of the date of this Agreement, (v) easements, rights-of-way, covenants, restrictions and other encumbrances incurred in the ordinary course of business that, in the aggregate, are not material in amount and that do not, in any case, materially detract from the value or the use of the property subject thereto, (vi) statutory landlords liens and liens granted to landlords under any lease, (vii) non-exclusive licenses to Intellectual Property granted in the ordinary course of business, (viii) any purchase money security interests, equipment leases or similar financing arrangements, (ix) any Liens which are disclosed on the Company Balance Sheet and (x) any Liens that are not material to the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
Permitted Lien
 means any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, trust or other entity or organization, including a government or political subdivision or an agency or instrumentality of such government or political subdivision.
Person
 means all primary care physicians and physician groups, medical groups, independent practice associations, specialist physicians, dentists, optometrists, pharmacies and pharmacists, radiologists and radiology centers, laboratories, mental health professionals, community health centers, clinics, surgicenters, accountable care organizations, chiropractors, physical therapists, hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, extended care facilities, other health care or services facilities, durable medical equipment suppliers, home health agencies, alcoholism or drug abuse centers and any other specialty, ancillary or allied health professional or facility.
Providers
 means any Subsidiary of the Company or Parent, as applicable, that is licensed in one or more jurisdictions as an insurance company, health maintenance organization (including a single healthcare service plan), managed care organization, healthcare service plan, specialized healthcare service plan, healthcare service corporation, dental maintenance organization, dental plan organization, prepaid dental plan, third party administrator and/or utilization review agent.
Regulated Subsidiary
 means the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
 
10
 
 
 means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
SEC
 means all (i) computer programs and other software including any and all software implementations of algorithms, models and, methodologies, assemblers, applets, compilers, development tools, design tools and user interfaces, whether in source code or object code form, (ii) databases and compilations, including all data and collections of data, whether machine readable or otherwise, and (iii) updates, upgrades, modifications, improvements, enhancements, derivative works, new versions, new releases and corrections to or based on any of the foregoing.
Software
 means, with respect to any Person, any entity of which securities or other ownership interests having ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or other persons performing similar functions are directly or indirectly owned by such Person.
Subsidiary
 means any Person, including as defined in Section 13(d) of the 1934 Act, other than Parent or any of its Affiliates, and the directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person, in each case, acting in such capacity.
Third Party
 has the meaning specified in the definition of Intellectual Property.
Trade Secrets
(b) Each of the following terms is defined in the Section set forth opposite such term:
 
11
 
 
 
 
12
 
 
Section 1.02 The words hereof, herein and hereunder and words of like import used in this Agreement shall refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular provision of this Agreement. The table of contents and captions in this Agreement are included for convenience of reference only and shall be ignored in the construction or interpretation hereof. References to Articles, Sections and Exhibits are to Articles, Sections and Exhibits of this Agreement unless otherwise specified. All Exhibits and schedules annexed to this Agreement or referred to in this Agreement, including the Company Disclosure Schedule and the Parent Disclosure Schedule, are incorporated in and made a part of this Agreement as if set forth in full in this Agreement. Any capitalized term used in any Exhibit, the Company Disclosure Schedule or the Parent Disclosure Schedule but not otherwise defined therein shall have the meaning set forth in this Agreement. Any singular term in this Agreement shall be deemed to include the plural, and any plural term the singular. Whenever the words include, includes or including are used in this Agreement, they shall be deemed to be followed by the words without limitation, whether or not they are in fact followed by those words or words of like import. Writing, written and comparable terms refer to printing, typing and other means of reproducing words (including electronic media) in a visible form. References to any statute shall be deemed to refer to such statute as amended from time to time and to any rules or regulations promulgated thereunder. References to any Contract are to that Contract as amended, modified or supplemented from time to time in accordance with the terms hereof and thereof; that with respect to any Contract listed on any schedule hereto, all such amendments, modifications or supplements must also be
. Other Definitional and Interpretative Provisions.
provided
 
13
 
listed in the appropriate schedule. References to any Person include the successors and permitted assigns of that Person. References from or through any date mean, unless otherwise specified, from and including or through and including, respectively.
ARTICLE 2
T M
HE
ERGER
Section 2.01 (a) At the Effective Time, Merger Subsidiary shall be merged (the ) with and into the Company in accordance with the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ), whereupon the separate existence of Merger Subsidiary shall cease, and the Company shall be the surviving corporation (the ).
. The Merger.
Merger
Delaware Law
Surviving Corporation
(b)
 
The closing of the Merger (the ) shall take place in New York City at the offices of Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP, 450 Lexington Avenue, New York, New York, 10017 as soon as possible, but in any event no later than two Business Days after the date the conditions set forth in Article 9 (other than conditions that by their nature are to be satisfied at the Closing, but subject to the satisfaction or, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law, waiver of such conditions by the party or parties entitled to the benefit thereof at the Closing) have been satisfied or, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law, waived by the party or parties entitled to the benefit thereof, or at such other place, at such other time or on such other date as Parent and the Company may mutually agree (it being understood and agreed that the obligation of each of Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company to consummate the Closing is subject to the satisfaction (or, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law, waiver by such party) of the conditions to Closing set forth in Article 9 for the benefit of such party as of the Closing) (the date on which the Closing occurs, the ).
Closing
Closing Date
(c)
 
At the Closing, the Company and Merger Subsidiary shall file a certificate of merger with the Delaware Secretary of State and make all other filings or recordings required by the Delaware Law in connection with the Merger. The Merger shall become effective at such time (the ) as the certificate of merger is duly filed with the Delaware Secretary of State (or at such later time as Parent and the Company shall agree and is specified in the certificate of merger).
Effective Time
(d)
 
From and after the Effective Time, the Surviving Corporation shall possess all the rights, powers, privileges and franchises and be subject to all of the obligations, liabilities, restrictions and disabilities of the Company and Merger Subsidiary, all as provided under the Delaware Law.
 
14
 
Section 2.02. (a) At the Effective Time:
Conversion of Shares.
(i)
 
except as otherwise provided in Section 2.02(a)(ii), Section 2.02(a)(iii) or Section 2.04, each share of Company Common Stock outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be converted into the right to receive (i) 0.3885 (the ) shares of Parent Common Stock (the ) and (ii) $27.30 in cash (the , and, together with the Per Share Stock Consideration, the ), without interest;
Exchange Ratio
Per Share Stock Consideration
Per Share Cash Consideration
Merger Consideration
(ii)
 
each share of Company Common Stock held by the Company as treasury stock or owned by Parent or Merger Subsidiary immediately prior to the Effective Time (other than any such shares owned by Parent or any of its Subsidiaries in a fiduciary, representative or other capacity on behalf of other Persons, whether or not held in a separate account) shall be canceled, and no payment shall be made with respect thereto;
(iii)
 
each share of Company Common Stock held by any Subsidiary of either the Company or Parent (other than Merger Subsidiary) immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be converted into a number of shares of common stock of the Surviving Corporation such that each such Subsidiary owns the same percentage of the outstanding common stock of the Surviving Corporation immediately following the Effective Time as such Subsidiary owned of the outstanding capital stock of the Company immediately prior to the Effective Time; and
(iv)
 
each share of common stock of Merger Subsidiary outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be converted into and become one share of common stock of the Surviving Corporation with the same rights, powers and privileges as the shares so converted and shall constitute the only outstanding shares of capital stock of the Surviving Corporation (except for any such shares resulting from the conversion of shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to Section 2.02(a)(iii)).
(b)
 
As of the Effective Time, all outstanding shares of Company Common Stock shall no longer be outstanding and shall automatically be canceled and retired and shall cease to exist, and (x) each certificate which immediately prior to the Effective Time represented any such shares of Company Common Stock (each, a ) and (y) each uncertificated share of Company Common Stock (an ) which immediately prior to the Effective Time was registered to a holder on the stock transfer books of the Company shall thereafter represent only the right to receive the Merger Consideration and the right to receive any dividends or other distributions
Certificate
Uncertificated Share
 
15
 
 
pursuant to Section 2.03(f) and any cash in lieu of any fractional share of Parent Common Stock pursuant to Section 2.07, in each case to be issued or paid in accordance with Section 2.03, without interest
Section 2.03 (a) Prior to the Effective Time, Parent shall appoint a commercial bank or trust company reasonably acceptable to the Company (the ) for the purpose of exchanging (i) Certificates or (ii) Uncertificated Shares for the Merger Consideration. As of the Effective Time, Parent shall deposit with the Exchange Agent, for the benefit of the holders of shares of Company Common Stock, for exchange in accordance with this Section 2.03 through the Exchange Agent, (x) certificates (or evidence of shares in book-entry form) representing the shares of Parent Common Stock issuable pursuant to Section 2.02(a)(i) in exchange for outstanding shares of Company Common Stock and (y) cash sufficient to pay the aggregate Per Share Cash Consideration payable pursuant to Section 2.02(a)(i). Parent agrees to make available directly or indirectly to the Exchange Agent from time to time as needed additional cash sufficient to pay any dividends or other distributions to which such holders are entitled pursuant to Section 2.03(f) and cash in lieu of any fractional share of Parent Common Stock to which such holder is entitled pursuant to Section 2.07. Promptly after the Effective Time (and in no event more than five Business Days after the Effective Time), Parent shall send, or shall cause the Exchange Agent to send, to each holder of shares of Company Common Stock at the Effective Time a letter of transmittal and instructions (which shall be in a form reasonably acceptable to the Company and substantially finalized prior to the Effective Time and which shall specify that delivery shall be effected, and risk of loss and title shall pass, only upon proper delivery of the Certificates or transfer of the Uncertificated Shares to the Exchange Agent) for use in such exchange. All certificates (or evidence of shares in book-entry form) and cash deposited with the Exchange Agent pursuant to this Section 2.03 shall be referred to in this Agreement as the . Parent shall cause the Exchange Agent to deliver the Merger Consideration contemplated to be issued or paid pursuant to this Article II out of the Exchange Fund. The Exchange Fund shall not be used for any other purpose. The Exchange Agent shall invest any cash included in the Exchange Fund as directed by Parent; that no such investment or losses thereon shall affect the Merger Consideration payable to holders of Company Common Stock entitled to receive such consideration or cash in lieu of fractional interests; , that, to the extent necessary to pay the Merger Consideration, Parent shall promptly cause to be provided additional funds to the Exchange Agent for the benefit of holders of Company Common Stock entitled to receive such consideration in the amount of any such losses. Any interest and other income resulting from such investments shall be the property of, and paid to, Parent upon termination of the Exchange Fund.
. Surrender and Payment.
Exchange Agent
Exchange Fund
provided
provided, further
(b) Each holder of shares of Company Common Stock that have been converted into the right to receive the Merger Consideration shall be entitled to receive, upon (i) surrender to the Exchange Agent of a Certificate, together with a
 
16
 
properly completed letter of transmittal, or (ii) receipt of an agents message by the Exchange Agent (or such other evidence, if any, of transfer as the Exchange Agent may reasonably request) in the case of a book-entry transfer of Uncertificated Shares, the Merger Consideration in respect of the Company Common Stock represented by a Certificate or Uncertificated Share. The shares of Parent Common Stock constituting part of such Merger Consideration, at Parents option, shall be in uncertificated book-entry form, unless a physical certificate is requested by a holder of shares of Company Common Stock or is otherwise required under Applicable Law.
(c)
 
If any portion of the Merger Consideration is to be paid to a Person other than the Person in whose name the surrendered Certificate or the transferred Uncertificated Share is registered, it shall be a condition to such payment that (i) either such Certificate shall be properly endorsed or shall otherwise be in proper form for transfer or such Uncertificated Share shall be properly transferred and
(ii)
 
the Person requesting such payment shall pay to the Exchange Agent any transfer or similar Taxes required as a result of such payment to a Person other than the registered holder of such Certificate or Uncertificated Share or establish to the satisfaction of the Exchange Agent that such Tax has been paid or is not payable.
(d)
 
The stock transfer books of the Company shall be closed immediately upon the Effective Time and there shall be no further registration of transfers of shares of Company Common Stock thereafter on the records of the Company. If, after the Effective Time, Certificates or Uncertificated Shares are presented to Parent, the Surviving Corporation or the Exchange Agent for any reason, they shall be canceled and exchanged for the Merger Consideration, any dividends or other distributions to which the holders thereof are entitled pursuant to Section 2.03(f) and any cash in lieu of any fractional share of Parent Common Stock to which such holders are entitled pursuant to Section 2.07, in each case to the extent provided for, and in accordance with the procedures set forth, in this Article 2.
(e)
 
Any portion of the Merger Consideration made available to the Exchange Agent pursuant to Section 2.03(a) that remains unclaimed by the holders of shares of Company Common Stock 12 months after the Effective Time shall be delivered to Parent or as otherwise instructed by Parent, and any such holder who has not exchanged shares of Company Common Stock for the Merger Consideration in accordance with this Section 2.03 prior to that time shall thereafter look only to Parent for payment of the Merger Consideration and any dividends and distributions (and cash in lieu of any fractional shares of Parent Common Stock) with respect thereto, in respect of such shares without any interest thereon. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Parent shall not be liable to any holder of shares of Company Common Stock for any amounts paid to a public official pursuant to applicable abandoned property, escheat or similar laws. Any amounts remaining unclaimed by holders of shares of Company Common Stock
 
17
 
 
immediately prior to such time when the amounts would otherwise escheat to or become property of any Governmental Authority shall become, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law, the property of Parent free and clear of any claims or interest of any Person previously entitled thereto.
(f)
 
No dividends or other distributions with respect to securities of Parent constituting part of the Merger Consideration, and no cash payment in lieu of fractional shares as provided in Section 2.07, shall be paid to the holder of any Certificates not surrendered or of any Uncertificated Shares not transferred until such Certificates or Uncertificated Shares are surrendered or transferred, as the case may be, as provided in this Section 2.03. Following such surrender or transfer, there shall be paid, without interest, to the Person in whose name the securities of Parent constituting part of the Merger Consideration have been registered, (i) promptly after the time of such surrender or transfer, the amount of any cash payable in lieu of fractional shares to which such Person is entitled pursuant to Section 2.07 and the aggregate amount of all dividends or other distributions payable with respect to securities of Parent constituting part of the Merger Consideration with a record date after the Effective Time that were paid prior to the time of such surrender or transfer with respect to such securities of Parent, and (ii) at the appropriate payment date, the amount of all dividends or other distributions payable with respect to securities of Parent constituting part of the Merger Consideration with a record date after the Effective Time and prior to the time of such surrender or transfer and with a payment date subsequent to the time of such surrender or transfer.
(g)
 
The payment of any transfer, documentary, sales, use, stamp, registration, value added and other Taxes and fees (including any penalties and interest) incurred solely by a holder of Company Common Stock in connection with the Merger, and the filing of any related Tax returns and other documentation with respect to such Taxes and fees, shall be the sole responsibility of such holder.
Section 2.04. . Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, shares of Company Common Stock that are issued and outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Time and that are held by a stockholder who is entitled to demand and properly demands appraisal of such shares pursuant to, and who complies in all respects with, the provisions of Section 262 of the Delaware Law (such stockholders, the   and such shares of Company Common Stock, the ), shall not be converted into or be exchangeable for the right to receivethe Merger Consideration, but instead such holder shall be entitled to payment of the fair value of such Dissenting Shares in accordance with the provisions of Section 262 of the Delaware Law (and, at the Effective Time, such Dissenting Shares shall no longer be outstanding and shall automatically be canceled and shall cease to exist, and such holder shall cease to have any rights with respect thereto, except the right to receive the fair value of such Dissenting Shares in
Dissenting Shares
Dissenting
Stockholders
Dissenting Shares
 
 
18
 
 
accordance with the provisions of Section 262 of the Delaware Law), unless and until such holder shall have failed to perfect or shall have effectively waived, withdrawn or lost rights to appraisal under the Delaware Law. If any Dissenting Stockholders shall have failed to perfect or shall have effectively waived, withdrawn or lost such rights, the Dissenting Shares held by such Dissenting Stockholder shall thereupon be deemed to have been converted, as of the Effective Time, into the right to receive the Merger Consideration as provided in Section 2.02, without interest. The Company shall give Parent prompt notice of any written demands for appraisal of any shares of Company Common Stock, attempted withdrawals of such demands and any other instruments served pursuant to the Delaware Law and received by the Company relating to stockholders rights of appraisal in accordance with the provisions of Section 262 of the Delaware Law, and Parent shall have the right to direct all negotiations and proceedings with respect to all such demands. The Company shall not, except with the prior written consent of Parent, make any payment with respect to, settle or offer or agree to settle any such demands. Any portion of the Merger Consideration made available to the Exchange Agent pursuant to Section 2.03 to pay for shares of Company Common Stock for which appraisal rights have been perfected shall be returned to Parent upon demand.
Section 2.05 (a) At the Effective Time:
. Stock Awards.
(i)
 
each option to purchase shares of Company Common Stock outstanding under any Employee Plan (each, a  ), whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exerciseprice less than the Equity Award Cash Consideration, shall be canceled and converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest, equal to the product of (A) the excess, if any, of (1) the sum of (x) the Per Share Cash Consideration (y) the value equal to the product of the Parent Stock Price the Exchange Ratio (the sum of the amounts in clauses (x) and (y), the  ) over (2) the applicable per share exercise price of suchCompany Stock Option (B) the total number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to such Company Stock Option;
Company Stock
Option
 
plus
multiplied by
Equity Award Cash
Consideration
 
multiplied by
(ii)
 
each share of Company Common Stock outstanding that is subject to forfeiture risk under any Employee Plan (collectively, ) and that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of this Agreement, is vested or becomes vested as of the Effective Time shall be converted into the right to receive the Merger Consideration;
Company Restricted Shares
(iii)
 
(A) each performance share unit and restricted stock unit outstanding under any Employee Plan (collectively,  ) that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of this Agreement, isvested or becomes vested as of the Effective Time, and each performance-
Company Stock
Units
 
 
19
 
 
based Company Stock Unit held by the individual listed on Section 2.05(iii)(A) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, shall be
converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest, equal to the product of (1) the Equity Award Cash Consideration (2) the number of shares of Company Common Stockrepresented by such unit; and
multiplied by
 
(B) each Company Stock Unit that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of this Agreement, is not vested and will not become vested as of the Effective Time (other than any performance-based Company Stock Unit held by the individual listed on Section 2.05(iii)(A) of Company Disclosure Schedule), in the event that the Merger is consummated, shall convert at the Effective Time into a cash-settled restricted stock unit with the number of shares of Parent Common Stock underlying such cash-settled restricted stock unit equal to (1) the number of shares of Company Common Stock subject to such Company Stock Unit (as determined in accordance with the terms and conditions applicable thereto) immediately prior to the Effective Time (2) the Equity Award Cash Consideration divided bythe Parent Stock Price; , that each such cash-settled restricted stock unit shall be subject to the same terms and conditions (including service-based vesting) as applied to the corresponding Company Stock Units immediately prior to the Effective Time.
multiplied by
 
provided
(b)
 
During the 60-day period commencing on the date of this Agreement, Parent, in consultation with the Company, shall consider, after taking into account the terms and conditions of each applicable Company Stock Option, the appropriate treatment of each Company Stock Option, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price equal to or greater than the Equity Award Cash Consideration.
(c)
 
Prior to the Effective Time, the Board of Directors of the Company (and/or the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company) shall pass such resolutions as are necessary to give effect to the transactions contemplated by this Section 2.05.
Section 2.06 Without limiting or affecting any of the provisions of Section 6.01 or Section 7.01, if, during the period between the date of this Agreement and the Effective Time, any change in the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company or Parent shall occur as a result of any reclassification, recapitalization, stock split (including reverse stock split), merger, combination, exchange or readjustment of shares, subdivision or other similar transaction, or any stock dividend thereon with a record date during such period, the Merger Consideration and any other amounts payable pursuant to this
. Adjustments.
 
20
 
 
Agreement shall be appropriately adjusted to eliminate the effect of such event on the Merger Consideration or any such other amounts payable pursuant to this Agreement.
Section 2.07 Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, no fractional shares of Parent Common Stock shall be issued in the Merger. All fractional shares of Parent Common Stock that a holder of shares of Company Common Stock would otherwise be entitled to receive as a result of the Merger shall be aggregated and, if a fractional share results from such aggregation, such holder shall be entitled to receive, in lieu thereof, an amount in cash, without interest, determined by multiplying the Parent Stock Price by the fraction of a share of Parent Common Stock to which such holder would otherwise have been entitled.
. Fractional Shares.
Section 2.08 Each of the Exchange Agent, Parent and the Surviving Corporation shall be entitled to deduct and withhold from the consideration otherwise payable to any Person pursuant to this Article 2 such amounts as it is required to deduct and withhold with respect to the making of such payment under any provision of any Applicable Law, including federal, state, local or foreign Tax law. If the Exchange Agent, Parent or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, so withholds amounts, such amounts shall be treated for all purposes of this Agreement as having been paid to the Person in respect of which the Exchange Agent, Parent or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, made such deduction and withholding. Parent shall pay, or shall cause to be paid, all amounts so deducted or withheld to the appropriate Taxing Authority within the period required under Applicable Law.
. Withholding Rights.
Section 2.09 If any Certificate shall have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the Person claiming such Certificate to be lost, stolen or destroyed and, if required by the Surviving Corporation, the posting by such Person of a bond, in such reasonable amount as the Surviving Corporation may direct, as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the Surviving Corporation with respect to such Certificate, the Exchange Agent will issue, in exchange for such lost, stolen or destroyed Certificate, the Merger Consideration to be paid in respect of the shares of Company Common Stock represented by such Certificate, as contemplated by this Article 2.
. Lost Certificates.
Section 2.10 At and after the Effective Time, the officers and directors of the Surviving Corporation shall be authorized to execute and deliver, in the name and on behalf of the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or Merger Subsidiary, any deeds, bills of sale, assignments or assurances and to take and do, in the name and on behalf of the Company, any of its Subsidiaries or Merger Subsidiary, any other actions and things to vest, perfect or confirm of record or otherwise in the Surviving Corporation any and all right, title and interest in, to and under any of the rights, properties or assets of the Company
. Further Assurances.
 
21
 
 
acquired or to be acquired by the Surviving Corporation as a result of, or in connection with, the Merger.
ARTICLE 3
T S C
HE
URVIVING
ORPORATION
Section 3.01 At the Effective Time, the certificate of incorporation of the Company shall be amended and restated in its entirety as set forth in Exhibit A hereto and, as so amended, shall remain the certificate of incorporation of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter amended as provided therein or by Applicable Law.
. Certificate of Incorporation.
Section 3.02 The bylaws of Merger Subsidiary in effect at the Effective Time shall be the bylaws of the Surviving Corporation until thereafter amended as provided therein, in the certificate of incorporation of the Surviving Corporation or by Applicable Law.
. Bylaws.
Section 3.03 From and after the Effective Time, until their respective successors are duly elected or appointed and qualified in accordance with Applicable Law, (i) the directors of Merger Subsidiary at the Effective Time shall be the directors of the Surviving Corporation and (ii) the officers of the Company at the Effective Time shall be the officers of the Surviving Corporation.
. Directors and Officers.
ARTICLE 4
R W C
EPRESENTATIONS AND
ARRANTIES OF THE
OMPANY
Subject to Section 11.05, except (i) other than with respect to the representations and warranties in Section 4.01, Section 4.02, Section 4.05, Section 4.06, Section 4.26, Section 4.27 and Section 4.28, as disclosed in any publicly available Company SEC Document filed after December 31, 2011 and before the date of this Agreement or in the Companys annual report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010 or in the Companys proxy statement for the 2011 annual meeting of the Companys stockholders or (ii) as set forth in the Company Disclosure Schedule, the Company represents and warrants to Parent as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing Date that:
Section 4.01 The Company is a corporation duly incorporated, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Delaware and has all corporate powers required to carry on its business as now conducted. The Company is duly qualified to do business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction where such qualification is necessary, except for those jurisdictions where failure to be so qualified has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material
. Corporate Existence and Power.
 
22
 
 
Adverse Effect on the Company. Prior to the date of this Agreement, the Company has made available to Parent true and complete copies of the certificate of incorporation and bylaws of the Company as in effect on the date of this Agreement.
Section 4.02 (a) The execution, delivery and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement are within the Companys corporate powers and, except for the required approval of the Companys stockholders in connection with the consummation of the Merger, have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Company. The affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of Company Common Stock is the only vote of the holders of any of the Companys capital stock necessary in connection with the consummation of the Merger (the ). This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company and constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with its terms.
. Corporate Authorization.
Company Stockholder Approval
(b) At a meeting duly called and held, the Board of Directors of the Company unanimously adopted resolutions (i) determining that this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby are fair to and in the best interests of the Companys stockholders, (ii) approving, adopting and declaring advisable this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, (iii) directing that the approval and adoption of this Agreement be submitted to a vote at a meeting of the Companys stockholders and (iv) recommending approval and adoption of this Agreement by the Companys stockholders (such recommendation, the ). Except as permitted by Section 6.03(b), Section 6.03(c), Section 6.03(d) and Section 6.03(e), the Board of Directors of the Company has not subsequently rescinded, modified or withdrawn any of the foregoing resolutions.
Company Board Recommendation
Section 4.03 (a) The execution, delivery and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the consummation by the Company of the transactions contemplated hereby require no action by or in respect of, or Filing with, any Governmental Authority other than (i) the filing of a certificate of merger with respect to the Merger with the Delaware Secretary of State and appropriate documents with the relevant authorities of other states in which the Company is qualified to do business, (ii) compliance with any applicable requirements of the HSR Act, (iii) compliance with any applicable requirements of the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act and any other applicable U.S. state or federal securities laws, (iv) the state insurance department, department of health and other Filings and approvals that, in each case of this clause (iv), are listed on Section 4.03(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule (the consents, approvals orders, authorizations, acknowledgements and Filings required under or in connection with this clause (iv), the )
. Governmental Authorization.
Required Governmental Authorizations
 
 
 
23
 
 
and (v) any other actions or Filings the absence of which would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
(b) Section 4.03(b) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of each Regulated Subsidiary of the Company in existence as of the date of this Agreement and, for each such Regulated Subsidiary, its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization and each jurisdiction where it is licensed by the state department of insurance, state department of health or other applicable state agency.
Section 4.04 The execution, delivery and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby do not and will not (i) contravene, conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of any provision of the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of the Company, (ii) assuming compliance with the matters referred to in Section 4.03 and receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval, contravene, conflict with or result in any violation or breach of any provision of any Applicable Law, (iii) assuming compliance with the matters referred to in Section 4.03 and receipt of the Company Stockholder Approval, require any consent or other action by any Person under, constitute a default, or an event that, with or without notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute a default, under, or cause or permit the termination, cancellation, acceleration or other change of any right or obligation or the loss of any benefit to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is entitled under any provision of any Contract binding upon the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or any governmental licenses, authorizations, permits, consents (including consents required by Contract), approvals, variances, exemptions or orders affecting, or relating in any way to, the assets or business of the Company and its Subsidiaries or (iv) result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, with such exceptions, in the case of each of clauses (ii) through (iv), as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
. Non-contravention.
Section 4.05 (a) The authorized capital stock of the Company consists of (i) 570,000,000 shares of Company Common Stock and (ii) 1,000,000 shares of Preferred Stock, par value $0.01 per share ( ). As of August 17, 2012, there were outstanding (i)133,851,107 shares of Company Common Stock (of which, an aggregate of 1,317,354 shares are Company Restricted Shares), (ii) no shares of Company Preferred Stock, (iii) Company Stock Options to purchase an aggregate of 8,550,329 shares of Company Common Stock (of which, options to purchase an aggregate of 5,598,994 shares of Company Common Stock were exercisable) and (iv) Company Stock Units. All outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company have been, and all shares that may be issued pursuant to any employee stock option or other compensation plan or arrangement will be, when
. Capitalization.
Company
Preferred Stock
 
1,240,833
 
24
 
 
issued in accordance with the respective terms thereof, duly authorized and validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable and free of preemptive rights. No Subsidiary of the Company and no controlled Affiliate of the Company owns any shares of capital stock of the Company. Section 4.05 of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list, as of August 17, 2012, of (i) all outstanding Company Stock Options, including with respect to each such option the holder, date of grant, exercise price, vesting schedule and number of shares of Company Common Stock subject thereto, (ii) all outstanding Company Restricted Shares, including with respect to each such share the holder, date of grant and vesting schedule, and (iii) all outstanding Company Stock Units, including with respect to each such Company Stock Unit the holder, date of grant, vesting schedule and number of shares of Company Common Stock subject thereto.
(b) There are no outstanding bonds, debentures, notes or other indebtedness of the Company having the right to vote (or convertible into, or exchangeable for, securities having the right to vote) on any matters on which stockholders of the Company may vote. Except as set forth in this Section 4.05 and for changes since August 17, 2012 resulting from (x) the exercise of Company Stock Options outstanding on such date or issued after such date, (y) the vesting of Company Stock Units outstanding on such date or issued after such date and (z) the issuance of Company Stock Options, Company Restricted Shares and Company Stock Units after such date, in each case as permitted by Section 6.01, there are no issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding (i) shares of capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interest in, the Company, (ii) securities of the Company convertible into or exchangeable for shares of capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, the Company, (iii) warrants, calls, options or other rights to acquire from the Company, or other obligations of the Company to issue, any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, or securities convertible into or exchangeable for capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, the Company or (iv) restricted shares, stock appreciation rights, performance units, contingent value rights, phantom stock or similar securities or rights that are derivative of, or provide economic benefits based, directly or indirectly, on the value or price of, any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests, in the Company (the items in clauses (i) through (iv) being referred to collectively as the ). There are no outstanding obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Company Securities. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is a party to any agreement with respect to the voting of any Company Securities.
Company Securities
Section 4.06 (a) Each Subsidiary of the Company is a corporation or other entity duly incorporated or organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization and has all corporate or other organizational powers, as applicable, required to carry on its business as now conducted. Each such Subsidiary is duly qualified to
. Subsidiaries.
 
25
 
 
do business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction where such qualification is necessary, except for those jurisdictions where failure to be so qualified has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company. Section 4.06 of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list of each Subsidiary of the Company as of the date of this Agreement and, for each such Subsidiary, its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization. Prior to the date of this Agreement, the Company has made available to Parent true and complete copies of the certificate of incorporation and bylaws (or equivalent organizational documents) of each Subsidiary of the Company as in effect on the date of this Agreement
(b) All of the outstanding capital stock or other voting securities of, or ownership interests in, each Subsidiary of the Company is owned by the Company, directly or indirectly, free and clear of any Lien and free of any other limitation or restriction (including any restriction on the right to vote, sell or otherwise dispose of such capital stock or other voting securities or ownership interests). There are no issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding (i) securities of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries convertible into or exchangeable for shares of capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, any Subsidiary of the Company, (ii) warrants, calls, options or other rights to acquire from the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or other obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to issue, any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable for any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, any Subsidiary of the Company or (iii) restricted shares, stock appreciation rights, performance units, contingent value rights, phantom stock or similar securities or rights that are derivative of, or provide economic benefits based, directly or indirectly, on the value or price of, any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, any Subsidiary of the Company (the items in clauses (i) through (iii) being referred to collectively as the ). There are no outstanding obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Company Subsidiary Securities. Except for the capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, its Subsidiaries and publicly traded securities held for investment which do not exceed 5% of the outstanding securities of any entity, the Company does not own, directly or indirectly, any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, any Person.
Company Subsidiary Securities
Section 4.07 (a) The Company has timely filed with or furnished to the SEC all reports, schedules, forms, statements, prospectuses, registration statements and other documents required to be filed with or furnished to the SEC by the Company since January 1, 2010. No Subsidiary of the Company is required to file any report, schedule, form, statement, prospectus, registration statement or other document with the SEC.
. SEC Filings and the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
 
26
 
 
(b)
 
As of its filing date, each report, schedule, form, statement, prospectus, registration statement and other document filed with or furnished to the SEC by the Company since January 1, 2010 (collectively, together with any exhibits and schedules thereto and other information incorporated therein, the ) filed prior to the date of this Agreement complied, and each Company SEC Document filed subsequent to the date of this Agreement will comply, as to form in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the New York Stock Exchange (the ), the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act and the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, as the case may be.
Company SEC Documents
NYSE
(c)
 
As of its filing date (or, if amended or superseded by a filing prior to the date of this Agreement, on the date of such filing), each Company SEC Document filed pursuant to the 1934 Act prior to the date of this Agreement did not, and each Company SEC Document filed pursuant to the 1934 Act subsequent to the date of this Agreement will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(d)
 
Each Company SEC Document that is a registration statement, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, filed pursuant to the 1933 Act, as of the date such registration statement or amendment or supplement became effective, did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(e)
 
The Company is and since January 1, 2010, has been in compliance in all material respects with (i) the applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and (ii) the applicable listing and corporate governance rules and regulations of the NYSE.
(f)
 
The Company and its Subsidiaries have established and maintain disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15 under the 1934 Act). Such disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company, including its consolidated Subsidiaries, is made known to the Companys principal executive officer and its principal financial officer by others within those entities, particularly during the periods in which the periodic reports required under the 1934 Act are being prepared. Such disclosure controls and procedures are effective in timely alerting the Companys principal executive officer and principal financial officer to material information required to be included in the Companys periodic and current reports required under the 1934 Act. For purposes of this Agreement,  and  shall have the meanings given to such terms in the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
principal executive officer
principal financial officer
 
27
 
 
(g)
 
The Company and its Subsidiaries have established and maintain a system of internal controls over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15 under the 1934 Act) (). Such internal controls are sufficient to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of the Companys financial reporting and the preparation of the Companys financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP. The Companys principal executive officer and principal financial officer have disclosed, based on their most recent evaluation of internal controls prior to the date of this Agreement, to the Companys auditors and the audit committee of the Board of Directors of the Company (x) all significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal controls which are reasonably likely to adversely affect the Companys ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information and (y) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in internal controls. The Company has made available to Parent prior to the date of this Agreement a true and complete summary of any disclosure of the type described in the preceding sentence made by management to the Companys auditors and audit committee since January 1, 2010.
internal controls
(h)
 
Since January 1, 2010, each of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company (or each former principal executive officer and principal financial officer of the Company, as applicable) has made all certifications required by Rule 13a-14 and 15d-14 under the 1934 Act and Sections 302 and 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and any related rules and regulations promulgated by the SEC and the NYSE, and the statements contained in any such certifications are true and complete.
Section 4.08
. Financial Statements and Financial Matters.
(a)
 
The audited consolidated financial statements and unaudited consolidated interim financial statements of the Company included or incorporated by reference in the Company SEC Documents fairly present in all material respects, in conformity with GAAP applied on a consistent basis (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto), the consolidated financial position of the Company and its Subsidiaries as of the dates thereof and their consolidated results of operations and cash flows for the periods then ended (subject to normal and recurring year-end audit adjustments in the case of any unaudited interim financial statements).
(b)
 
From January 1, 2010 to the date of this Agreement, the Company has not received written notice from the SEC or any other Governmental Authority indicating that any of its accounting policies or practices are or may be the subject of any review, inquiry, investigation or challenge by the SEC or any other Governmental Authority.
 
28
 
 
Section 4.09 (a) At the time the proxy or information statement of the Company to be filed with the SEC in connection with the Merger (the ) or any amendment or supplement thereto is first mailed to stockholders of the Company, at the time such stockholders vote on approval and adoption of this Agreement and at the Effective Time, the Company Proxy Statement, as supplemented or amended, if applicable, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The representations and warranties contained in this Section 4.09(a) will not apply to statements or omissions included in the Company Proxy Statement based upon information furnished to the Company by Parent expressly for inclusion therein.
. Disclosure Documents.
Company Proxy Statement
(b) None of the information furnished by the Company to Parent expressly for inclusion in the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto, at the time the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto becomes effective and at the Effective Time, will contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Section 4.10 (a) Since January 1, 2010, each Regulated Subsidiary of the Company has filed all annual statements and quarterly statements required to be filed by it with any Governmental Authority (the ). The Company Statutory Filings and the respective statements of assets, liabilities, surplus and other funds, reserves and expenses and cash flows included or incorporated by reference therein (i) were prepared from the books and records of the applicable Regulated Subsidiary, (ii) fairly present in all material respects the statutory financial condition and results of operations of the applicable Regulated Subsidiary as of the date and for the periods then ended (subject to normal and recurring year- end adjustments in the case of any interim statements) and (iii) were prepared in all material respects in conformity with applicable statutory accounting principles () applied on a consistent basis (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto).
. Statutory Financial Statements.
Company Statutory Filings
SAP
(b) The Company and its Subsidiaries have established and maintain a system of internal controls over statutory financial reporting ( ). Such statutory internal controls are sufficient to provide reasonableassurance regarding the reliability of the Companys financial reporting and the preparation of the Companys statutory financial statements for external purposes in accordance with SAP.
statutory internal
controls
 
Section 4.11 The loss reserves and other actuarial amounts of the Regulated Subsidiaries of the Company as of December 31, 2011 recorded in their respective Company Statutory Filings: (i) were determined in all material respects in accordance with ASOPs in effect on that date (except as may be
. Reserves.
 
29
 
 
indicated in the notes thereto), (ii) were computed on the basis of methodologies consistent in all material respects with those used in computing the corresponding reserves in the prior fiscal years (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto) and (iii) include provisions for all actuarial reserves that are required to be established in accordance with Applicable Laws; , that, without diminishing or affecting the foregoing, it is acknowledged and agreed by Parent and Merger Subsidiary that the Company and its Representatives are not making any representation or warranty in this Agreement and nothing contained in this Agreement, including the Company Disclosure Schedule, or any other agreement, document or instrument to be delivered in connection with this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to be a representation or warranty of the Company or any of its Representatives in respect of the adequacy or sufficiency of the reserves of the Company or the Companys Regulated Subsidiaries.
provided, however
Section 4.12 As of the date of this Agreement, no Regulated Subsidiary of the Company is subject to any requirement to maintain capital or surplus amounts or levels or is subject to any restriction on the payment of dividends or other distributions on its shares of capital stock, except for any such requirements or restrictions under Applicable Laws, including insurance laws and regulations, of general application.
. Capital or Surplus Maintenance.
Section 4.13 Since the Company Balance Sheet Date, the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries has been conducted in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices and there has not been any event, change, effect, development or occurrence that has had or would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company. Since the Company Balance Sheet Date, there has not been any action taken by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that, if taken during the period from the date of this Agreement through the Effective Time without Parents consent, would constitute a breach of Section 6.01.
. Absence of Certain Changes.
Section 4.14 There are no liabilities or obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of any kind whatsoever, whether accrued, contingent, absolute, determined, determinable or otherwise, and there is no existing condition, situation or set of circumstances, that could reasonably be expected to result in such a liability or obligation, other than (i) liabilities or obligations disclosed and provided for in the Company Balance Sheet or in the notes thereto, (ii) liabilities or obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices since the Company Balance Sheet Date and (iii) other liabilities or obligations that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
. No Undisclosed Material Liabilities.
Section 4.15 There is no claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company, any of its Subsidiaries, any present or former officers,
. Litigation.
 
30
 
 
directors or employees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in their respective capacities as such or any of the respective properties of any of the foregoing Persons, before (or, in the case of threatened actions, suits, investigations or proceedings, that would be before) any arbitrator or Governmental Authority, that has had or would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company or that in any manner challenges or seeks to prevent, enjoin, alter or materially delay the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated hereby, nor is there any judgment, decree, injunction, rule or order (including corrective action plans or other compliance-related programs) of any arbitrator or Governmental Authority outstanding against the Company, any of its Subsidiaries, any present or former officers, directors or employees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in their respective capacities as such or any of the respective properties of any of the foregoing Persons that has had or would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
Section 4.16 Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, the Company and its Subsidiaries hold all governmental licenses, authorizations, permits, consents (including consents required by Contract), approvals, variances, exemptions and orders necessary for the operation of the businesses of the Company and its Subsidiaries (the  ). The Company and each of its Subsidiaries is and since January 1,2010, has been in compliance with the terms of the Company Permits, except for failures to comply that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company. Since January 1, 2010, no event has occurred that (i) gives to any Third Party any right of termination, cancellation, revocation or adverse modification (with or without notice or lapse of time or both) of any Company Permit or (ii) to the knowledge of the Company, would otherwise reasonably be expected to result in the termination, cancellation, revocation, adverse modification or non-renewal of any Company Permit, other than, in the case of clauses (i) and (ii), any such termination, revocation, cancellation, non-renewal or adverse modification that has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
. Permits.
Company
Permits
 
Section 4.17. (a) The Company and each of its Subsidiaries is and since January 1, 2010, has been in compliance with all Applicable Laws, except for failures to comply that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company. There is and since January 1, 2010, has been no claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding (including an audit or examination) pending or, to, the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries alleging any failure to comply with Applicable Law, except for failures to comply that have not had and would not
. Compliance with Applicable Laws
 
31
 
 
reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
(b)
 
Without limiting the generality of Section 4.17(a), there is and since January 1, 2010, has been no claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding (including an audit or examination) pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries alleging any (i) risk-based capital deficiency or other failure to comply with applicable capital (or similar) requirements or (ii) violation of Applicable Law that would reasonably be expected to result in (A) an assessment or cease and desist order or (B) any current or prospective exclusion from any Government Sponsored Health Care Program or any aspect thereof, except for deficiencies or violations that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company. Since January 1, 2010, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has entered into any agreement or settlement with any Governmental Authority with respect to any actual or alleged violation of any Applicable Law, except for agreements and settlements that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company. Since January 1, 2010, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received written notice of any claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding (including an audit or examination), pending or threatened against or affecting any Third Party service provider acting on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries alleging any violation of Applicable Law, except for violations that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
(c)
 
Since January 1, 2010, the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has timely filed all Company Statutory Filings and all other material Filings (including Filings with respect to premium rates, rating plans, policy terms and other terms established or used by any Subsidiaries of the Company), together with any amendments required to be made with respect thereto, that it was required to file with any Governmental Authority, including CMS, state insurance departments, state departments of health, other applicable state Medicaid authorities, and any other agencies with jurisdiction over the Health Care Programs and including Filings that it was required to file under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Pub. L. 111-148) as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Pub. L. 111-152) (collectively, ), except where the failure to make such filings or payments has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
Company Regulatory Filings
(d)
 
Except as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, the Company and its Subsidiaries have adopted and implemented policies, procedures or programs designed to assure that their respective directors, officers, employees, agents,
 
32
 
 
brokers, producers, contractors, vendors, field marketing organizations, Third Party marketing organizations and similar entities with which they do business are in compliance with all Applicable Laws.
(e)
 
With respect to participation in Government Sponsored Health Care Programs, except as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, each of the Regulated Subsidiaries of the Company (i) meets the requirements for participation in, and receipt of payment from, the Government Sponsored Health Care Programs in which such Regulated Subsidiary currently participates and (ii) is a party to one or more valid agreements with the appropriate Governmental Authority, including CMS or applicable state entities.
(f)
 
Since January 1, 2010, except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, none of the Company, any of its Subsidiaries, any employee of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, any officer or director of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or, to the knowledge of the Company, any contractors or agents of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, has been or is currently suspended, excluded or debarred from contracting with the federal or any state government or from participating in any Government Sponsored Health Care Program or subject to an investigation or proceeding by any Governmental Authority that could result in such suspension, exclusion or debarment.
(g)
 
Since January 1, 2010, except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries, nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director or executive officer of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, (i) has been assessed a civil monetary penalty under Section 1128A of the Social Security Act, (ii) has been excluded from participation in any federal health care program or state health care program (as such terms are defined by the Social Security Act), (iii) has been convicted of any criminal offense relating to the delivery of any item or service under a federal health care program or (iv) has been or is a party to or subject to any action or proceeding concerning any of the matters described in the foregoing clauses (i) through (iii).
Section 4.18 (a) Section 4.18(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list as of the date of this Agreement of each of the following Contracts to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party or by which it is bound (each such Contract listed or required to be so listed, and each of the following Contracts to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries becomes a party or by which it becomes bound after the date of this Agreement, a ):
. Material Contracts.
Company Material Contract
 
33
 
 
(i)
 
(A) the 34 largest Contracts of the Company and its Subsidiaries with Providers; (B) the 20 largest service vendor Contracts of the Company and its Subsidiaries; (C) the 20 largest customer Contracts of the Company and its Subsidiaries in each of the Companys Commercial Risk and Commercial ASO lines of business; and (D) the 10 largest customer Contracts of the Company and its Subsidiaries in the Companys Workers Compensation line of business; in each of (A) through (D) measured in terms of payments made or received (as applicable) by the Company and its Subsidiaries during the six months ending June 30, 2012;
(ii)
 
(A) any Medicaid or Medicare Contract or any national Office of Personnel Management Contract with a Governmental Authority; and (B) any Contract currently in effect with Health Risk Partners, Inc. or Verisk Health, Inc.;
(iii)
 
(A) the 15 largest Contracts of the Company and its Subsidiaries with brokers, measured in terms of payments made by the Company and its Subsidiaries during the six months ending June 30, 2012; and (B) any Contract pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries acts as a broker for a Third Party and for which payments received by the Company and its Subsidiaries during the six months ending June 30, 2012, exceeded $1,000,000;
(iv)
 
any Contract or policy for reinsurance with a Third Party involving payments in excess of $5,000,000 in any fiscal year;
(v)
 
any Contract involving payments in excess of $10,000,000 in any fiscal year that (A) limits or purports to limit the freedom of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to engage or compete in any line of business or with any Person or in any area or that would so limit or purport to limit the freedom of Parent, the Company or any of their respective Affiliates after the Effective Time or (B) contains exclusivity or most favored nation obligations or restrictions or other provisions restricting or purporting to restrict the ability of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to contract or establish prices for health care or other services, to sell products directly or indirectly through third parties or to solicit any potential employee, Provider or customer or that would so restrict or purport to restrict Parent, the Company or any of their respective Affiliates after the Effective Time; for each such Contract of which a true and complete copy has not been provided to Parent prior to the date of this Agreement, Section 4.18(a)(v) of the Company Disclosure Schedule also sets forth an accurate summary of the material terms of such limits, obligations, restrictions or other provisions;
(vi)
 
any Contract reasonably expected to result in payments made or received by the Company and its Subsidiaries in excess of
 
34
 
 
$10,000,000 in any year and for which the execution, delivery and performance by the Company of this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby would require any consent or other action by any Person (including notice by the Company) thereunder, constitute a default, or an event that, with or without notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute a default, thereunder, or cause or permit the termination, cancellation, acceleration or other change of any right or obligation (including triggering of a price adjustment, right of renegotiation or other remedy) or the loss of any benefit to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is entitled thereunder;
(vii)
 
promissory notes, loan agreements, indentures, evidences of indebtedness or other instruments providing for or relating to the lending of money, whether as borrower, lender or guarantor, in excess of $1,000,000 (it being understood that trade payables, ordinary course business funding mechanisms between the Company and its customers and Providers and guarantees of indebtedness by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries shall not be considered indebtedness for purposes of this provision);
(viii)
 
any Contract restricting the payment of dividends or the making of distributions to stockholders or the repurchase of stock or other equity;
(ix)  
any collective bargaining agreements;
(x)
 
any material joint venture, profit sharing, partnership or other similar agreements;
(xi)
 
other than with respect to any transactions involving investments in securities under the Companys investment portfolio consistent with the Companys historical investment policy, any Contracts or series of related Contracts relating to the pending acquisition or disposition of the securities of any Person, any business or any assets outside the ordinary course of business or for an acquisition price in excess of $5,000,000 (in each case, whether by merger, sale of stock, sale of assets or otherwise);
(xii)
 
any lease or sublease for real or personal property involving annual expense in excess of $500,000;
(xiii)
 
all material Contracts pursuant to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (A) receives or is granted any license or sublicense to, or covenant not to be sued under, any Intellectual Property (other than licenses to Software that is commercially available on non-discriminatory pricing terms) or (B) grants any license or sublicense to, or covenant not to
 
35
 
 
be sued under, any Intellectual Property (other than immaterial, non-exclusive licenses granted in the ordinary course of business);
(xiv)
 
any Contracts or other transactions with any (A) officer or director of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries; (B) record or beneficial owner of five percent or more of the voting securities of the Company; or
(C)
 
affiliate (as such term is defined in Rule 12b-2 promulgated under the 1934 Act) or associates (or members of any of their immediate family) (as such terms are respectively defined in Rule 12b-2 and Rule 16a-1 of the 1934 Act) of any such officer, director or beneficial owner; and
(xv)
 
any other Contract required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Item 601(b)(10) of Regulation S-K promulgated under the 1933 Act.
(b)
 
All of the Company Material Contracts are valid and binding and in full force and effect (except those that are terminated after the date of this Agreement in accordance with their respective terms), except where the failure to be in full force and effect has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, and prior to the date of this Agreement no notice to terminate, in whole or part, any of the same has been served (nor, to the knowledge of the Company, has there been any indication that any such notice of termination will be served). To the knowledge of the Company, no Person is challenging the validity or enforceability of any Company Material Contract, except such challenges which would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries, nor to the knowledge of the Company, any of the other parties thereto, has violated any provision of, or committed or failed to perform any act which (with or without notice, lapse of time or both) would constitute a default under any provision of, and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received notice that it has violated or defaulted under, any Company Material Contract, except for those violations and defaults which have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
(c)
 
Section 4.18(c) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list as of the date of this Agreement of each executory contract, offer, bid or other undertaking by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that, if accepted or executed and delivered by the applicable Third Party would constitute a Company Material Contract.
Section 4.19. Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company:
. Taxes
 
36
 
 
(a)
 
All Tax Returns required by Applicable Law to be filed with any Taxing Authority by, or on behalf of, the Company or any of its Subsidiaries have been filed when due (including extensions) in accordance with all Applicable Law, and all such Tax Returns are true and complete.
(b)
 
The Company and each of its Subsidiaries has paid (or has had paid on its behalf) or has withheld and remitted to the appropriate Taxing Authority all Taxes due and payable, or (i) where payment is not yet due, has established (or has had established on its behalf and for its sole benefit and recourse) in accordance with GAAP or SAP, as applicable, an adequate accrual or (ii) where payment is being contested in good faith pursuant to appropriate procedures, has established (or has had established on its behalf and for its sole benefit and recourse) in accordance with GAAP or SAP, as applicable, an adequate reserve, in each case for all Taxes through the end of the last period for which the Company and its Subsidiaries ordinarily record items on their respective books and records.
(c)
 
(i) All federal income Tax Returns of the affiliated group of which the Company is the common parent through the Tax year ended December 31, 2006 have been examined and closed or are Tax Returns with respect to which the applicable period for assessment under Applicable Law, after giving effect to extensions or waivers, has expired; and (ii) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries (or any member of any affiliated, consolidated, combined or unitary group of which the Company or any Subsidiary is or has been a member) has granted any extension or waiver of the limitation period applicable to the assessment or collection of any Tax.
(d)
 
There is no claim, action, suit, proceeding or investigation (including an audit) pending or, to the Companys knowledge, threatened in writing against or with respect to the Company or its Subsidiaries in respect of any Tax or Tax asset.
(e)
 
There are no requests for rulings or determinations in respect of any Tax or Tax asset pending between the Company or any Subsidiary and any Taxing Authority.
(f)
 
During the two-year period ending on the date of this Agreement, the Company was not a distributing corporation or a controlled corporation in a transaction intended to be governed by Section 355 of the Code.
(g)
 
There are no Liens for Taxes (other than statutory liens for taxes not yet due and payable or being contested in good faith, for which adequate accruals or reserves have been established on the Company Balance Sheet) upon any of the assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
 
37
 
 
(h)
 
No claim has been made in writing by any Taxing Authority in a jurisdiction where the Company and/or the Companys Subsidiaries do not file Tax Returns that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is or may be subject to taxation by, or required to file any Tax Return in, that jurisdiction.
(i)
 
(i) Since January 1, 2006, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has been a member of an affiliated, consolidated, combined or unitary group other than one of which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries was the common parent; (ii) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is party to any Tax Sharing Agreement; (iii) as of the date of this Agreement, to the knowledge of the Company, (A) no amount of the type described in clause (ii) of the definition of Tax is currently payable by either the Company or any Subsidiary, regardless of whether such Tax is imposed on the Company or any Subsidiary and (B) no amount relating to amounts set forth in clause (i) of the definition of Tax is currently payable by the Company or any Subsidiary pursuant to any Tax Sharing Agreement; and (iv) neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has entered into any written agreement with any Taxing Authority with regard to the Tax liability of the Company or any Subsidiary affecting any Tax period for which the applicable statute of limitations, after giving effect to extensions or waivers, has not expired.
(j)
 
 means (i) any tax, governmental fee or other like assessment or charge of any kind whatsoever (including withholding on amounts paid to or by any Person), together with any interest, penalty, addition to tax or additional amount imposed by any Governmental Authority (a ) responsible for the imposition of any such tax (domestic or foreign), and any liability for any of the foregoing as transferee, and (ii) in the case of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, liability for the payment of any amount of the type described in clause (i) as a result of being or having been before the Effective Time a member of an affiliated, consolidated, combined, unitary or other Tax filing group by reason of the application of Treas. Reg.  1.1502-6 (or any similar provision of any Tax Law of any applicable jurisdiction).  means any report, return, document, declaration or other information or filing required to be supplied to any Taxing Authority with respect to Taxes, including information returns, any documents with respect to or accompanying payments of estimated Taxes, or with respect to or accompanying requests for the extension of time in which to file any such report, return, document, declaration or other information.  means all existing agreements (other than
Tax
Taxing Authority
Tax Return
Tax Sharing Agreements
(x)
 
agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business that do not have as a principal purpose addressing Tax matters, (y) financing agreements that do not have as a principal purpose addressing Tax matters and (z) leases) binding the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that provide for the allocation, apportionment, sharing or assignment of any Tax liability or benefit, or the transfer or assignment of income, revenues, receipts, or gains for the purpose of determining any Persons Tax liability.
 
38
 
 
(k) Notwithstanding any other provision, Section 4.08, Section 4.10, this Section 4.19, and Section 4.20 contain the sole and exclusive representations and warranties of the Company in this Agreement regarding Tax matters, liabilities or obligations or compliance with Laws relating thereto.
Section 4.20 (a) Section 4.20 of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a true and complete list as of the date of this Agreement of each material Employee Plan and each Employee Plan that is subject to ERISA. For each material Employee Plan and each Employee Plan that is subject to ERISA, the Company has made available to Parent a copy of such plan (or a description, if such plan is not written) and all amendments thereto and material written interpretations thereof, together with a copy of (if applicable)
. Employees and Employee Benefit Plans.
(i) each trust, insurance or other funding arrangement, (ii) each summary plan description and summary of material modifications, (iii) the most recently filed Internal Revenue Service Forms 5500, (iv) the most recent favorable determination or opinion letter from the Internal Revenue Service, (v) the most recently prepared actuarial reports and financial statements in connection with each such Employee Plan, (vi) all documents and correspondence relating thereto received from or provided to the Department of Labor, the PBGC, the Internal Revenue Service or any other Governmental Authority during the past year and
(vii)  
all current employee handbooks, manuals and policies.
(b)
 
Neither the Company nor any of its ERISA Affiliates (nor any predecessor of any such entity) sponsors, maintains, administers or contributes to (or has any obligation to contribute to), or has in the past six years sponsored, maintained, administered or contributed to (or had any obligation to contribute to), any plan subject to Title IV of ERISA, including any multiemployer plan, as defined in Section 3(37) of ERISA.
(c)
 
Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, each Employee Plan that is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code has received a favorable determination or opinion letter from the Internal Revenue Service or has applied to the Internal Revenue Service for such a letter within the applicable remedial amendment period or such period has not expired and, to the knowledge of the Company, no circumstances exist that would reasonably be expected to result in any such letter being revoked or not being reissued or a penalty under the Internal Revenue Service Closing Agreement Program if discovered during an Internal Revenue Service audit or investigation. Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, each trust created under any such Employee Plan is exempt from tax under Section 501(a) of the Code and has been so exempt since its creation.
(d)
 
Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company,
 
39
 
 
since January 1, 2010, each Employee Plan has been maintained in compliance with its terms and all Applicable Law, including ERISA and the Code. Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, no claim (other than routine claims for benefits), action, suit, investigation or proceeding (including an audit) is pending against or involves or, to the Companys knowledge, is threatened against or reasonably expected to involve, any Employee Plan before any court or arbitrator or any Governmental Authority, including the Internal Revenue Service, the Department of Labor or the PBGC. To the knowledge of the Company, since January 1, 2010, no events have occurred with respect to any Employee Plan that would reasonably be expected to result in the assessment of any excise taxes or penalties against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, except for events that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
(e)
 
Except as set forth in Section 4.20(e) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, with respect to each director, officer, employee or independent contractor (including each former director, officer, employee or independent contractor) of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not, either alone or together with any other event: (i) entitle any such individual to any payment or benefit, including any bonus, retention, severance, retirement or job security payment or benefit, (ii) accelerate the time of payment or vesting or trigger any payment or funding (through a grantor trust or otherwise) of compensation or benefits under, or increase the amount payable or trigger any other obligation under, any Employee Plan or (iii) limit or restrict the right of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or, after the Closing, Parent, to merge, amend or terminate any Employee Plan.
(f)
 
Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any current or projected liability for, and no Employee Plan provides or promises, any post-employment or post-retirement medical, dental, disability, hospitalization, life or similar benefits (whether insured or self-insured) to any director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor (including any former director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor) of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (other than coverage mandated by Applicable Law).
(g)
 
There has been no amendment to, written interpretation of or announcement (whether or not written) by the Company or any of its Affiliates relating to, or making a change in employee participation or coverage under, any Employee Plan that would materially increase the expense of maintaining such plan above the level of expense incurred in respect thereof for the fiscal year ended on the Company Balance Sheet Date, except as required in order to comply with Applicable Law.
 
40
 
 
(h)
 
No Employee Plan or other compensation benefit or arrangement, individually or collectively, would reasonably be expected to result in the payment of any amount that would not be deductible under Section 280G of the Code. Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has any obligation to gross-up, indemnify or otherwise reimburse any director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor (including any former director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor) of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries for any tax incurred by such individual, including under Section 409A or 4999 of the Code.
(i)
 
Each Employee Plan, and any award thereunder, that is or forms part of a nonqualified deferred compensation plan within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code has been timely amended (if applicable) to comply and has been operated in compliance with, and the Company and its Subsidiaries have complied in practice and operation with, all applicable requirements of Section 409A of the Code in all material respects.
(j)
 
With respect to any Employee Plan covered by Subtitle B, Part 4 of Title I of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, no non-exempt prohibited transaction has occurred that has caused or would reasonably be expected to cause the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to incur any material liability under ERISA or the Code.
Section 4.21 (a) Except as has not had or would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, the Company and its Subsidiaries are and since January 1, 2010, have been in compliance with all Applicable Laws relating to labor and employment, including those relating to labor management relations, wages, hours, overtime, employee classification, discrimination, sexual harassment, civil rights, affirmative action, work authorization, immigration, safety and health, information privacy and security, workers compensation, continuation coverage under group health plans, wage payment and the payment and withholding of taxes.
. Labor Matters.
(b) Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries is or since January 1, 2010, has been a party to or subject to, or is currently negotiating in connection with entering into, any collective bargaining agreement, and, to the Companys knowledge, there has not been any organizational campaign, card solicitation, petition or other unionization activity seeking recognition of a collective bargaining unit relating to any director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor of the Company of any of its Subsidiaries. Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, there are no unfair labor practice complaints pending or, to the Companys knowledge, threatened against
the Company or any of its Subsidiaries before the National Labor Relations Board or any other Governmental Authority or any current union representation
 
41
 
 
questions involving any director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor (including any former director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor) of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. There is no labor strike, slowdown, stoppage, picketing, interruption of work or lockout pending or, to the Companys knowledge, threatened against or affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
(c) No employee of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is employed by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries outside of the United States.
Section 4.22 (a) Section 4.22(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth a list as of the date of this Agreement that is true and correct in all material respects of (i) all registrations (including patents and domain name registrations) and applications for registration included in the Owned Intellectual Property (the ) and (ii) all Software included in the Owned Intellectual Property (the ), in each case that is material to the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries. None of the Registered IP has lapsed, expired, been abandoned or been adjudged invalid or unenforceable, and, to the knowledge of the Company, all Registered IP is valid, enforceable and subsisting, except in each case as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
. Intellectual Property.
Registered IP
Owned Software
(b)
 
The Company and its Subsidiaries are the sole and exclusive owners of all material Owned Intellectual Property and hold all of their right, title and interest in and to all material Company Intellectual Property free and clear of all Liens (other than non-exclusive licenses granted by the Company or one of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business). The Company Intellectual Property constitutes all of the Intellectual Property necessary to, or used or held for use in, the conduct of the respective businesses of the Company and its Subsidiaries as currently conducted in all material respects. There exist no material restrictions on the disclosure, use, license or transfer of any material Owned Intellectual Property, and the Company and its Subsidiaries have taken reasonable measures to protect the confidentiality of their material Trade Secrets and Software. The consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not result in the loss, impairment, encumbrance or alteration of the Companys and its Subsidiaries rights in the Company Intellectual Property, except for any loss, impairment, encumbrance or alteration that would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company.
(c)
 
Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries nor the conduct of their respective businesses has infringed, misappropriated, diluted or otherwise violated any Intellectual Property rights of any Third Party in any material respect. There is no material claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against or affecting the
 
42
 
 
Company or any of its Subsidiaries (i) alleging that the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or the conduct of their respective businesses, has infringed, misappropriated, diluted or otherwise violated any Intellectual Property rights of any Third Party or (ii) based upon, or challenging or seeking to deny or restrict, the rights of the Company or any Subsidiary in any of the Company Intellectual Property. To the knowledge of the Company, no Third Party has infringed, misappropriated, diluted or otherwise violated any Company Intellectual Property in any material respect.
(d)
 
Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company,
(i)
 
the Company and its Subsidiaries have provided reasonable notice of their privacy and personal data collection and use policies on their websites and other customer and public communications and complied with such policies and all Applicable Law relating to (A) the privacy of the users of the Companys and its Subsidiaries respective services and websites and (B) the collection, use, storage and disclosure of any personal information (including personal health information) collected or stored by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries;
(ii)
 
neither this Agreement nor the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will violate any such policy or Applicable Law; and
(iii)
 
there is no claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries alleging any violation of such policies or Applicable Law.
(e)
 
Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company,
(i)
 
the IT Assets operate in accordance with their specifications and related documentation and perform in a manner that permits the Company and its Subsidiaries to conduct their respective businesses as currently conducted; and (ii) the Company and its Subsidiaries take commercially reasonable actions, consistent with current industry standards, to protect the confidentiality, integrity and security of the IT Assets (and all information and transactions stored or contained therein or transmitted thereby) against any unauthorized use, access, interruption, modification or corruption, including but not limited to the implementation of commercially reasonable data backup, disaster avoidance and recovery procedures and business continuity procedures.
Section 4.23 Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, (i) the Company and each of its Subsidiaries has good, valid and marketable fee simple title to, or valid leasehold interests in, as the case may be, each parcel of real property of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, free and clear of all Liens, except for Liens disclosed on the Company Balance Sheet, (ii) each lease, sublease or license (each, a ) under which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries leases, subleases or licenses any real property is valid and binding and in full force and effect and (iii) neither the Company nor any of its
. Properties.
Lease
 
43
 
 
Subsidiaries, nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any of the other parties thereto, has violated any provision of, or committed or failed to perform any act which (with or without notice, lapse of time or both) would constitute a default under any provision of, any Lease and neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries has received notice that it has violated or defaulted under any Lease.
Section 4.24 (a) Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company:
. Environmental Matters.
(i)
 
no notice, notification, demand, request for information, citation, summons or order has been received, no complaint has been filed, no penalty has been assessed, and no claim, action, suit, proceeding or investigation (including a review) is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened by any Governmental Authority or other Person relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries and relating to or arising out of any Environmental Law, Environmental Permit or Hazardous Substance;
(ii)
 
the Company and its Subsidiaries are and have been in compliance with all Environmental Laws and all Environmental Permits and hold all applicable Environmental Permits; and
(iii)
 
there are no liabilities or obligations of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries of any kind whatsoever, whether accrued, contingent, absolute, determined, determinable or otherwise arising under or relating to any Environmental Law, Environmental Permit or Hazardous Substance and there is no existing condition, situation or set of circumstances that could reasonably be expected to result in any such liability or obligation.
(b)
 
Neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries owns, leases or operates any real property, or conducts any operations, in New Jersey or Connecticut.
Section 4.25 (a) The Company has made available to Parent, prior to the date of this Agreement, summaries of all material insurance policies and fidelity bonds for which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a policyholder or which covers the business, operations, employees, officers, directors or assets of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (the  ). The Company and its Subsidiaries maintain insurance coverage withreputable insurers in such amounts and covering such risks as the Company reasonably believes, based on past experience, are adequate for the businesses and operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taking into account the cost and availability of such insurance). Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company, the Insurance Policies (i) are sufficient for compliance by the
. Insurance.
Insurance
Policies
 
 
44
 
 
Company and its Subsidiaries with all Company Material Contracts and (ii) will not terminate or lapse by their terms by reason of the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Section 4.25 of the Company Disclosure Schedule sets forth the amount per annum the Company paid in its last full fiscal year ending prior to the date of this Agreement for the Companys existing directors and officers insurance policies.
Section 4.26 Assuming the representation and warranty set forth in Section 5.19 is true and correct, the Company has taken all action necessary to exempt the Merger, this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby from Section 203 of the Delaware Law, and, accordingly, neither such Section 203 nor any other antitakeover or similar statute or regulation applies or purports to apply to any such transactions. No other control share acquisition, fair price, moratorium or other antitakeover laws enacted under U.S. state or federal laws apply to this Agreement or any of the transactions contemplated hereby.
. Antitakeover Statutes.
Section 4.27 The Company has received the opinion of Greenhill & Co., LLC, financial advisor to the Company, to the effect that, as of the date of this Agreement, the Merger Consideration is fair to the Companys stockholders from a financial point of view.
. Opinion of Financial Advisor.
Section 4.28 Except for Greenhill & Co., LLC, a copy of whose engagement agreement has been provided to Parent prior to the date of this Agreement, there is no investment banker, broker, finder or other intermediary that has been retained by or is authorized to act on behalf of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries who might be entitled to any fee or commission from the Company or any of its Affiliates in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
. Finders Fees.
ARTICLE 5
R W P
EPRESENTATIONS AND
ARRANTIES OF
ARENT
Subject to Section 11.05, except (i) other than with respect to the representations and warranties in Section 5.01, Section 5.02, Section 5.05 or Section 5.17, as disclosed in any publicly available Parent SEC Document filed after December 31, 2011 and before the date of this Agreement or in Parents annual report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010 or in Parents proxy statement for the 2011 annual meeting of Parents stockholders or (ii) as set forth in the Parent Disclosure Schedule, Parent represents and warrants to the Company as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing Date that:
Section 5.01 Each of Parent and Merger Subsidiary is a corporation duly incorporated, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation and has all corporate
. Corporate Existence and Power.
 
45
 
 
powers required to carry on its business as now conducted. Each of Parent and Merger Subsidiary is duly qualified to do business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction where such qualification is necessary, except for those jurisdictions where failure to be so qualified has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent. Prior to the date of this Agreement, Parent has made available to the Company true and complete copies of the certificate of incorporation and bylaws of each of Parent and Merger Subsidiary as in effect on the date of this Agreement. Since the date of its formation, Merger Subsidiary has not engaged in any activities other than in connection with or as contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 5.02 The execution, delivery and performance by Parent and Merger Subsidiary of this Agreement and the consummation by Parent and Merger Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement are within the corporate powers of Parent and Merger Subsidiary and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of Parent and Merger Subsidiary. This Agreement has been duly executed by Parent and Merger Subsidiary constitutes a valid and binding agreement of Parent and Merger Subsidiary enforceable against Parent and Merger Subsidiary in accordance with its terms.
. Corporate Authorization.
Section 5.03 The execution, delivery and performance by Parent and Merger Subsidiary of this Agreement and the consummation by Parent and Merger Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated hereby require no action by or in respect of, or Filing with, any Governmental Authority, other than (i) the filing of a certificate of merger with respect to the Merger with the Delaware Secretary of State, (ii) compliance with any applicable requirements of the HSR Act, (iii) compliance with any applicable requirements of the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act and any other applicable U.S. state or federal securities laws, (iv) the Required Governmental Authorizations and (v) any other actions or Filings the absence of which would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent.
. Governmental Authorization.
Section 5.04 The execution, delivery and performance by Parent and Merger Subsidiary of this Agreement and the consummation by Parent and Merger Subsidiary of the transactions contemplated hereby do not and will not (i) contravene, conflict with, or result in any violation or breach of any provision of the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of Parent or of Merger Subsidiary, (ii) assuming compliance with the matters referred to in Section 5.03, contravene, conflict with or result in any violation or breach of any provision of any Applicable Law, (iii) assuming compliance with the matters referred to in Section 5.03, require any consent or other action by any Person under, constitute a default, or an event that, with or without notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute a default, under, or cause or permit the termination, cancellation, acceleration or other change of any right or obligation or the loss of any benefit to which Parent or any of its Subsidiaries is entitled under any
. Non-contravention.
 
46
 
 
provision of any Contract binding upon Parent or any of its Subsidiaries or any license, franchise, permit, certificate, approval or other similar authorization affecting, or relating in any way to, the assets or business of the Parent and its Subsidiaries or (iv) result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Parent or any of its Subsidiaries, with such exceptions, in the case of each of clauses (ii) through (iv), as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent.
Section 5.05 (a) The authorized capital stock of Parent consists of 2,996,654,333 shares, par value $0.01 per share, of which
. Capitalization.
(x) 2,600,159,551 shares are designated shares of Parent Common Stock as of the date of this Agreement and 2,600,159,551 shares (less any shares purchased by, redeemed by, surrendered to or otherwise acquired by Parent after the date of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date, which shares will become undesignated) will be designated shares of Parent Common Stock as of the Closing Date and (y) 7,625,000 shares are designated Class A Voting Preferred Shares. As of August 16, 2012, there were outstanding (i) 334,273,182 shares of Parent Common Stock, (ii) no Class A Voting Preferred Shares and (iii) employee stock options to purchase an aggregate of 6,904,380 shares of Parent Common Stock (all of which options were exercisable). All outstanding shares of capital stock of Parent have been duly authorized and validly issued and are fully paid and nonassessable and free of preemptive rights.
(b) The shares of Parent Common Stock to be issued as part of the Merger Consideration have been duly authorized and, when issued and delivered in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, will have been validly issued and will be fully paid and nonassessable and the issuance thereof will be free of preemptive right.
Section 5.06 (a) Each Subsidiary of Parent is a corporation or other entity duly incorporated or organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of its jurisdiction of incorporation or organization and has all corporate or other organizational powers, as applicable, required to carry on its business as now conducted. Each such Subsidiary is duly qualified to do business and is in good standing in each jurisdiction where such qualification is necessary, except for those jurisdictions where failure to be so qualified has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent. All material Subsidiaries of Parent and their respective jurisdictions of organization are identified in the Parent 10-K.
. Subsidiaries.
(b) All of the outstanding capital stock or other voting securities of, or ownership interests in, each Subsidiary of Parent is owned by Parent, directly or indirectly, free and clear of any Lien and free of any other limitation or restriction (including any restriction on the right to vote, sell or otherwise dispose of such capital stock or other voting securities or ownership interests). There are no issued, reserved for issuance or outstanding (i) securities of Parent or any of its
 
47
 
 
Subsidiaries convertible into or exchangeable for shares of capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, any Subsidiary of Parent, (ii) warrants, calls, options or other rights to acquire from Parent or any of its Subsidiaries, or other obligations of Parent or any of its Subsidiaries to issue, any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, or any securities convertible into or exchangeable for any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, any Subsidiary of Parent or (iii) restricted shares, stock appreciation rights, performance units, contingent value rights, phantom stock or similar securities or rights that are derivative of, or provide economic benefits based, directly or indirectly, on the value or price of, any capital stock or other voting securities of, or other ownership interests in, any Subsidiary of Parent (the items in clauses (i) through (iii) being referred to collectively as the ). There are no outstanding obligations of Parent or any of its Subsidiaries to repurchase, redeem or otherwise acquire any Parent Subsidiary Securities.
Parent Subsidiary Securities
Section 5.07 (a) Parent has timely filed with or furnished to the SEC all reports, schedules, forms, statements, prospectuses, registration statements and other documents required to be filed with or furnished to the SEC by Parent since January 1, 2010.
. SEC Filings.
(b)
 
As of its filing date, each report, schedule, form, statement, prospectus, registration statement and other document filed with or furnished to the SEC by Parent since January 1, 2010 (collectively, together with any exhibits and schedules thereto and other information incorporated therein, the  ) filed prior to the date of this Agreement complied, and eachParent SEC Document filed subsequent to the date of this Agreement will comply, as to form in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the NYSE, the 1933 Act, the 1934 Act and the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, as the case may be.
Parent
SEC Documents
 
(c)
 
As of its filing date (or, if amended or superseded by a filing prior to the date of this Agreement, on the date of such filing), each Parent SEC Document filed pursuant to the 1934 Act prior to the date of this Agreement did not, and each Parent SEC Document filed pursuant to the 1934 Act subsequent to the date of this Agreement will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
(d)
 
Each Parent SEC Document that is a registration statement, as amended or supplemented, if applicable, filed pursuant to the 1933 Act, as of the date such registration statement or amendment or supplement became effective, did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
 
48
 
 
(e)
 
Parent is and since January 1, 2010, has been in compliance in all material respects with (i) the applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and
(ii)
 
the applicable listing and corporate governance rules and regulations of the NYSE.
(f)
 
Parent and its Subsidiaries have established and maintain disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15 under the 1934 Act). Such disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that material information relating to Parent, including its consolidated Subsidiaries, is made known to Parents principal executive officer and its principal financial officer by others within those entities, particularly during the periods in which the periodic reports required under the 1934 Act are being prepared. Such disclosure controls and procedures are effective in timely alerting Parents principal executive officer and principal financial officer to material information required to be included in Parents periodic and current reports required under the 1934 Act.
(g)
 
Parent and its Subsidiaries have established and maintain a system of internal controls. Such internal controls are sufficient to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of Parents financial reporting and the preparation of Parents financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP. Parents principal executive officer and principal financial officer have disclosed, based on their most recent evaluation of internal controls prior to the date of this Agreement, to Parents auditors and the audit committee of the Board of Directors of Parent (x) all significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal controls which are reasonably likely to adversely affect Parents ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information and (y) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in internal controls. Parent has made available to the Company prior to the date of this Agreement any disclosure of the type described in the preceding sentence made by management to Parents auditors and audit committee since January 1, 2010.
(h)
 
Since January 1, 2010, each of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer of Parent (or each former principal executive officer and principal financial officer of Parent, as applicable) has made all certifications required by Rule 13a-14 and 15d-14 under the 1934 Act and Sections 302 and 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and any related rules and regulations promulgated by the SEC and the NYSE, and the statements contained in any such certifications are true and complete.
Section 5.08 The audited consolidated financial statements and unaudited consolidated interim financial statements of Parent included or incorporated by reference in the Parent SEC Documents fairly present in all material respects, in conformity with GAAP applied on a consistent basis (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto), the consolidated financial position of Parent and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of the dates thereof and
. Financial Statements.
 
49
 
 
their consolidated results of operations and cash flows for the periods then ended (subject to normal and recurring year-end audit adjustments in the case of any unaudited interim financial statements).
Section 5.09 (a) At the time the registration statement of Parent to be filed with the SEC with respect to the offering of Parent Common Stock in connection with the Merger (the  ) or any amendment or supplement thereto becomes effective and at the Effective Time, the Registration Statement, as supplemented or amended, if applicable, will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading. The representations and warranties contained in this Section 5.09(a) will not apply to statements or omissions included in the Registration Statement based upon information furnished to Parent by the Company expressly for inclusion therein.
. Disclosure Documents.
Registration Statement
(b) None of the information furnished by Parent to the Company expressly for inclusion in the Company Proxy Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto, at the time the Company Proxy Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto is first mailed to stockholders of the Company, at the time such stockholders vote on approval and adoption of this Agreement and at the Effective Time, will contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Section 5.10 The loss reserves and other actuarial amounts of the Regulated Subsidiaries of Parent as of December 31, 2011 recorded in their respective annual statements required to be filed with any Governmental Authority: (i) were determined in all material respects in accordance with ASOPs in effect on that date (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto), (ii) were computed on the basis of methodologies consistent in all material respects with those used in computing the corresponding reserves in the prior fiscal years (except as may be indicated in the notes thereto) and (iii) include provisions for all actuarial reserves that are required to be established in accordance with Applicable Laws; , that, without diminishing or affecting the foregoing, it is acknowledged and agreed by the Company that Parent and its Representatives are not making any representation or warranty in this Agreement and nothing contained in this Agreement, including the Parent Disclosure Schedule, or any other agreement, document or instrument to be delivered in connection with this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to be a representation or warranty of Parent or any of its Representatives in respect of the adequacy or sufficiency of the reserves of Parent or Parents Regulated Subsidiaries.
. Reserves.
provided, however
Section 5.11 Since the Parent Balance Sheet Date, the business of Parent and its Subsidiaries has been conducted in the
. Absence of Certain Changes.
 
50
 
 
ordinary course of business consistent with past practices, and there has not been any event, change, effect, development or occurrence that has had or would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent.
Section 5.12 There are no liabilities or obligations of Parent or any of its Subsidiaries of any kind whatsoever, whether accrued, contingent, absolute, determined, determinable or otherwise, and there is no existing condition, situation or set of circumstances that could reasonably be expected to result in such a liability or obligation, other than (i) liabilities or obligations disclosed and provided for in the Parent Balance Sheet or in the notes thereto, (ii) liabilities or obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices since the Parent Balance Sheet Date and (iii) other liabilities or obligations that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent.
. No Undisclosed Material Liabilities.
Section 5.13 There is no claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding pending, or, to the knowledge of Parent, threatened against or affecting, Parent, any of its Subsidiaries, any present or former officers, directors or employees of Parent or any of its Subsidiaries in their respective capacities as such or any of the respective properties of any of the foregoing before (or, in the case of threatened actions, suits, investigations or proceedings, that would be before) any arbitrator or any Governmental Authority, that has had or would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent or that in any manner challenges or seeks to prevent, enjoin, alter or materially delay the Merger or any of the other transactions contemplated hereby, nor is there any judgment, decree, injunction, rule or order of any arbitrator or Governmental Authority outstanding against Parent, any of its Subsidiaries, any present or former officers, directors or employees of Parent or any of its Subsidiaries in their respective capacities as such or any of the respective properties of any of the foregoing Persons that has had or would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent.
. Litigation.
Section 5.14 Except as has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent, Parent and its Subsidiaries hold all governmental licenses, authorizations, permits, consents (including consents required by Contract), approvals, variances, exemptions and orders necessary for the operation of the businesses of Parent and its Subsidiaries (the ). Parent and each of its Subsidiaries is and since January 1, 2010, has been in compliance with the terms of the Parent Permits, except for failures to comply that have not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent. Since January 1, 2010, no event has occurred that (i) gives to any Third Party any right of termination, cancellation, revocation or adverse modification (with or without notice or lapse of time or both) of any
. Permits.
Parent Permits
 
51
 
 
Parent Permit or (ii) to the knowledge of Parent, would otherwise reasonably be expected to result in the termination, cancellation, revocation, adverse modification or non-renewal of any Parent Permit, other than, in the case of clauses (i) and (ii), any such termination, revocation, cancellation, non-renewal or adverse modification that has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent.
Section 5.15 Parent and each of its Subsidiaries is and since January 1, 2010, has been in compliance with all Applicable Laws, except for failures to comply that have not been and would not reasonably be expected to be, individually or in the aggregate, material to Parent and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole. There is and since January 1, 2010, has been no claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding (including an audit or examination) pending or, to, the knowledge of Parent, threatened against or affecting Parent or any of its Subsidiaries alleging any failure to comply with Applicable Law, except for failures to comply that have not been and would not reasonably be expected to be, individually or in the aggregate, material to Parent and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
. Compliance with Applicable Laws.
Section 5.16 The Board of Directors of Parent has received separate opinions of each of Goldman Sachs & Co. and UBS Securities LLC to the effect that, as of the date of this Agreement and based upon and subject to the limitations, qualifications and assumptions set forth therein, the Merger Consideration to be paid by Parent pursuant to this Agreement is fair, from a financial point of view, to Parent.
. Opinion Of Financial Advisor.
Section 5.17 Except for Goldman Sachs & Co. and UBS Securities LLC, whose fees will be paid by Parent, there is no investment banker, broker, finder or other intermediary that has been retained by or is authorized to act on behalf of Parent who might be entitled to any fee or commission from the Company or any of its Affiliates in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
. Finders Fees.
Section 5.18 (a) Parent has delivered to the Company a complete and correct copy of a fully executed commitment letter from the financial institution(s) named therein (including all exhibits, schedules, and annexes to such letters as and to the extent delivered to the Company on or prior to the date of this Agreement, the ), pursuant to which such financial institutions (including any financial institutions providing Alternative Financing or Replacement Debt Financing, the ) have committed, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth therein, to provide the debt financing described therein in connection with the Transactions. The Debt Commitment Letter and any other debt commitment letter (including any replacement of the Debt Commitment Letter in connection with any Alternative Financing or Replacement Debt Financing) executed in accordance with Section 7.06, as replaced, amended, supplemented, modified or waived in
. Financing.
Debt Commitment Letter
Financing Sources
 
52
 
 
accordance with Section 7.06, including all exhibits, schedules, and annexes to such letters, are hereinafter referred to together as the  . The financing contemplated pursuant to the Debt Commitment Lettersis hereinafter referred to as the .
Debt Commitment
Letters
 
Debt Financing
(b) As of the date of this Agreement, the Debt Commitment Letters are in full force and effect and are legal, valid and binding obligations of Parent, and to the knowledge of Parent, the other parties thereto, and enforceable in accordance with their respective terms against Parent, and to the knowledge of Parent, each of the other parties thereto. All commitment fees required to be paid under the Debt Commitment Letters have been paid in full or will be duly paid in full as and when due, and Parent and Merger Subsidiary have otherwise satisfied all of the other items and conditions required to be satisfied by them pursuant to the terms of the Debt Commitment Letters on or prior to the date of this Agreement. None of the Debt Commitment Letters have been amended, modified or terminated on or prior to the date of this Agreement, no such amendment, modification or termination is contemplated as of the date of this Agreement and no Debt Commitment Letter will be amended or modified except as consistent with Section 7.06. As of the date of this Agreement, no event has occurred which, with or without notice, lapse of time or both, would constitute a breach or default by Parent or Merger Subsidiary under any Debt Commitment Letter. Neither Parent nor Merger Subsidiary is, as of the date of this Agreement, aware of any fact, occurrence or condition that makes any of the assumptions or statements set forth in any Debt Commitment Letter inaccurate (assuming the accuracy of the Companys representations and warranties), in any material respect or that would cause the commitments provided in the Debt Commitment Letter to be terminated or ineffective or any of the conditions contained therein not to be met. The consummation of the Debt Financing is subject to no conditions precedent other than those expressly set forth in the copies of the Debt Commitment Letters delivered to the Company, and there are no contingencies that would permit the Financing Sources to reduce the total amount of the Debt Financing other than those expressly set forth in the copies of the Debt Commitment Letters delivered to the Company. Except for fee letters relating to fees with respect to the Debt Financing (redacted copies of which, removing only fee amounts, market flex provisions and certain other terms (none of which concern or would adversely affect the amounts, availability, timing or conditionality of the Debt Financing), have been provided to the Company), there are no side letters or other agreements, contracts or arrangements related to the funding of the Debt Financing, other than as expressly set forth in the Debt Commitment Letters delivered to the Company prior to the date of this Agreement. As of the date of this Agreement, assuming no breach by the Company of its representations and warranties under this Agreement (and cooperation and assistance by the Company as provided in this Agreement) and no breach or default by the Company of its obligations under this Agreement in either case such that the condition set forth in Section 9.02(a) or Section 9.02(b)
 
53
 
 
would fail to be satisfied, and based upon facts and events known by Parent as of the date of this Agreement, neither Parent nor Merger Sub have any reason to believe that any of the conditions to the Debt Financing will not be satisfied or the Debt Financing will not be consummated as contemplated in the Debt Commitment Letters on or prior to the Closing Date. The aggregate proceeds of the Debt Financing, together with cash or cash equivalents held by Parent and the other sources of funds referenced in the copies of the Debt Commitment Letters delivered to the Company, as of the Effective Time, will be sufficient to enable them to pay in cash all amounts required to be paid by them in cash in connection with the Transactions, including the Merger Consideration (and the treatment of Company Stock Options, Company Restricted Shares and Company Stock Units pursuant to Section 2.05(a)) and all payments, fees and expenses payable by them related to or arising out of the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
Section 5.19. To the knowledge of Parent, neither Parent nor any of its Subsidiaries beneficially owns, directly or indirectly, any shares of Company Common Stock and neither Parent nor any of its Subsidiaries has any rights to acquire any shares of Company Common Stock except pursuant to this Agreement. There are no voting trusts or other agreements or understandings to which Parent or any of its Subsidiaries is a party with respect to the voting of the capital stock or other equity interest of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries.
. No Ownership of Company Common Stock
ARTICLE 6
C C
OVENANTS OF THE
OMPANY
The Company agrees that:
Section 6.01 From the date of this Agreement until the earlier of termination of this Agreement and the Effective Time, except
. Conduct of the Company.
(x) as prohibited or required by Applicable Law, (y) as set forth in Section 6.01 of the Company Disclosure Schedule or (z) as otherwise required or expressly contemplated by this Agreement, unless Parent shall otherwise consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), the Company shall, and shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, conduct its business in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and in compliance in all material respects with all Applicable Laws and all Company Permits and use its commercially reasonable efforts to preserve intact its business organization and relationships with customers, suppliers, licensors, licensees, distributors and other Third Parties and keep available the services of its present officers and employees; , , that no action or failure to take action by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with respect to matters specifically addressed by any provision of Section 6.01(a) through (p) shall constitute a breach under this paragraph unless such action or failure to take action would constitute a
provided
however
 
54
 
 
breach of such provision of Section 6.01(a) through (p), as applicable. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and to the fullest extent permitted by Applicable Law, from the date of this Agreement until the earlier of termination of this Agreement and the Effective Time, except as set forth in Section 6.01 of the Company Disclosure Schedule or with Parents prior written consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed (other than with respect to Section 6.01(a), Section 6.01(c) or Section 6.01(d))), the Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to:
(a)
 
adopt or propose any change to its certificate of incorporation or bylaws or other organizational documents (whether by merger, consolidation or otherwise);
(b)
 
(i) merge or consolidate with any other Person, (ii) acquire (including by merger, consolidation, or acquisition of stock or assets) any interest in any corporation, partnership, other business organization or any division thereof or any assets, securities or property, other than (A) acquisitions of assets or property (other than, for the avoidance of doubt, interests in any corporation, partnership, other business organization or any division thereof or securities) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice in an amount not to exceed $20,000,000 in the aggregate for all such acquisitions, (B) acquisitions of, securities under the Companys investment portfolio consistent with the Companys historical investment policy and (C) transactions (1) solely among the Company and one or more of its Subsidiaries where the Company is the acquiring party or (2) solely among the Companys Subsidiaries, or (iii) adopt a plan of complete or partial liquidation, dissolution, recapitalization or restructuring;
(c)
 
(i) split, combine or reclassify any shares of its capital stock, (ii) amend any term or alter any rights of any of its outstanding equity securities, (iii) in the case of the Company only, declare, set aside or pay any dividend or make
any other distribution (whether in cash, stock, property or any combination thereof) in respect of any shares of its capital stock or other securities, other than regular cash dividends in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice in an amount not to exceed $0.125 per share of Company Common Stock per quarter (appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock dividends, subdivisions, splits, combinations or other similar events relating to Company Common Stock), (iv) in the case of Subsidiaries of the Company only, fail to declare, set aside or pay any dividend or make any other distribution (whether in cash, stock, property or any combination thereof) in respect of any shares of its capital stock or other securities in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or (v) redeem, repurchase, cancel or otherwise acquire or offer to redeem, repurchase, or otherwise acquire any of its securities or any securities of any Subsidiary of the Company, other than repurchases of shares of Company Common Stock in connection with the exercise of Company Stock Options or in connection with the vesting or settlement of shares of Company Restricted Shares or other equity and equity-linked awards (including in satisfaction of any amounts required to be
 
55
 
 
deducted or withheld under Applicable Law), in each case outstanding as of the date of this Agreement or awarded after the date of this Agreement to the extent permitted by this Agreement in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice;
(d) issue, deliver or sell, or authorize the issuance, delivery or sale of, any shares of its capital stock or any securities convertible into or exercisable for, or any rights, warrants or options to acquire, any such capital stock or any such convertible securities, other than (i) the issuance of any shares of Company Common Stock upon the exercise of Company Stock Options or the vesting of Company Stock Units, that, in each case, are outstanding on the date of this Agreement in accordance with the present terms of such options and units or are issued after the date of this Agreement as permitted by the following clauses (iii) or (iv), (ii) with respect to capital stock or securities of any Subsidiary of the Company, in connection with contribution-in-kind transactions solely among the Company and one or more of its wholly owned Subsidiaries or solely among the Companys wholly owned Subsidiaries, (iii) Company Stock Units (each an ) with an aggregate fair market value equal to
Interim Period Stock Unit
(A) $51,000,000 for annual Interim Period Stock Unit grants to be made in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, including with respect to timing of such annual Interim Period Stock Unit grants (and including, for the avoidance of doubt, the fair market value of any Company Stock Unit or other equity-based award required to be granted by the Company pursuant to any Employee Plan) and (B) $7,000,000 for Interim Period Stock Unit grants to be made to new hires in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice (including, for the avoidance of doubt, the fair market value of any Company Stock Unit or other equity-based award required to be granted by the Company pursuant to any Employee Plan), each of which shall, by its terms, become vested and be administered in accordance with the terms and conditions of such Interim Period Stock Unit, that the terms and conditions of each Interim Period Stock Unit shall include the following provisions: (x) such Interim Period Stock Unit shall vest in 25% increments per year, (y) the vesting of such Interim Period Stock Unit shall not accelerate in connection with the approval or consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and (z) in the event that the Merger is consummated, as of the Effective Time, such Interim Period Stock Unit shall convert into a cash-settled restricted stock unit, with the number of shares of Parent Common Stock underlying such restricted stock unit equal to the product of (A) the number of shares of Company Common Stock represented by such Interim Period Stock Unit (B) the Equity Award Cash Consideration the Parent Stock Price, shall not be credited with dividend equivalentsand shall vest and settle on the earlier to occur of (1) the vesting date of such Interim Period Stock Unit, subject to the applicable holders continued employment through such vesting date, and (2) the date the holder experiences an involuntary termination of employment without cause or such other termination of employment that would give rise to the payment of severance benefits under an
provided
multiplied by
divided by
 
 
56
 
 
arrangement applicable to the holder and (iv) grants to directors in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, provided that the Company shall not permit directors to elect to be granted Company Stock Options;
(e)
 
incur any capital expenditures or any obligations or liabilities in connection therewith in excess of (i) for fiscal year 2012, $20,000,000 individually or $100,000,000 in the aggregate (including all capital expenditures or obligations or liabilities in connection therewith made prior to the date of this Agreement for fiscal year 2012), (ii) for fiscal year 2013, $20,000,000 individually or $110,000,000 in the aggregate or (iii) for fiscal year 2014, $20,000,000 individually or $110,000,000 in the aggregate; that the Company and its Subsidiaries shall not, during any consecutive six-month period falling completely in fiscal year 2012, 2013 or 2014, incur any capital expenditures or any obligations or liabilities in connection therewith, in excess of 75% of the aggregate limit for such fiscal year as set forth in the foregoing clauses (i) through (iii);
provided
(f)
 
sell, lease, license or otherwise dispose of any Subsidiary or any division thereof or of the Company or any assets, securities or property, other than
(i)
 
pursuant to existing contracts or commitments disclosed on Section 6.01(f) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, (ii) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice for fair market value in an amount not to exceed $20,000,000 in the aggregate, (iii) dispositions of securities under the Companys investment portfolio consistent with the Companys historical investment policy or (iv) transactions (A) where the Company is the disposing party, among the Company and one or more of its wholly owned Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or (B) where a Subsidiary of the Company is the disposing party, among the Company and one or more of its Subsidiaries or among the Companys Subsidiaries;
(g)
 
(i) make any material loans, advances or capital contributions to any other Person, other than loans, advances or capital contributions (A) by the Company to any wholly owned Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice or (B) by any Subsidiary of the Company to the Company or to any other Subsidiary of the Company, or (ii) incur, assume, guarantee or repurchase any indebtedness for borrowed money, other than (A) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice in an amount not to exceed $25,000,000 in the aggregate (provided that all such indebtedness for borrowed money must be prepayable at any time by the Company without penalty) or (B) transactions permitted by the foregoing clause (i);
(h)
 
create or incur any Lien (except for a Permitted Lien) on any material asset;
(i)
 
(i) enter into any Company Material Contract (including by amendment of any Contract that is not a Company Material Contract such that
 
57
 
 
such Contract becomes a Company Material Contract), other than in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices (except that no Company Material Contract pursuant to clause (v) of Section 4.18(a) shall be entered into), or (ii) terminate, renew, extend or amend in any material respect any Company Material Contract or waive any material right thereunder, other than in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practices;
(j)
 
terminate, suspend, abrogate, amend or modify in any material respect any material Company Permit;
(k)
 
except as required by Applicable Law or Employee Plans or other contracts as in effect on the date hereof, (i) grant any severance or termination pay to (or amend any existing arrangement with) any of their respective directors, officers or employees (including former directors, officers or employees) other than (A) as required pursuant to Employee Plans existing as of the date of this Agreement or (B) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice for terminated employees in exchange for a general release of claims or other customary covenants, (ii) increase benefits payable under any severance or termination pay policies or employment agreements existing as of the date of this Agreement, (iii) enter into any employment, deferred compensation or other similar agreement (or any amendment to any such existing agreement) with any of their respective directors, officers or employees (including former directors, officers or employees); that the Company may provide new hires with offer letters in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, (iv) establish, adopt or amend any Employee Plan or labor agreement, other than (A) as required by Applicable Law or (B) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, or (v) increase the compensation, bonus or other benefits payable to any of their respective directors, officers or employees (including former directors, officers or employees), other than increases in base compensation and bonus to directors and employees who are not considered to be executive officers (as defined in the 1934 Act) in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice (it being understood that the amount of bonus actually paid may be higher or lower than prior years based on actual performance and such payment shall not be considered an increase) and increases in employee welfare benefits in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice for employees generally);
provided
(l)
 
make any material change in any method of financial or statutory accounting or financial or statutory accounting principles or practice, except for any such change required by reason of (or, in the reasonable good-faith judgment of the Company, advisable under) a concurrent change in GAAP, SAP or Regulation S-X under the 1934 Act, as approved by its independent public accountants;
(m)
 
make any material change in investment, hedging, underwriting or claims administration principles or practices or in methodologies for estimating
 
58
 
 
and providing for medical costs and other liabilities, in each case with respect to the Company or any of its significant subsidiaries (as defined in Rule 102(w) of Regulation S-X promulgated pursuant to the 1934 Act), except, to the extent applicable, for any such changes required by reason of a concurrent change in GAAP, SAP or Regulation S-X under the 1934 Act, as approved by its independent public accountants (as to accounting matters);
(n)
 
settle or compromise, or propose to settle or compromise, any claim, action, suit, investigation or proceeding (including any litigation, arbitration or dispute, including disputes with Providers) involving or against the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, other than settlements or compromises (i) involving only monetary payment by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 individually or $15,000,000 in the aggregate or (ii) for the avoidance of doubt, relating to Taxes;
(o)
 
sell, assign, license, sublicense, abandon, allow to lapse, transfer or otherwise dispose of, or create or incur any Lien (other than a Permitted Lien) on, any Company Intellectual Property, other than in the ordinary course of business
(i)
 
pursuant to non-exclusive licenses or (ii) for the purpose of disposing of obsolete or worthless assets; or
(p)  
agree, commit or propose to do any of the foregoing.
Section 6.02 (a) The Company shall cause a meeting of its stockholders (the ) to be duly called and held as promptly as reasonably practicable after the SEC or its staff advises that it has no further comments on the Company Proxy Statement or that the Company may commence mailing the Company Proxy Statement for the purpose of voting on the approval and adoption of this Agreement and shall comply with all legal requirements applicable to such meeting; , , that the Company shall be permitted to adjourn, delay or postponeconvening the Company Stockholder Meeting (i) with the consent of Parent, (ii) for the absence of a quorum or (iii) once for a period not to exceed thirty calendar days to solicit additional proxies for the approval and adoption of this Agreement; ,, that in the case of any such adjournment, delay orpostponement, the Company shall cause the Company Stockholder Meeting to be duly called and held as promptly as reasonably practicable after the originally scheduled time.
. Stockholder Meeting.
Company Stockholder Meeting
provided
however
 
provided further
however
 
(b) Subject to Section 6.03(b), Section 6.03(c), Section 6.03(d) and Section 6.03(e), the Board of Directors of the Company shall (i) include in the Proxy Statement the Company Board Recommendation and (ii) use its reasonable best efforts to obtain the Company Stockholder Approval.
Section 6.03 (a) From the date of this Agreement until the earlier of the Effective Time or the termination of this
. No Solicitation; Other Offers.
 
59
 
 
Agreement in accordance with its terms, subject to Section 6.03(b), Section 6.03(c) and Section 6.03(e), the Company shall not, and shall cause its Subsidiaries not to, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause its and its Subsidiaries officers, directors, employees, investment bankers, attorneys, accountants, consultants and other agents, advisors, intermediaries and representatives (collectively, ) not to, directly or indirectly, (i) solicit, initiate or take any action to knowingly facilitate (it being understood and agreed that ministerial acts that are not otherwise prohibited by this Section 6.03 (such as answering unsolicited phone calls) shall not be deemed to facilitate for purposes of this Section 6.03(a)) or knowingly encourage the submission of any Acquisition Proposal, (ii) enter into or participate in any discussions or negotiations with, furnish any information relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or afford access to the business, properties, assets, books or records of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to, otherwise cooperate in any way with, or knowingly assist, participate in, knowingly facilitate or knowingly encourage any effort by any Third Party that is seeking to make, or has made, an Acquisition Proposal or (iii) (A) withdraw (or modify in a manner adverse to Parent) the Company Board Recommendation (it being understood that failure to issue a press release that reaffirms the Company Board Recommendation within five Business Days of the date any Acquisition Proposal or any material modification thereto is publicly disclosed shall be considered an adverse modification), (B) fail to include the Company Board Recommendation in the Company Proxy Statement or (C) recommend, adopt or approve or publicly propose to recommend, adopt or approve an Acquisition Proposal (any of the foregoing in this clause (iii), an ) or (iv) approve any transaction under, or any Person becoming an interested stockholder under, Section 203 of the Delaware Law. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, it is agreed that any violation of the restrictions on the Company set forth in the preceding sentence by any Representative of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries shall be a breach of this Section by the Company (it being understood and agreed that any such violation shall be determined as if such Representative is bound by the terms of this Section 6.03(a)).
Representatives
Adverse Recommendation Change
(b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, at any time prior to the approval and adoption of this Agreement by the Companys stockholders (and in no event after the approval and adoption of this Agreement by the Companys stockholders), the Board of Directors of the Company, directly or indirectly through its Representatives may (x) contact any Third Party that has made after the date of this Agreement an unsolicited written Acquisition Proposal in order to ascertain facts or clarify terms for the sole purpose of the Board of Directors of the Company informing itself about such Acquisition Proposal and such Third Party and (y) subject to compliance with this Section 6.03(b), Section 6.03(c) and Section 6.03(e), (i) engage in negotiations or discussions with any Third Party that, subject to the Companys compliance with Section 6.03(a), has made after
bona fide
 
60
 
the date of this Agreement a Superior Proposal or an unsolicited written Acquisition Proposal that the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith, after consultation with its financial advisor and outside legal counsel, is reasonably likely to lead to a Superior Proposal, (ii) thereafter furnish to such Third Party and its Representatives and financing sources nonpublic information relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries pursuant to a confidentiality agreement (which confidentiality agreement shall not include any provision requiring exclusive negotiations with such Third Party) with confidentiality terms no less favorable to the Company than those contained in the Confidentiality Agreement, a copy of which shall be provided, promptly after its execution, to Parent for informational purposes; that all such non-public information (to the extent that such information has not been previously provided or made available to Parent) is provided or made available to Parent, as the case may be, promptly (but no later than one Business Day) after or substantially concurrently with the time it is provided or made available to such Third Party) and (iii) following receipt of a Superior Proposal after the date of this Agreement, (1) make an Adverse Recommendation Change and/or (2) terminate this Agreement to enter into a definitive agreement providing for such Superior Proposal (provided that the Company may not terminate this Agreement pursuant to the foregoing clause (2), and any purported termination pursuant to the foregoing clause (2) shall be void and of no force or effect, unless in advance of or concurrently with such termination the Company pays the Termination Fee in accordance with Section 10.03(d)), but in each case referred to in the foregoing clauses (i) through (iii) only if the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith after consultation with outside legal counsel to the Company, that the failure to take such action would be reasonably likely to be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under Applicable Law. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the Board of Directors of the Company from (x) complying with Rule 14e -2(a) under the 1934 Act with regard to an Acquisition Proposal, so long as any action taken or statement made to so comply is consistent with this Section 6.03, that (subject to the following sentence) any such action taken orstatement made that involves or relates to an Acquisition Proposal shall be deemed to be an Adverse Recommendation Change unless the Board of Directors of the Company reaffirms the Company Board Recommendation in such statement or in connection with such action; or (y) making any required disclosure to the stockholders of the Company if the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith, after consultation with outside legal counsel, that the failure to take such action would be reasonably likely to be inconsistent with Applicable Law, provided that any Adverse Recommendation Change involving or relating to an Acquisition Proposal may only be made in accordance with the provisions of Section 6.03(b), Section 6.03(c) and Section 6.03(e) . For the avoidance of doubt, a stop, look and listen disclosure or similar communication of the type contemplated by Rule 14d-9(f) under the 1934 Act shall not be an Adverse Recommendation Change.
bona fide
provided
provided
 
 
61
 
(c)
 
In addition to the requirements set forth in Section 6.03(b), the Board of Directors of the Company shall not take any of the actions referred to in clauses (i) through (iii) of Section 6.03(b) unless the Company shall have first delivered to Parent written notice advising Parent that it intends to take such action, and the Company shall continue to advise Parent, on a current basis, after taking such action of the status and material terms of any discussions and negotiations with the applicable Third Party. In addition, the Company shall notify Parent promptly (but in no event later than 24 hours) after receipt by the Company (or any of its Representatives) of any Acquisition Proposal, any indication that a Third Party is considering making an Acquisition Proposal or any request for information relating to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or for access to the business, properties, assets, books or records of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries by any Third Party that may be considering making, or has made, an Acquisition Proposal, which notice shall be provided orally and in writing and shall identify the Third Party making, and the material terms and conditions of, any such Acquisition Proposal, indication or request (including any material changes thereto). The Company shall keep Parent fully informed, on a current basis, of the status and details of any such Acquisition Proposal, indication or request (including any changes thereto) and shall promptly (but in no event later than 24 hours after receipt) provide to Parent copies of all material correspondence and written materials sent or provided to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries that describes any terms or conditions of any Acquisition Proposal (as well as written summaries of any material oral communications addressing such matters).
(d)
 
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, at any time prior to the approval and adoption of this Agreement by the Companys stockholders (and in no event after the approval and adoption of this Agreement by the Companys stockholders), the Board of Directors of the Company may effect an Adverse Recommendation Change involving or relating to an Intervening Event if the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel, that the failure to take such action would be reasonably likely to be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties under Applicable Law; that (x) the Company shall (A) promptly notify Parent in writing of its intention to take such action and (B) negotiate in good faith with Parent for two Business Days following such notice regarding revisions to the terms of this Agreement proposed by Parent and (y) the Board of Directors of the Company shall not effect any Adverse Recommendation Change involving or relating to an Intervening Event unless, after the two Business Day period described in the foregoing clause (B), the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith, after consultation with its outside legal counsel, that the failure to take such action would be reasonably likely to be inconsistent with its fiduciary duties to the stockholders of the Company under Applicable Law.
provided
(e)
 
Without limiting or affecting Section 6.03(a), Section 6.03(b) or Section 6.03(c), the Board of Directors of the Company shall not make an
 
62
 
 
Adverse Recommendation Change involving or relating to a Superior Proposal or terminate this Agreement in order to enter into a definitive agreement with respect to a Superior Proposal unless (i) the Company promptly notifies Parent, in writing at least five calendar days before taking such action, that it intends to take such action, which notice attaches the most current version of any proposed agreement or a detailed summary of all material terms of such Superior Proposal and the identity of the offeror, (ii) if requested by Parent, during such five calendar day period, the Company and its Representatives have discussed and negotiated in good faith with Parent regarding any proposal by Parent to amend the terms of this Agreement in response to such Superior Proposal and (iii) after such five calendar day period, the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith, taking into account any proposal by Parent to amend the terms of this Agreement, that such Acquisition Proposal continues to constitute a Superior Proposal (it being understood and agreed that in the event of any amendment to the financial terms or other material terms of any such Superior Proposal, a new written notification from the Company consistent with that described in clause (i) of this Section 6.03(e) shall be required and a new notice period under clause (i) of this Section 6.03(e) shall commence, during which notice period the Company shall be required to comply with the requirements of this Section 6.03(e) anew, except that such new notice period shall be for three Business Days (as opposed to five calendar days)). After delivery of such written notice pursuant to the immediately preceding sentence, the Company shall promptly keep Parent informed of all material developments affecting the material terms of any such Superior Proposal (and the Company shall provide Parent with copies of any additional written materials received that relate to such Superior Proposal).
(f)  means any , unsolicited written Acquisition Proposal (with all references to 20% in the definition of Acquisition Proposal being deemed to be references to 50%) on terms that the Board of Directors of the Company determines in good faith, after consultation with its financial advisor and outside legal counsel, and taking into account all the terms and conditions of the Acquisition Proposal that the Board of Directors of the Company considers to be appropriate (including the expected timing and likelihood of consummation, any governmental or other approval requirements, break-up fees, expense reimbursement provisions, conditions to consummation and availability of necessary financing), would result in a transaction (i) that if consummated, is more favorable to the Companys stockholders from a financial point of view (taking into account, among other items, the tax attributes of such transaction) than the Merger (taking into account any proposal by Parent to amend the terms of this Agreement), (ii) that is reasonably capable of being completed on the terms proposed, taking into account the identity of the Person making the Acquisition Proposal, any approval requirements and all other financial, regulatory, legal and other aspects of such Acquisition Proposal and (iii) for which financing, if a cash transaction (whether in whole or in part), is then fully committed in a manner comparable to Parents and Merger Subsidiarys financing
Superior Proposal
bona fide
 
63
 
 
(or which is reasonably determined to be available by the Board of Directors of the Company).
(g)
 
 means any material event, change, effect, development or occurrence occurring or arising after the date of this Agreement that (i) was not known or reasonably foreseeable to the Board of Directors or executive officers of the Company as of or prior to the date of this Agreement and
Intervening Event
(ii)  
does not relate to or involve an Acquisition Proposal.
(h)
 
The Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause its and its Subsidiaries respective Representatives to, cease immediately and cause to be terminated any and all existing activities, discussions or negotiations, if any, with any Third Party conducted prior to the date of this Agreement with respect to any Acquisition Proposal and shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause any such Party (or its agents or advisors) in possession of confidential information about the Company that was furnished by or on behalf of the Company to return or destroy all such information. During the term of this Agreement, except in connection with the termination of this Agreement to enter into a Superior Proposal in accordance with Section 6.03(b), the Company shall not take any actions to exempt any Person other than Parent and Merger Subsidiary from any antitakeover provision in the Companys Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, or make any state takeover statute (including any Delaware state takeover statute) or similar statute inapplicable to any Acquisition Proposal.
(i)
 
Notwithstanding (i) any Adverse Recommendation Change, (ii) the making of any Acquisition Proposal (whether or not publicly) or (iii) anything in this Agreement to the contrary, until termination of this Agreement in accordance with its terms (x) in no event may the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (A) enter into any agreement in principle, letter of intent, term sheet, merger agreement, acquisition agreement, option agreement, joint venture agreement, partnership agreement or other similar instrument constituting or relating to an Acquisition Proposal, (B) except as required by Applicable Law, make, facilitate or provide information in connection with any SEC or other regulatory filings in connection with the transactions contemplated by any Acquisition Proposal or
(C) seek any third-party consents in connection with the transactions contemplated by any Acquisition Proposal and (y) the Company shall otherwise remain subject to all of its obligations under this Agreement.
Section 6.04 From the date of this Agreement until the Effective Time, upon reasonable notice and subject to Applicable Law, the Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, (i) give to Parent, its counsel, financial advisors, auditors and other authorized representatives reasonable access during normal business hours to its offices, properties, books, Contracts and records, (ii) furnish as promptly as reasonably practicable to Parent, its counsel, financial advisors, auditors and other authorized
. Access to Information; Confidentiality.
 
64
 
 
representatives such financial and operating data and other information as such Persons may reasonably request, in each case unless furnishing such information would constitute a violation of Applicable Law or of any confidentiality obligations of the Company or its Subsidiaries pursuant to contracts; that the Company and its Subsidiaries shall use commercially reasonable efforts to cause the beneficiaries of any such confidentiality obligations to provide any consent necessary to permit the Company and its Subsidiaries to furnish such information, and (iii) instruct its employees, counsel, financial advisors, auditors and other authorized representatives to reasonably cooperate with Parent in its investigation; , , that (1) the Company shall not be required to afford such access if it would unreasonably disrupt its operations or those of any of its Subsidiaries or would cause a risk of a loss of privilege to the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or would constitute a violation of any Applicable Law and
provided
provided
however
(2) Parent shall not have access to individual performance or evaluation records, medical histories or other information that in the reasonable opinion of the Company is sensitive or the disclosure of which could reasonably be expected to subject the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to risk of liability or information that is subject to attorney-client privilege or other privilege. All such access shall be subject to reasonable restrictions imposed from time to time with respect to the provision of privileged communications or any applicable confidentiality agreement with any Person. Any investigation pursuant to this Section 6.04 shall be conducted in such manner as not to unreasonably interfere with the conduct of the business of the Company or damage any property or any portion thereof. All information furnished pursuant to this Section shall be subject to the confidentiality agreement, dated as of April 26, 2012, between Parent and the Company (the  ). No information or knowledge obtained in any investigation pursuant to this Section 6.04 shall affect or be deemed to modify any representation or warranty made by the Company pursuant to this Agreement.
Confidentiality Agreement
Section 6.05 (a) From the date of this Agreement until the Effective Time, without the prior written consent of Parent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries shall (i) make or change any Tax election; (ii) change any annual Tax accounting period; (iii) adopt or change any method of tax accounting; (iv) enter into any closing agreement with respect to Taxes; (v) consent to any extension or waiver of the limitations period applicable to any Tax claim or assessment (other than (A) with respect to the claims and assessments set forth in Section 6.05 of the Company Disclosure Schedule, any extension or waiver of the limitations period for a period not to exceed six months and (B) with respect to other claims and assessments, any extension or waiver of the limitations period for a period not to exceed 12 months); (vi) file any amended Tax Returns or claims for Tax refunds; (vii) settle or surrender any material Tax claim, audit or assessment (A) with respect to the claims, audits, or assessments set forth in Section 6.05 of the Company Disclosure Schedule, for an amount materially in
. Tax Matters.
 
65
 
excess of amounts reserved, and (B) with respect to any other claims, audits, or assessments, for an amount in excess of $1,000,000, individually; or (viii) surrender any right to claim a Tax refund, or offset or other reduction in Tax liability, in each case, in lieu of a Tax refund, if the amount of the Tax refund, offset or other reduction in Tax liability so surrendered exceeds $1,000,000; except (x) with respect to each of clauses (i) through (viii), as may be required by Applicable Law or as set forth in Section 6.05 of the Company Disclosure Schedule or (y) with respect to each of clauses (i) through (vi), as would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, an adverse effect on the Company that is material.
(b) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, this Section 6.05 contains the sole and exclusive covenants in this Agreement of the Company regarding Tax matters.
Section 6.06 Prior to the Closing, the Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, at the sole expense of Parent, use its and their commercially reasonable efforts to provide such cooperation as may be reasonably requested by Parent in connection with the arrangement of any financing to be consummated in connection with the Merger and the other transactions contemplated by this Agreement ( that such requested cooperation does not unreasonably interfere with the ongoing operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries) . Without limiting the generality of the foregoing sentence, prior to the Closing, the Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, at the sole expense of Parent, use its and their commercially reasonable efforts to: (i) as promptly as reasonably practicable providing information (financial or otherwise) relating to Company to the Persons providing the financing (including information to be used in the preparation of an information package regarding the business, operations, financial projections and prospects of Parent and the Company customary or reasonably necessary for the completion of such financing) to the extent reasonably requested by Parent to assist in preparation of customary offering or information documents to be used for the completion of the financing, (ii) cooperate with the marketing efforts of Parent and its financing sources, including participating in reasonable number of meetings, due diligence sessions and road shows, at times and at locations reasonably acceptable to the Company, (iii) reasonably assist in preparing customary offering memoranda, rating agency presentations, lender presentations, financial statements (including financial statements, all of which unaudited financial statements shallhave been reviewed by the Companys independent accountants as provided in Statement on Accounting Standards No. 100), private placement memoranda, prospectuses and other similar documents, including delivery of (A) audited consolidated balance sheets and related audited statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows of the Company for each of the three fiscal years most recently ended at least 90 days prior to the Closing Date (and audit reports for such financial statements shall not be subject to any going concern qualifications) and (B) unaudited consolidated balance sheets and related
. Financing Assistance.
provided
pro forma
 
 
66
 
 
unaudited statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows of the Company for each subsequent fiscal quarter ended at least 60 days prior to the Closing Date, (iv) make available, on a customary and reasonable basis and upon reasonable notice, appropriate personnel, documents and information relating to the Company and its Subsidiaries, in each case, as may be reasonably requested by Parent, (v) obtain any necessary consents from auditors in connection with any filings with the SEC; that until the Closing occurs, the Company shall
provided
(A) have no liability or any obligation under any agreement or document related to the financing or (B) not be required to incur any other liability in connection with the financing unless simultaneously reimbursed or reasonably satisfactorily indemnified by Parent, (vi) obtain customary legal opinions, financing accountants comfort letters and consents of accountants for use of their reports in any materials relating to the financing and in connection with any filings required to be made by Parent pursuant to the 1933 Act or the 1934 Act (including the Registration Statement), (vii) subject to customary confidentiality provisions, provide customary authorization letters to the Financing Sources authorizing the distribution of information to prospective lenders or investors and (viii) obtain customary payoff letters and instruments of discharge to be delivered at Closing to allow for the payoff, discharge and termination in full on the Closing Date of the Credit Agreement. Parent shall, promptly upon request by the Company, reimburse the Company for all reasonable and documented out-of-pocket costs and expenses (including reasonable attorneys fees) incurred by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries in connection with the cooperation of the Company and its Subsidiaries contemplated by this Section 6.06 (without duplication of any reimbursement pursuant to the preceding sentence). Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall, on a joint and several basis, indemnify and hold harmless the Company and its Subsidiaries and their respective representatives from and against any and all liabilities, losses, damages, claims, costs, expenses (including attorneys fees), interest, awards, judgments and penalties suffered or incurred in connection with any financing or other securities offering of Parent and/or its Subsidiaries or any assistance or activities provided in connection therewith.
Section 6.07 The Company shall promptly advise Parent orally and in writing of any stockholder litigation (including derivative claims) against the Company and/or its directors relating to this Agreement, the Merger and/or the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and shall keep Parent fully informed regarding any such stockholder litigation. The Company shall give Parent the opportunity to consult with the Company regarding the defense or settlement of any such stockholder litigation and shall give due consideration to Parents advice with respect to such stockholder litigation. Further, the Company shall not settle any litigation commenced on or after the date of this Agreement against it or any of its directors or executive officers by any stockholder of the Company relating to this Agreement, the Merger or any other transaction contemplated hereby or otherwise, without the
. Stockholder Litigation.
 
67
 
 
prior written consent of Parent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed)
Section 6.08 (a) In order to facilitate the integration and the operations of the Company and Parent and their respective Subsidiaries and to permit the coordination of their related operations on a timely basis after the Effective Time, and in an effort to accelerate to the earliest time possible after the Effective Time the realization of synergies, operating efficiencies and other benefits expected to be realized as a result of the Merger, the Company, upon Parents request, shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, use its and their commercially reasonable efforts to consult with Parent on all strategic and operational matters, including with respect to the renewal or extension of any lease or sublease of real property expiring in 2013 for more than a one year renewal or extension term (and shall not enter into any such renewal or extension prior to consulting with Parent), to the extent such consultation is not in violation of Applicable Law. In furtherance of the foregoing, upon Parents request, the parties shall establish a transition planning team of at least six members (the ) comprised of an equal number of representatives of Parent and the Company, which shall be responsible for facilitating a transition and integration planning process to ensure the successful combination of the operations of Parent and the Company. Upon Parents request, subject to Applicable Law, the Transition Team shall be responsible for developing and implementing a detailed action plan for the combination of the businesses from and after the Effective Time and shall (i) confer on a regular and continued basis regarding the status of the transition and integration planning process, (ii) communicate and consult with its members with respect to (x) the manner in which the respective businesses will be conducted from and after the Effective Time and (y) the manner in which the Companys accounting, investment, hedging, underwriting and claims administration policies and practices will be conformed to those of Parent from and after the Effective Time and (iii) coordinate human resources integration. Upon Parents request, the Company shall devote sufficient resources to the Transition Team and share information as necessary to achieve the objectives set forth in this Section 6.08, including making available its facilities and those of its Subsidiaries, in order to assist the Transition Team, to the extent not in violation of Applicable Law.
. Transition.
Transition Team
(b) Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, (i) at the reasonable request of Parent, the Company shall cooperate in good faith with Parent to establish and implement Company-sponsored employee retention and transition incentive programs designed to encourage the retention and performance of employees and groups of employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries who are mutually identified by the Company and Parent and (ii) the Company shall, and shall cause its Subsidiaries to, coordinate with Parent with respect to the formulation and dissemination of all internal and external communications and announcements relating to the impact on employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries of the Merger and the integration of the operations
 
68
 
 
of the Company with those of Parent. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the adoption of a retention and transition incentive program described above pursuant to the mutual written agreement of the Company and Parent, and the obligations and liabilities relating to such agreed program, shall be disregarded for purposes of determining the completeness, truthfulness and accuracy of the representations of the Company set forth in Article 4 and for purposes of determining the Companys compliance with its covenants under Section 6.01.
Section 6.09 The Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to timely provide or cause to be provided, in accordance with the provisions of the indentures relating to the Companys 6.125% Senior Notes due 2015, 5.950% Senior Notes due 2017, 6.300% Senior Notes due 2014 and 5.450% Senior Notes due 2021 (the (), to the trustee under each Indenture, any notices, announcements, certificates or legal opinions required by such Indenture to be provided in connection with the Merger prior to the Effective Time. Parent and its counsel shall be given a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on any such notice, announcement, certificate or legal opinion, in each case before such document is provided to such trustee, and the Company shall give reasonable and good faith consideration to any comments made by Parent and its counsel.
. Indentures.
Indentures
ARTICLE 7
C P
OVENANTS OF
ARENT
Parent agrees that:
Section 7.01 From the date of this Agreement until the earlier of termination of this Agreement and the Effective Time, except (x) as prohibited or required by Applicable Law, (y) as set forth in Section 7.01 of the Parent Disclosure Schedule or (z) as otherwise required or expressly contemplated by this Agreement, unless the Company shall otherwise consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), Parent shall, and shall cause each of its Subsidiaries to, conduct its business in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice and in compliance in all material respects with all Applicable Laws and all Parent Permits and use its commercially reasonable efforts to preserve intact its business organization and relationships with customers, suppliers, licensors, licensees, distributors and other third parties and keep available the services of its present officers and employees; , , that no action or failure to take action by Parent or any of itsSubsidiaries with respect to matters specifically addressed by any provision of Section 7.01(a) through (c) shall constitute a breach under this paragraph unless such action or failure to take action would constitute a breach of such provision of Section 7.01(a) through (c), as applicable. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and to the fullest extent permitted by Applicable Law, from the date of
. Conduct of Parent.
provided
however
 
 
69
 
 
this Agreement until the earlier of termination of this Agreement and the Effective Time, except with the Companys prior written consent (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned or delayed), Parent shall not:
(a)
 
adopt or propose any change in Parents certificate of incorporation or bylaws in a manner materially adverse to the Companys stockholders (whether by merger, consolidation or otherwise);
(b)
 
declare, set aside or pay any dividend or other distribution, payable in cash, stock or property, with respect to any of its capital stock, other than regular cash dividends in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice; or
 
(c)  
adopt a plan of complete or partial liquidation or dissolution of
Parent.
Section 7.02 Parent shall take all action necessary to cause Merger Subsidiary to perform its obligations under this Agreement and to consummate the Merger on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement.
. Obligations of Merger Subsidiary.
Section 7.03 (a) From and after the Effective Time, Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, to the fullest extent permitted by Applicable Law (including to the fullest extent authorized or permitted by any amendments to or replacements of the Delaware Law adopted after the date of this Agreement that increase the extent to which a corporation may indemnify its officers and directors), indemnify, defend and hold harmless (and promptly advance expenses from time to time as incurred to the fullest extent permitted by Applicable Law, , the Person to whom expenses are advanced provides a reasonable and customary undertaking (which shall not include posting of any collateral) to repay such advances, if it is ultimately determined that such Person is not entitled to indemnification) the present and former directors, officers and employees of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (each an  ) from and against any and all costs or expenses (including attorneys fees, expenses and disbursements), judgments, fines, losses, claims, damages, penalties, liabilities and amounts paid in settlement in connection with any actual or threatened claim, action, suit, proceeding or investigation, whether civil, criminal, administrative, regulatory or investigative, arising out of, relating to or in connection with any circumstances, developments or matters in existence, or acts or omissions occurring or alleged to occur prior to or at the Effective Time in their capacities as officers, directors and employees of the Company, including the approval of this Agreement and the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby or arising out of or pertaining to the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby, whether asserted or claimed prior to, at or after the Effective Time.
. Director and Officer Liability.
provided
Indemnified Person
 
70
 
(b)
 
Following the Effective Time, the Surviving Corporation shall, and Parent shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, maintain in effect the provisions in its certificate of incorporation and bylaws to the extent they provide for indemnification, advancement and reimbursement of expenses and exculpation of Indemnified Parties, as applicable, with respect to facts or circumstances occurring at or prior to the Effective Time, on the same basis as set forth in the certificate of incorporation and bylaws of the Company in effect on the date of this Agreement, to the fullest extent permitted from time to time under Applicable Law, which provisions shall not be amended except as required by Applicable Law or except to make changes permitted by Applicable Law that would enlarge the scope of the Indemnified Parties indemnification rights thereunder.
(c)
 
Prior to the Effective Time, the Company shall, in consultation with Parent, purchase a six year extended reporting period endorsement with respect to the Companys currently existing directors and officers liability insurance and fiduciary liability insurance, which endorsement shall contain coverage that is at least as protective to the Persons covered by such existing insurance, and the Surviving Corporation shall maintain such endorsement in full force and effect for its full term, that in no event shall the aggregate cost of such endorsement exceed 300% of the current annual premium paid by the Company for such insurance (the ); , that if the aggregate cost of such endorsement exceeds the Maximum Amount, the Company shall purchase, and the Surviving Corporation shall maintain, as much comparable insurance as is available for the Maximum Amount. Such endorsement shall be placed through such broker(s) and with such insurance carriers as may be specified by Parent and as are reasonably acceptable to the Company.
provided
Maximum Amount
provided
further
(d)
 
If Parent, the Surviving Corporation or any of its successors or assigns (i) consolidates with or merges into any other Person and shall not be the continuing or the surviving corporation of such consolidation or merger, or (ii) transfers or conveys all or substantially all of its properties and assets to any Person, then, and in each such case, to the extent necessary, proper provision shall be made so that the successors and assigns of Parent or the Surviving Corporation, as the case may be, shall assume the obligations set forth in this Section 7.03.
(e)
 
The rights of each Indemnified Person under this Section 7.03 shall be in addition to any rights such Person may have under the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, or under the Delaware Law or any other Applicable Law or under any agreement of any Indemnified Person with the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (and Parent shall, and shall cause the Surviving Corporation to, honor and perform under all indemnification agreements entered into by the Company or any of its Subsidiaries). These rights shall survive consummation of the Merger and are intended to benefit, and shall be enforceable by, each Indemnified Person. The obligations of Parent under this Section 7.03 shall not be terminated or modified in such a manner as to adversely affect any Indemnified Person unless the
 
71
 
 
affected Indemnified Person shall have consented in writing to such termination or modification. It is expressly agreed that each Indemnified Person shall be a third-party beneficiary of this Section 7.03, and entitled to enforce the covenants contained in this Section 7.03. If any Indemnified Person makes any claim for indemnification or advancement of expenses under this Section 7.03 that is denied by Parent and/or the Surviving Corporation, and a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the Indemnified Person is entitled to such indemnification, then Parent or the Surviving Corporation shall pay such Indemnified Persons costs and expenses, including legal fees and expenses, incurred in connection with pursuing such claim against Parent and/or the Surviving Corporation.
(f) Nothing in this Agreement is intended to, shall be construed to or shall release, waive or impair any rights to directors and officers insurance claims under any policy that is or has been in existence with respect to the Company or any of its respective Subsidiaries for any of their respective directors, officers or other employees, it being understood and agreed that the indemnification provided for in this Section 7.03 is not prior to or in substitution for any such claims under such policies.
Section 7.04 (a) Subject to Section 7.04(c), following the Effective Time, Parent will or, as applicable, will cause its Subsidiaries to, honor all obligations under all Employee Plans that exist on the date of this Agreement (or as established or amended in accordance with or permitted by this Agreement) that apply to any current or former employee, or current or former director, of the Company or its Subsidiaries. Through the end of the calendar year in which the Closing Date occurs (the  ), the Surviving Corporation shall provide, and Parent shallcause the Surviving Corporation to provide, to the individuals who are employed by the Company and its Subsidiaries immediately prior to the Effective Time and to the extent they continue as employees of the Surviving Corporation or any of Parents Subsidiaries during all or a portion of the Benefits Continuation Period (the  ) compensation (including base salary, bonus and other incentive compensation opportunities) and employee benefits no less favorable in the aggregate than the compensation and employee benefits provided to the Affected Employees under the Employee Plans immediately prior to the Effective Time. For two years following the Effective Time, individuals who are employed by the Company and its Subsidiaries immediately prior to the Effective Time shall be provided with severance benefits in amounts and on terms and conditions that are no less favorable than those provided to such individuals immediately prior to the Effective Time, as set forth in the Companys Severance Pay Plan, effective as of January 1, 2012.
. Employee Matters.
Benefits
Continuation Period
 
Affected Employees
(b) With respect to any employee benefit plan in which any Affected Employee first becomes eligible to participate, on or after the Effective Time (the  ), Parent shall: (a) waive all pre-existing conditions, exclusions and waiting periods with respect to participation and coverage
New Company Plans
 
72
 
 
requirements applicable to such Affected Employee under any health and welfare New Company Plans in which such Affected Employee may be eligible to participate after the Effective Time, (b) recognize service of Affected Employees (or otherwise credited by the Company or its Subsidiaries) accrued prior to the Effective Time for all purposes under (but not for the purposes of benefit accrual under any defined benefit pension plan) any New Employee Plan in which such Affected Employees may be eligible to participate after the Effective Time, provided, however, that in no event shall any credit be given to the extent it would result in the duplication of benefits for the same period of service and (c) if applicable, cause to be credited any deductibles or out-of-pocket expenses incurred by employees of the Company and their beneficiaries and dependents during the portion of the calendar year prior to their participation in Parents health plans with the objective that there be no double counting during the year in which the Effective Time occurs of such deductibles or out-of-pocket expenses.
(c) (i) Neither Parent nor any of its Affiliates shall be obligated to continue to employ any Affected Employee for any period of time following the Effective Time, (ii) nothing herein shall prevent Parent or its Affiliates from revising, amending or terminating any Employee Plan or any other employee benefit plan, program or policy in effect from time to time, (iii) nothing in this Agreement shall be construed as an amendment of any Employee Plan, and (iv) no provision of this Section 7.04 shall create any third-party beneficiary rights in any director, officer, employee or individual independent contractor (including former directors, officers, employees or individual independent contracts) of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (including any beneficiary or dependent of such individual).
Section 7.05 Parent shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause the shares of Parent Common Stock to be issued in connection with the Merger to be listed on the NYSE, subject to official notice of issuance, prior to the Effective Time.
. Stock Exchange Listing.
Section 7.06. (a) Each of Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall use commercially reasonable efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all actions and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary to arrange the Debt Financing on the terms and conditions described in the Debt Commitment Letters, including using commercially reasonable efforts (i) to negotiate and enter into the definitive agreements with respect thereto on the terms and conditions contained in the Debt Commitment Letters (including, as necessary, the flex provisions contained in any related fee letter) by a date no later than the date that is three months from the date hereof and (ii) to satisfy (or if determined advisable by Parent and Merger Subsidiary, obtain the waiver of) on a timely basis all conditions to obtaining the Debt Financing within Parents and Merger Subsidiarys control and to comply with all of its obligations pursuant to the Debt Commitment Letters and the definitive agreements related thereto. In the event that all conditions to funding the commitments contained in the Debt Commitment Letters have been satisfied,
. Financing
 
73
 
 
each of Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Financing Sources to fund the Debt Financing required to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and to pay related fees and expenses on the Closing Date (including, to the extent commercially reasonable, by taking enforcement action to cause the Financing Sources to provide the Debt Financing). Each of Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall use its commercially reasonable efforts to enforce all of its rights under the Debt Commitment Letters. Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall give the Company prompt notice of any material breach by any party to the Debt Commitment Letters or the definitive agreements related thereto of which Parent or Merger Subsidiary has become aware or any termination of any of the Commitment Letters or such definitive agreements. In the event that any portion of the Debt Financing becomes unavailable, Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall (1) use their commercially reasonable efforts to obtain, as promptly as practicable following the occurrence of such event, alternative debt financing for any such portion from alternative debt sources ( ) in an amount that will still enable Parent and Merger Subsidiary to consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and (2) promptly notify the Company of such unavailability and the reason therefor. If obtained, Parent shall deliver to the Company true and complete copies of all agreements (other than any fee letters and engagement letters) pursuant to which any such alternative source shall have committed to provide Parent or the Surviving Corporation with Alternative Financing. Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall not, without the Companys prior written consent (not to be unreasonably withheld) permit any amendment or modification to, or any waiver of any provision or remedy under, any Debt Commitment Letter or any definitive agreements related thereto unless the terms of such Debt Commitment Letter or definitive agreements related thereto, in each case as so amended, modified or waived, are substantially similar to those in such Debt Commitment Letter or definitive agreement related thereto, prior to giving effect to such amendment, modification or waiver (other than economic terms, which shall as good as or better for Parent and Merger Subsidiary than those in the Debt Commitment Letter or definitive agreement relating thereto prior to giving effect to such amendment, modification or waiver); that in the case of amendments or modifications of any Debt Commitment Letter or a definitive agreement relating thereto, the foregoing shall only apply if such amendment or modification (x) could reasonably be expected to (I) adversely affect the ability or likelihood of Parent or Merger Subsidiary timely consummating the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or (II) make the timely funding of the Debt Financing or the satisfaction of the conditions to obtaining the Debt Financing less likely to occur, (y) reduces the amount of the Debt Financing or (z) adversely affects the ability of Parent or Merger Subsidiary to enforce their rights against other parties to the Debt Commitment Letters or the definitive agreements relating thereto. Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall provide the Company with prompt written notice of the receipt of any notice or other communication from any financing source with respect to such financing
Alternative Financing
provided
 
74
 
sources failure or anticipated failure to fund its commitments under any Debt Commitment Letters or definitive agreement in connection therewith. Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall keep the Company reasonably informed on a reasonably current basis of the status of its efforts to consummate the Debt Financing.
(b) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, the Parent, in its sole discretion, may replace any existing Debt Commitment Letter with a debt commitment letter (a ) pursuant to which financial institutions selected by it in its sole discretion commit to provide debt financing to finance the transactions contemplated by this Agreement () and on or following the effectiveness thereof Parent may, in its sole discretion terminate the existing Debt Commitment Letter and the commitments thereunder; that, without the Companys consent, the terms of such Replacement Debt Financing shall be substantially similar to the terms of the Debt Commitment Letter or definitive agreement relating thereto being replaced (other than economic terms, which shall be as good as or better for Parent and Merger Subsidiary than those in the Debt Commitment Letter or definitive agreement relating thereto being replaced). Promptly following the execution of a Replacement Debt Commitment Letter by Parent, Parent shall notify the Company to such effect and shall promptly provide a fully executed copy of such Replacement Debt Commitment Letter and any related agreements (other than any fee letters or engagement letters). Such notice shall also satisfy the Parents notification requirements under Section 7.06(b) relating to termination of the existing Debt Commitment Letter.
Replacement Debt Commitment Letter
Replacement Debt Financing
provided
ARTICLE 8
C P C
OVENANTS OF
ARENT AND THE
OMPANY
The parties hereto agree that:
Section 8.01 (a) Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company and Parent shall use their respective reasonable best efforts to take, or cause to be taken, all actions and to do, or cause to be done, all things necessary, proper or advisable under Applicable Law to consummate the Merger, (x) including (i) preparing and filing as promptly as practicable with any Governmental Authority or other Third Party all documentation to effect all necessary Filings, (ii) obtaining and maintaining all licenses, authorizations, permits, consents, approvals, clearances, variances, exemptions, orders and other confirmations required to be obtained from any Governmental Authority or other Third Party that are necessary, proper or advisable to consummate the Merger and (iii) cooperating to the extent reasonable with the other parties hereto in their efforts to comply with their obligations under this Agreement and (y) which may include contesting (which may include by litigation) any (i) action, suit, investigation or proceeding brought by any Governmental Authority in a federal, state or administrative court seeking to
. Reasonable Best Efforts.
 
75
 
 
enjoin, restrain, prevent, prohibit or make illegal consummation of the Merger or seeking damages or to impose any terms or conditions in connection with the Merger or (ii) Order that has been entered by a federal, state or administrative court that enjoins, restrains, prevents, prohibits or makes illegal consummation of the Merger or imposes any damages, terms or conditions in connection with the Merger. Subject to clause (y) of the preceding sentence, the parties understand and agree that Parents obligation to use its reasonable best efforts set forth in this Section 8.01(a) includes taking all actions and doing all things necessary, proper or advisable under Applicable Law (including divestitures and the entry into other commitments and limitations) to obtain the governmental approvals described in clauses (x), (y) and (z) of the first sentence of Section 8.01(b) to consummate the Merger so long as such actions would not have and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Regulatory Material Adverse Effect on Parent or on the Company.
(b) Notwithstanding Section 8.01(a) or anything else in this Agreement to the contrary, nothing in this Agreement will obligate or require Parent or Merger Subsidiary to take or cause to be taken any action (or refrain or cause to refrain from taking any action) or agree or cause to agree to any term, condition or limitation as a condition to, or in connection with, (x) the expiration or termination of any applicable waiting period relating to the Merger under the HSR Act, (y) any other Applicable Law that is designed or intended to prohibit, restrict or regulate actions having the purpose or effect of monopolization or restraint of trade or (z) obtaining any Required Governmental Authorization, in each case if such action (or refraining from such action), term, condition or limitation would have or would reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Regulatory Material Adverse Effect on Parent or on the Company.   means, with respect to any Person, any event, change,effect, development or occurrence, in each case resulting from or arising out of the matters contemplated by clauses (x) through (z) of the first sentence of this Section 8.01(b), that has a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business, revenue or EBITDA of such Person and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole; that, for purposes of determining whether any action, term or condition would have or would reasonably be expected to have a Regulatory Material Adverse Effect on Parent, Parent and its Subsidiaries will collectively be deemed to be a company the size of (and with revenue and EBITDA equal to those of) the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole; , that, for purposes of determining whether any action, term or condition would have or would reasonably be expected to have a Regulatory Material Adverse Effect on Parent or on the Company, (i) impacts on the synergies expected to be realized from the Merger that are publicly disclosed by Parent will be taken into account and (ii) impacts on Parent, the Company or any of their respective Subsidiaries will be aggregated.  means, with respect to any Person, the sum of (1) consolidated net income, determined in accordance with GAAP, (2) without duplication and to the extent deducted in determining such
Regulatory
Material Adverse Effect
 
provided
provided, further
EBITDA
plus
 
76
 
consolidated net income, the sum of (I) consolidated interest expense, (II) consolidated income tax expense and (III) all amounts attributed to
depreciation or amortization, in each case of such Person and its Subsidiaries .
(c)
 
Neither the Company nor Parent shall, and each of them shall cause its Subsidiaries not to, directly or indirectly (whether by merger, consolidation or otherwise), acquire, purchase, lease or license (or agree to acquire, purchase, lease or license) any business, corporation, partnership, association or other business organization or division or part thereof, or any securities or collection of assets, if doing so would reasonably be expected to: (i) impose any material delay in the obtaining of, or materially increase the risk of not obtaining, any Consent, or exemption of any Governmental Authority necessary to consummate the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby or the expiration or termination of any applicable waiting period; (ii) materially increase the risk of any Governmental Authority entering an order prohibiting the consummation of the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby; or (iii) materially increase the risk of not being able to remove any such order on appeal or otherwise.
(d)
 
In furtherance and not in limitation of Section 8.01(a), the parties shall as promptly as practicable following the date of this Agreement, make all Filings with all Governmental Authorities that may be or may become reasonably necessary, proper or advisable under this Agreement and Applicable Law to consummate and make effective the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby, including: (i) not later than 30 Business Days following the date of this Agreement, Parent filing, or causing to be filed, Form A Statements or similar change of control applications, with the insurance commissioners or departments of health or other Governmental Authorities in each jurisdiction where required by Applicable Law seeking approval of Parents acquisition of control of each of the Regulated Subsidiaries which results from the Merger; (ii) as promptly as practicable, Parent filing, or causing to be filed, any pre-acquisition notifications on Form E or similar market share notifications to be filed in each jurisdiction where required by Applicable Laws with respect to the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby; (iii) not later than 10 Business Days following the date of this Agreement (unless the Parties otherwise agree to another time period), the Company and Parent each making an appropriate Filing of a notification and report form pursuant to the HSR Act with the Federal Trade Commission and the Antitrust Division of the United States Department of Justice with respect to the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby and requesting early termination of the waiting period under the HSR Act; (iv) the Company and Parent each making any other Filing that may be required under any other Applicable Laws relating to antitrust or by any Governmental Authority having antitrust jurisdiction under Applicable Law; (v) not later than 60 days prior to the Closing, the Company and Parent filing any required notices to CMS, with a separate notice to the CMS Central and/or Regional Office Medicare Advantage and/or Part D plan manager if applicable; and (vi) the Company and Parent each promptly making any other Filing that may
 
77
 
 
be required under any Applicable Laws or by any Governmental Authority with jurisdiction over enforcement of any such Applicable Law.
(e)
 
To the extent permitted by Applicable Law, the Company and Parent shall, as promptly as practicable, (i) upon the reasonable request of the other party, furnish to such party and upon any reasonable request from a Governmental Authority, furnish to such Governmental Authority, any information or documentation concerning themselves, their Affiliates, directors, officers and securityholders, information or documentation concerning the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby and such other matters as may be requested and (ii) make available their respective personnel and advisers to each other and, upon reasonable request, any Governmental Authority, in connection with (A) the preparation of any Filing made by or on their behalf to any Governmental Authority in connection with the Merger or the other transactions contemplated hereby or (B) any investigation, review or approval process.
(f)
 
Subject to Applicable Laws relating to the sharing of information, each of the Company and Parent shall promptly notify the other of any Filing or material communication or inquiry it or any of its Affiliates intends to make with or receives from any Governmental Authority relating to the matters that are the subject of this Agreement, and prior to submitting any Filing, substantive written communication, correspondence or other information or response by such party or any or its Representatives, on the one hand, to any Governmental Authority, or members of the staff of any Governmental Authority, on the other hand, the submitting party shall permit the other party and its counsel the opportunity to review as reasonably in advance as practicable under the circumstances, and consider in good faith the comments of the other party in connection with any such Filing, communication or inquiry and further each of the Company and Parent shall furnish each other with a copy of any Filing, communication or, if in written form, inquiry, it or any of its Affiliates makes to or receives from any Governmental Authority relating to matters that are the subject of this Agreement. Subject to the terms and conditions of the Confidentiality Agreement, the Clean Team Confidentiality Agreement and all other agreements entered into by the parties to this Agreement, the Company and Parent shall coordinate and cooperate fully with each other in exchanging such information and providing such assistance as the other party may reasonably request in connection with the foregoing (including in seeking early termination of any applicable waiting periods under the HSR Act). Each such party shall promptly inform the other parties hereto of any material oral communication with, and provide copies of material written communications with, any Governmental Authority regarding any Filing. None of the parties hereto shall agree to participate in any substantive meeting or conference with any Governmental Authority, or any member of the staff of any Governmental Authority, in respect of any Filing, proceeding, investigation (including any settlement of the investigation), litigation, or other inquiry unless it consults with the other party in advance and, to the extent permitted by such Governmental Authority, allows the other party to participate.
 
78
 
 
Neither party shall be required to comply with any of the foregoing provisions of this Section 8.01(f) to the extent that such compliance would be prohibited by Applicable Law. The parties further covenant and agree not to voluntarily extend any waiting period associated with any consent or approval of any Governmental Authority (including under the HSR Act) or enter into any agreement with any Governmental Authority or other Third Party not to consummate the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby, except with the prior written consent of the other parties hereto. Parent shall have responsibility for the filing fees associated with its Form A Statements or similar change of control applications and its Form E or similar market share notifications.
(g)
 
Each of the Company and Parent may, as each deems advisable and necessary, reasonably designate any competitively sensitive material provided to the other under this Section 8.01 as Outside Counsel Only Material. Such materials and the information contained therein shall be given only to the outside counsel of the recipient and, subject to any additional confidentiality or joint defense agreement the parties may mutually propose and enter into, will not be disclosed by such outside counsel to employees, officers or directors of the recipient unless express permission is obtained in advance from the source of the materials (the Company or Parent, as the case may be) or its legal counsel. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 8.01, materials provided to the other party or its outside counsel may be redacted (i) to remove references concerning valuation, (ii) as necessary to comply with contractual arrangements and (iii) as necessary to address reasonable attorney-client or other privilege or confidentiality concerns.
(h)
 
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, in no event shall (i) Parent or its Affiliates or the Company or its Affiliates be required to agree to take or enter into any action which is not conditioned upon the Closing or (ii) the Company or its Affiliates agree to any obligation, restriction, requirement, limitation, qualification, condition, remedy or other action relating to consents or approvals required to be obtained by the parties or their respective Subsidiaries in connection with the Merger without the prior written consent of Parent.
Section 8.02 (a) Subject to Section 8.01(e), Section 8.01(f) and Section 8.01(g), the Company and Parent shall cooperate with one another (i) in connection with the preparation of the Company Proxy Statement and the Registration Statement, (ii) in determining whether any action by or in respect of, or filing with, any Governmental Authority is required, or any actions, consents, approvals or waivers are required to be obtained from parties to any material Contracts, in connection with the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and (iii) in taking such actions or making any such filings, furnishing information required in connection therewith or with the Company Proxy Statement or the Registration Statement and seeking timely to obtain any such actions, consents, approvals or waivers.
. Certain Filings; SEC Matters.
 
79
 
 
(b)
 
As promptly as reasonably practicable after the date of this Agreement, the Company shall prepare and file with the SEC the Company Proxy Statement and Parent shall prepare and file with the SEC the Registration Statement (in which the Company Proxy Statement shall be included as a prospectus). The Company and Parent shall use their respective reasonable best efforts to cause (x) the Company Proxy Statement and any amendments or supplements thereto, when filed, to comply as to form in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the 1934 Act and (y) the Registration Statement and any amendments or supplements thereto, when filed, to comply as to form in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act. The Company and Parent shall use their respective reasonable best efforts to have the Company Proxy Statement and the Registration Statement cleared by the SEC and the Registration Statement to become effective under the 1933 Act as promptly as practicable after each such filing and to have the Registration Statement remain effective as long as is necessary to consummate the Merger and the other transactions contemplated hereby. The Company shall use its reasonable best efforts to cause the Company Proxy Statement (and all other proxy materials for the Company Stockholder Meeting) to be mailed to its shareholders as promptly as practicable after the Registration Statement becomes effective. Subject to Section 6.03(b), Section 6.03(c), Section 6.03(d) and Section 6.03(e), the Company Proxy Statement shall include the Company Board Recommendation.
(c)
 
The Company and its counsel shall be given a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on the Registration Statement, and Parent and its counsel shall be given a reasonable opportunity to review and comment on the Company Proxy Statement, in each case before either such document (or any amendment thereto) is filed with the SEC, and reasonable and good faith consideration shall be given to any comments made by such party and its counsel. Each of Parent and the Company shall provide the other party and its counsel with
(x)
 
any comments or other communications, whether written or oral, that such party or its counsel may receive from time to time from the SEC or its staff with respect to the Company Proxy Statement or the Registration Statement, as applicable, promptly after receipt of those comments or other communications and (y) a reasonable opportunity to participate in the response to those comments and to provide comments on that response (to which reasonable and good faith consideration shall be given), including by participating in any discussions or meetings with the SEC.
(d)
 
If at any time prior to the Effective Time any information relating to the Company or Parent, or any of their respective Affiliates, directors or officers, should be discovered by the Company or Parent which should be set forth in an amendment or supplement to either the Company Proxy Statement or the Registration Statement so that either such document would not include any misstatement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, the party which discovers such information shall promptly
 
80
 
 
notify the other parties hereto and an appropriate amendment or supplement describing such information shall be promptly filed with the SEC and, to the extent required by Applicable Law, disseminated to the stockholders of the Company. The parties shall notify each other promptly of the receipt of any oral or written notice of the time when the Registration Statement has become effective or any supplement or amendment has been filed, the issuance of any stop order, the suspension of the qualification of the Parent Common Stock issuable in connection with the Merger for offering or sale in any jurisdiction, or any oral or written request by the SEC for amendment of the Company Proxy Statement or the Registration Statement or comments thereon and responses thereto and of any request by the SEC or the staff of the SEC for amendments or supplements to the Company Proxy Statement or the Registration Statement or for additional information and shall supply each other with copies of (i) all correspondence between it or any of its Representatives, on the one hand, and the SEC or the staff of the SEC, on the other hand, with respect to the Company Proxy Statement, the Registration Statement or the Merger and (ii) all orders of the SEC relating to the Registration Statement.
(e) Notwithstanding (x) any Adverse Recommendation Change, (y) the public proposal or announcement or other submission to the Company or any of its Representatives of an Acquisition Proposal or (z) anything in this Agreement to the contrary, unless this Agreement is terminated in accordance with its terms, the obligations of the Company under this Section 8.02 shall continue in full force and effect.
Section 8.03 The initial press release concerning this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby shall be a joint press release to be reasonably agreed upon by the Company and Parent. Following such initial press release, Parent and the Company shall consult with each other before issuing any additional press release, making any other public statement or scheduling any press conference, conference call or meeting with investors or analysts with respect to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby and, except as may be required by Applicable Law or any listing agreement with or rule of any national securities exchange or association, shall not issue any such press release, make any such other public statement or schedule any such press conference, conference call or meeting before such consultation; , , that the restrictions set forth in this Section 8.03 shall not apply to anyrelease or public statement (a) made or proposed to be made by the Company in compliance with Section 6.03 with respect to the matters contemplated by Section 6.03 or (b) in connection with any dispute between the parties regarding this Agreement, the Merger or the other transactions contemplated hereby.
. Public Announcements.
provided
however
 
Section 8.04 Each of the Company and Parent shall promptly notify the other of (a) any notice or other communication from any Person alleging that the consent of such Person is or may be required in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; (b) any notice
. Notices of Certain Events.
 
81
 
 
or other communication from any Governmental Authority in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; and (c) any actions, suits, claims, investigations or proceedings commenced or, to its knowledge, threatened against, relating to or involving or otherwise affecting the Company or any of its Subsidiaries or Parent and any of its Subsidiaries, as the case may be, that, if pending on the date of this Agreement, would have been required to have been disclosed pursuant to any Section of this Agreement or that relate to the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement; that the delivery of any notice pursuant to this Section 8.04 shall notlimit or otherwise affect the remedies available hereunder to the party receiving that notice.
provided,
however,
 
Section 8.05 Prior to the Effective Time, Parent and the Company shall take all such steps as may be required (to the extent permitted under Applicable Law) to cause any dispositions of Company Common Stock (including derivative securities with respect to Company Common Stock) or acquisitions of Parent Common Stock (including derivative securities with respect to Parent Common Stock) resulting from the transactions contemplated by this Agreement by each individual who is subject to the reporting requirements of Section 16(a) of the 1934 Act with respect to the Company, or will become subject to such reporting requirements with respect to Parent, to be exempt under Rule 16b-3 promulgated under the 1934 Act.
. Section 16 Matters.
ARTICLE 9
C M
ONDITIONS TO THE
ERGER
Section 9.01 The obligations of the Company, Parent and Merger Subsidiary to consummate the Merger are subject to the satisfaction (or, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law, waiver) of the following conditions:
. Conditions to the Obligations of Each Party.
(a)
 
the Company Stockholder Approval shall have been obtained in accordance with the Delaware Law;
(b)
 
no Applicable Law shall be in effect that enjoins, restrains, prevents, prohibits or makes illegal the consummation of the Merger;
(c)
 
the Registration Statement shall have been declared effective and no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall be in effect and no proceedings for such purpose shall be pending before or threatened by the SEC; and
(d)
 
the shares of Parent Common Stock to be issued in the Merger shall have been approved for listing on the NYSE, subject to official notice of issuance.
 
82
 
Section 9.02 The obligations of Parent and Merger Subsidiary to consummate theMerger are subject to the satisfaction (or, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law, waiver by Parent) of the following further conditions:
. Conditions to the Obligations of Parent and Merger
Subsidiary.
 
(a)
 
the Company shall have performed in all material respects all of its obligations hereunder required to be performed by it at or prior to the Effective Time;
(b)
 
(i) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 4.01 (other than the second sentence thereof), Section 4.02, Section 4.04(i), Section 4.06(b), Section 4.26, Section 4.27 and Section 4.28 shall be true and correct in all material respects at and as of the date of this Agreement and at and as of the Effective Time as if made at and as of such time (other than any such representations and warranties that by their terms address matters only as of another specified time, which shall be true and correct in all material respects only at and as of such time); (ii) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 4.05 shall be true and correct, subject only to exceptions, at and as of the date of this Agreement and at and as of the Effective Time as if made at and as of such time (other than any such representations and warranties that by their terms address matters only as of another specified time, which shall be true and correct, subject only to exceptions, only at and as of such time); (iii) the representation and warranty of the Company set forth in the first sentence of Section 4.13 shall be true and correct at and as of the date of this Agreement and at and as of the Effective Time as if made at and as of such time; and (iv) all other representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct (without regard to materiality or Material Adverse Effect qualifiers contained therein) at and as of the date of this Agreement and at and as of the Effective Time as if made at and as of such time (other than any such representations and warranties that by their terms address matters only as of another specified time, which shall be true and correct (without regard to materiality or Material Adverse Effect qualifiers contained therein) only at and as of such time), except, in the case of this clause (iv) only, where the failure of such representations and warranties to be so true and correct has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on the Company;
de minimis
de minimis
(c)
 
Parent shall have received a certificate from an executive officer of the Company confirming the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in Sections 9.02(a) and 9.02(b); and
(d)
 
both (i) the early termination or expiration of the waiting period required under the HSR Act shall have occurred and (ii) the Required Governmental Authorizations set forth in Section 9.03(d) of the Company Disclosure Schedule shall have been made or obtained and shall be in full force and effect and shall not impose any term or condition that would have or would
 
83
 
 
reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Regulatory Material Adverse Effect on Parent or the Company.
Section 9.03 The obligations of the Company to consummate the Merger are subject to the satisfaction (or, to the extent permissible, waiver by the Company) of the following further conditions:
. Conditions to the Obligations of the Company.
(a)
 
each of Parent and Merger Subsidiary shall have performed in all material respects all of its obligations hereunder required to be performed by it at or prior to the Effective Time;
(b)  
(i) the representations and warranties of Parent set forth in Section
5.1
 
(other than the second sentence thereof), Section 5.02, Section 5.04(i) and Section 5.17 shall be true and correct in all material respects at and as of the date of this Agreement and at and as of the Effective Time as if made at and as of such time (other than any such representations and warranties that by their terms address matters only as of another specified time, which shall be true and correct in all material respects only at and as of such time); (ii) the representations and warranties of Parent set forth in Section 5.05 shall be true and correct, subject only to exceptions, at and as of the date of this Agreement and at and as of the Effective Time as if made at and as of such time (other than any such representations and warranties that by their terms address matters only as of another specified time, which shall be true and correct, subject only to exceptions, only at and as of such time); (iii) the representation and warranty of Parent set forth in Section 5.11 shall be true and correct at and as of the date of this Agreement and at and as of the Effective Time as if made at and as of such time; and (iv) all other representations and warranties of Parent set forth in this Agreement shall be true and correct (without regard to materiality or Material Adverse Effect qualifiers contained therein) at and as of the date of this Agreement and at and as of the Effective Time as if made at and as of such time (other than any such representations and warranties that by their terms address matters only as of another specified time, which shall be true and correct (without regard to materiality or Material Adverse Effect qualifiers contained therein) only at and as of such time), except, in the case of this clause (iv) only, where the failure of such representations and warranties to be so true and correct has not had and would not reasonably be expected to have, individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Effect on Parent;
de minimis
de minimis
(c)
 
the Company shall have received a certificate from an executive officer of Parent confirming the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in Section 9.03(a) and Section 9.03(b); and
(d)
 
both (i) the early termination or expiration of the waiting period required under the HSR Act shall have occurred and (ii) the Required Governmental Authorizations set forth in Section 9.03(d) of the Company
 
84
 
 
Disclosure Schedule shall have been made or obtained and shall be in full force and effect.
ARTICLE 10
T
ERMINATION
Section 10.01 This Agreement may be terminated and the Merger may be abandoned at any time prior to the Effective Time (notwithstanding any approval and adoption of this Agreement by the stockholders of the Company):
. Termination.
(a)  
by mutual written agreement of the Company and Parent;
(b)  
by either the Company or Parent, if:
(i)
 
the Merger has not been consummated on or before August 19, 2013 (the ); , that if on August 19, 2013, the conditions to the Closing set forth in Section 9.02(d) or Section 9.03(d) shall not have been satisfied but all other conditions to the Closing shall have been satisfied (or in the case of conditions that by their terms are to be satisfied at the Closing, shall be capable of being satisfied on
End Date
provided
August 19, 2013), then the End Date shall be extended to and including November 19, 2013, if either the Company or Parent notifies the other party in writing on or prior to August 19, 2013, of its election to extend the End Date to November 19, 2013; , that the right to terminate or extend this Agreement pursuant to this Section 10.01(b)(i) shall not be available to any party whose breach of any provision of this Agreement results in the failure of the Merger to be consummated by such time; , that if the End Date shall be extended to and including November 19, 2013, and the Closing shall not have occurred on or before such date, before exercising the right to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this Section 10.01(b)(i) the Company or Parent, as applicable, shall, if requested by the other, consider in good faith agreeing (but shall not be obligated to agree) to a further extension of the End Date;
provided, further
and provided, further
(ii)
 
there shall be any Order in effect that enjoins, restrains, prevents, prohibits or makes illegal the consummation of the Merger and such Order shall have become final and non-appealable; or
(iii)
 
if Company Stockholder Approval shall not have been obtained upon a vote taken thereof at the Company Stockholder Meeting (including any adjournment or postponement thereon); or
(c)  
by Parent, if:
 
85
 
(i)
 
(A) an Adverse Recommendation Change shall have occurred or (B) the Board of Directors of the Company shall have failed to publicly confirm the Company Board Recommendation within seven Business Days of a written request by Parent that it do so;
(ii)
 
a breach of any representation or warranty or failure to perform any covenant or agreement on the part of the Company set forth in this Agreement shall have occurred that would cause any condition set forth in Section 9.02(a) or Section 9.02(b) not to be satisfied, and such breach or failure to perform (A) is incapable of being cured by the End Date or (B) has not been cured by the Company within 30 days following notice to the Company from Parent or Merger Subsidiary of such breach or failure to perform; or
(iii)
 
the Company shall have breached any of its obligations under Sections 6.02 or 6.03 in any material respect, other than in the case where (A) such breach is a result of an isolated action by a Representative of the Company (other than a director or officer of the Company), (B) such breach was not caused by, or within the knowledge of, the Company,
(C)
 
the Company takes appropriate actions to remedy such breach upon discovery thereof and (D) Parent is not significantly harmed as a result thereof; or
(d)  
by the Company:
(i)
 
if a breach of any representation or warranty or failure to perform any covenant or agreement on the part of Parent or Merger Subsidiary set forth in this Agreement shall have occurred that would cause any condition set forth in Section 9.03(a) or Section 9.03(b) not to be satisfied, and such breach or failure to perform (A) is incapable of being cured by the End Date or (B) has not been cured by Parent or Merger Subsidiary, as applicable, within 30 days following notice to Parent or Merger Subsidiary, as applicable, from the Company of such breach or failure to perform;
(ii)
 
prior to obtaining the Company Stockholder Approval, in order to enter into a definitive agreement providing for a Superior Proposal (which definitive agreement must be entered into concurrently with, or immediately following, the termination of this Agreement pursuant to this Section 10.01(d)(ii)) in accordance with, and subject to the terms and conditions of, Section 6.03; that, in advance of or concurrently with such termination, the Company pays to Parent the Termination Fee in accordance with Section 10.03(d); or
provided
(iii)
 
if (A) there shall be in effect any Order in respect of the matters contemplated by clauses (x) through (z) of the first sentence of
 
86
 
 
Section 8.01(b) that shall not have become final and non-appealable and that enjoins, restrains, prevents, prohibits or makes illegal consummation of the Merger, (B) within 30 days of such Order first being in effect, Parent shall not have instituted appropriate proceedings seeking to have such Order vacated, lifted, reversed, overturned or terminated and (C) such failure to institute appropriate proceedings shall not have been cured by Parent within 10 days following irrevocable written notice to Parent from the Company of the Companys intent to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this Section 10.01(d)(iii) in respect of such failure (which notice may not be given prior to the expiration of such 30-day period and, for the avoidance of doubt, shall not be effective if Parent institutes such appropriate proceedings within such 10-day period).
The party desiring to terminate this Agreement pursuant to this Section 10.01 (other than pursuant to Section 10.01(a)) shall give notice of such termination to the other party.
Section 10.02 If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 10.01, this Agreement shall become void and of no effect without liability of any party (or any stockholder, director, officer, employee, agent, consultant or Representative of such party) to the other party hereto (except as provided in Section 10.03); that neither Parent nor the Company shall be released from any liabilities or damages arising out of any (i) fraud by any party, (ii) the willful and intentional breach by any party of any representation or warranty on the part of such party set forth in this Agreement or (iii) the willful and intentional breach of any covenant or agreement set forth in this Agreement. The provisions of this Section 10.02, Section 10.03 and Article 11 (other than Section 11.13) shall survive any termination hereof pursuant to Section 10.01.
. Effect of Termination.
provided
Section 10.03 (a) In the event this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Sections 10.01(c)(i) or 10.01(c)(iii), then the Company shall pay Parent a fee of $167,500,000 (the ) within one Business Day after the date of such termination.
. Termination Fee.
Termination Fee
(b)
 
In the event this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 10.01(b)(iii) and an Adverse Recommendation Change shall have occurred, then the Company shall pay Parent the Termination Fee simultaneously with termination of the Agreement (in the case of a termination by the Company) or within one Business Day after the termination of the Agreement (in the case of a termination by Parent).
(c)
 
In the event this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 10.01(b)(iii) (but no Adverse Recommendation Change shall have occurred) and prior to the Company Stockholder Meeting an Acquisition Proposal shall have been publicly proposed, announced or disclosed and not irrevocably withdrawn, then (A) the Company shall pay Parent 25% of the Termination Fee
 
87
 
 
simultaneously with the termination of this Agreement (in the case of a termination by the Company) or within one Business Day after the termination of this Agreement (in the case of a termination by Parent) and (B) if the Company within 12 months after such termination either consummates an Acquisition Proposal or enters into a definitive agreement with respect to an Acquisition Proposal, then the Company shall pay or cause to be paid to Parent (or its designees) the remaining 75% of the Termination Fee simultaneously with such consummation or entering into such definitive agreement, as the case may be. For purposes of this Section 10.03(c), each reference to 20% in the definition of Acquisition Proposal shall be deemed to be a reference to 50%.
(d)
 
In the event that this Agreement is terminated by the Company pursuant to Section 10.01(d)(ii), then, in advance of or concurrently with such termination, the Company shall pay or cause to be paid to Parent the Termination Fee.
(e)
 
In the event this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 10.01(b)(i), Section 10.01(b)(ii) (solely in respect of an Order in respect of the matters contemplated by clauses (x) through (z) of the first sentence of Section 8.01(b)) or Section 10.01(d)(iii) and, at the time of such termination, (A) the condition set forth in Section 9.02(d) has not been satisfied and (B) the conditions set forth in Section 9.01 (other than the condition set forth in Section 9.01(b) solely in respect of an Applicable Law in respect of the matters contemplated by clauses (x) through (z) of the first sentence of Section 8.01(b)) and Section 9.02(a) through (c) have been satisfied (or in the case of conditions that by their nature are to be satisfied at the Closing, are capable of being satisfied if the Closing were to occur on the date of such termination), then Parent shall pay or cause to be paid $450,000,000 (the ) to the Company as promptly as reasonably practicable (and in any event within five Business Days following such termination); that no Reverse Termination Fee shall be payable by Parent pursuant to this Section 10.03(e) if the failure of the condition set forth in Section 9.02(d) to be satisfied is caused by the Companys willful and intentional breach of Section 8.01.
Reverse Termination Fee
provided
(f)
 
Any payment of the Termination Fee (or applicable portion thereof) or the Reverse Termination Fee shall be made by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account designated in writing by Parent or the Company, as applicable.
(g)
 
The parties agree and understand that (x) in no event shall the Company be required to pay the Termination Fee on more than one occasion (other than the allocation of the Termination Fee required by Section 10.03(c)) and in no event shall Parent and Merger Subsidiary be required to pay the Reverse Termination Fee on more than one occasion and (y) in no event shall Parent be entitled, pursuant to this Section 10.03, to receive an amount greater than the Termination Fee and in no event shall the Company be entitled, pursuant to this
 
88
 
 
Section 10.03, to receive an amount greater than the Reverse Termination Fee. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, except in the case of fraud, (i) if Parent receives the Termination Fee from the Company pursuant to this Section 10.03 or if the Company receives the Reverse Termination Fee from Parent or Merger Subsidiary pursuant to this Section 10.03, such payment shall be the sole and exclusive remedy of the receiving party against the paying party and its Subsidiaries and their respective former, current or future officers, directors, partners, stockholders, managers, members, Affiliates and Representatives and none of the paying party, any of its Subsidiaries or any of their respective former, current or future officers, directors, partners, stockholders, managers, members, Affiliates or Representatives shall have any further liability or obligation relating to or arising out of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby and (ii) if (A) Parent or Merger Subsidiary receives any payments from the Company in respect of any breach of this Agreement and thereafter Parent receives the Termination Fee pursuant to this Section 10.03 or (B) the Company receives any payments from Parent or Merger Subsidiary in respect of any breach of this Agreement and thereafter the Company receives the Reverse Termination Fee pursuant to this Section 10.03, the amount of such Termination Fee or Reverse Termination Fee, as applicable, shall be reduced by the aggregate amount of such payments made by the party paying the Termination Fee or Reverse Termination fee, as applicable, in respect of any such breaches. The parties acknowledge that the agreements contained in this Section 10.03 are an integral part of the transactions contemplated hereby, that, without these agreements, the parties would not enter into this Agreement and that any amounts payable pursuant to this Section 10.03 do not constitute a penalty. Accordingly, if any party fails to promptly pay any amount due pursuant to this Section 10.03, such party shall also pay any costs and expenses (including reasonable legal fees and expenses) incurred by the party entitled to such payment in connection with a legal action to enforce this Agreement that results in a judgment for such amount against the party failing to promptly pay such amount. Any amount not paid when due pursuant to this Section 10.03 shall bear interest from the date such amount is due until the date paid at a rate equal to the prime rate as published in , Eastern Edition in effect on the date of such payment.
The Wall Street
Journal
ARTICLE 11
M
ISCELLANEOUS
Section 11.01 All notices, requests and other communications to any party hereunder shall be in writing (including facsimile transmission) and shall be given,
. Notices.
 
89
 
 
if to Parent or Merger Subsidiary, to:
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, Connecticut 06156
with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP
450 Lexington Avenue
New York, New York 10017
H. Oliver Smith
if to the Company, to:
Coventry Health Care, Inc.
6270-B Rockledge Drive, Suite 700
Bethesda, Maryland 20817
with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz
51 West 52 Street
nd
New York, New York 10019
and
Bass, Berry & Sims PLC
150 Third Avenue South, Suite 2800
Nashville, Tennessee 37201
Angela Humphreys
or to such other address or facsimile number as such party may hereafter specify for the purpose by notice to the other parties hereto. All such notices, requests and other communications shall be deemed received on the date of receipt by the
 
90
 
recipient thereof if received prior to 5:00 p.m. on a Business Day in the place of receipt. Otherwise, any such notice, request or communication shall be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day in the place of receipt.
Section 11.02 The representations, warranties and agreements contained in this Agreement and in any certificate or other writing delivered pursuant hereto shall not survive the Effective Time, except for the agreements set forth in Section 7.03. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the parties agree that the terms of the Confidentiality Agreement shall survive any termination of this Agreement pursuant to Section 10.01 and, in the event of the termination of this Agreement pursuant to Section 10.01, all references to the date of this Agreement or the date hereof in the Confidentiality Agreement shall be deemed to be the date of such termination.
. Survival.
Section 11.03 (a) Any provision of this Agreement may be amended or waived prior to the Effective Time if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed, in the case of an amendment, by each party to this Agreement or, in the case of a waiver, by each party against whom the waiver is to be effective; that, after the Company Stockholder Approval has been obtained there shall be no amendment or waiver that would require the further approval of the stockholders of the Company under the Delaware Law without such approval having first been obtained.
. Amendments and Waivers.
provided
(b) No failure or delay by any party in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege. The rights and remedies in this Agreement provided shall be cumulative and not exclusive of any rights or remedies provided by Applicable Law.
Section 11.04 Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, all costs and expenses incurred in connection with this Agreement shall be paid by the party incurring such cost or expense.
. Expenses.
Section 11.05 (a) The parties hereto agree that each section or subsection of theCompany Disclosure Schedule or the Parent Disclosure Schedule, as applicable, shall be deemed to qualify the corresponding section or subsection of this Agreement, irrespective of whether or not any particular section or subsection of this Agreement specifically refers to the Company Disclosure Schedule or the Parent Disclosure Schedule, as applicable. The parties hereto further agree that (other than with respect to any items disclosed in Section 4.18(a) of the Company Disclosure Schedule, for which an explicit reference in any other section shall be required in order to apply to such other section) disclosure of any item, matter or event in any particular section or subsection of either the Company Disclosure Schedule or the Parent Disclosure Schedule shall be deemed disclosure with
. Disclosure Schedule References and SEC Document
References.
 
 
91
 
 
respect to any other section or subsection of the Company Disclosure Schedule or the Parent Disclosure Schedule, as applicable, to which the relevance of such disclosure would be reasonably apparent, notwithstanding the omission of a cross-reference to such other section or subsections.
(b) The parties hereto agree that in no event shall any disclosure contained in any part of any Company SEC Document or Parent SEC Document entitled Risk Factors, Cautionary Note Regarding Forward Looking Statements or Special Note Regarding Forward Looking Statements or containing a description or explanation of Forward-Looking Statements or any other disclosures in any Company SEC Document or Parent SEC Document that are cautionary, predictive or forward-looking in nature be deemed to be an exception to (or a disclosure for purposes of) any representations and warranties of any party contained in this Agreement.
Section 11.06 (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure solely to the benefit of the parties hereto, except for: (i) only following the Effective Time, the right of the Companys stockholders and holders of Company Stock Options, Company Restricted Shares and Company Stock Units, as applicable, to receive (w) the Merger Consideration in respect of shares of Company Common Stock pursuant to Section 2.02, (x) the consideration payable in respect of Company Stock Options pursuant to Section 2.05(a), (y) the consideration payable in respect of Company Restricted Shares pursuant to Section 2.05(a) and (z) the consideration payable in respect of Company Stock Units pursuant to Section 2.05(a), (ii) the right of the Company on behalf of its stockholders to pursue damages (including claims for damages based on loss of the economic benefits of the Merger to the Companys stockholders) in the event of Parents or Merger Subsidiarys wrongful termination of this Agreement or breach of this Agreement (whether or not this Agreement has been terminated pursuant to Section 10.01), which right is hereby expressly acknowledged and agreed by Parent and Merger Subsidiary and (iii) the right of the Indemnified Persons to enforce the provisions of Section 7.03 only, and except that any Financing Source shall be an express third-party beneficiary of Section 11.07, Section 11.08 and Section 11.09. The third-party beneficiary rights referenced in clause (ii) of the preceding sentence may be exercised only by the Company (on behalf of its stockholders as their agent) through actions expressly approved by the Board of Directors of the Company, and no stockholder of the Company whether purporting to act in its capacity as a stockholder or purporting to assert any right (derivatively or otherwise) on behalf of the Company, shall have any right or ability to exercise or cause the exercise of any such right.
. Binding Effect; Benefit; Assignment.
(b) No party may assign, delegate or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement without the prior written consent of each other party hereto, except that Parent or Merger Subsidiary may transfer or assign its rights and obligations under this Agreement, in whole or from time to time in
 
92
 
 
part, to (i) one or more of their Affiliates at any time and (ii) after the Effective Time, to any Person; that such transfer or assignment shall not relieve Parent or Merger Subsidiary of its obligations hereunder or enlarge, alter or change any obligation of any other party hereto or due to Parent or Merger Subsidiary.
provided
Section 11.07 This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to the conflicts of law rules of such state.
. Governing Law.
Section 11.08 Each of the parties hereto (i) irrevocably consents to the service of the summons and complaint and any other process in any action or proceeding relating to the transactions contemplated hereby, on behalf of itself or its property, in accordance with Section 11.01 or in such other manner as may be permitted by Applicable Law, of copies of such process to such party, and nothing in this Section 11.08 shall affect the right of any party to serve legal process in any other manner permitted by Applicable Law, (ii) irrevocably and unconditionally consents and submits itself and its property in any action or proceeding to the exclusive general jurisdiction of the Delaware Court of Chancery and any state appellate court therefrom within the State of Delaware (or, only if the Delaware Court of Chancery declines to accept jurisdiction over a particular matter, any state or federal court within the State of Delaware) in the event any dispute arises out of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby, or for recognition and enforcement of any judgment in respect thereof, (iii) agrees that it shall not attempt to deny or defeat such personal jurisdiction by motion or other request for leave from any such court, (iv) agrees that any actions or proceedings arising in connection with this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby shall be brought, tried and determined only in the Delaware Court of Chancery (or, only if the Delaware Court of Chancery declines to accept jurisdiction over a particular matter, any state or federal court within the State of Delaware), (v) waives any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the venue of any such action or proceeding in any such court or that such action or proceeding was brought in an inconvenient court and agrees not to plead or claim the same and (vi) agrees that it shall not bring any action relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby in any court other than the aforesaid courts. Each of Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company agrees that a final judgment in any action or proceeding in such court as provided above shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by Applicable Law.
. Jurisdiction/Venue.
Section 11.09. EACH PARTY ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT ANY CONTROVERSY WHICH MAY ARISE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT IS LIKELY TO INVOLVE COMPLICATED AND DIFFICULT ISSUES, AND THEREFORE EACH SUCH PARTY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY
. WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
93
 
 
WAIVES ANY RIGHT SUCH PARTY MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, THE MERGER OR THE OTHER TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY. EACH PARTY CERTIFIES AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT (i) NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER, (ii) EACH PARTY UNDERSTANDS AND HAS CONSIDERED THE IMPLICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER, (iii) EACH PARTY MAKES THIS WAIVER VOLUNTARILY AND (iv) EACH PARTY HAS BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 11.09.
Section 11.10 This Agreement may be signed in any number of counterparts, including by facsimile or by email with
. Counterparts; Effectiveness.
.pdf attachments, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument. This Agreement shall become effective when each party hereto shall have received a counterpart hereof signed and delivered (by electronic communication, facsimile or otherwise) by all of the other parties hereto. Until and unless each party has received a counterpart hereof signed by the other party hereto, this Agreement shall have no effect and no party shall have any right or obligation hereunder (whether by virtue of any other oral or written agreement or other communication).
Section 11.11 This Agreement, the Confidentiality Agreement, the Clean Team Confidentiality Agreement and the letter agreement, dated as of July 20, 2012, relating to certain confidentiality obligations constitute the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter thereof and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings, both oral and written, between the parties with respect to the subject matter thereof.
. Entire Agreement.
Section 11.12 If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Agreement is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other Governmental Authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated so long as the economic or legal substance of the transactions contemplated hereby is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party. Upon such a determination, the parties shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Agreement so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible in an acceptable manner in order that the transactions contemplated hereby be consummated as originally contemplated to the fullest extent possible.
. Severability.
 
94
 
Section 11.13 The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur if any provision of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with the terms hereof and that, except where this Agreement is terminated in accordance with Section 10.01, the parties shall be entitled to an injunction or injunctions to prevent breaches of this Agreement or to enforce specifically the performance of the terms and provisions hereof in the courts referred to in Section 11.08, without proof of actual damages (and each party further agrees to waive any requirement for the securing or posting of any bond in connection with such remedy) in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity.
. Specific Performance.
 
95
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 2.2
 
CONFIDENTIAL
 
August 19, 2012
 
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue
Hartford, CT  06156
 
 
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the  or ), has informed Goldman Sachs Bank USA (), UBS Loan Finance LLC () and UBS Securities LLC ( and, together with UBSLF, ) that the Borrower intends to acquire (the ) all the issued and outstanding equity interests in an entity previously identified to us and codenamed  (the and, together with its subsidiaries, the ) pursuant to an Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of the date hereof among the Borrower, Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., and the Acquired Company (together with the exhibits and schedules thereto, the ) for consideration consisting of shares of the Borrowers common stock and cash.  Capitalized terms used and not defined in this letter (together with Annexes A, B and C hereto, this ) have the meanings assigned to them in Annex B hereto.  Goldman Sachs, UBS and any other Lenders that become parties to this Commitment Letter as additional Commitment Parties as provided in Section 3 hereof are referred to herein, collectively, as the ,  or .
Borrower
you
Goldman Sachs
UBSLF
UBS Securities
UBS
Acquisition
Jaguar
Acquired Company
Acquired Business
Merger Agreement
Commitment Letter
Commitment Parties
we
us
 
You have informed us that the cash consideration payable in connection with the Acquisition and amounts required to pay expenses related to the Transactions will be obtained from the following sources:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
or, in the event the entire principal amount of the Notes has not been issued on or prior to the Closing Date, borrowings by the Borrower of term loans under a senior unsecured bridge facility having the terms set forth on Annex B hereto (the ) in an aggregate principal amount of $2,000,000,000 less the net cash proceeds received from the issuance of the Notes on or prior to the Closing Date.
Facility
 
 
In connection with the foregoing, (a) Goldman Sachs is pleased to commit, severally and not jointly, to provide 50% of the principal amount of the Facility, and UBSLF is pleased to commit, severally and not jointly, to provide 50% of the principal amount of the Facility, (b) Goldman Sachs and UBS Securities are pleased to confirm their agreement to act, and you hereby appoint Goldman Sachs and UBS Securities to act, as joint lead arrangers and joint bookrunners in connection with the Facility (in such capacities, the ), (c) Goldman Sachs is pleased to confirm its agreement to act, and you hereby appoint Goldman Sachs to act, as sole administrative agent for the Facility and (d) UBS Securities is pleased to confirm its agreement to act, and you hereby appoint UBS Securities to act, as sole syndication agent for the Facility, in each case on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter (as defined below); that, the amount of the Facility shall be automatically reduced as provided under Optional Commitment Reductions and Prepayments and Mandatory Commitment Reductions and Prepayments in Annex B hereto, and that any such reduction will be allocated among the commitments of Goldman Sachs, UBSLF and the additional Commitment Parties ratably or, in the event a Successful Syndication (as defined in the Fee Letter) shall not have been achieved during the Initial Syndication Period (as defined below), in the manner determined by the Arrangers in consultation with the Borrower (it being agreed that the commitments of Goldman Sachs and UBSLF will in any event be reduced by equal amounts).
Arrangers
provided
 
It is agreed that, except during the Initial Syndication Period as provided in the Syndication Plan (as defined below), (a) no other agents, co-agents, arrangers, co-arrangers or bookrunners will be appointed and no other titles will be awarded unless the Arrangers and the Borrower shall so agree, and (b) no compensation will be paid in connection with the Facility unless the Arrangers shall so agree.
 
The fees for, and other amounts to be paid in connection with, the commitments of Goldman Sachs and UBSLF hereunder and the services of Goldman Sachs and UBS related to the Facility are set forth in an Arranger Fee Letter (the ) being entered into by you, Goldman Sachs and UBS on the date hereof.
Fee Letter
 
 
Each of the Commitment Parties commitments and agreements hereunder are subject to (a) the execution and delivery of a credit agreement (the ) and other definitive documentation for the Facility prepared by counsel for Goldman Sachs and UBS and reasonably satisfactory to you and the Arrangers, reflecting the terms set forth or referred to in this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter (modified as provided in the Market Flex provisions of the Fee Letter, if applicable), and otherwise substantially consistent with the terms of the Existing Credit Agreement; and (b) the other conditions expressly set forth in Annex C hereto.
Credit Agreement
 
 
2
 
 
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the terms of the Credit Agreement will be such that they do not impair the availability of the Facility on the Closing Date if the conditions set forth in this Section 2 and in Annex C hereto are satisfied.
 
 
The Arrangers reserve the right, in accordance with the provisions of this Section 3, prior to or after the Closing Date, to syndicate the Facility to the Lenders.  During the period of 45 days following the date of this Commitment Letter (the ), the syndication of the Facility, including determinations as to the timing of offers to prospective Lenders, the selection of Lenders, the acceptance and final allocation of commitments, the awarding of titles or roles to any Lenders and the amounts offered and the compensation provided to each Lender from the amounts to be paid to the Arrangers pursuant to the terms of this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter, will be conducted jointly by the Arrangers and the Borrower and, except to the extent the Arrangers and the Borrower otherwise agree, in accordance with the syndication plan heretofore discussed by such parties (the ).  Without limiting the foregoing, the Facility will be syndicated during the Initial Syndication Period only to Lenders identified in the Syndication Plan ().  Following the Initial Syndication Period, if and for so long as a Successful Syndication has not been achieved, the syndication of the Facility shall be conducted by the Arrangers in consultation with the Borrower, and departures may be made from the Syndication Plan (including in the selection of Lenders) after consultation with the Borrower and to the extent required in the reasonable judgment of the Arrangers to achieve a Successful Syndication.  In connection with any commitments received from Designated Lenders selected in accordance with this paragraph (or other Lenders approved in writing by you), whether before or after the Initial Syndication Period (but prior to the execution and delivery of the Credit Agreement), you agree, at the request of the Arrangers, to enter into one or more customary joinder agreements providing for such additional Lenders to become additional Commitment Parties under this Commitment Letter and extend commitments in respect of the Facility directly to you (it being agreed that, subject to the second paragraph of Section 1, such joinder agreements will contain such provisions relating to titles, the allocation of any reductions in the amount of the Facility and other matters relating to the relative rights of the Arrangers and such additional Commitment Parties as the Arrangers may reasonably request, which provisions, in the case of any joinder agreement entered into during the Initial Syndication Period, will be consistent with the Syndication Plan).  The commitments of Goldman Sachs and UBSLF hereunder with respect to the Facility shall be reduced on a pro rata basis dollar-for-dollar by the amount of each commitment for the Facility received from a Designated Lender (or other Lender approved in writing by you) upon such Lender becoming a party to this Commitment Letter as an additional Commitment Party pursuant to a joinder agreement or a party to the Credit Agreement as a Lender.
Initial Syndication Period
Syndication Plan
Designated Lenders
 
You and the Arrangers agree to use commercially reasonable efforts to negotiate, execute and deliver the Credit Agreement (with the Lenders selected as provided in this Section 3 as parties thereto) as promptly as practicable and in any event within 60 days following the date of this Commitment Letter.
 
You agree to use your commercially reasonable efforts to ensure that the Arrangers syndication efforts benefit from your and your affiliates existing relationships with banks and other financial institutions.  To facilitate an orderly and successful syndication of the Facility, you agree that, until the earlier of (a) the achievement of a Successful Syndication and (b) 90 days following the date of initial funding under the Facility (such earlier date being called the ), you will not, and will not permit any of your subsidiaries to, and will use commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Acquired Business not to, syndicate or issue, attempt to syndicate or issue or announce or authorize the announcement of the syndication or issuance (or plans for the syndication or issuance) of, any debt or credit facility or any debt security of the Borrower or any of its subsidiaries or of the Acquired Business (other than (i) the Facility, (ii) the Notes, (iii) commercial paper financings, (iv) prior to the closing of the Acquisition, any
Syndication Date
 
 
3
 
 
indebtedness of the Acquired Business permitted to be incurred under the Merger Agreement and (v) Excluded Debt), without the prior written consent of the Arrangers (such consent to be withheld only if, in the reasonable  judgment of the Arrangers, such financing, syndication or placement would be likely to have a materially detrimental effect on the ability of the Arrangers to syndicate the Facility).  The Borrower agrees that until the Syndication Date it will cause any syndication or issuance of any Excluded Debt referred to in clause (a) or (c) of the definition of such term to be coordinated with the syndication of the Facility in a manner reasonably acceptable to the Borrower and the Arrangers.
 
The Arrangers and the Borrower intend to commence syndication efforts promptly after the execution and delivery of this Commitment Letter.  To assist the Arrangers in such syndication efforts, until the Syndication Date, you agree (a) to prepare and provide, and to use commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Acquired Business to prepare and provide, customary information with respect to the Borrower and its subsidiaries, the Acquired Business and the transactions contemplated hereby reasonably requested by the Arrangers in connection with the syndication of the Facility and (b) to cooperate, and to use commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Acquired Business to cooperate, with the Arrangers in connection with (i) the preparation of one or more information packages (collectively, the ) containing such information regarding the business, operations, assets, liabilities, financial position, pro forma financial statements, projections and prospects of the Borrower and its subsidiaries, the Acquired Business and the transactions contemplated hereby as shall be reasonably deemed necessary by the Arrangers to complete the syndication of the Facility, (ii) the presentation of one or more information packages reasonably acceptable in format and content to the Arrangers (collectively, the ) in a reasonable number of meetings and other communications with prospective Lenders in connection with the syndication of the Facility at times to be mutually agreed and upon reasonable notice (including through direct contact between senior management and representatives, with appropriate seniority and expertise, of the Borrower and prospective Lenders and participation of such persons in a reasonable number of meetings with prospective Lenders) and (iii) the obtaining as promptly as practicable, and in any event prior to the commencement of the general syndication of the Facility, of a public rating of the Borrowers Index Debt from Moodys Investor Services, Inc. () and a public rating of the Borrowers Index Debt from Standard & Poors Ratings Group, a division of The McGraw Hill Corporation (), in each case taking into account the Transactions.  You will be solely responsible for the contents of the Confidential Information Memorandum, the Lender Presentation and all other information, documentation or other materials delivered to the Arrangers in connection therewith, and acknowledge that the Arrangers will be using and relying upon such information without independent verification thereof.
Confidential Information Memorandum
Lender Presentation
Moodys
S&P
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Commitment Letter or the Fee Letter or any other agreement, the completion of any syndication of the Facility shall in no event constitute a condition precedent to the commitments hereunder or the funding of the Facility on the Closing Date.
 
You agree that information regarding the Facility and the Information provided by or on behalf of the Borrower, the Acquired Business or their respective affiliates to the Arrangers in connection with the Facility or the other transactions contemplated hereby (including draft and execution versions of the Credit Agreement, the Confidential Information Memorandum, the Lender Presentation, publicly filed financial statements, and draft or final offering materials relating to contemporaneous or prior securities issuances by the Borrower) may be disseminated to prospective Lenders and other persons through one or more internet sites (including an IntraLinks, SyndTrak or other electronic workspace (the )) created for purposes of syndicating the Facility or otherwise, in accordance with the Arrangers standard syndication practices, and you acknowledge that neither the Arrangers nor any of their affiliates will be responsible or liable to you or any other person or entity for damages arising from the use by others of any Information or other materials obtained on the Platform.
Platform
 
 
4
 
 
You acknowledge that certain of the Lenders may be public side Lenders that do not wish to receive material non-public information within the meaning of federal, state or other applicable securities laws with respect to the Borrower, the Acquired Business, their respective affiliates or any securities of any of the foregoing (such information being called  and each such Lender being called a ).  At the request of the Arrangers, you agree to prepare, and to use your commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Acquired Business to assist in the preparation of, an additional version of the Confidential Information Memorandum and the Lender Presentation to be used by Public Lenders that does not contain MNPI.  It is understood that, in connection with your assistance described above, you will provide, and cause all other applicable persons to provide, authorization letters to the Arrangers authorizing the distribution of the Information to prospective Lenders and containing a representation to the Arrangers that such versions of the Confidential Information Memorandum and the Lender Presentation do not contain MNPI.  In addition, you agree clearly to designate as such all Information provided to the Arrangers by or on behalf of the Borrower, the Acquired Business or their respective affiliates that is suitable to make available to Public Lenders (it being agreed that distribution of any Information that is not so identified may be restricted by the Arrangers to Lenders that are not Public Lenders).  You acknowledge and agree that the following documents may, after you shall have been given a reasonable opportunity to review them, be distributed to Public Lenders (unless you notify the Arrangers in writing prior to such distribution that any such document contains MNPI, in which case, for so long as a Successful Syndication has not been achieved, you will take such action as shall be reasonably requested by the Arrangers to permit such documents to be distributed to Public Lenders, if any, in connection with their efforts to syndicate the Facility): (a) drafts and final versions of the Credit Agreement, (b) administrative materials prepared by the Arrangers for prospective Lenders (such as a lender meeting invitation, allocations and funding and closing memoranda) and (c) term sheets and notification of changes in the terms and conditions of the Facility.
MNPI
Public Lender
 
 
You represent and covenant that (a) all information (other than financial projections and other forward-looking information and information of a general economic or industry nature) (the ) provided by or on behalf of the Borrower or its representatives to the Commitment Parties or the Lenders in written form or in any Lender presentation or due diligence session in connection with the Facility (including, for the avoidance of doubt, all Information set forth in the Confidential Information Memorandum) does not and will not, when furnished, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements contained therein not materially misleading when taken as a whole and in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made (giving effect to any supplements then or theretofore furnished) and (b) the financial projections provided by or on behalf of the Borrower or its representatives to the Commitment Parties or the Lenders in connection with the Facility have been and will be prepared in good faith based upon assumptions that are believed by the Borrower to be reasonable at the time such financial projections are furnished to the Commitment Parties or the Lenders, it being understood and agreed that financial projections are not a guarantee of financial performance and are subject to significant uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond the Borrowers and/or the Acquired Business control, that no assurance can be given that such financial projections will be realized, that actual results may differ from financial projections and that such differences may be material; that, prior to the consummation of the Acquisition, such representation with respect to any Information relating to the Acquired Business or its affiliates is made only to the best of your knowledge.  You agree that if at any time prior to the later of (i) the Closing Date and (ii) the Syndication Date, any of the representations in the preceding sentence would be incorrect if such Information or such financial projections were being furnished, and such representations were being made, at such time, then you will (or with respect to Information or financial projections relating to the Acquired Business, you will use commercially reasonable efforts to) promptly supplement, or cause to be supplemented, such Information or such financial projections so that such representations will be correct
Information
provided
 
 
5
 
 
under those circumstances.  In arranging and syndicating the Facility, the Arrangers will be entitled to use and rely on the Information and the financial projections without responsibility for independent verification thereof, and you acknowledge and agree that the Arrangers will have no obligation to conduct any independent evaluation or appraisal of the assets or liabilities of the Borrower, the Acquired Business or any other person or to advise or opine on any related solvency issues.
 
 
In connection with arrangements such as this, it is the policy of the Commitment Parties to receive indemnification.  You agree to the provisions with respect to our indemnity and other matters set forth in Annex A, which is incorporated by reference into this Commitment Letter.
 
 
This Commitment Letter may not be assigned by you without the prior written consent of the Arrangers (and any purported assignment without such consent will be null and void) and, except as set forth in Annex A hereto, is intended to be solely for the benefit of the parties hereto and is not intended to confer any benefits upon, or create any rights in favor of or be enforceable by or at the request of, any person other than the parties hereto.  Any Commitment Party may assign its commitment and agreements hereunder, in whole or in part, to any of its affiliates and, in the case of Goldman Sachs and UBSLF, as part of the syndication of the Facility, subject to the provisions of Section 3 hereof, to any Lender; that, except as contemplated by Section 3 hereof or as otherwise agreed in writing by the Borrower, in the event that, notwithstanding the satisfaction of all applicable conditions to funding, any Lender (other than a Designated Lender or another Lender approved in writing by the Borrower) shall default on its obligation to fund its commitment in respect of the Facility on the Closing Date, each of Goldman Sachs and UBSLF shall remain severally obligated to assume its ratable share of the unfunded commitment of such Lender and to fund such share of such commitment.
provided
 
 
Please note that this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter, the terms hereof and thereof and any written communications provided by, or oral discussions with, the Arrangers in connection with this arrangement are exclusively for your information and may not be disclosed by you to any other person or circulated or referred to publicly without the prior written consent of the Arrangers; that we hereby consent to your disclosure of (a) this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter, the terms hereof and thereof and such communications and discussions (i) to your officers, directors, employees, partners, agents and advisors (other than financial advisors) who are directly involved in the consideration of the Facility and who have been advised by you of the confidential nature of such information or (ii) pursuant to a subpoena or order issued by a court or by judicial, administrative or legislative body or committee, or as otherwise required by applicable law or compulsory legal process (in which case you agree to inform the Arrangers promptly thereof to the extent not prohibited by law) or required or requested by governmental and/or regulatory authorities, (b) this Commitment Letter and the terms hereof, and a version of the Fee Letter that shall have been redacted in a manner reasonably acceptable to the Arrangers (but not any of the other terms of the Fee Letter), to the Acquired Company, so long as it shall have agreed to treat such information confidentially, and to the Acquired Companys officers, directors, employees, partners, agents and advisors who are directly involved in the consideration of the Facility and who have been advised of the confidential nature of such information, (c) information regarding the Facility (but not the Fee Letter or the terms thereof) in any prospectus or other offering memorandum relating to the offering of the Notes or any filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission or any other governmental authority in connection with the Acquisition (, that the Borrower may include the aggregate amount  payable as fees under the Fee Letter as part of aggregate transaction expenses in a customary sources and uses
provided
provided
 
 
6
 
 
disclosure in any such filing) and (d) information regarding the Facility and the related transactions (but not the Fee Letter or the terms thereof) to Moodys and S&P on a confidential basis after consultation with the Arrangers.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, following your acceptance hereof, the Commitment Letter (but not the Fee Letter) may be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, and thereafter the foregoing restrictions on the disclosure of the Commitment Letter shall no longer apply.
 
Each Commitment Party will treat as confidential all confidential information provided to it by or on behalf of the Borrower or the Acquired Business hereunder; , that nothing herein shall prevent the Commitment Parties from disclosing any such information (i) to any Lenders or participants or prospective Lenders or participants or to any direct or indirect contractual counterparties to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower or its obligations under the Facility (collectively, ), (ii) to its affiliates and its and their respective officers, directors, members, partners, agents, advisors, employees and representatives on a confidential and need-to-know basis, (iii) pursuant to a subpoena or order issued by a court or by a judicial, administrative or legislative body or committee, or as otherwise required by applicable law or compulsory legal process or required or requested by governmental and/or regulatory authorities, including any self-regulatory organization (in which case such Commitment Party agrees to inform the Borrower promptly thereof to the extent not prohibited by law, except to the extent in connection with a request from a regulatory authority having jurisdiction over it or its affiliates), (iv) as requested by any state, federal or foreign authority or examiner regulating banks or banking or otherwise having jurisdiction over such Commitment Party or its affiliates, (v) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Commitment Letter or the Fee Letter, or enforcement hereof or thereof, or the assertion of any due diligence defense, (vi) to the extent such confidential information is publicly available or becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this provision, (vii) provided to it from a source, other than the Borrower, the Acquired Business or their respective affiliates, which is not to such Commitment Partys knowledge subject to any confidentiality or fiduciary obligation to the Borrower or the Acquired Business with respect to such information, (viii) to Moodys and S&P and other rating agencies or to market data collectors or similar service providers to the lending industry and service providers to the Arrangers and the Lenders in connection with the administration and management of the Facility; that such information is limited to Annex B and Annex C hereto and is supplied only on a confidential basis, and (ix) to the extent that such information was already in the Commitment Parties possession (other than as a result of any Commitment Party being provided such information by or on behalf of the Borrower or the Acquired Business hereunder) or is independently developed by the Commitment Parties; , that the disclosure of any such information to any Lenders or prospective Lenders or participants or prospective participants or Specified Counterparties referred to above shall be made subject to the acknowledgment and acceptance by such Lender or prospective Lender or participant or prospective participant or Specified Counterparty that such information is being disseminated on a confidential basis in accordance with the standard syndication process of the Arrangers or customary market standards for dissemination of such types of information, subject to customary confidentiality restrictions that are no less restrictive in any material respect than those in this paragraph;and , , that the foregoing obligations of the Commitment Parties shall remain in effect until the earlier of (i) 18 months from the date hereof and (ii) the execution and delivery of the Credit Agreement by the parties thereto, at which time any confidentiality undertaking in the Credit Agreement shall supersede the provisions in this paragraph.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, following your filing of the Commitment Letter with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the foregoing restrictions shall no longer apply insofar (and only insofar) as they relate to the disclosure of this Commitment Letter and the terms hereof.
provided
Specified Counterparties
provided
provided
 
provided
further
 
 
As you know, each of the Arrangers (together with their affiliates, the ), is a full service financial institution engaged, either directly or through its affiliates, in a broad array of activities,
Arranger Parties
 
 
7
 
 
including commercial and investment banking, financial advisory, market making and trading, investment management (both public and private investing), investment research, principal investment, financial planning, benefits counseling, risk management, hedging, financing, brokerage and other financial and non-financial activities and services globally.  In the ordinary course of their various business activities, each of the Arranger Parties and funds or other entities or persons in which each of the Arranger Parties co-invests may at any time purchase, sell, hold or vote long or short positions and investments in securities, derivatives, loans, commodities, currencies, credit default swaps and other financial instruments for their own account and for the accounts of their customers. In addition, each of the Arranger Parties may at any time communicate independent recommendations and/or publish or express independent research views in respect of such assets, securities or instruments.  Any of the aforementioned activities may involve or relate to assets, securities and/or instruments of the Borrower, the Acquired Business, their respective affiliates and other entities and persons that may be involved in transactions arising from or relating to the arrangement contemplated by this Commitment Letter or have other relationships with the Borrower, the Acquired Business or their respective affiliates.  In addition, each of the Arranger Parties may provide investment banking, commercial banking, underwriting and financial advisory services to such other entities and persons.  The arrangement contemplated by this Commitment Letter may have a direct or indirect impact on the investments, securities or instruments referred to in this paragraph, and employees working on the financing contemplated hereby may have been involved in originating certain of such investments and those employees may receive credit internally therefor.  Although the Arranger Parties in the course of such other activities and relationships may acquire information about the transactions contemplated by this Commitment Letter or other entities and persons that may be the subject of the financing contemplated by this Commitment Letter, none of the Arranger Parties shall have any obligation to disclose such information, or the fact that such Arranger Party is in possession of such information, to you or any of your affiliates or to use such information on your or your affiliates behalf.
 
Consistent with the policies of each of the Arranger Parties to hold in confidence the affairs of its customers, neither of the Arranger Parties will furnish confidential information obtained from you by virtue of the transactions contemplated by this Commitment Letter to any of its other customers.  Furthermore, you acknowledge that the Arranger Parties and their respective affiliates have no obligation to use in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Commitment Letter, or to furnish to you, confidential information obtained or that may be obtained by them from any other person.
 
Each of the Arranger Parties may have economic interests that conflict with yours or those of your equityholders or affiliates.  You agree that each of the Arranger Parties will act under this Commitment Letter as an independent contractor and that nothing in this Commitment Letter or the Fee Letter or otherwise will be deemed to create an advisory, fiduciary or agency relationship or fiduciary or other implied duty between either Arranger Party, on the one hand, and you or your equityholders or affiliates, on the other hand with respect to the financing transactions contemplated hereby.  You acknowledge and agree that the financing transactions contemplated by this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter (including the exercise of rights and remedies hereunder and thereunder) are arms-length commercial transactions between each of the Arranger Parties, on the one hand, and you, on the other, and in connection therewith and with the process leading thereto, (a) neither of the Arranger Parties has assumed advisory or fiduciary responsibilities in favor of you or your equityholders or affiliates with respect to the financing transactions contemplated hereby (or the exercise of rights or remedies with respect thereto) or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether any Arranger Party has advised, is currently advising or will advise you or your equityholders or affiliates on other matters) or any other obligation to you, except the obligations expressly set forth in this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter and (b) each of the Arranger Parties is acting solely as a principal and not as an agent or fiduciary of you or your management, equityholders, affiliates, creditors or any other person in connection with the financing transactions contemplated by this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter.  You acknowledge and agree
 
 
8
 
 
that you have consulted your own legal and financial advisors to the extent you deemed appropriate and that you are responsible for making your own independent judgment with respect to such financing transactions and the process leading thereto.  You agree that you will not claim that either of the Arranger Parties has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to you, in connection with such financing transactions or the process leading thereto.  As you know, Goldman Sachs and UBS Securities have been retained by you as financial advisors (in such capacity, the ) in connection with the Acquisition.  You agree not to assert any claim you might allege based on any actual or potential conflicts of interest that might be asserted to arise or result from, on the one hand, the engagement of the Financial Advisors and, on the other hand, the Arranger Parties and their affiliates relationships with you as described and referred to herein.  In addition, the Arranger Parties may employ the services of their affiliates in providing services and/or performing their obligations hereunder and may exchange with such affiliates information concerning the Borrower, the Acquired Business and other entities or persons that may be the subject of this arrangement, and such affiliates will be entitled to the benefits afforded to the Arranger Parties hereunder.
Financial Advisors
 
In addition, please note that the Arranger Parties do not provide accounting, tax or legal advice.
 
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Borrower (and each employee, representative or other agent of the Borrower) may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, the tax treatment and tax structure of the Facility and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to the Borrower relating to such tax treatment and tax structure.  However, any information relating to the tax treatment or tax structure will remain subject to the confidentiality provisions hereof (and the foregoing sentence will not apply) to the extent reasonably necessary to enable the parties hereto, their respective affiliates and their respective affiliates directors and employees to comply with applicable securities laws.  For this purpose, tax treatment means U.S. federal or state income tax treatment, and tax structure is limited to any facts relevant to the U.S. federal income tax treatment of the transactions contemplated by this Commitment Letter but does not include information relating to the identity of the parties hereto or any of their respective affiliates.
 
 
The Commitment Parties commitments and agreements hereunder will automatically terminate upon the first to occur of (a) the consummation of the Acquisition, (b) the termination of the Merger Agreement or the public announcement by you of your intention not to proceed with the Acquisition, (c) the execution of the Credit Agreement by the parties thereto and (d) August 19, 2013 or, if the End Date referred to in the Merger Agreement is extended to a later date as provided in Section 10.01(b)(i) of the Merger Agreement, such later date (but in any event no later than November 19, 2013) (the date referred to in this clause (d) being called the ).
End Date
 
The provisions set forth under Sections 5 (including Annex A), 7 and 8 hereof and this Section 9 and the provisions of the Fee Letter will remain in full force and effect notwithstanding the expiration or termination of this Commitment Letter or the commitments and agreements hereunder; that your  and our obligations under this Commitment Letter (other than those under Sections 3, 4, 7 (solely as it relates to restrictions on your disclosure of the Fee Letter), 8 and, to the extent applicable, this Section 9 and the provisions of the Fee Letter, all of which shall survive), shall automatically terminate and be of no further force and effect (and, if applicable, shall be superseded by the Credit Agreement) on the date the Credit Agreement is executed, and you and we shall be automatically released from all liability hereunder in connection therewith at such time (, that Section 5 (including Annex A) will so terminate and be superseded only to the extent the Credit Agreement contains provisions affording the Commitment Parties rights to expense reimbursement and indemnity not less comprehensive than those provided for in such Section 5).
provided
provided
 
 
9
 
 
  
Each party hereto agrees, for itself and its affiliates, that any suit, action or proceeding arising in respect of this Commitment Letter or the Commitment Parties commitments or agreements hereunder or the Fee Letter brought by it or any of its affiliates shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in any Federal court of the United States of America sitting in the Borough of Manhattan or, if that court does not have subject matter jurisdiction, in any state court located in the City and County of New York.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of, and to venue in, such court and irrevocably and unconditionally waives any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising in respect of this Commitment Letter or the Commitment Parties commitments or agreements hereunder or the Fee Letter in any such court and any defense of any inconvenient forum to the maintenance of any such suit, action or proceeding in any such court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such suit, action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Service of any process, summons, notice or document by registered mail or overnight courier addressed to any of the parties hereto at the addresses above (and, in the case of service upon the Borrower, with a copy delivered by registered mail or overnight courier addressed to Aetna Inc., 151 Farmington Avenue, Hartford, CT  06156, Attention:  General Counsel) shall be effective service of process against such party for any such suit, action or proceeding brought in any court.
Any right to trial by jury with respect to any suit, action or proceeding arising in connection with or as a result of either the Commitment Parties commitments or agreements hereunder or the Fee Letter or any matter referred to in this Commitment Letter or the Fee Letter is hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waived by the parties hereto.  This Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York without regard to principles of conflicts of laws;
provided
that (a) the interpretation of the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect and whether there shall have occurred an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect, (b) whether the Acquisition has been consummated as contemplated by the Merger Agreement and (c) whether the representations and warranties made by the Acquired Company in the Merger Agreement are accurate and whether as a result of any inaccuracy thereof the Borrower has the right to terminate its obligations under the Merger Agreement or not to consummate the Acquisition, shall be determined in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware without regard to principles of conflicts of laws that would result in the application of the laws of another jurisdiction.
 
The Arrangers hereby notify you that pursuant to the requirements of the USA PATRIOT Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ) the Arrangers and each Lender may be required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow the Arrangers and each Lender to identify the Borrower in accordance with the Patriot Act.  This notice is given in accordance with the requirements of the Patriot Act and is effective for the Arrangers and each Lender.
Patriot Act
 
This Commitment Letter may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when executed will be an original, and all of which, when taken together, will constitute one agreement.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Commitment Letter by facsimile transmission or electronic transmission (in pdf format) will be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.  This Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter are the only agreements that have been entered into among the parties hereto with respect to the Facility and set forth the entire understanding of the parties hereto with respect thereto and supersede any prior written or oral agreements between the parties hereto with respect to the Facility.  This Commitment Letter may not be amended, and no term or provision hereof may be waived or modified, except by an instrument in writing signed by each of the parties hereto; provided, that any amendment, waiver or modification that affects only the rights or obligations of Goldman Sachs and UBS may be effected by the Borrower and Goldman Sachs and UBS without the
 
 
10
 
 
consent of any other Commitment Party.  The Fee Letter may not be amended, and no term or provision thereof may be waived or modified, except by an instrument in writing signed by each of the parties thereto.
 
 
 
11
 
 
Please confirm that the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding by signing and returning to the Arrangers the enclosed copy of this Commitment Letter, together, if not previously executed and delivered, with the Fee Letter, on or before the close of business on August 20, 2012, whereupon this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter will become binding agreements between Goldman Sachs, UBS and you.  If this Commitment Letter and the Fee Letter have not been signed and returned as described in the preceding sentence by such date, this offer will terminate on such date.  We look forward to working with you on this transaction.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
12
 
ACCEPTED AND AGREED AS OF
THE DATE FIRST SET FORTH ABOVE:
 
 
 
 
13
 
 
 
In the event that
any Commitment Party
becomes involved in any capacity in any action, proceeding or investigation brought by or against any person, including you, the Acquired Business or any of your or its equityholders, affiliates or creditors, in connection with or as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Commitment Letter or the Fee Letter (together, the 
Letters
), you agree to periodically reimburse such Commitment Party for its reasonable out-of-pocket legal and other out-of-pocket expenses (including the cost of any investigation and preparation) incurred in connection therewith.  You also agree to indemnify and hold each Indemnified Person (as defined below) harmless against any and all losses, claims, damages or liabilities to any person, including you, the Acquired Business or any of your or its equityholders or affiliates, arising out of any investigation, litigation, claim or proceeding in connection with or as a result of the transactions contemplated by the Letters
(whether or not such investigation, litigation, claim or proceeding is brought by you, the Acquired Business or any of your or its equityholders, affiliates or creditors or any Indemnified Person and whether or not any Indemnified Person is otherwise a party thereto)
, except to the extent that (and only for so long as) such loss, claim, damage or liability has been found by a judgment of the highest court of competent jurisdiction to have considered such matter to have resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnified Person (or any of its controlling persons or subsidiaries of controlling persons or any of their or such Indemnified Persons partners, members, directors, agents, employees or controlling persons) in performing the services that are the subject of the Letters, or the material breach of the material agreements of such Indemnified Person set forth in one or both of the Letters.  If for any reason the foregoing indemnification is unavailable to an Indemnified Person or insufficient to hold it harmless, then you will contribute to the amount paid or payable by such Indemnified Person as a result of such loss, claim, damage or liability in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect (a) the relative economic interests of (i) you, the Acquired Business and your and its equityholders and affiliates, on the one hand, and (ii) such Indemnified Person, on the other, in the matters contemplated by the Letters, and (b) if and to the extent the allocation provided for in the immediately preceding clause (a) is for any reason held to be unenforceable, the relative fault of (1) you, the Acquired Business and your and its equityholders and affiliates, on the one hand, and (2) such Indemnified Person, on the other, with respect to such loss, claim, damage or liability and any other relevant equitable considerations.  Your reimbursement, indemnity and contribution obligations under this paragraph shall be in addition to any liability or obligation that you may otherwise have, shall extend upon the same terms and conditions to each affiliate of each Commitment Party and the partners, members, directors, agents, employees and controlling persons and subsidiaries of such controlling persons, as the case may be, of such Commitment Party and each such affiliate,
and will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of any successors, assigns, heirs and personal representatives of you, such Commitment Party, each such affiliate and any such person (collectively, the 
Indemnified Persons
).  You also agree that none of the Indemnified Persons will have
any liability to you or any person asserting claims on behalf of or in right of you in connection with or as a result of either this arrangement or any matter referred to in the Letters, except, in the case of any such liability to you, solely to the extent that (and only for so long as) any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses incurred by you have been found by a judgment the highest court of competent jurisdiction to have considered such matter to have resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnified Person (or any of its controlling persons or subsidiaries of controlling persons or any of their or such Indemnified Persons partners, members, directors, agents, employees or controlling persons) in performing the services that are the subject of the Letters, or the material breach of the material agreements of such Indemnified Person set forth in the Letters;
provided
that in no event will you or any Indemnified Person have any liability for any indirect, consequential, special or punitive damages in connection with or as a result of the transactions contemplated by the Letters (it being agreed, however, that your indemnity and contribution obligations, as set forth in the preceding provisions of this Annex A, will apply in respect of any indirect, consequential, special or punitive
 
 
 
 
 
damages that may be awarded against any Indemnified Person).  
The provisions of this Annex A will survive any termination or completion of the arrangement provided by the Letters.
provided,
Notwithstanding the foregoing, (x) the Borrowers obligation to reimburse legal expenses shall, in connection with any one action or proceeding or separate but substantially similar actions or proceedings arising out of the same general allegations, be limited to the fees, charges and disbursements of one counsel for all Indemnified Persons (and, if reasonably necessary, one local counsel plus one specialist counsel in, respectively, any relevant jurisdiction or applicable specialty), which, if the Arrangers or their affiliates shall be parties or potential parties to any such action or proceeding, shall be selected by the Arrangers, and, solely in the case of an actual or potential conflict of interest affecting any Indemnified Person or Indemnified Persons, of one additional counsel (and if reasonably necessary, one local counsel plus one specialist counsel in, respectively, any relevant jurisdiction or applicable specialty) for the affected Indemnified Person or Indemnified Persons and (y) to the extent that it is found by a judgment of the highest court of competent jurisdiction to have considered such matter that an Indemnified Person is not entitled to indemnification because such loss, claim, damage or liability resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnified Person (or any of its controlling persons or subsidiaries of controlling persons or any of their or such Indemnified Persons partners, members, directors, agents, employees or controlling persons) in performing the services that are the subject of the Letters, or the material breach of the material agreements of such Indemnified Person set forth in one or both of the Letters, then such Indemnified Person will refund to the Borrower any portion of the reimbursed amounts that is attributable to expenses incurred in relation to the act or omission of such Indemnified Person which is the subject of such finding;
that any amount so refunded shall be returned by the Borrower if such finding is overturned by a higher court.
 
 
2
 
ANNEX B
CONFIDENTIAL
 
This Summary outlines certain terms of the Facility referred to in the Commitment Letter, of which this Annex B is a part.  Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Annex B have the meanings given thereto in the Commitment Letter.
 
 
 
 
Annex B-1
 
 
 
 
 
 
Annex B-2
 
 
 
 
 
Annex B-3
 
 
 
 
 
Annex B-4
 
 
 
 
 
Annex B-5
 
 
 
 
 
Annex B-6
 
SCHEDULE I TO ANNEX B
CONFIDENTIAL
 
 
 
 
Annex B-7
 
 
 
 
 
 
Annex B-8
 
ANNEX C
 
This Summary outlines certain of the conditions precedent to the Facility referred to in the Commitment Letter, of which this Annex C is a part.  Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Annex C have the meanings given thereto in the Commitment Letter.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Annex C-1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Annex C-2
 
 
 
 means (i) any event, change, effect, development or occurrence that has a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business or results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, other than any event, change, effect, development or occurrence to the extent resulting from (A) any changes in general United States or global economic conditions, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, (B) any changes in conditions generally affecting the healthcare, health insurance or managed care industry or any other industry in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries operate, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, (C) any decline, in and of itself, in the market price or trading volume of the Companys common stock (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such decline that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (D) any changes in regulatory, legislative or political conditions or in securities, credit, financial, debt or other capital markets, in each case in the United States or any foreign jurisdiction, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes or conditions have on other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, (E) any failure, in and of itself, by the Company to meet any internal or published projections, forecasts, estimates or predictions in respect of revenues, earnings or other financial or operating metrics for any period (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such failure that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (F) the execution and delivery of the Merger Agreement, the public announcement of the Merger Agreement or the Merger, the taking of any action required or expressly contemplated by the Merger Agreement (including pursuant to Section 8.01 thereof) or the identity of, or any facts or circumstances relating to the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, including the impact of any of the foregoing on the relationships, contractual or otherwise, of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with customers, Providers, suppliers, partners, officers or employees (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not apply with respect to any representation or warranty that is intended to address the consequences of the execution, delivery or performance of the Merger Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby), (G) any adoption, implementation, promulgation, repeal, modification, amendment, reinterpretation, change or proposal of any Applicable Law of or by any Governmental Authority, except to the extent that such events or changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to
Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect
 
 
Annex C-3
 
the adverse effect such events or changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and any of its Subsidiaries operate, (H) any changes in GAAP (or authoritative interpretations thereof), (I) any changes in geopolitical conditions, the outbreak or escalation of hostilities, any acts of war, sabotage or terrorism, or any escalation or worsening of any such acts of war, sabotage or terrorism threatened or underway as of the date of the Merger Agreement, (J) any taking of any action at the written request of or with the consent of the Arrangers (it being understood and agreed that, with respect to any action taken with such consent, the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences resulting from such action that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (K) any reduction in the credit rating of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such reduction that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (L) any hurricane, earthquake, flood or other natural disasters, acts of God or any change resulting from weather conditions, (M) any changes resulting from, arising under or relating to the Supreme Courts decision regarding Nat. Fed. of Indep. Bus. v. Sebelius, Sec. of Dept. of Health & Human Servs., No. 11-393 (2012); Dept. of Health & Human Servs. v. Florida, Nos. 11-398 & 11-400 (2012), including any state determining not to expand its Medicaid Programs pursuant to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, (N) any changes to reimbursement rates or in methods or procedures for determining such rates, any changes to eligibility requirements or any other programmatic changes by any Governmental Authority that, in each case, have general application to other companies providing managed care services similar to the services that are provided by the Company and its Subsidiaries or to other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, as applicable, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies operating in the Medicaid or Medicare managed care industry or other industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, (O) the failure, in and of itself, of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to obtain the right to provide services in any jurisdiction under a Contract with CMS, any state agency or any other Governmental Authority pursuant to any request for proposal, procurement, re-procurement or similar process or the failure of any such Contract to be renewed upon its expiration (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences giving rise to such failure that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (P) the effects on the Companys and its Subsidiaries business arising from employee departures that result from the announcement of the Merger Agreement and the Merger or (Q) any litigation or legal proceedings arising from allegations of a breach of fiduciary duty or violation of Applicable Law relating to the Merger Agreement or the Merger.
 
Capitalized terms used but not defined in this ninth paragraph, other than Arrangers, have the meanings assigned to them in the Merger Agreement. References to section numbers in this ninth paragraph are references to sections of the Merger Agreement.
 
 
Annex C-4
 
EXHIBIT I TO ANNEX C
 
This Solvency Certificate (this ) is delivered pursuant to Section [__] of the Credit Agreement, dated as of [________], 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ), among Aetna Inc. (the ), Goldman Sachs Bank USA, as Administrative Agent, UBS Securities LLC, as Syndication Agent, and each lender from time to time party thereto (collectively, the  and individually, a ).  Capitalized terms used herein without definition have the same meanings as in the Credit Agreement.
Certificate
Credit Agreement
Borrower
Lenders
Lender
I, [_____________], solely in my capacity as the duly appointed and acting Chief Financial Officer of the Borrower, and not individually, DO HEREBY CERTIFY to the Lenders, as follows:
1.    I am knowledgeable of the financial and accounting matters of the Borrower and its subsidiaries, the Credit Agreement and the covenants and representations (financial or otherwise) contained therein.
2.    Immediately after giving effect to the Acquisition on the Closing Date:
a.     the fair value of the property of the Borrower and its subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, will be greater than the total amount of liabilities, including contingent liabilities, of the Borrower and its subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis;
b.     the present fair saleable value of the assets of the Borrower and its subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of the Borrower and its subsidiaries on their debts, on a consolidated basis, as they become absolute and matured;
c.     the capital of the Borrower and its subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, is not unreasonably small in relation to their collective businesses, taken as a whole, as now conducted and as proposed to be conducted immediately following the Closing Date; and
d.     the Borrower and its subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, do not intend to incur, or believe that they will incur on or immediately following the Closing Date, debts, including current obligations, beyond their ability to pay such debts as they become absolute and matured.
For the purposes of this Certificate, the amount of any contingent liability at any time shall be computed as the amount that, in the light of all the facts and circumstances existing at such time, represents the amount that can reasonably be expected to become an actual or matured liability.  For the purpose of this Certificate, it is assumed that the indebtedness and the other obligations incurred under and in connection with the Facility will come due at maturity.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto set my hand as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
Annex C-1


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120911162353.txt.gz
TIME:20120911162353
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On September 12, 2012, Aetna Inc. ("Aetna" or "we") expects to participate in presentations and meetings with investors and analysts, including a presentation by Joseph M. Zubretsky, Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna, at the Morgan Stanley Global Healthcare Conference (the "Conference") in New York City.  During the presentation and these meetings, Aetna intends to disclose that, based on its results and performance to date in 2012:
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 9:45 a.m. Eastern time on September 12, 2012. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at
www.aetna.com/investor
. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at
www.aetna.com/investor
for 14 days. Website addresses are included for reference only. The information contained on Aetna's website is not part of this Form 8-K and is not incorporated by reference into this Form 8-K.
(1)
Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains of $39.2 million ($60.3 million pretax) reported by Aetna for the six months ended June 30, 2012. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share also exclude projected transaction costs related to the Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry") acquisition. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction costs related to the Coventry acquisition), and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share or projected operating earnings to projected net income in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2012 reflect a range of approximately 344 million to 347 million weighted average diluted shares.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION - This Form 8-K may contain forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. You can generally identify forward-looking statements by the use of forward-looking terminology such as anticipate, believe, continue, could, estimate, expect, explore, evaluate, intend, may, might, plan, potential, predict, project, seek, should, or will, or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology. These forward-looking statements are only predictions and involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond Aetna's control.
Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, progression of operating earnings per share during 2012, Commercial medical cost trend, pricing and forecasting assumptions and reserve adequacy. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the risk that a regulatory approval that may be required for the proposed acquisition of Coventry is delayed or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated; the diversion of management time on acquisition related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to
implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to repeal, amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, the 2012 presidential and congressional elections, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report") and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetna's "First Quarter 10-Q") and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (together with Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q, Aetna's "Quarterly Reports"), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
No assurances can be given that any of the events anticipated by the forward-looking statements will transpire or occur, or if any of them do occur, what impact they will have on the results of operations, financial condition or cash flows of Aetna or Coventry.  Aetna assumes any duty to update or revise forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, as of any future date.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20120926202119.txt.gz
TIME:20120926202119
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
  
Item 1.01.  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
The information set forth in Item 2.03 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is incorporated herein by reference.
Section 2  Financial Information
  
Item 2.03.  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
First Amendment to Existing Credit Agreement
On September 24, 2012, Aetna Inc. () entered into a First Amendment (the ) to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012 (the ), with the various lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (), as administrative agent.  Aetna also entered into an Incremental Commitment Agreement dated as of September 24, 2012 (the  and, together with the First Amendment and the Existing Credit Agreement, the ), with the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan, as administrative agent.  A summary of the terms of the Existing Credit Agreement may be found in Aetnas Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 28, 2012, which summary is incorporated herein by reference.
Aetna
First Amendment
Existing Credit Agreement
JPMorgan
Incremental Commitment
Amended Credit Agreement
The First Amendment provides Aetna the option to expand the lenders aggregate commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement by up to $1.0 billion, to a maximum aggregate commitment of $2.5 billion, subject to certain conditions precedent.  Pursuant to the Incremental Commitment, Aetna exercised its option to expand the lenders aggregate commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement by $500 million, to a maximum aggregate amount of revolving loans and letters of credit outstanding of $2.0 billion.  Accordingly, Aetna now has the option to expand the lenders aggregate commitments under the Amended Credit Agreement in the future by up to an additional $500 million, subject to certain conditions precedent.
Entry into Bridge Credit Agreement
On September 24, 2012, Aetna entered into a 364-day bridge credit agreement (the ).  Under the Bridge Credit Agreement, Goldman Sachs Bank USA () is the administrative agent. In addition to Goldman, twelve other lenders are party to the Bridge Credit Agreement.  The maximum aggregate loan commitment of any single lender under the Bridge Credit Agreement is $400 million.  Goldman, Sachs & Co., an affiliate of Goldman, and UBS Securities LLC, a party to the Bridge Credit Agreement, also are serving as financial advisors to Aetna in connection with its proposed acquisition (the ) of Coventry Health Care, Inc. ().
Bridge Credit Agreement
Goldman
Proposed Acquisition
Coventry
Under the Bridge Credit Agreement, Aetna may borrow on an unsecured basis an aggregate principal amount of up to $2.0 billion
to the extent Aetna has not received $2.0 billion in net cash proceeds from issuing its senior notes or from certain other transactions on or prior to the Closing Date (as defined below).
Any proceeds of the Bridge Credit Agreement are required to be used to fund the Proposed Acquisition and to pay fees and expenses incurred in connection with the Proposed Acquisition. Any borrowings under the Bridge Credit Agreement mature 364 days after the closing of the Proposed Acquisition (the ).
Closing Date
Amounts outstanding under the Bridge Credit Agreement will bear interest, at Aetnas option, either (a) at the London Interbank Offered Rate (); or (b) at the base rate (defined as the highest of (i) the prime rate, (ii) the federal funds effective rate plus 0.50% per annum and (iii) LIBOR for an interest period of one month plus 1.00% per annum), plus, in each case, the applicable LIBOR margin or base rate margin depending upon the ratings of long-term indebtedness of Aetna.  The minimum and maximum LIBOR margins are 1.00% and 1.75% per annum, respectively, and the minimum and maximum base rate margins are 0% and 0.75% per annum, respectively, provided, however, that the applicable margins will increase by 0.25% per annum on the 90th day following the and by an additional 0.25% per annum each 90th day thereafter while loans remain outstanding under the Bridge Credit Agreement.  Aetna will also pay to each lender on each of the following dates a duration fee equal to the following applicable percentages of the aggregate principal amount of such lenders loans outstanding on such date: (i) 90 days after the Closing Date, 0.50%; (ii) 180 days after the Closing Date, 1.00%; and (iii) 270 days after the Closing Date, 1.50%. Aetna will also pay the lenders certain other fees.
LIBOR
Closing Date
The lenders' undrawn commitments under the Bridge Credit Agreement will be automatically and permanently reduced in an amount equal to, and Aetna also will be required to make prepayments of any outstanding loans under the Bridge Credit Agreement with, the (i) net cash proceeds from the issuance of debt of Aetna or any of its subsidiaries, (ii) net cash proceeds from the issuance of equity of Aetna and (iii) net cash proceeds in excess of $300 million received by Aetna or any of its subsidiaries from non-ordinary course asset sales, in each case subject to certain exceptions.  
The Bridge Credit Agreement contains customary events of default, the occurrence of which would permit the lenders to accelerate payment of the full amounts outstanding.  Additionally, the Bridge Credit Agreement contains customary representations and warranties, affirmative covenants and negative covenants. The Bridge Credit Agreement events of default, respresentations and warranties, and affirmative and negative covernants are substantially the same as those under the Existing Credit Agreement. The Bridge Credit Agreement also contains a covenant limiting Restricted Payments (as defined in the Bridge Credit Agreement) by Aetna, subject to certain exceptions and baskets, including an exception permitting the payment of regular cash dividends.
The funding of the Bridge Credit Agreement is subject to various conditions precedent including:  (i) the consummation of the Proposed Acquisition; (ii) the absence of any Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect (as defined in the Bridge Credit Agreement); (iii) the accuracy on and as of the Closing Date of certain representations and warranties related to both Aetna and Coventry; (iv) termination of Coventrys existing credit agreement dated as of June 22, 2011;
(v) Aetna having used commercially reasonable efforts to cause a senior notes issuance to occur prior to the Closing Date; 
and (vi) other customary closing conditions each as more fully described in the Bridge Credit Agreement.
In the ordinary course of their respective businesses, the various agents and certain lenders under the Amended Credit Agreement and the Bridge Credit Agreement and their affiliates have performed, perform and may in the future perform, normal commercial banking, investment banking and/or advisory services for Aetna and its affiliates from time to time for which they have received, or will receive, customary fees and expenses.
The foregoing summaries of the Amended Credit Agreement and the Bridge Credit Agreement, and the transactions contemplated thereby, are not complete and are qualified in their entirety by the full text of the Amended Credit Agreement and the Bridge Credit Agreement, which are filed as Exhibits 99.1, 99.2, 99.3 and 99.4 to this Current Report on Form 8-K, and are incorporated herein by reference.  You are encouraged to read the Amended Credit Agreement and the Bridge Credit Agreement in their entirety.
 
Section 8  Other Events
  
Item 8.01.  Other Events.
 
In connection with the Proposed Acquisition, attached hereto as Exhibit 99.5 and incorporated by reference herein are the Aetna and Coventry unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements as of, and for the six months ended, June 30, 2012 and for the year ended December 31, 2011.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, and for the six months ended June 30, 2012, combine the historical consolidated statements of income of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the merger of a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna with and into Coventry (referred to as the merger) as if it had occurred on January 1, 2011. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of June 30, 2012, combines the historical consolidated balance sheets of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the merger as if it had occurred on June 30, 2012.
These unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements and the accompanying notes are based on and should be read in conjunction with the following historical consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes:
 
 
 
 
 
 
Coventrys separate historical financial statements referred to in the preceding paragraph were prepared by Coventry and provided to Aetna. Aetna takes no responsibility for Coventrys separate historical financial statements, and Aetna is not incorporating into this Current Report on Form 8-K such financial statements. Coventrys separate historical financial statements, however, may be read and copied at the Security and Exchange Commissions (the ) public reference room at 100 F Street, N.E., Room 1580, Washington, D.C., 20549. Please call the SEC at 1-800-SEC-0330 for further information on the operation of the public reference room. Coventrys separate historical financial statements contained in its SEC filings are also available to the public at the SECs web site at www.sec.gov.
SECs
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
The following exhibits are filed as part of this Current Report:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
 
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
FIRST AMENDMENT dated as of September 24, 2012 (this ), to the Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012 (the ), among AETNA INC.,  a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Agent.
Amendment
Credit Agreement
Borrower
 
A.
 
Pursuant to the Credit Agreement, the Lenders have extended and agreed to extend credit to the Borrower on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth therein.  Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Credit Agreement.
 
B.
 
The Borrower has requested that the Credit Agreement be amended as set forth herein to permit future increases in the Commitments pursuant to Section 2.10 of the Credit Agreement in an amount of $500,000,000.
 
Accordingly, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained and other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, and subject to the conditions set forth herein, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.
 
.  The Borrower and the Lenders party hereto agree that, immediately following the effectiveness of the Amendment on the Amendment Effective Date (as defined below):
Amendments to Credit Agreement
 
(a)
 
The first sentence of Section 2.10(a) of the Credit Agreement shall be amended by deleting the dollar amount $500,000,000 appearing in clause (i) of the proviso thereto and inserting the dollar amount $1,000,000,000 in place thereof.  It is agreed that the Incremental Commitments effected pursuant to the Incremental Commitment Agreement dated as of the date hereof, among the Borrower, the Augmenting Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., will be deemed to have utilized $500,000,000 of the resulting $1,000,000,000 limit on Commitment increases provided for in Section 2.10 as so amended.
 
(b)
 
Section 4.09 of the Credit Agreement shall be deleted and replaced with the following new Section 4.09:
 
SECTION 4.09.  None of the Disclosure Documents or any other information furnished in writing by or on behalf of the Borrower to the Agent or any Lender for purposes of or in connection with this Agreement (in each case taken as a whole with all other information so furnished) contained, as of the time it was furnished, any material misstatement of fact or omitted as of such time to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein taken as a whole not materially misleading, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made; that with respect to information consisting of statements, estimates, projections and other forward looking information (collectively, the Projections), the Borrower represents only that such information has been prepared in good faith based upon assumptions
. Full Disclosure
provided
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
believed in good faith by the Borrower to be reasonable at the time of preparation thereof (it being understood that the Projections are subject to significant uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond the Borrowers control, and that no assurance can be given that the Projections will be realized); that, at any time that the representations set forth in this Section 4.09 are made on or prior to the date on which the Borrowers acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. is consummated pursuant to the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of August 19, 2012, among the Borrower, Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc. and Coventry Health Care, Inc., with respect to any such information relating to Coventry Health Care, Inc. and its subsidiaries (and its and their respective businesses) such representations are made to the best of the Borrowers knowledge .
provided
further
 
(c)
 
The last sentence of Section 5.06 of the Credit Agreement shall be deleted and the following new Section 4.11 is inserted at the end of Article IV of the Credit Agreement:
 
Section 4.11.  .  Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is engaged or will engage, principally or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U.  Not more than 25% of the value of the assets subject to any restrictions on the sale, pledge or other disposition of assets under this Agreement or any other agreement to which any Lender or Affiliate of a Lender is party will at any time be represented by margin stock (as defined in Regulation U).
Federal Reserve Regulations
 
(d)
 
The parenthetical in the penultimate sentence of Section 9.05(b) of the Credit Agreement shall be amended by deleting the reference to 8.05 therein and replacing it with 8.04.
 
SECTION 2.
 
.  To induce the other parties hereto to enter into this Amendment, the Borrower represents and warrants to each of the Lenders and the Agent that:
Representations and Warranties
 
(a)
 
this Amendment has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Borrower and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Borrower, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law; and
 
(b)
 
on the Amendment Effective Date, and after giving effect to this Amendment and the transactions contemplated hereby to occur on such date, (i) the representations and warranties set forth in the Credit Agreement, as amended herein, will be true and correct in all material respects as though made on and as of the Amendment Effective Date, other than representations and warranties which are given as of a particular date, which representations and warranties will be true and correct as of that date and (ii) no Default has occurred and is continuing.
 
 
 
2
 
 
 
SECTION 3.
 
.  This Amendment shall become effective as of the first date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (the ):
Conditions
Amendment Effective Date
 
(a)
 
the Agent shall have received from each of the Borrower, the Agent and the Required Lenders either (i) a counterpart of this Amendment signed on behalf of such party or (ii) evidence satisfactory to the Agent (which may include a facsimile or electronic transmission) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Amendment;
 
(b)
 
the Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Agent may reasonably request relating to the existence of the Borrower, the corporate authority for and validity of this Amendment, and any other matters relevant hereto, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Agent;
 
(c)
 
the Agent shall have received reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower under the Credit Agreement or under Section 4 hereof; and
 
(d)
 
The Borrower shall have paid all fees payable by it in connection with this Amendment.
 
The Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Amendment Effective Date and such notice shall be conclusive and binding on all parties hereto.
 
SECTION 4.
 
.  The Borrower agrees to reimburse the Agent for its reasonable out-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Amendment and the transactions contemplated hereby, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, in each case to the extent invoiced.
Expenses
 
SECTION 5.
 
.  THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AND GOVERNED BY THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
APPLICABLE LAW
 
SECTION 6.
 
.  This Amendment may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original but all of which, when taken together, shall constitute a single contract.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Amendment by facsimile or electronic transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually signed counterpart of this Amendment.
Counterparts
 
SECTION 7.
 
.  The Section headings used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Amendment and are not to affect the construction of, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Amendment.
Headings
 
SECTION 8.
 
.  Except as expressly set forth herein, this Amendment shall not by implication or otherwise limit, impair, constitute a waiver of or otherwise affect the rights and remedies of the Borrower, the Agent, the Issuing Banks or the Lenders under the Credit Agreement, and shall not alter, modify, amend or in any
Effect of Amendment
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
way affect any of the terms, conditions, obligations, covenants or agreements contained in the Credit Agreement, all of which are ratified and affirmed in all respects and shall continue in full force and effect.
 
SECTION 9.
 
  The Credit Agreement, and any and all other agreements, documents or instruments now or hereafter executed and delivered pursuant to the terms hereof or pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement, as amended hereby, are hereby amended so that any reference in the Credit Agreement to the Credit Agreement shall mean a reference to the Credit Agreement as amended hereby.
References.
 
 
 
4
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first written above.
 
[Signature Page To First Amendment]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender: Citibank, N.A.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender:
State Street Bank and Trust Company
 
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Institution: CREDIT SUISSE AG, Cayman Islands Branch
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender: SunTrust Bank
 
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender:
U.S. Bank, N.A.
 
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender: UBS LOAN FINANCE LLC
 
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender: THE ROYAL BANK OF SCOTLAND PLC
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender:
BARCLAYS BANK PLC
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender:  UMB BANK, N.A.
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender:
FIFTH THIRD BANK
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender:  Bank of America, N.A.
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
Name of Lender:  MORGAN STANLEY BANK, N.A.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender:  Goldman Sachs Bank USA
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO FIRST AMENDMENT
 
 
Name of Lender:  Webster Bank, National Association
 
For any Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.3
 
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
INCREMENTAL COMMITMENT AGREEMENT dated as of September 24, 2012 (this ), among AETNA INC., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), the AUGMENTING LENDERS (as defined below) and other Lenders party hereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. (), in its capacity as Agent under the Credit Agreement referred to below.
Agreement
Borrower
JPMCB
 
A.
 
Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012 (the ), among the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Agent.  Pursuant to the Credit Agreement, the Lenders have extended and agreed to extend credit to the Borrower on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth therein.  Capitalized terms used but not otherwise defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
 
B.
 
Pursuant to Section 2.10 of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower has requested that the total Commitments be increased by $500,000,000.
 
C.
 
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each party hereto whose name is set forth on Schedule I hereto (each an ) has agreed to extend a Commitment or increase its existing Commitment, as the case may be, under the Credit Agreement in the amount set forth opposite its name on such Schedule (such commitments, the ).
Augmenting Lender
Incremental Commitments
 
Accordingly, in consideration of the mutual agreements herein contained and other good and valuable consideration, the sufficiency and receipt of which are hereby acknowledged, and subject to the conditions set forth herein, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.
 
.  (a)  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, on the Commitment Increase Effective Date (as defined below), the Incremental Commitment of each Augmenting Lender shall become effective.  The Incremental Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date applicable to the Commitments in effect under the Credit Agreement immediately prior to the Commitment Increase Effective Date (the ) and shall have terms (including in respect of fees and interest rates) identical those of the Existing Commitments.
Incremental Commitments
Existing Commitments
 
(b)
 
From and after the Commitment Increase Effective Date, for all purposes of the Credit Agreement, (i) the Incremental Commitments shall constitute Commitments under the Credit Agreement of the same class as the Existing Commitments, (ii) Loans made pursuant to the Incremental Commitments contemplated hereby shall constitute Loans under the Credit Agreement of same class as the Loans made pursuant to the Existing Commitments and (iii) each Augmenting Lender shall be (or in the case of any Augmenting Lender with an Existing Commitment, continue to be) a Lender under the Credit Agreement, and shall have all the rights and obligations of a Lender holding a Commitment under the Credit Agreement.  This Agreement shall, as to each Augmenting Lender that is not already a Lender under the Credit Agreement,
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
constitute the accession agreement referred to in clause (iii) of the first sentence of Section 2.10(a) of the Credit Agreement and the notice referred to in the first and second sentences of such Section 2.10(a).
 
(c)
 
On the Commitment Increase Effective Date, Schedule 2.01 to the Credit Agreement will be replaced with Schedule 2.01 attached hereto.
 
SECTION 2.
 
.  To induce the other parties hereto to enter into this Agreement, the Borrower represents and warrants to each of the Lenders (including the Augmenting Lenders) and the Agent that:
Representations and Warranties
 
(a)
 
this Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Borrower and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Borrower, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors rights generally and to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law; and
 
(b)
 
on the Commitment Increase Effective Date, and after giving effect to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby to occur on such date, (i) the representations and warranties set forth in the Credit Agreement will be true and correct in all material respects as though made on and as of the Commitment Increase Effective Date, other than representations and warranties which are given as of a particular date, which representations and warranties will be true and correct as of that date; that the representation in Section 4.09 of the Credit Agreement insofar as it relates to information relating to Coventry Health Care, Inc. and its subsidiaries (and its and their respective businesses) is made to the best of the Borrowers knowledge, and (ii) no Default has occurred and is continuing.
provided
 
SECTION 3.
 
.  This Agreement and the Incremental Commitments shall become effective as of the first date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (the ):
Conditions
Commitment Increase Effective Date
 
(a)
 
the Agent shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) evidence satisfactory to the Agent (which may include a facsimile or electronic transmission) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement;
 
(b)
 
the Agent shall have received the written opinions (addressed to the Agent and the Lenders and dated the Commitment Increase Effective Date) of each of (i) William C. Baskin III, Esq., counsel to the Borrower, (ii) Davis, Polk & Wardwell LLP, special counsel for the Borrower and (iii) Drinker, Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel for the Borrower, collectively as to the corporate power and authority of the Borrower to borrow hereunder and as to the enforceability of this Agreement after giving effect to such increase;
 
(c)
 
the Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Agent may reasonably request relating to the existence of the Borrower, the corporate
 
 
 
2
 
 
 
authority for and validity of this Agreement, and any other matters relevant hereto, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Agent;
 
(d)
 
the conditions set forth in paragraphs (b) and (d) of Section 3.02 of the Credit Agreement (without giving effect to the parenthetical in Section 3.02(d)) shall be satisfied on and as of the Commitment Increase Effective Date (as though a Borrowing were being made on such date), and the Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Commitment Increase Effective Date and signed by a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower, confirming compliance with such conditions;
 
(e)
 
no Loans shall be outstanding under the Credit Agreement on the Commitment Increase Effective Date;
 
(f)
 
the Agent shall have received reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower under the Credit Agreement or under Section 4 hereof; and
 
(g)
 
The Borrower shall have paid all fees payable by it in connection with this Agreement and the Incremental Commitments.
 
The Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower and the Augmenting Lenders of the Commitment Increase Effective Date and such notice shall be conclusive and binding on all parties hereto.
 
SECTION 4.
 
.  The Borrower agrees to reimburse the Agent for its reasonable out-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, in each case to the extent invoiced.
Expenses
 
SECTION 5.
 
.  THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AND GOVERNED BY THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.  EACH OF THE BORROWER, THE AUGMENTING LENDERS AND JPMCB HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
APPLICABLE LAW
 
SECTION 6.
 
.  Sections 9.07(b), (c) and (d) of the Credit Agreement shall apply to this Agreement .
Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
mutatis
mutandis
 
SECTION 7.
 
.  This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original but all of which, when taken together, shall constitute a single contract.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Agreement by facsimile or electronic transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually signed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
SECTION 8.
 
.  The Section headings used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and are not to affect the construction of, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
 
 
 
4
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first written above.
 
 
 
[SIGNATURE PAGE TO INCREMENTAL COMMITMENT AGREEMENT]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
[SIGNATURE PAGE TO INCREMENTAL COMMITMENT AGREEMENT]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender: Citibank, N.A.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender: HSBC Bank USA, N.A.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender:
State Street Bank and Trust Company
 
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender: CREDIT SUISSE AG, Cayman Islands Branch
 
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender: SunTrust Bank
 
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender:
U.S. Bank, N.A.
 
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender: UBS LOAN FINANCE LLC
 
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender: THE ROYAL BANK OF SCOTLAND PLC
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender:
BARCLAYS BANK PLC
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender: 
UMB BANK, N.A.
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender:
FIFTH THIRD BANK
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender:  Bank of America, N.A.
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender:  MORGAN STANLEY BANK, N.A.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender:  Goldman Sachs Bank USA
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Name of Augmenting Lender:  Webster Bank, National Association
 
For any Augmenting Lender requiring a second signature line:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.4
 
 
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page
 
 
 
 
* The Table of Contents is not a part of this Agreement.
 
 
i
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ii
 
 
 
 
 
 
iii
 
 
Schedules and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
iv
 
 
 
 
BRIDGE CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of September 24, 2012, among AETNA INC., the LENDERS listed on the signature pages hereof or from time to time party hereto and GOLDMAN SACHS BANK USA, as administrative agent.
 
Pursuant to the Merger Agreement (such term and each other capitalized term used and not otherwise defined herein having the meaning assigned to it in Article I), the Borrower has agreed to acquire all the issued and outstanding equity interests in the Acquired Company for consideration consisting of shares of the Borrowers common stock and cash.  In that connection, the Borrower has requested that the Lenders extend credit to the Borrower in the form of Loans in Dollars in an aggregate principal amount not in excess of $2,000,000,000.  The proceeds of the Loans will be used by the Borrower on the Closing Date, together with available cash of the Borrower and the Acquired Business, proceeds of the issuance by the Borrower of its commercial paper and any proceeds from Senior Notes Issuance prior to the Closing Date, to pay the cash portion of the consideration payable under the Merger Agreement and to pay fees and expenses incurred in connection with the Transactions.
 
The Lenders are willing to make the Loans upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein.  Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
 
 
SECTION 1.01.
 
Definitions.  The following terms, as used herein, have the following meanings:
 
 means the Acquired Company together with its Subsidiaries.
Acquired Business
 
 means (i) any event, change, effect, development or occurrence that has a material adverse effect on the financial condition, business or results of operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, other than any event, change, effect, development or occurrence to the extent resulting from (A) any changes in general United States or global economic conditions, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, (B) any changes in conditions generally affecting the healthcare, health insurance or managed care industry or any other industry in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries operate, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, (C) any decline, in and of itself, in the market price or trading volume of the Companys common stock (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such decline that
Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (D) any changes in regulatory, legislative or political conditions or in securities, credit, financial, debt or other capital markets, in each case in the United States or any foreign jurisdiction, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes or conditions have on other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, (E) any failure, in and of itself, by the Company to meet any internal or published projections, forecasts, estimates or predictions in respect of revenues, earnings or other financial or operating metrics for any period (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such failure that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (F) the execution and delivery of the Merger Agreement, the public announcement of the Merger Agreement or the Merger, the taking of any action required or expressly contemplated by the Merger Agreement (including pursuant to Section 8.01 thereof) or the identity of, or any facts or circumstances relating to the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, including the impact of any of the foregoing on the relationships, contractual or otherwise, of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries with customers, Providers, suppliers, partners, officers or employees (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not apply with respect to any representation or warranty that is intended to address the consequences of the execution, delivery or performance of the Merger Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby), (G) any adoption, implementation, promulgation, repeal, modification, amendment, reinterpretation, change or proposal of any Applicable Law of or by any Governmental Authority, except to the extent that such events or changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such events or changes have on other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and any of its Subsidiaries operate, (H) any changes in GAAP (or authoritative interpretations thereof), (I) any changes in geopolitical conditions, the outbreak or escalation of hostilities, any acts of war, sabotage or terrorism, or any escalation or worsening of any such acts of war, sabotage or terrorism threatened or underway as of the date of the Merger Agreement, (J) any taking of any action at the written request of or with the consent of the Arrangers (it being understood and agreed that, with respect to any action taken with such consent, the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences resulting from such action that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in
 
 
 
2
 
 
 
determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (K) any reduction in the credit rating of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences giving rise to or contributing to such reduction that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (L) any hurricane, earthquake, flood or other natural disasters, acts of God or any change resulting from weather conditions, (M) any changes resulting from, arising under or relating to the Supreme Courts decision regarding Nat. Fed. of Indep. Bus. v. Sebelius, Sec. of Dept. of Health & Human Servs., No. 11-393 (2012); Dept. of Health & Human Servs. v. Florida, Nos. 11-398 & 11-400 (2012), including any state determining not to expand its Medicaid Programs pursuant to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, (N) any changes to reimbursement rates or in methods or procedures for determining such rates, any changes to eligibility requirements or any other programmatic changes by any Governmental Authority that, in each case, have general application to other companies providing managed care services similar to the services that are provided by the Company and its Subsidiaries or to other companies operating in the industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, as applicable, except to the extent that such changes have a materially disproportionate adverse effect on the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, relative to the adverse effect such changes have on other companies operating in the Medicaid or Medicare managed care industry or other industries in which the Company and its Subsidiaries operate, (O) the failure, in and of itself, of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries to obtain the right to provide services in any jurisdiction under a Contract with CMS, any state agency or any other Governmental Authority pursuant to any request for proposal, procurement, re-procurement or similar process or the failure of any such Contract to be renewed upon its expiration (it being understood and agreed that the foregoing shall not preclude the assertion that any facts or occurrences giving rise to such failure that are not otherwise excluded from the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect should be deemed to constitute, or be taken into account in determining whether there has been, or would reasonably be expected to be, an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect), (P) the effects on the Companys and its Subsidiaries business arising from employee departures that result from the announcement of the Merger Agreement and the Merger or (Q) any litigation or legal proceedings arising from allegations of a breach of fiduciary duty or violation of Applicable Law relating to the Merger Agreement or the Merger.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Agreement, (x) capitalized terms used but not defined in this definition, other than the term Arrangers, have the meanings assigned to them in the Merger Agreement and (y) references in this definition to the Merger Agreement mean the Merger Agreement as originally executed.
 
 means Coventry Health Care, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Acquired Company
 
 means the representations and warranties made by or with respect to the Acquired Business in the Merger Agreement.
Acquired Company Merger Agreement Representations
 
 means (a) the Acquired Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the period ended December 31, 2011; (b) the Acquired Companys Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for each of the periods ended March 31, 2012, and June 30, 2012; and (c)  the Acquired Companys Current Reports on Form 8-K filed with or
Acquired Companys Disclosure Documents
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission after the filing of the Acquired Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the period ended December 31, 2011, and on or before August 19, 2012.
 
 means, as of any date, the sum of (i) Total Debt as of such date and (ii) Adjusted Consolidated Net Worth as of such date.
Adjusted Consolidated Capitalization
 
 means at any date, the total consolidated shareholders equity of the Borrower determined as of such date in accordance with GAAP, adjusted to exclude (i) any adjustment recorded to reflect the overfunded or underfunded status of the Borrowers defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans in accordance with ASC 715 and (ii) any net unrealized capital gains and losses.
Adjusted Consolidated Net Worth
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the administrative questionnaire in the form submitted to such Lender by the Agent and submitted to the Agent (with a copy to the Borrower) duly completed by such Lender.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
 means Goldman Sachs Bank USA in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder, and its successors in such capacity.
Agent
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, (i) in the case of its Base Rate Loans, its Domestic Lending Office and (ii) in the case of its Euro-Dollar Loans, its Euro-Dollar Lending Office.
Applicable Lending Office
 
 means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in commercial loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its activities and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
 
 means Goldman Sachs Bank USA and UBS Securities LLC, in their capacities as the joint lead arrangers and joint bookrunners for the Commitments and the Loans.
Arrangers
 
 means Accounting Standards Codification No. 715,  issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board of the Financial Accounting Foundation in July 2009, as amended or succeeded by subsequent pronouncements, if applicable.
ASC 715
Compensation-Retirement Benefits
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.05), and accepted by the Agent, in the form of Exhibit B or any other form approved by the Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
 
 
 
4
 
 
 
 means Accounting Standards Update (ASU) Leases (Topic 840) issued August 17, 2010.
ASU Topic 840
 
 means, with respect to any Person, that such Person has become the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee, administrator, custodian, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business appointed for it, or, in the good faith determination of the Agent, has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of or acquiescence in, any such proceeding or appointment; that a Bankruptcy Event shall not result solely by virtue of any ownership interest, or the acquisition of any ownership interest, in such Person by a Governmental Authority; , , that such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Person with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States of America or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Person (or such Governmental Authority) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any agreements made by such Person.
Bankruptcy Event
provided
provided
however
 
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the highest of (i) the Prime Rate for such day, (ii) the sum of 1/2 of 1% plus the Federal Funds Rate for such day and (iii) the sum of 1% plus the London Interbank Offered Rate on such day (or if such day is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, the immediately preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day) for a deposit in Dollars with a maturity of one month.  Solely for purposes of clause (iii) above and the last sentence of this definition of Base Rate, the London Interbank Offered Rate on any day means the rate per annum, or if such day is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, on the immediately preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day, for a period equal to one month; that if for any reason such rate is not available, the term London Interbank Offered Rate for purposes of clause (iii) above and the last sentence of this definition of Base Rate shall mean the rate per annum offered by the principal London office of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in immediately available funds in the London interbank market for deposits in Dollars at approximately 11:00 A.M. (London time) on such day, or if such day is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, on the immediately preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day, for a period equal to one month.  Any change in the Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Rate or the London Interbank Offered Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Rate or the London Interbank Offered Rate.
Base Rate
appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or any successor page) as the London interbank offered rate for deposits in Dollars at 11:00 A.M. (London time) on such day
provided
 
 means (i) a Loan which bears interest at the Base Rate pursuant to the applicable Notice of Borrowing or a Notice of Interest Rate Election or the provisions of Article VIII or (ii) an overdue amount which was a Base Rate Loan immediately before it became overdue.
Base Rate Loan
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section
Base Rate Margin
SECTION 2.07(a)
.
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
 means Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation, and its successors.
Borrower
 
 means a borrowing hereunder consisting of Loans made to the Borrower at the same time by the Lenders pursuant to Article II.  A Borrowing is a Base Rate Borrowing if such Loans are Base Rate Loans and a Euro-Dollar Borrowing if such Loans are Euro-Dollar Loans.
Borrowing
 
 means a date, on or after the Effective Date but not after the Commitment Termination Date, on which the conditions specified in Section 3.02 are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.04) and the Merger is consummated.
Closing Date
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the amount set forth opposite the name of such Lender on Schedule 2.01 hereto, as such amount may be terminated or reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 
Commitment
2.06
, terminated pursuant to Section
8.07
 or changed pursuant to Section
8.06
 or
9.05
.
 
 means the Commitment Letter dated August 19, 2012, among the Borrower, Goldman Sachs Bank USA, UBS Securities LLC and UBS Loan Finance LLC.
Commitment Letter
 
 means:
Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event
 
(a) any Senior Notes Issuance or other Debt Incurrence;
 
(b) any Equity Issuance; and
 
(c) any sale, transfer or other disposition of assets (including pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction or by way of any merger or consolidation) of any asset of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, including (i) any issuance or sale of Equity Interests in any Subsidiary to a Person other than the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries and (ii) any casualty or other insured damage to, or any taking under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding of, any assets of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, but excluding (A) dispositions of assets in the ordinary course of business (including ordinary course sales of investments in the investment portfolios of the Borrower and its subsidiaries and securities lending arrangements and repurchase agreements) and (B) dispositions by Subsidiaries that are regulated insurance subsidiaries to the extent that, notwithstanding the use of commercially reasonable efforts by the Borrower and such Subsidiaries, regulatory approvals required for the upstreaming of the proceeds to the Borrower cannot be obtained.
 
 means August 19, 2013 or, if the End Date (as defined in the Merger Agreement as in effect on the August 19, 2012) shall have been extended to a later date as provided in Section 10.01(b)(i) of the Merger Agreement (as so in effect), such later date (but in any event not later than November 19, 2013).
Commitment Termination Date
 
 means, at any date, any Subsidiary or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the Borrower in its
Consolidated Subsidiary
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
consolidated financial statements in accordance with GAAP if such statements were prepared as of such date.
 
 means, at any time, a director who (i) was a director of the Borrower on the Effective Date or (ii) was nominated or elected as a director by vote of a majority of the persons who were Continuing Directors at the time of such nomination or election.
Continuing Director
 
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.   and  have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
 
 means any incurrence of indebtedness for borrowed money by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, whether pursuant to a public offering or a Rule 144A or other private placement of debt securities (including debt securities convertible into equity securities) or an incurrence of loans under any loan or credit facility, other than (a) indebtedness under the Existing Credit Agreement in an amount not greater than the commitments thereunder in effect on August 19, 2012, plus up to $500,000,000 pursuant to any increase in such commitments (including through an amendment or an amendment and restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement); (b) indebtedness owed by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, (c) refinancings of the Acquired Companys 6% Senior Notes due 2015 required to be redeemed following the Merger as a result of the occurrence of a change in control event (as defined in the 6% Senior Notes Indenture), (d) issuances of commercial paper, (e) capital leases, (f) purchase money indebtedness incurred in the ordinary course of business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, (g) facilities of foreign Subsidiaries of the Borrower for working capital purposes in an aggregate principal amount of up to $25,000,000, (h) indebtedness under overdraft facilities, (i) obligations in connection with repurchase agreements and/or securities lending arrangements and (j) other indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $100,000,000.
Debt Incurrence
 
 means any condition or event which constitutes an Event of Default or which with the giving of notice or lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means any Lender that: (a) has failed, within two Domestic Business Days of the date required to be funded or paid, (i) to fund any portion of any of its Loans or (ii) to pay to the Agent or any Lender any other amount required to be paid by such Lender hereunder; (b) has notified the Borrower, the Agent or any Lender in writing, or has made a public statement to the effect, that such Lender does not intend or expect to comply with (i) any one or more of its funding obligations under this Agreement or (ii) its funding obligations generally under other syndicated credit agreements in which it commits to extend credit; (c) has failed, within three Domestic Business Days after request by the Borrower or the Agent to provide a certification in writing from an authorized officer of such Lender that such Lender will comply with its obligations (and, as of the date of such certificate, is financially able to meet such obligations) to fund prospective Loans, that such Lender shall cease to be a
Defaulting Lender
provided
 
 
 
7
 
 
 
Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (c) upon the receipt by such requesting Person and the Agent of such certification in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Borrower and the Agent; or (d) has become, or is a Subsidiary of any parent company that has become, the subject of a Bankruptcy Event.
 
 means (a) the Confidential Information Memorandum dated August 2012 previously delivered to the Lenders; (b) the Borrowers Annual Report on Form 10-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the period ended December 31, 2011; (c) the Borrowers Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for each of the periods ended March 31, 2012, and June 30, 2012 ; and (d)  the Borrowers Current Reports on Form 8-K filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission on or before August 19, 2012.
Disclosure Documents
 
 shall have the meaning set forth in Section 9.03(b).
Documents
 
 and the sign  mean lawful currency of the United States of America.
Dollars
$
 
 means any day except a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized by law to close.
Domestic Business Day
 
 means, as to each Lender, its office located at its address set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire (or identified in its Administrative Questionnaire as its Domestic Lending Office) or such other office as such Lender may hereafter designate as its Domestic Lending Office by notice to the Borrower and the Agent.
Domestic Lending Office
 
 means the date this Agreement becomes effective in accordance with Section 
Effective Date
3.01
.
 
 means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests, beneficial interests or other ownership interests, whether voting or nonvoting, in, or interests in the income or profits of, a Person, and any warrants, options or other rights entitling the holder thereof to purchase or acquire any of the foregoing.
Equity Interests
 
 means any issuance of Equity Interests by the Borrower, whether pursuant to a public offering or in a Rule 144A or other private placement, other than (a) issuances pursuant to employee and/or director stock plans or employee and/or director compensation plans and (b) the issuance of common stock, options, units and/or other Equity Interests of the Borrower to shareholders and/or employees of the Acquired Company as provided in the Merger Agreement.
Equity Issuance
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
ERISA
 
 means all members of a controlled group of corporations and all trades or businesses (whether or not incorporated) under common control which, together with the Borrower, are treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code.
ERISA Group
 
 
 
8
 
 
 
 means any Domestic Business Day on which commercial banks are open for international business (including dealings in dollar deposits) in London.
Euro-Dollar Business Day
 
 means, as to each Lender, its office, branch or Affiliate located at its address set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire (or identified in its Administrative Questionnaire as its Euro-Dollar Lending Office) or such other office, branch or Affiliate of such Lender as it may hereafter designate as its Euro-Dollar Lending Office by notice to the Borrower and the Agent.
Euro-Dollar Lending Office
 
 means (i) a Loan which bears interest at a Euro-Dollar Rate pursuant to the applicable Notice of Borrowing or a Notice of Interest Rate Election or (ii) an overdue amount which was a Euro-Dollar Loan immediately before it became overdue.
Euro-Dollar Loan
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.07(b).
Euro-Dollar Margin
 
 means a rate of interest determined pursuant to Section 2.07(b) on the basis of the London Interbank Offered Rate.
Euro-Dollar Rate
 
 means, for any day, that percentage (expressed as a decimal) which is in effect on such day, as prescribed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (or any successor), for determining the maximum reserve requirement for a member bank of the Federal Reserve System in New York City with deposits exceeding five billion dollars in respect of Eurocurrency liabilities (or in respect of any other category of liabilities which includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Euro-Dollar Loans is determined or any category of extensions of credit or other assets which includes loans by a non-United States office of any Lender to United States residents).
Euro-Dollar Reserve Percentage
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 6.01.
Event of Default
 
 means the Amended and Restated Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012 (as amended from time to time), among the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
Existing Credit Agreement
 
 means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Internal Revenue Code inclusive, as in effect on the date of this Agreement (or any amended or successor version that is substantively comparable and not materially more onerous to comply with) and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
 
 means, for any day, the rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the nearest 1/100th of 1%) equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers on such day, as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York on the Domestic Business Day next succeeding such day; that (i) if such day is not a Domestic Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Domestic Business
Federal Funds Rate
provided
 
 
 
9
 
 
 
Day as so published on the next succeeding Domestic Business Day, and (ii) if no such rate is so published on such next succeeding Domestic Business Day, the Federal Funds Rate for such day shall be the average rate quoted to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. on such day on such transactions as calculated by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., such calculation to be supplied to the Borrower upon the Borrowers request.
 
 means the financial institutions engaged by the Borrower in connection with the Senior Notes Issuance.
Financial Institutions
 
 means Fitch, Inc.
Fitch
 
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
 
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government (including the European Union, the European Central Bank, the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision or any supra-national body exercising such powers or functions of government).
Governmental Authority
 
 or  means at any time a group of Loans consisting of (i) all Loans which are Base Rate Loans at such time or (ii) all Loans which are Euro-Dollar Loans having the same Interest Period at such time; that, if Loans of any particular Lender are converted to or made as Base Rate Loans pursuant to Article VIII, such Loans shall be included in the same Group or Groups of Loans from time to time as they would have been in if they had not been so converted or made.
Group of Loans
Group
provided
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness of any other Person (the ) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness of the payment thereof, including pursuant to any synthetic lease arrangement, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness; that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
 of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such
Indebtedness
 
 
 
10
 
 
 
Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding current accounts payable and accrued obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all obligations of such Person as an account party to reimburse amounts drawn under any letter of credit or letter of guaranty that constituted Indebtedness of such Person under clause (f) above prior to drawing thereunder and (h) all obligations of such Person in respect of leases required to be accounted for as capital leases under GAAP; that any obligations of such Person in connection with repurchase agreements and/or securities lending arrangements shall not constitute Indebtedness.
provided
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.03(b).
Indemnified Persons
 
 means:
Interest Period
 
(a)
 
with respect to each Base Rate Loan, the period commencing on the date of such Loan and ending on the next succeeding Quarterly Date; that any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date;
provided
 
(b)
 
with respect to each Euro-Dollar Loan, a period commencing on the date of Borrowing specified in the applicable Notice of Borrowing or on the date specified in the applicable Notice of Interest Rate Election and ending one, two, three or six months thereafter, as the Borrower may elect in the applicable Notice; that:
provided
 
(i)
 
any Interest Period which would otherwise end on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day shall, subject to clause (b)(iii) below, be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day;
 
(ii)
 
any Interest Period which begins on the last Euro-Dollar Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall, subject to clause (b)(iii) below, end on the last Euro-Dollar Business Day of a calendar month; and
 
(iii)
 
any Interest Period which would otherwise end after the Maturity Date shall end on the Maturity Date.
 
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or any successor statute.
Internal Revenue Code
 
 means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 who are parties to this Agreement and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to Section 8.06 or pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person
Lender
 
 
 
11
 
 
 
that shall have ceased to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or Section 8.06 or Section 8.07.
 
 means any period during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings:  (i) A- by S&P and/or (ii) A3 by Moodys and/or (iii) A- by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level I Period
provided
 
 means any period (other than a Level I Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings:  (i) BBB+ by S&P and/or (ii) Baa1 by Moodys and/or (iii) BBB+ by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level II Period
provided
 
 means any period (other than a Level I Period or a Level II Period) during which any long-term Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower has ratings that are better than or equal to at least two of the following three ratings: (i) BBB by S&P and/or (ii) Baa2 by Moodys and/or (iii) BBB by Fitch; that if S&P or Moodys or Fitch changes its rating system after the date hereof, the new rating of such rating agency that most closely corresponds to the level specified above for such rating agency shall be substituted for such level.
Level III Period
provided
 
 means any period other than a Level I Period, Level II Period or Level III Period.
Level IV Period
 
 means, as of any date, the ratio of (a) Total Debt as of such date to (b) Adjusted Consolidated Capitalization as of such date.
Leverage Ratio
 
 means, with respect to any asset, any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset.
Lien
 
 means a Base Rate Loan or a Euro-Dollar Loan and Loans means any combination of the foregoing.
Loan
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.07(b).
London Interbank Offered Rate
 
 means a Consolidated Subsidiary of the Borrower that, as of the time of determination of whether such Consolidated Subsidiary is a Material Subsidiary, accounted on a consolidated basis for 10% or more of the total assets of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries (i) as of June 30, 2012, or, thereafter, (ii) as of the most recent date for which a consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower has been delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b); that, for purposes of Article VI, if any event or combination of events described in Sections 6.01(g) and 6.01(h) occur with respect to any one or more Consolidated
Material Subsidiary
provided
 
 
 
12
 
 
 
Subsidiaries that are not Material Subsidiaries but in the aggregate would constitute a Material Subsidiary if such Consolidated Subsidiaries constituted a single Consolidated Subsidiary, then such Consolidated Subsidiaries shall be deemed collectively to constitute a Material Subsidiary for purposes of such Sections.
 
 means the day that is 364 days after the Closing Date or, if such day is not a Domestic Business Day, the Domestic Business Day immediately preceding such day.
Maturity Date
 
 means the merger of the Merger Sub with and into the Acquired Company pursuant to the Merger Agreement, with the separate existence of the Merger Sub ceasing and the Acquired Company continuing as the surviving corporation.
Merger
 
 means the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of August 19, 2012, among the Borrower, the Merger Sub and the Acquired Company, together with all schedules, exhibits and disclosure letters related thereto.  References herein to the Merger Agreement shall be deemed, except as otherwise provided herein, to mean the Merger Agreement as amended from time to time as permitted hereunder.
Merger Agreement
 
 means Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a Delaware corporation and a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Borrower.
Merger Sub
 
 means material non-public information concerning the Borrower and its Subsidiaries or the respective securities of any of the foregoing.
MNPI
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
Moodys
 
 means, with respect to any event, (a) the cash (which term, for purposes of this definition, shall include cash equivalents) proceeds (including, in the case of any casualty, condemnation or similar proceeding, insurance, condemnation or similar proceeds) received in respect of such event, including any cash received in respect of any noncash proceeds, but only as and when received, net of (b) the sum, without duplication, of (i) all fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid in connection with such event by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to third parties, (ii) in the case of a sale, transfer, lease or other disposition of an asset, the amount of all payments required to be made by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as a result of such event to repay Indebtedness secured by such asset, (iii) the amount of all taxes paid (or reasonably estimated to be payable) by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, and (iv) the amount of any reserves established by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP to fund purchase price adjustment, indemnification and similar contingent liabilities reasonably estimated to be payable, in each case during the year that such event occurred or the next two succeeding years and that are directly attributable to the occurrence of such event (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the Borrower).  For purposes of this definition, in the event any contingent liability reserve established with respect to any event as described in clause (b)(iv) above shall be reduced, the amount of such reduction shall, except to the extent such reduction is made as a result of a payment having been made in respect of the
Net Proceeds
 
 
 
13
 
 
 
contingent liabilities with respect to which such reserve has been established, be deemed to be receipt, on the date of such reduction, of cash proceeds in respect of such event.
 
 means promissory notes of the Borrower, substantially in the form of Exhibit A hereto, evidencing the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans, and Note means any one of such promissory notes issued hereunder.
Notes
 
  has the meaning set forth in Section 2.02.
Notice of Borrowing
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 2.09.
Notice of Interest Rate Election
 
 means the United States Treasury Department Office of Foreign Assets Control.
OFAC
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.04(a).
Other Taxes
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.05(e).
Participant
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.05(e).
Participant Register
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation or any entity succeeding to any or all of its functions under ERISA.
PBGC
 
 means an individual, a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, an association, a trust or any other entity or organization, including a government or political subdivision or an agency or instrumentality thereof.
Person
 
 means at any time an employee pension benefit plan which is covered by Title IV of ERISA or subject to the minimum funding standards under Section 412 of the Internal Revenue Code and is either (i) maintained by a member of the ERISA Group for employees of a member of the ERISA Group or (ii) maintained pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or any other arrangement under which more than one employer makes contributions and to which a member of the ERISA Group is then making or accruing an obligation to make contributions or has within the preceding five plan years made contributions.
Plan
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.01(d).
Platform
 
 means the rate of interest quoted in the print edition of The Wall Street Journal, Money Rates Section as the Prime Rate (currently defined as the base rate on corporate loans posted by at least 75% of the nations 30 largest banks), as in effect from time to time.  The Prime Rate is a reference rate and does not necessarily represent the lowest or best rate actually charged to any customer.
Prime Rate
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, representatives of such Lender that are not Public Side Lender Representatives.
Private Side Lender Representatives
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 4.09.
Projections
 
 
 
14
 
 
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, representatives of such Lender that do not wish to receive MNPI.
Public Side Lender Representatives
 
 means the last Domestic Business Day of each March, June, September and December.
Quarterly Date
 
 means Regulation U of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, as in effect from time to time.
Regulation U
 
 means any reportable event as defined in Section 4043(c) of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder (other than a Reportable Event as to which the 30-day notice requirement has been waived by applicable regulation) with respect to a Plan (other than a Plan maintained by a member of an applicable ERISA Group that is considered a member of such ERISA Group only pursuant to subsection (m) or (o) of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code).
Reportable Event
 
 means at any time Lenders having (a) prior to the borrowing of the Loans on the Closing Date, at least 51% of the aggregate amount of the Commitments, and (b) after the borrowing of the Loans on the Closing Date, Lenders having at least 51% of the aggregate amount of the outstanding Loans.
Required Lenders
 
 
 means chief financial officer, treasurer, chief accounting officer or senior corporate finance officer.
Responsible Financial Officer
 
 means any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests in the Borrower, or any payment or distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, exchange, conversion or cancelation of, or any other return of capital with respect to, any Equity Interests in the Borrower.
Restricted Payment
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
S&P
 
 means the contemplated issuance by the Borrower of one or more series of its senior notes pursuant to one or more registered public offerings or Rule 144A or other private placements to provide funds to pay the cash portion of the consideration payable under the Merger Agreement and fees and expenses incurred in connection with the Transactions or to refinance the Loans made hereunder.
Senior Notes Issuance
 
 means indebtedness for borrowed money that is not subordinated to any other indebtedness for borrowed money and is not secured or supported by a guarantee, letter of credit or other form of credit enhancement.
Senior Unsecured Debt
 
  means the Indenture dated as of January 28, 2005, between the Acquired Company, as Issuer, and Wachovia, National Association, as Trustee, in respect of the Acquired Companys 6% Senior Notes due 2015.
6% Senior
Notes Indenture
 
 
 
15
 
 
 
 means the representations and warranties set forth in clause (i) of the first sentence of Section 4.01 and in Sections 4.02 (except insofar as the representation in Section 4.02 relates to the consummation of any Transaction other than the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of this Agreement), 4.03, 4.04(a), 4.07(b), 4.08, 4.11 and 4.12, but only insofar as they relate to the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (other than the Acquired Company and its subsidiaries).
Specified Representations
 
 means any corporation or other entity of which securities or other ownership interests having ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or other persons performing similar functions are at the time directly or indirectly owned by the Borrower.
Subsidiary
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.06.
Substitute Lender
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.04(h).
Tax Event
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 8.04(a).
Taxes
 
 means, as of any date, the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries as of such date (whether or not such Indebtedness would be reflected on a consolidated balance sheet prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP), determined on a consolidated basis.
Total Debt
 
 means the Merger, the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of this Agreement, the borrowings hereunder, the other financing transactions related to the Merger and the payment of fees and expenses incurred in connection with the foregoing.
Transactions
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the London Interbank Offered Rate or the Base Rate.
Type
 
 means the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, as amended or reauthorized from time to time.
USA Patriot Act
 
SECTION 1.02.
 
.  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined.  Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms.  The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation.  The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall.  Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall, except as otherwise provided herein, be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and assigns, (c) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to
Terms Generally
 
 
 
16
 
 
 
refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
 
SECTION 1.03.
 
.  Unless otherwise specified herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted, all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made and all financial statements required to be delivered hereunder shall be prepared in accordance with GAAP as in effect from time to time, applied on a basis consistent (except for changes concurred in by the Borrowers independent public accountants) with the most recent audited consolidated financial statements of the Borrower delivered to the Lenders; that, if the Borrower notifies the Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change in GAAP shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith.  Without limiting the foregoing, for purposes of determining compliance with any provision of this Agreement and any related definitions (including, for the avoidance of doubt, for the purpose of the definitions of Indebtedness and Adjusted Consolidated Net Worth), the determination of whether a lease is to be treated as an operating lease or capital lease shall be made without giving effect to any change in GAAP that becomes effective on or after the Effective Date that would require operating leases to be treated similarly to capital leases, including as a result of the implementation of proposed ASU Topic 840, or any successor or similar proposal.
Accounting Terms and Determinations; GAAP
provided
 
SECTION 1.04.
 
  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, in the event that, on or after the date of this Agreement, definitive documentation governing any new syndicated credit facility of the Borrower becomes effective and contains, or the Existing Credit Agreement is amended, supplemented or otherwise modified to contain, any covenant or event of default that is more restrictive than the corresponding covenant or Event of Default in this Agreement, or that does not correspond to any covenant or Event of Default contained in this Agreement, then this Agreement shall automatically and without further act be amended to incorporate such covenant or event of default, .  The Borrower agrees (a) to provide the Agent with complete and accurate copies of (i) any such definitive documentation and (ii) any amendment, supplement or other modification of the Existing Credit Agreement, in each case promptly upon the execution and delivery thereof, and (b) to execute such documents, agreements or instruments, and to take such other actions, as shall reasonably be requested by the Agent to give effect to this Section.
Incorporation of Certain Provisions.
mutatis
mutandis
 
 
 
17
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 2.01.
 
.  On the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement, each Lender severally agrees to lend to the Borrower on the Closing Date, in Dollars such Lenders pro rata share of the principal amount requested in a Notice of Borrowing pursuant to Section 2.03, not to exceed such Lenders Commitment.  Any Borrowing under this Section 2.01 shall be made from the several Lenders ratably in proportion to their respective Commitments.  Amounts repaid or prepaid in respect of Loans may not be reborrowed.  Failure by any Lender to make Loans as required under the terms of this Agreement will not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder.
Commitments
 
SECTION 2.02.
 
.  The Borrower shall give the Agent notice of the Borrowing to be made on the Closing Date (a ) not later than 10:30 A.M. (New York City time) on (x) the Domestic Business Day immediately preceding the date of such Borrowing, if such Borrowing is to be a Base Rate Borrowing and (y) the third Euro-Dollar Business Day before the date of such Borrowing, if such Borrowing is to be a Euro-Dollar Borrowing, specifying:
Notice of Borrowing
Notice of Borrowing
 
(a)
 
the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Domestic Business Day in the case of a Base Rate Borrowing and a Euro-Dollar Business Day in the case of a Euro-Dollar Borrowing,
 
(b)
 
the aggregate amount of such Borrowing,
 
(c)
 
whether the Loans comprising such Borrowing are to be Base Rate Loans or Euro-Dollar Loans, and
 
(d)
 
in the case of a Euro-Dollar Borrowing, the duration of the initial Interest Period applicable thereto, subject to the provisions of the definition of Interest Period.
 
SECTION 2.03.
 
.  (a)  Upon receipt of a Notice of Borrowing, the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and of such Lenders share of such Borrowing and such Notice of Borrowing shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower.
Notice to Lenders; Funding of Loans
 
(b)
 
Not later than 10:00 A.M. (New York City time) on the Closing Date, each Lender shall make available each Loan to be made by it hereunder, in Federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, to the Agent at its address specified in or pursuant to Section 9.01.  Unless the Agent determines that any applicable condition specified in Article III has not been satisfied, the Agent will make the funds so received from the Lenders available to the Borrower at the Agents aforesaid address.
 
(c)
 
Unless the Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the Closing Date that such Lender will not make available to the Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share
 
 
 
18
 
 
 
available to the Agent on the Closing Date in accordance with Section 2.03(b) and the Agent may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower on such date a corresponding amount.  If and to the extent that such Lender shall not have so made such share available to the Agent, such Lender and the Borrower severally agree to repay to the Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount together with interest thereon, for each day from the date such amount is made available to the Borrower until the date such amount is repaid to the Agent, at (i) in the case of the Borrower, a rate per annum equal to the higher of the Federal Funds Rate and the interest rate applicable thereto pursuant to Section 2.07 and (ii) in the case of such Lender, the Federal Funds Rate.  If such Lender shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount, such amount so repaid shall constitute such Lenders Loan included in such Borrowing for purposes of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 2.04.
 
  (a)   Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from the Loans made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
Evidence of Debt.
 
(b)
 
The Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the Commitment of each Lender and the amount of the Loans made hereunder by such Lender, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Agent hereunder for the accounts of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
(c)
 
The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to Section 2.04(b) shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein and shall be presumptively correct absent demonstrable error; that the failure of the Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
 
(d)
 
Any Lender may request in writing that Loans made by it be evidenced by a Note.  In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a Note payable to the order of such Lender in the form of Exhibit A.  Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such Note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.05) be represented by one or more Notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein.
 
(e)
 
Each Lender agrees that it will cancel and return to the Borrower all Notes then held by it upon the earlier of (i) the Maturity Date; that no Default shall have then occurred and be continuing or (ii) the date there are no Loans outstanding to or accrued interest owing to such Lender.
provided
 
SECTION 2.05.
 
.  The Loans of each Lender shall mature, and the principal amount thereof shall be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon, on the Maturity Date.
Maturity of Loans
 
 
 
19
 
 
 
SECTION 2.06.
 
.  (a) Unless previously terminated, the Commitment of each Lender shall terminate upon the earlier of (A)  the borrowing of the Loans in accordance with Section 2.01 and (B) 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the Commitment Termination Date.
Termination or Reduction of Commitments
 
(b) The Borrower may, upon at least three Domestic Business Days notice to the Agent, terminate the Commitments at any time.
 
(c)
 
The Borrower may, upon at least three Domestic Business Days notice to the Agent, reduce the Commitments from time to time, ratably in accordance with the amounts thereof, by an aggregate amount of $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000.  Any such reduction shall be permanent.
 
(d)
 
In the event and on each occasion that, prior to the termination of the Commitments in accordance with Section 2.06(a) or Section 2.06(b), any Net Proceeds are received by or on behalf of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of any Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event, (i) the Borrower shall, on the day of such receipt, deliver to the Agent a notice thereof setting forth the nature of such Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event and the amount of such Net Proceeds (together with a reasonably detailed calculation thereof), and (ii) the Commitments will be automatically and permanently reduced by the amount of such Net Proceeds (or, if less, the aggregate amount of the Commitments then in effect), such reduction to be effective on the day on which such Net Proceeds are received; , that if the Borrower shall advise the Agent that the Closing Date is to occur on or within two Domestic Business Days after the date on which such Net Proceeds are received, and that it is impractical on short notice to include such Net Proceeds in the payment of the cash Merger Consideration, then the effectiveness of such reduction shall be deferred for two Domestic Business Days and, if the Closing Date shall occur during the period of such deferral, such Net Proceeds shall be applied within three Domestic Business Days after their receipt to prepay Loans as provided in Section 2.10(b); , that in the case of any Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event described in clause (c) of the definition of such term, (x) such reduction in Commitments shall only be required in an amount equal to the amount by which the Net Proceeds of all Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Events described in such clause (c) occurring since August 19, 2012, exceeds $300,000,000 and (y) if the Borrower shall, in such notice to the Agent, state that the Borrower intends to cause the Net Proceeds from such Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event (or a portion thereof specified in such notice) to be applied, or committed to be applied, within 180 days after receipt of such Net Proceeds to acquire, construct, improve, upgrade or repair assets (other than cash or cash equivalents) to be used in the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, or to consummate any business acquisition by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, then the amount of the reduction of the Commitments under this Section 2.06(d) on account of such Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event shall be reduced by the amount of the Net Proceeds specified by the Borrower in such notice as intended to be so reinvested; , that if any such Net Proceeds have not been so applied, or committed to be applied under one or more legally binding agreements, by the end of such 180-day period, or if such Net Proceeds shall have been so committed to be applied by the end of such 180-day period but shall not have been so applied within 270 days after they shall have been received
provided
provided
further
provided
(except for the application of Net Proceeds so committed to be applied that arise
 
 
 
20
 
 
 
, then, not later than the last day of such 180-day period (or such 270-day period, as the case may be), the Borrower shall provide to the Agent written notice thereof and on the first Domestic Business Day following the end of such 180-day (or 270-day) period, the Commitments will be automatically permanently reduced by the amount of such Net Proceeds that have not been so applied (or, if less, the aggregate amount of the Commitments then in effect).
from any casualty, condemnation or similar event or any related insurance, which shall not be subject to such 270-day period)
 
SECTION 2.07.
 
  (a)  Each Base Rate Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for each day from the date such Loan is made until it becomes due or is prepaid, repaid or converted to a Euro-Dollar Loan, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the Base Rate Margin plus the Base Rate for such day.  Such interest shall be payable for each Interest Period on the earlier of (A) the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto or (B) the Maturity Date.
Interest Rates
.
 
The  applicable to any Base Rate Loan outstanding on any day means, subject to the proviso below:
Base Rate Margin
 
(i)
 
if such day falls within a Level I Period, then 0.000%;
 
(ii)
 
if such day falls within a Level II Period, then 0.250%;
 
(iii)
 
if such day falls within a Level III Period, then 0.500%; and
 
(iv)
 
if such day falls within a Level IV Period, then 0.750%;
 
, that each of the Base Rate Margins set forth above will increase by 0.25% per annum on and at all times after the 90th day following the Closing Date and by an additional 0.25% per annum on and at all times after each 90th day thereafter.
provided
 
Any overdue principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, overdue interest on any Base Rate Loan and any overdue fees and other amounts (other than principal and interest) owing hereunder shall bear interest, payable on demand, for each day until paid at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Base Rate Margin plus the Base Rate for such day.
 
(b)
 
Each Euro-Dollar Loan shall bear interest on the outstanding principal amount thereof, for each Interest Period applicable thereto, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of the Euro-Dollar Margin plus the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate.  Such interest shall be payable for each Interest Period on the earliest of (i) the last day thereof, (ii) three months after the initial date thereof and, if such Interest Period is longer than three months, at intervals of three months thereafter or (iii) the Maturity Date.
 
The  applicable to any Euro-Dollar Loan outstanding on any day means, subject to the proviso below:
Euro-Dollar Margin
 
(i)
 
if such day falls within a Level I Period, then 1.000%;
 
(ii)
 
if such day falls within a Level II Period, then 1.250%;
 
 
 
 
21
 
 
 
(iii)
 
if such day falls within a Level III Period, then 1.500%; and
 
(iv)
 
if such day falls within a Level IV Period, then 1.750%;
 
, that each of the Euro-Dollar Margins set forth above will increase by 0.25% per annum on and at all times after the 90th day following the Closing Date and by an additional 0.25% per annum on and at all times after each 90th day thereafter.
provided
 
The  applicable to any Interest Period means the rate per annum appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen (or any successor page) as the London interbank offered rate for deposits in Dollars at 11:00 A.M. (London time) two Euro-Dollar Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period for a period equal to such Interest Period; that, if for any reason such rate is not available, the term  applicable to any Interest Period shall mean the rate per annum as offered by the principal London office of JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in immediately available funds in the London interbank market for deposits in Dollars at approximately 11:00 A.M. (London time) two Euro-Dollar Business Days before the first day of such Interest Period for a period equal to such Interest Period.
London Interbank Offered Rate
provided
London Interbank Offered Rate
 
(c)
 
Any overdue principal of and, to the extent permitted by law, overdue interest on any Euro-Dollar Loan shall bear interest, payable on demand, for each day from and including the date payment thereof was due to but excluding the date of actual payment, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Euro-Dollar Margin plus the higher of (i) the London Interbank Offered Rate applicable to such Loan and (ii) the average of the respective rates per annum at which one day (or, if such amount due remains unpaid more than three Euro-Dollar Business Days, then for such other period of time not longer than three months as the Agent may select) deposits in Dollars in an amount approximately equal to such overdue payment are offered to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in the London interbank market for the applicable period determined as provided above (or, if the circumstances described in Section 8.01 shall exist, at a rate per annum equal to the sum of 2% plus the Base Rate Margin plus the Base Rate for such day).
 
(d)
 
The Agent shall determine (in accordance with this Agreement) each interest rate applicable to the Loans hereunder.  The Agent shall give prompt notice to the Borrower and each of the participating Lenders by facsimile transmission of each rate of interest so determined, and its determination thereof shall be conclusive in the absence of manifest error.
 
SECTION 2.08.
 
.  (a)    The Borrower shall pay to the Agent for the accounts of the Lenders, ratably in proportion to their Commitments, a commitment fee of 0.125% per annum on the daily amount of the Commitments during the period from and including November 17, 2012, to but excluding the Commitment Termination Date.  Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on each Quarterly Date, on the Closing Date and (if other than the Closing Date) on the Commitment Termination Date, commencing on the first such date to occur after November 17, 2012.
Fees
Commitment Fee.
 
 
 
22
 
 
 
(b)
 
.  The Borrower shall pay to the Agent on each of the dates set forth below for the accounts of the Lenders, ratably in proportion to their outstanding Loans, a duration fee equal to the applicable percentage set forth below of the aggregate principal amount of the Loans outstanding on such date:
Duration Fee
 
SECTION 2.09.
 
.  (a)  The Loans included in each Borrowing shall bear interest initially at the type of rate specified by the Borrower in the Notice of Borrowing.  Thereafter, the Borrower may from time to time elect to change or continue the type of interest rate borne by each Group of Loans (subject in each case to the provisions of Article VIII), as follows:
Method of Electing Interest Rates
 
(i)
 
if such Loans are Base Rate Loans, the Borrower may elect to convert such Loans to Euro-Dollar Loans as of any Euro-Dollar Business Day; and
 
(ii)
 
if such Loans are Euro-Dollar Loans, the Borrower may (x) elect to convert such Euro-Dollar Loans to Base Rate Loans as of any Domestic Business Day, (y) elect to convert such Euro-Dollar Loans to Euro-Dollar Loans with an Interest Period different from the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans as of any Euro-Dollar Business Day or (z) elect to continue such Loans as Euro-Dollar Loans for an additional Interest Period beginning on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans;
 
that, if the Borrower elects to convert any Euro-Dollar Loans to Base Rate Loans or to Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period, as of any day other than the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Loans, the Borrower shall reimburse each Lender in accordance with Section 2.12.
provided
 
Each such election shall be made by delivering a notice (a ) to the Agent (i) at least one Domestic Business Day before such notice is to be effective if the relevant Loans are to be converted into Base Rate Loans or (ii) at least three Euro-Dollar Business Days before such conversion or continuation is to be effective if such Loans are to be converted into, or continued as, Euro-Dollar Loans.
Notice of Interest Rate Election
 
A Notice of Interest Rate Election may, if it so specifies, apply to only a portion of the aggregate principal amount of the relevant Group of Loans; that (i) such portion is allocated ratably among the Loans comprising such Group and (ii) the portion to which such Notice applies, and the remaining portion to which it does not apply, are each $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000.
provided
 
 
 
23
 
 
 
(b)
 
Each Notice of Interest Rate Election shall specify:
 
(i)
 
the Group of Loans (or portion thereof) to which such notice applies;
 
(ii)
 
the date on which the conversion or continuation selected in such notice is to be effective, which shall comply with the applicable clause of Section 2.09(a);
 
(iii)
 
whether such Group of Loans (or portion thereof) is to be converted to Base Rate Loans or Euro-Dollar Loans or continued as Euro-Dollar Loans for an additional Interest Period; and
 
(iv)
 
if such Loans (or portions thereof) are to be converted to or continued as Euro-Dollar Loans, the duration of the Interest Period to be applicable thereto immediately after such conversion or continuation.
 
Each Interest Period specified in a Notice of Interest Rate Election shall comply with the provisions of the definition of Interest Period.
 
(c)
 
Upon receipt of a Notice of Interest Rate Election from the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.09(a), the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and such notice shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower.  If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Notice of Interest Rate Election to the Agent for any Euro-Dollar Loans, such Loans shall be converted into Base Rate Loans on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable thereto.  Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default under clause (g) or (h) of Section 6.01 has occurred and is continuing with respect to the Borrower, or if any other Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, has notified the Borrower of the election to give effect to this sentence on account of such other Event of Default, then, in each such case, so long as such Event of Default is continuing, no Loans may be converted to or continued as Euro-Dollar Loans.
 
SECTION 2.10.
 
.  (a)  The Borrower may (i) upon at least one Domestic Business Days notice to the Agent to be received no later than 10:30 A.M. (New York City time), prepay any Base Rate Loans and (ii) upon at least three Euro-Dollar Business Days notice to the Agent, prepay any Euro-Dollar Loans, in whole or in part, in amounts aggregating $15,000,000 or any larger multiple of $1,000,000 in the case of partial prepayments, by paying the principal amount to be prepaid together with accrued interest thereon to the date of prepayment.  Each such optional prepayment shall be applied to prepay ratably the relevant Loans of the several Lenders.  Prepayment of a Euro-Dollar Loan on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto shall be subject to Section 2.12.
Prepayments
 
(b)
 
In the event and on each occasion that, after the making of the Loans hereunder on the Closing Date (or prior thereto if any required reduction of the Commitments shall be deferred pursuant to the first proviso in Section 2.06(d)), any Net Proceeds are received by or on behalf of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries in respect of any Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event, (i) the Borrower shall, on the date of
 
 
 
24
 
 
 
such receipt, deliver to the Agent a notice thereof setting forth the nature of such Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event and the amount of such Net Proceeds (together with a reasonably detailed calculation thereof) and (ii) within three Domestic Business Days after such Net Proceeds are received, the Borrower shall prepay Loans in an amount equal to such Net Proceeds (or, if less, the aggregate amount of the Loans then outstanding); that in the case of any Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event described in clause (c) of the definition of such term, (x) such prepayment shall only be required in an amount equal to the amount by which the Net Proceeds of all Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Events described in such clause (c) occurring since August 19, 2012, exceeds $300,000,000 and (y) if the Borrower shall, in such notice to the Agent, state that the Borrower intends to cause such Net Proceeds from such Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event (or a portion thereof specified in such notice) to be applied, or committed to be applied, within 180 days after receipt of such Net Proceeds to acquire, construct, improve, upgrade or repair assets (other than cash or cash equivalents) to be used in the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, or to consummate any business acquisition by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, then the amount of the prepayment required to be made under this Section 2.10(b) on account of such Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Event shall be reduced by the amount of the Net Proceeds specified by the Borrower in such notice as intended to be so reinvested; , that if any such Net Proceeds have not been so applied, or committed to be applied under one or more legally binding agreements, by the end of such 180-day period, or if such Net Proceeds shall have been so committed to be applied by the end of such 180-day period but shall not have been so applied within 270 days after they shall have been received (except for the application of Net Proceeds so committed to be applied that arise from any casualty, condemnation or similar event or any related insurance, which shall not be subject to such 270-day period), then, not later than the last day of such 180-day period (or such 270-day period, as the case may be), the Borrower shall provide to the Agent written notice thereof and on the first Domestic Business Day following the end of such 180-day (or 270-day) period, the Borrower shall prepay Loans in an amount equal to such Net Proceeds that have not been so applied  (or, if less, the aggregate amount of the Loans then outstanding).
provided
provided
 
(c)
 
Upon receipt of a notice of prepayment pursuant to this Section 2.10, the Agent shall promptly notify each Lender of the contents thereof and of such Lenders ratable share of such prepayment, and such notice shall not thereafter be revocable by the Borrower.
 
SECTION 2.11.
 
.  (a)  The Borrower shall make each payment of principal of, and interest on, the Loans and fees hereunder, not later than 12:00 Noon (New York City time) on the date when due, in Federal or other funds immediately available in New York City, to the Agent at its address referred to in its Administrative Questionnaire, without set-off or counterclaim.  The Agent will promptly distribute to each Lender its ratable share of each such payment received by the Agent for the account of the Lenders.  Whenever any payment of principal of, or interest on, any Base Rate Loans or fees shall be due on a day which is not a Domestic Business Day, the date for payment thereof shall be extended to the next succeeding Domestic Business Day.  Whenever any payment of principal of, or interest on, the Euro-Dollar Loans shall be due on a day which is not a Euro-Dollar Business Day, the date for
General Provisions as to Payments
 
 
 
25
 
 
 
payment thereof shall be extended to the next succeeding Euro-Dollar Business Day unless such Euro-Dollar Business Day falls in another calendar month or falls after the Maturity Date, in which case the date for payment thereof shall be the next preceding Euro-Dollar Business Day.  If the date for any payment of principal is extended by operation of law or otherwise, interest thereon shall be payable for such extended time.
 
(b)
 
Unless the Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Lenders that the Borrower will not make such payment in full, the Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment in full to the Agent on such date and the Agent may, in reliance upon such assumption, cause to be distributed to each Lender on such due date an amount equal to the amount then due such Lender.  If and to the extent that the Borrower shall not have so made such payment, each Lender shall repay to the Agent forthwith on demand such amount distributed to such Lender together with interest thereon, for each day from the date such amount is distributed to such Lender until the date such Lender repays such amount to the Agent, at the Federal Funds Rate.
 
(c)
 
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this Section 2.11(c) shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary (as to which the provisions of this Section 2.11(c) shall apply).  The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
 
SECTION 2.12.
 
.  If the Borrower makes any payment of principal with respect to any Euro-Dollar Loan or any Euro-Dollar Loan is converted to a Base Rate Loan (pursuant to Section 2.09, Section 2.10, Article VI or Article VIII) on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto or the end of an applicable period fixed pursuant to Section 2.07(c), or if any Lender assigns any Euro-Dollar Loan as required by Section 8.06 on any day other than the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto, or if the Borrower fails to borrow or prepay any Euro-Dollar Loan after notice has been given to any Lender in accordance with Section 2.03(a) or Section 2.10, the Borrower shall reimburse each Lender within 15 days after demand for
Funding Losses
 
 
 
26
 
 
 
any resulting loss or expense incurred by it (or by an existing or prospective Participant in the related Loan), including any loss reasonably incurred in obtaining, liquidating or employing deposits from third parties, but excluding loss of margin for the period after such payment or conversion or assignment or failure to borrow or prepay; that such Lender shall have delivered to the Borrower a certificate as to the amount of such loss or expense with an explanation of the calculation of such loss or expense, which certificate shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith.
provided
 
SECTION 2.13.
 
.  Interest based on the Prime Rate hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year) and paid for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  All other interest and commitment fees hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and paid for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
Computation of Interest and Fees
 
SECTION 2.14.
 
.  For each day for which a Lender is required to maintain reserves in respect of either (x)  (as defined in all regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System) or (y) any other category of liabilities which includes deposits by reference to which the interest rate on Euro-Dollar Loans is determined or any category of extensions of credit or other assets which includes loans by a non-United States office of any Lender to United States residents, such Lender may require the Borrower to pay, contemporaneously with each payment of interest on the Euro-Dollar Loans, additional interest on the related Euro-Dollar Loan of such Lender at a rate per annum determined by such Lender up to but not exceeding the excess of (i) (A) the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate divided by (B) one the Euro-Dollar Reserve Percentage over (ii) the applicable London Interbank Offered Rate.  Any Lender wishing to require payment of such additional interest (x) shall so notify the Borrower and the Agent, in which case such additional interest on the Euro-Dollar Loans of such Lender shall be payable to such Lender at the place indicated in such notice with respect to each Interest Period commencing at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days after the giving of such notice and (y) shall notify the Borrower at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days prior to each date on which interest is payable on the Euro-Dollar Loans of the amount then due to such Lender under this Section.  Such Lenders notice to the Borrower shall set forth its calculation of such additional interest and such calculation shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith.
Regulation D Compensation
Eurocurrency Liabilities
minus
 
SECTION 2.15.
 
.  Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
Defaulting Lenders
 
(a)
 
commitment fees shall cease to accrue on the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.08(a); and
 
(b)
 
the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether the Required Lenders or any other requisite Lenders have taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment, waiver or other modification pursuant to Section 9.04); that any amendment, waiver or other
provided
 
 
 
27
 
 
 
modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or all Lenders affected thereby shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender in accordance with the terms hereof.
 
 
 
SECTION 3.01.
 
.  This Agreement shall become effective on the date that all of the following conditions shall have been satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.04):
Effectiveness
 
(a)
 
The Agent shall have received from each of the parties hereto either (i) a counterpart hereof signed by such party or (ii) facsimile transmission or other written confirmation, in form satisfactory to the Agent, confirming that a counterpart hereof has been signed by such party.
 
(b)
 
 The Agent shall have received all documents it shall reasonably have requested relating to the existence and good standing of the Borrower and to the Borrowers corporate power and authority to enter into, borrow under and perform its obligations under this Agreement, all in form and substance satisfactory to the Agent.
 
(c)
 
The Agent shall have received a certificate of a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower either (i) setting forth the Net Proceeds received by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries from any Commitment Reduction/Prepayment Events that shall have occurred after August 19, 2012, and on or prior to the date hereof or (ii) confirming that no such Net Proceeds have been received.
 
The Agent shall promptly notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date and such notice shall be conclusive and binding on all parties hereto.
 
SECTION 3.02.
 
.  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans hereunder are subject to receipt of a Notice of Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.02 and to the satisfaction (or waiver in accordance with Section 9.04) of the following conditions:
Closing Date
 
(a)
 
This Agreement shall have become effective as provided in Section 3.01.
 
(b)
 
 The Agent shall have received opinions of William C. Baskin III, Esq., counsel to the Borrower, Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP, special counsel to the Borrower, and Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, Pennsylvania counsel to the Borrower, in each case given upon the Borrowers express instructions, substantially in the forms of Exhibits C-1, C-2 and C-3 hereto, respectively.
 
(c)
 
The Agent shall have received a certificate signed by the Chief Financial Officer or the Vice President, Finance, of the Borrower, dated the Closing Date, confirming the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in clauses (g), (j) and (k) of this Section 3.02.
 
 
 
28
 
 
 
(d)
 
The Agent shall have received a solvency certificate signed by the Chief Financial Officer of the Borrower in form attached hereto as Exhibit D.
 
(e)
 
All fees, reasonable out-of-pocket expenses and other compensation required by the Commitment Letter or the Fee Letter referred to therein to be paid to the Arrangers, the Agent or the Lenders shall have been paid to the extent due and, in the case of expenses, invoiced at least two Domestic Business Days prior to the Closing Date.
 
(f)
 
The Arrangers shall have received  (a) audited consolidated balance sheets and related audited statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows of the Borrower and the Acquired Company for each of the three fiscal years most recently ended at least 60 days prior to the Closing Date (and the audit reports for such financial statements shall not be subject to any qualification or going concern disclosures) and (b) unaudited consolidated balance sheets and related unaudited statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows of the Borrower and the Acquired Company for each subsequent fiscal quarter ended at least 45 days prior to the Closing Date; that the filing of financial statements complying with the foregoing requirements on Form 10-K or Form 10-Q, as the case may be, by the Borrower or the Acquired Company will satisfy the applicable conditions set forth in this Section 3.02(f).  The Arrangers and the Lenders acknowledge the receipt of each of the Borrowers and the Acquired Companys Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, and Form 10-Qs for the quarterly periods ended March 31, 2012 and June 30, 2012 (each of which are deemed to have been delivered by or on behalf of the Borrower)
provided
 
(g)
 
The Merger shall have been consummated, or substantially concurrently with the making of Loans hereunder shall be consummated, in each case pursuant to and on the terms set forth in the Merger Agreement and without giving effect to amendments, supplements, waivers or other modifications to the Merger Agreement as originally executed (other than waivers by the Acquired Company) that are materially adverse to the Lenders and that have not been approved by the Arrangers.  There shall have been no material change in the terms of the Merger Agreement as originally executed
arising from any issue as to the accuracy of any representation or warranty of the Borrower in the Merger Agreement as originally executed or any condition related thereto that has not been approved by the Arrangers.
 
(h)
 
The Borrower shall have obtained (a) a public rating of the Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower from Moodys and (b) a public rating of the Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower from S&P, in each case taking into account the Transactions.
 
(i)
 
The Acquired Company Merger Agreement Representations shall be true and correct on and as of the Closing Date (but this condition shall apply only to the extent that the Borrower has the right under the Merger Agreement not to consummate the Merger, or to terminate the Borrowers obligations under the Merger Agreement, as a result of such Acquired Company Merger Agreement Representations not being true and correct), and the Agent shall have received a copy of the certificate delivered by the
 
 
 
29
 
 
 
Acquired Company pursuant to Section 9.02(c) of the Merger Agreement, if such certificate is so delivered.
 
(j)
 
The Specified Representations shall be true and correct on and as of the Closing Date.
 
(k)
 
No Event of Default referred to in Section 6.01(a), 6.01(b), 6.01(c) (insofar as such Event of Default arises from the failure by the Borrower to observe or perform any covenant contained in Section 5.03, 5.05 or 5.10), 6.01(d) (insofar as such Event of Default arises from the failure by the Borrower to observe or perform the covenant contained in Section 5.04), 6.01(f), 6.01(g) or 6.01(h) shall have occurred and be continuing or would result from the making of the Loans on the Closing Date.
 
(l)
 
The Borrower shall have used commercially reasonable efforts to cause the Senior Notes Issuance to occur prior to the Closing Date.  The Borrower shall have used commercially reasonable efforts to (i) deliver to the Financial Institutions  a complete printed preliminary prospectus supplement or preliminary offering memorandum or preliminary private placement memorandum that is suitable for use in a customary road show relating to the Senior Notes Issuance that contains (or incorporates by reference) all financial statements (including all audited financial statements, all unaudited financial statements (which shall have been reviewed by the independent accountants for the Borrower or the Acquired Business, as applicable, as provided in Statement on Auditing Standards No. 100) and all pro forma financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States and prepared in accordance with Regulation S-X and all other data (including selected financial data), in each case that the Securities and Exchange Commission would require in a registration statement on Form S-3 for a registered offering of the Borrowers senior notes or that would be necessary for the Financial Institutions to receive customary comfort letters (including negative assurance comfort letters) from the independent auditors of the Borrower and the Acquired Business) and such disclosure as is necessary for outside counsel of the Borrower to render customary opinions and negative assurance letters, in each case in connection with the Senior Notes Issuance and (ii) if requested by the Financial Institutions, cause the senior management and representatives of the Borrower to participate in a customary road show for any registered offering or private placement in connection therewith.
 
(m)
 
On or prior to the Closing Date, the Acquired Companys existing Credit Agreement dated as of June 22, 2011, as amended, shall have been terminated and all amounts outstanding, accrued or otherwise owing thereunder shall have been paid.
 
(n)
 
Except as disclosed in any publicly available Company SEC Document (as defined in the Merger Agreement ) filed after December 31, 2011, and before August 19, 2012, in the Acquired Companys annual report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, or in Acquired or (ii) as set forth in the Company Disclosure Schedule (as defined in the Merger Agreement ), there shall not have been any event, change,
as originally executed
the
Companys proxy statement for the 2011 meeting of the Acquired Companys shareholders
as originally executed
 
 
 
30
 
 
 
effect, development or occurrence that has had or would reasonably be expected to have an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect.
 
(o)
 
The Arrangers shall have received at least three Domestic Business Days prior to the Closing Date all documentation and other information required by bank regulatory authorities under applicable know-your-customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA Patriot Act, to the extent requested of the Borrower in writing not fewer than eight Domestic Business Days prior to the Closing Date.
 
 
 
The Borrower represents and warrants as follows (a) in the case of clause (i) of the first sentence of Section 4.01 and Sections 4.02 except insofar as the representation in Section 4.02 relates to the consummation of any Transaction other than the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of this Agreement, 4.03 and 4.04(a) through 4.04(c) below, on and as of the date hereof, and (b) in the case of Sections 4.01 through 4.12 below, on and as of the Closing Date, both before and immediately after giving effect to the Transactions to occur on the Closing Date:
(
)
SECTION 4.01.
 
.  The Borrower (i) is a corporation duly incorporated, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, and (ii) has all corporate powers required to carry on its business as now conducted.  Each of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries has all governmental licenses, authorizations, consents and approvals required to carry on its business as now conducted, the failure to obtain which would, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on the Borrowers ability to perform its obligations hereunder or on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
Corporate Existence and Power
 
SECTION 4.02.
 
.  The execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of this Agreement, and the consummation by the Borrower of the other Transactions, are within its corporate powers, have been (or, in the case of such other Transactions, will by the Closing Date have been) duly authorized by all necessary corporate action, require no action by or in respect of, or advance filing with, any governmental body, agency or official (other than actions or filings that have been, or will when required have been, taken or made) and do not contravene, or constitute a default under, (i) any provision of the certificate of incorporation or by-laws of the Borrower, (ii) any applicable law or regulation or any judgment, injunction, order or decree binding upon the Borrower, or (iii) any material financial agreement or instrument of the Borrower.
Corporate and Governmental Authorization; No Contravention
 
SECTION 4.03.
 
.  This Agreement constitutes a valid and binding agreement of the Borrower and each Note, when executed and delivered in accordance with this Agreement, will constitute a valid and binding obligation of the Borrower, in each case enforceable in accordance with its terms except as may be limited
Binding Effect
 
 
 
31
 
 
 
by bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors rights generally and by general principles of equity.
 
SECTION 4.04.
 
.  (a)  The Borrower has heretofore furnished to the Agent, for distribution to each of the Lenders, the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower as of December 31, 2011, March 31, 2012, and June 30, 2012, and related consolidated statements of cash flows, income and retained earnings of the Borrower for the twelve-month, three-month and six-month periods, respectively, then ended.  Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the consolidated financial position and results of operations and cash flows of the Borrower as of such date and for such period, in accordance with GAAP.
Financial Information
 
(b)
 
All pro forma financial statements delivered by the Borrower to the Arrangers, the Agent or the Lenders in connection with the Transactions (i) have been prepared by the Borrower in good faith, based on the assumptions believed by the Borrower on the date hereof to be reasonable and (ii) present fairly, in all material respects, the pro forma consolidated financial condition and the pro forma consolidated results of operations of the Borrower as of and for the dates and periods to which they relate as if the Transactions had occurred at the beginnings of such periods.
 
(c)
 
The projected financial statements delivered by the Borrower to the Arrangers and the Agent in connection with the Transactions have been prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed by the Borrower to be reasonable at the time such projected financial statements were delivered (it being understood that Projections are subject to significant uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond the Borrowers control, and that no assurance can be given that Projections will be realized).
 
(d)
 
Since December 31, 2011, there has not been nor is there reasonably likely to be any material adverse change in the business, assets, operations or condition (financial or otherwise) of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole; that the charges and other information disclosed in the Disclosure Documents and the Acquired Companys Disclosure Documents shall be deemed not to constitute any such material adverse change.
provided
 
SECTION 4.05.
 
.  Except as disclosed in the Disclosure Documents and the Acquired Companys Disclosure Documents, there is no action, suit or proceeding pending against, or to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened against or affecting, the Borrower or its Consolidated Subsidiaries before any court or arbitrator or any governmental body, agency or official, whether in connection with the Transactions or otherwise, in which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse decision which could materially adversely affect the business, consolidated financial position or consolidated results of operations of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries taken as a whole or which in any manner draws into question the validity of this Agreement.
Litigation
 
SECTION 4.06.
 
.  Each member of the ERISA Group has fulfilled its obligations under the minimum funding standards of ERISA and the Internal Revenue Code with respect to each Plan and is not in violation of the
Compliance with ERISA
 
 
 
32
 
 
 
presently applicable provisions of ERISA and the Internal Revenue Code where such violation would have a material adverse effect on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, and has not incurred any material liability to the PBGC or a Plan under Title IV of ERISA; that this Section 4.06 applies to the members of the ERISA Group only in their capacity as employers and not in any other capacity (such as fiduciaries or service providers to Plans for the benefit of employers of others).
provided
 
SECTION 4.07.
 
.  (a)  Each of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries has complied in all material respects with all applicable laws and material agreements binding upon it, except where any failure to comply therewith would not individually or collectively have a material adverse effect on the Borrowers ability to perform its obligations hereunder, and except where necessity of compliance therewith is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings; , , that the sole representation and warranty with respect to compliance with ERISA is limited to Section 4.06.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements
provided
however
 
(b)
 
None of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, any director, officer, agent, employee or Affiliate of the Borrower, is currently the subject of any sanctions administered by OFAC that could materially adversely affect the business, consolidated financial position or consolidated results of operations of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries taken as a whole.  No part of the proceeds of the Loans will be used, directly or indirectly, or otherwise made available to any Person (A) in violation of the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977 or (B) for the purpose of financing the activities of any Person currently the subject of any United States sanctions administered by OFAC.  To the extent applicable, the Borrower and each of its Subsidiaries is in compliance in all material respects with the USA Patriot Act.
 
SECTION 4.08.
 
.  The Borrower is not an investment company or a company controlled by an investment company within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended.
Investment Company Act
 
SECTION 4.09.
 
.  None of the Disclosure Documents or any other information furnished in writing by or on behalf of the Borrower to the Agent or any Lender for purposes of or in connection with this Agreement (in each case taken as a whole with all other information so furnished) contained, as of the time it was furnished, any material misstatement of fact or omitted as of such time to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein taken as a whole not materially misleading in the light of the circumstances under which they were made; that with respect to information consisting of statements, estimates, projections and other forward looking information (collectively, the ), the Borrower represents only that such information has been prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed in good faith by the Borrower to be reasonable at the time of preparation thereof (it being understood that the Projections are subject to significant uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond the Borrowers control, and that no assurance can be given that the Projections will be realized); that, with respect to
Full Disclosure
provided
Projections
provided
further
 
 
 
33
 
 
 
any such information relating to the Acquired Business, the representations set forth in this Section are made to the best of the Borrowers knowledge.
 
SECTION 4.10.
 
.  The Borrower has filed or caused to be filed all United States Federal income tax returns and all other material tax returns required to be filed by it and has paid or caused to be paid all material taxes required to have been paid by it, except taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which the Borrower has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP.
Taxes
 
SECTION 4.11.
 
  Neither the Borrower nor any of its Subsidiaries is engaged or will engage, principally or as one of its important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U.  Not more than 25% of the value of the assets subject to any restrictions on the sale, pledge or other disposition of assets under this Agreement or any other agreement to which any Lender or Affiliate of a Lender is party will at any time be represented by margin stock (as defined in Regulation U).
Federal Reserve Regulations.
 
SECTION 4.12.
 
.  Immediately after giving effect to the Merger on the Closing Date, (a) the fair value of the property of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, will be greater than the total amount of liabilities, including contingent liabilities, of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, (b) the present fair saleable value of the assets of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on their debts, on a consolidated basis, as they become absolute and matured, (c) the capital of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, is not unreasonably small in relation to their collective businesses, taken as a whole, as now conducted and as proposed to be conducted immediately following the Closing Date, and (d) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, on a consolidated basis, do not intend to incur, or believe that they will incur, on or immediately following the Closing Date, debts, including current obligations, beyond their ability to pay such debts as they become absolute and matured.  For the purposes of this Section 4.12, (i) the amount of any contingent liability at any time shall be computed as the amount that, in the light of all the facts and circumstances existing at such time, represents the amount that can reasonably be expected to become an actual or matured liability and (ii) it is assumed that the Indebtedness and the other obligations incurred under and in connection with this Agreement will come due at maturity.
Solvency
 
 
 
The Borrower agrees that, so long as any Lender has any Commitment or any Loan is outstanding hereunder:
 
SECTION 5.01.
 
.  The Borrower will deliver to the Agent, for delivery by the Agent to each of the Lenders:
Information
 
 
 
34
 
 
 
(a)
 
as soon as available and in any event within 105days after the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, the consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower as of the end of such fiscal year and the related consolidated statements of earnings and of cash flows for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on in a manner acceptable to the Securities and Exchange Commission and audited by KPMG LLP or other independent public accountants of nationally recognized standing;
 
 
(b)
 
as soon as available and in any event within 55 days after the end of each of the first three quarters of each fiscal year of the Borrower, its Form 10-Q as of the end of such quarter;
 
(c)
 
simultaneously with the delivery of each set of financial statements referred to in Sections 5.01(a) and 5.01(b), a certificate of a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower (i) stating whether any Default exists on the date of such certificate and, if any Default then exists, setting forth the details thereof and the action which the Borrower is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto and (ii) setting forth calculations demonstrating compliance, as of the date of the most recent balance sheet included in the financial statements being furnished at such time, with the covenants set forth in Sections 5.03 and 5.04(e);
 
(d)
 
within five days after any officer of the Borrower obtains knowledge of any Default (other than one resulting from a failure to perform the covenant contained in paragraph (i) of this Section 5.01), if such Default is then continuing, a certificate of a Responsible Financial Officer of the Borrower setting forth the details thereof and the action which the Borrower is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto;
 
(e)
 
promptly upon the mailing thereof to the shareholders of the Borrower generally, copies of all financial statements and reports, and proxy statements so mailed;
 
(f)
 
promptly following a request therefor, any documentation or other information that a Lender reasonably requests in order to comply with its ongoing obligations under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA Patriot Act;
 
(g)
 
from time to time such additional publicly available information regarding the financial position or business of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries as the Agent, at the request of any Lender, may reasonably request;
 
(h)
 
prompt written notice after the occurrence of (i) any Reportable Event that, alone or together with any other Reportable Events that have occurred, or (ii) a failure to make a required installment or other payment (within the meaning of Section 412(n)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code) that, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower to the PBGC or to a Plan in an aggregate amount exceeding $50,000,000; and
 
(i)
 
 promptly after Moodys, Fitch or S&P shall have announced a change in the rating established for the Senior Unsecured Debt of the Borrower, written notice of such rating change.
 
 
 
35
 
 
 
Information required to be delivered pursuant to this Section shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date on which the Borrower provides notice to the Lenders that such information has been posted on the Borrowers website on the Internet at or at ; that the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of the information referred to in this Section after the date delivery is required thereunder to any Lender which requests such delivery within five Domestic Business Days after such request.
http://www.aetna.com
http://www.sec.gov
provided
 
SECTION 5.02.
 
.  The Borrower will preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect, and will cause each Material Subsidiary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect, its respective corporate existence; that the foregoing shall not prohibit (i) the termination of the existence of any Material Subsidiary if the surviving entity (in the case of any such termination resulting from a merger or consolidation) or the entity to which substantially all such Material Subsidiarys assets are transferred (in the case of any other such termination) is or becomes a Material Subsidiary or is the Borrower or (ii) any transaction involving the Borrower in accordance with Section 5.05.  The Borrower will also maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies, insurance (including self insurance), if reasonably available, in such amounts and against such risks as are customarily maintained by companies engaged in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations.
Conduct of Business and Maintenance of Existence and Insurance
provided
 
SECTION 5.03.
 
.  The Leverage Ratio as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Borrower ending after the date hereof will not exceed 0.50 to 1.00.
Leverage Ratio
 
SECTION 5.04.
 
.  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Consolidated Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness secured by any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, except:
Liens
 
(a)
 
any Indebtedness secured by a Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary existing on the date hereof; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only the Indebtedness which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
 
(b)
 
any Indebtedness secured by a Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary after the date hereof prior to the time such Person becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary; that (i) such Indebtedness and Lien are not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Consolidated Subsidiary, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only the Indebtedness which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person
provided
 
 
 
36
 
 
 
becomes a Consolidated Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
 
(c)
 
any Indebtedness secured by purchase money security interests in property or assets or improvements thereto hereafter acquired (or, in the case of improvements, constructed) by the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary; that (i) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred within 180 days of such acquisition (or construction), (ii) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the lesser of the cost or the fair market value of such property or assets or improvements at the time of such acquisition (or construction) and (iii) such security interests do not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary;
provided
 
(d)
 
any capitalized lease obligations secured by Liens; that such Liens do not extend to any property of the Borrower or its Consolidated Subsidiaries other than the property subject to the relevant capital lease; and
provided
 
(e)
 
Indebtedness secured by Liens that are not otherwise permitted by any of the foregoing provisions of this Section 5.04; that, at the time that any such Indebtedness is incurred or that any such Lien is granted (and after giving effect thereto), the aggregate outstanding principal amount of all Indebtedness secured by Liens permitted by this Section 5.04(e) shall not exceed 10% of the consolidated shareholders equity of the Borrower (i) as of December 31, 2011, until the first consolidated financial statements of the Borrower are delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) and, thereafter, (ii) as of the most recent date for which a consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower has been delivered to the Agent pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b), determined in accordance with GAAP.
provided
 
SECTION 5.05.
 
.  The Borrower will not consolidate or merge with or into any other corporation or convey or transfer (or permit the conveyance or transfer of) all or substantially all of the properties and assets of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries to any other Person unless (i) the surviving or acquiring entity is a corporation organized under the laws of one of the United States, (ii) the surviving or acquiring corporation, if other than the Borrower, expressly assumes the performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement and all Notes, and (iii) immediately after giving effect to such transaction, no Default shall exist.
Consolidations, Mergers and Sales of Assets
 
SECTION 5.06.
 
.  The Borrower will not use proceeds of the Loans other than to finance the payment of the cash consideration payable under the Merger Agreement upon the consummation of the Merger and to pay fees and expenses incurred in connection with the Transactions.
Use of Proceeds
 
SECTION 5.07.
 
.  The Borrower will comply, and will cause its Consolidated Subsidiaries to comply, in all material respects with all applicable laws, except where any failure to comply therewith would not individually or collectively have a material adverse effect on the Borrowers ability to perform its obligations hereunder, and except where the necessity of compliance therewith is being
Compliance with Laws
 
 
 
37
 
 
 
contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings; , , that with respect to compliance with ERISA, this Section 5.07 applies to the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries only in their respective capacities as employers and not in any other capacity (such as a fiduciary or service provider to Plans for the benefit of employers of others).
provided
however
 
SECTION 5.08.
 
.  The Borrower will keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries (in all material respects) in conformity with GAAP shall be made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities.  The Borrower will permit representatives of any Lender at such Lenders expense to visit and inspect the Borrowers financial records and properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records and to discuss its affairs and financial condition with the Borrowers officers and (with the participation of or prior notice to such officers) independent public accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested.
Inspection of Property, Books and Records
 
SECTION 5.09.
 
.  The Borrower will, and will cause each of its Consolidated Subsidiaries to, pay its tax liabilities and other material obligations, before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) (i) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and (ii) the Borrower or such Consolidated Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP or (b) the failure to make such payments could not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Borrowers ability to perform its obligations hereunder or on the financial condition of the Borrower and its Consolidated Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
Payment of Obligations
 
SECTION 5.10.
.  The Borrower will not make any Restricted Payment, except that (a) the Borrower may pay dividends with respect to its common stock payable solely in additional common stock, (b) the Borrower may repurchase Equity Interests upon the exercise of stock options, stock appreciation rights or stock units outstanding under employee benefit plans if such Equity Interests represent a portion of the exercise price of such stock options, stock appreciation rights or stock units, (c) the Borrower may make cash payments in lieu of the issuance of fractional shares representing insignificant interests in the Borrower in connection with the exercise of warrants, stock options, stock appreciation rights or stock units outstanding under employee benefit plans or other securities convertible into or exchangeable for shares of common stock in the Borrower, (d) the Borrower may declare and pay regularly scheduled cash dividends with respect to its Equity Interests (and corresponding dividends or dividend equivalents paid with respect to stock units outstanding under employee benefit plans), (e) the Borrower may repurchase shares of its common stock pursuant to repurchase programs announced by the Borrower for aggregate consideration not to exceed $2,500,000,000 and (f) the Borrower may declare and pay special cash dividends with respect to its common stock in an aggregate amount not to exceed $1,000,000,000.
Restricted Payments
 
 
 
38
 
 
 
 
SECTION 6.01.
 
.  If one or more of the following events () shall have occurred and be continuing:
Events of Default
Events of Default
 
(a)
 
the Borrower shall fail to pay when due any principal on any Loan;
 
(b)
 
the Borrower shall fail to pay within five Domestic Business Days of the date when due any fees or any interest on any Loan;
 
(c)
 
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant contained in Section 5.01(d), 5.03, 5.05 or 5.10;
 
(d)
 
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform, in any material respect, any covenant or agreement contained in this Agreement (other than those covered by Sections 6.01(a), 6.01(b) or 6.01(c) above) and such failure shall have continued for a period of 30 days after written notice thereof has been given to the Borrower by the Agent at the request of any Lender;
 
(e)
 
any representation, warranty, certification or statement made by the Borrower in this Agreement or in any certificate, financial statement or other document delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made (or deemed made);
 
(f)
 
the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest) in respect of any indebtedness for borrowed money having an outstanding principal amount of $100,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) or more, when and as the same shall become due and payable; or any event or condition occurs that results in any outstanding indebtedness for borrowed money of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary having an outstanding principal amount of $100,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) or more becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity, or that enables or permits the holder or holders of such indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause such indebtedness to become due prior to its scheduled maturity;
 
(g)
 
the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary shall commence a voluntary case or other proceeding seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief with respect to itself or its debts under any bankruptcy, insolvency or other similar law now or hereafter in effect or seeking the appointment of a trustee, receiver, liquidator, custodian or other similar official of it or all or substantially all of its property, or shall consent to any such relief or to the appointment of or taking possession by any such official in an involuntary case or other proceeding commenced against it, or shall make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or shall fail generally to pay its debts as they become due, or shall take any corporate action to authorize any of the foregoing;
 
(h)
 
an involuntary case or other proceeding shall be commenced against the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary seeking liquidation, reorganization or other
 
 
 
39
 
 
 
relief with respect to it or its debts under any bankruptcy, insolvency or other similar law now or hereafter in effect or seeking the appointment of a trustee, receiver, liquidator, custodian or other similar official of it or all or substantially all of its property, and such involuntary case or other proceeding shall remain undismissed and unstayed for a period of 60 days; or an order for relief shall be entered against the Borrower or any Material Subsidiary under the federal bankruptcy laws as now or hereafter in effect;
 
(i)
 
any person or group of persons (within the meaning of Section 13 or 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) shall have acquired beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 promulgated by the Securities and Exchange Commission under said Act) of more than 35% of the outstanding shares of common stock of the Borrower; or at any time Continuing Directors shall not constitute a majority of the board of directors of the Borrower;
 
(j)
 
one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $50,000,000 (or its equivalent in any other currency) shall be rendered against the Borrower, any Consolidated Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 60 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor to levy upon assets or properties of the Borrower or any Consolidated Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment; or
 
(k)
 
a Reportable Event or Reportable Events, or a failure to make a required installment or other payment (within the meaning of Section 412(n)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code), shall have occurred with respect to any Plan or Plans that reasonably could be expected to result in liability of the Borrower to the PBGC or to a Plan in an aggregate amount exceeding $50,000,000 and, within 30 days after the reporting of any such Reportable Event to the Agent, the Agent shall have notified the Borrower in writing that (i) the Required Lenders have made a determination that, on the basis of such Reportable Event or Reportable Events or the failure to make a required payment, there are reasonable grounds (A) for the termination of such Plan or Plans by the PBGC, (B) for the appointment by the appropriate United States District Court of a trustee to administer such Plan or Plans or (C) for the imposition of liens in an amount exceeding $25,000,000 in favor of a Plan and (ii) as a result thereof an Event of Default exists hereunder; or a trustee shall be appointed by a United States District Court to administer any such Plan or Plans; or the PBGC shall institute proceedings to terminate any Plan or Plans;
 
then (i) in any such event, if requested by Lenders holding more than 50% in aggregate principal amount of the Loans, the Agent shall by notice to the Borrower declare the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) to be, and the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) shall thereupon become, immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower, and (ii) in the case of any of the Events of Default specified in Section 6.01(g) or 6.01(h) above with respect to the Borrower, without any notice to the Borrower or any other act by the Agent or the Lenders, the Commitments shall thereupon terminate and the Loans (together with accrued interest thereon) shall become
 
 
 
40
 
 
 
immediately due and payable without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
 
SECTION 6.02.
 
.  The Agent shall give notice to the Borrower under Section 6.01(d) promptly upon being requested to do so by any Lender and shall thereupon notify all the Lenders thereof.
Notice of Default
 
SECTION 6.03.
 
.  The parties hereto agree that the absence of a right on the part of the Agent or the Lenders (other than as expressly set forth in Section 6.01) to terminate the Commitments prior to the funding of the Loans on the Closing Date as a result of the existence of an Event of Default shall not be construed as a waiver of (a) any condition precedent to the making of the Loans set forth in Article III or (b) any right on the part of the Agent or the Lenders to accelerate the maturity of the Loans as provided in Section 6.01 or to exercise any other remedy provided for herein or available under applicable law, it being the intent of the parties hereto that all such conditions, rights and remedies remain fully available to the Agent and the Lenders.
Preservation of Certain Rights and Remedies
 
 
 
SECTION 7.01.
 
.  Each Lender irrevocably appoints and authorizes the Agent to take such action as agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under this Agreement as are delegated to the Agent by the terms hereof, together with all such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
Appointment and Authorization
 
SECTION 7.02.
 
.  Goldman Sachs Bank USA, in its capacity as a Lender, shall have the same rights and powers under this Agreement as any other Lender and may exercise or refrain from exercising the same as though it were not the Agent, and Goldman Sachs Bank USA and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate of the Borrower as if it were not the Agent hereunder.
Agent and Affiliates
 
SECTION 7.03.
 
.  The obligations of the Agent hereunder are only those expressly set forth herein.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Agent shall not be required to take any action with respect to any Default, except as expressly provided in Article VI.
Action by Agent
 
SECTION 7.04.
 
.  The Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it and shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with the advice of such counsel, accountants or experts.
Consultation with Experts
 
SECTION 7.05.
 
.  Neither the Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents, or employees shall be liable to any Lender or Affiliate of a Lender for any action taken or not taken by it in connection herewith (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders or (ii) in the absence of its own gross
Liability of Agent
 
 
 
41
 
 
 
negligence or willful misconduct in performing its obligations hereunder as determined by a final and non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction.  Neither the Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents or employees shall be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain, inquire into or verify (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in connection with this Agreement or any Borrowing hereunder; (ii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants or agreements of the Borrower; (iii) the satisfaction of any condition specified in Article III, except receipt of items required to be delivered to the Agent; or (iv) the validity, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement or any other instrument or writing furnished in connection herewith.  The Agent shall not incur any liability by acting in reliance upon any notice, consent, certificate, statement, or other writing (which may be a bank wire, facsimile transmission or similar writing) reasonably believed by it to be genuine and to be signed by the proper party or parties.
 
SECTION 7.06.
 
.  Each Lender shall, severally and ratably in accordance with its Commitment (or outstanding Loans, if the Commitments have terminated), indemnify the Agent (to the extent not reimbursed by the Borrower) against any cost, expense (including counsel fees and disbursements), claim, demand, action, loss or liability (except such as result from the Agents gross negligence or willful misconduct as determined by a final and non-appealable judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction) that the Agent may suffer or incur in connection with this Agreement or any action taken or omitted by the Agent hereunder.
Indemnification
 
SECTION 7.07.
 
.  Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Agent or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Agent or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking any action under this Agreement.
Credit Decision
 
SECTION 7.08.
 
.  The Agent may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Lenders and the Borrower.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right to appoint a successor Agent approved by the Borrower (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld).  If no successor Agent shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and approved by the Borrower and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Agent gives notice of resignation, then the retiring Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders, appoint a successor Agent, which shall be a commercial bank organized or licensed under the laws of the United States of America or of any State thereof and having a combined capital and surplus of at least two billion dollars.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Agent hereunder by a successor Agent, such successor Agent shall thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights and duties of the retiring Agent, and the retiring Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder.  After any retiring Agents resignation hereunder as Agent, the provisions of this Article shall inure to its benefit as to any actions taken or omitted to be taken by it while it was Agent.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event no successor shall have been so appointed and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Agent gives
Successor Agent
 
 
 
42
 
 
 
notice of its intent to resign, the retiring Agent may give notice of the effectiveness of its resignation to the Lenders and the Borrower, whereupon, on the date of effectiveness of such resignation stated in such notice, (a) the retiring Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder and under the other Credit Documents and (b) the Required Lenders shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Agent; that (i) all payments required to be made hereunder to the Agent for the account of any Person other than the Agent shall be made directly to such Person and (ii) all notices and other communications required or contemplated to be given or made to the Agent shall also directly be given or made to each Lender.
provided
 
SECTION 7.09.
 
.  The Borrower shall pay to the Agent, for its own account, fees in the amounts and at the times previously agreed upon between the Borrower and the Agent.
Agents Fees
 
SECTION 7.10.
 
.  The Agent may perform any and all of its duties and exercise any and all of its powers, rights and remedies under this Agreement by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by it.  The Agent and any such of its sub-agents may perform any and all of its duties and exercise any and all of its powers, rights and remedies by or through their respective Affiliates.  The exculpatory, indemnification and other provisions set forth in this Article VII and in Section 9.03 shall apply to any such sub-agent or Affiliate (and to their respective directors, officers, agents, or employees) as if they were named as the Agent.
Delegation of Duties
 
SECTION 7.11.
 
.  It is agreed that the Syndication Agent, Documentation Agents and Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Bookrunners named on the cover page of this Agreement shall, in their capacities as such, have no duties or responsibilities under this Agreement or liability in connection with this Agreement.  Neither the Agent nor any such Syndication Agent, Documentation Agent or Joint Lead Arranger and Joint Bookrunner, in its capacity as such, has or will be deemed to have any fiduciary relationship with any Lender.
Other Agents and Arrangers
 
 
 
SECTION 8.01.
 
.  If on or prior to the first day of any Interest Period for any Euro-Dollar Loan the Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that deposits in dollars (in the applicable amounts) are not generally available in the London interbank market for such period or that the London Interbank Offered Rate cannot be determined in accordance with the definition thereof, the Agent shall forthwith give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders, whereupon until the Agent notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension no longer exist, (i) the obligations of the Lenders to make Euro-Dollar Loans, to convert outstanding Base Rate Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans or to convert outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period shall be suspended, (ii) each outstanding Euro-Dollar Loan shall be converted into a Base Rate Loan on the last day of the then current Interest Period
Basis for Determining Interest Rate Inadequate or Unfair
 
 
 
43
 
 
 
applicable thereto, and (iii) unless the Borrower notifies the Agent at least two Domestic Business Days before the date of any Euro-Dollar Borrowing for which a Notice of Borrowing has previously been given that it elects not to borrow on such date, such Borrowing shall instead be made as a Base Rate Borrowing.
 
SECTION 8.02.
 
.  If, on or after the date of this Agreement, the adoption of any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change in any applicable law, rule or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such authority, central bank or comparable agency shall make it unlawful or impossible for any Lender (or its Euro-Dollar Lending Office) to make, maintain or fund its Euro-Dollar Loans and such Lender shall so notify the Agent, the Agent shall forthwith give notice thereof to the other Lenders and the Borrower, whereupon until such Lender notifies the Borrower and the Agent that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension no longer exist, the obligation of such Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans, or to convert outstanding Base Rate Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans, or to convert outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans into Euro-Dollar Loans with a different Interest Period shall be suspended.  Before giving any notice to the Agent pursuant to this Section 8.02, such Lender shall designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for giving such notice and will not, in the judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.  If such notice is given, all Euro-Dollar Loans of such Lender then outstanding shall be converted to Base Rate Loans either (a) on the last day of the then current Interest Period applicable to such Euro-Dollar Loans if such Lender may lawfully continue to maintain and fund such Loans to such day or (b) immediately if such Lender may not lawfully continue to maintain and fund such Loans to such day.
Illegality
 
SECTION 8.03.
 
.  (a)  If any applicable law, rule or regulation (including any treaty having the force of law), or any change in any applicable law, rule or regulation (including any treaty having the force of law), or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or compliance by any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) with any request or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any such Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency, made or adopted after the date hereof shall impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit (including any compulsory loan), insurance assessment or similar requirement (including any such requirement imposed by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, but excluding, with respect to any Euro-Dollar Loan, any such requirement with respect to which such Lender is entitled to compensation during the relevant Interest Period under Section 2.14) against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or shall impose on any Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) or on the United States market for certificates of deposit or the London interbank market any other condition, cost or expense (including any taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings on its Loans or participations in the foregoing, its Commitment or other obligations or its deposits,
Increased Cost and Reduced Return
 
 
 
44
 
 
 
reserves or other liabilities or capital attributable thereto, but excluding (i) Taxes, as defined in Section 8.04, (ii) taxes specifically excluded from the definition of Taxes in Section 8.04 and (iii) taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges and withholdings that (A) are imposed on such Lender by virtue of its inclusion in any category of  banks or financial institutions and (B) the amount of which is not a function, in whole or in part, of the amounts of loans, participations or commitments of the institutions subject thereto or of the funding thereof or the capital required to be maintained with respect thereto) and the result of any of the foregoing is to increase the cost to such Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office) of making, continuing, converting into or maintaining any Euro-Dollar Rate Loan or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender (or its Applicable Lending Office)  under this Agreement or under its Note with respect thereto, by an amount reasonably deemed by such Lender to be material, then, within 15 days after demand by such Lender (with a copy to the Agent), the Borrower shall pay to such Lender such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such increased cost or reduction.   Such Lenders notice to the Borrower and the Agent shall set forth an explanation of the foregoing in reasonable detail. 
 
(b)
 
If any Lender shall have determined that any applicable law, rule or regulation regarding capital adequacy or liquidity, or any change in any such law, rule or regulation, or any change in the interpretation or administration thereof by any Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or any request or directive regarding capital adequacy or liquidity (whether or not having the force of law) of any such Governmental Authority, central bank or comparable agency, made or adopted after the date hereof has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lenders capital or on the capital of such Lenders holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement, the Commitments of such Lender or the Loans made by, or participations in Loans held by, such Lender, to a level below that which such Lender or such Lenders holding company could otherwise have achieved (taking into consideration such Lenders policies and the policies of such Lenders holding company with respect to capital adequacy or liquidity), and the amount of such reduction is reasonably determined by such Lender to be material, then within 15 days of the Borrowers receipt of written demand by such Lender (with a copy to the Agent), the Borrower shall pay to such Lender such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such reduction in return.  Such Lenders notice to the Borrower and the Agent shall set forth an explanation of the foregoing in reasonable detail.
 
(c)
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Sections 8.03(a) and/or 8.03(b), (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States or foreign regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a change in law after the date of this Agreement, whether enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued before or after the date of this Agreement.
 
 
 
45
 
 
 
 
(d)
 
           Each Lender will promptly notify the Borrower and the Agent of any event of which it has knowledge, occurring after the date hereof (other than any event deemed to have occurred after the date hereof solely as a result of Section 8.03(c)), which will entitle such Lender to compensation pursuant to this Section 8.03 and will designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, such compensation and will not, in the judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.  Failure or delay on the part of any Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lenders right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or expenses incurred or reductions suffered as a result of any change in law more than 120 days prior to the date that such Lender, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the change in law giving rise to such increased costs or expenses or reductions and of such Lenders intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the change in law giving rise to any such increased costs or expenses or reductions is retroactive, then the 120-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.  A certificate of any Lender claiming compensation under Section 8.03(a) or 8.03(b) and setting forth the additional amount or amounts to be paid to it hereunder and describing the method of calculation thereof shall be conclusive if made reasonably and in good faith.  In determining such amount, such Lender may use any reasonable averaging and attribution methods.  Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Section 8.03, (i) no Lender shall be entitled to request compensation under this Section 8.03 for any costs imposed on such Lender under the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act or Basel III or any taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings unless it shall be the general policy of such Lender to seek compensation under comparable credit facilities with documentation under which it is entitled to such compensation, and (ii) no Lender shall be entitled to request compensation under this Section 8.03 in excess of the amount determined by it in good faith to represent the actual net cost, reduction in amounts received or reduction in return on capital referred to in Section 8.03(a) or 8.03(b), as the case may be, taking into account any tax or other benefits received by it in connection with such cost or reduction.
provided
provided
further
 
SECTION 8.04.
 
.  (a)  For purposes of this Section 8.04, the following terms have the following meanings:
Taxes
 
 means any and all present or future taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings with respect to any payment by the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement or under any Note, and all liabilities with respect thereto, (i) in the case of each Lender and the Agent, taxes imposed on its income, and franchise or similar taxes imposed on it, by a jurisdiction under the laws of which such Lender or the Agent (as the case may be) is organized or in which its principal executive office is located or, in the case of each Lender, in which its Applicable Lending Office is located, (ii) in the case of each Lender, any United States Federal withholding tax imposed on such payments but only to the extent that such Lender is subject to United States Federal withholding tax at the time such Lender first becomes a party to this Agreement and (iii) any United States Federal withholding tax imposed under FATCA.
Taxes
excluding
 
 
 
46
 
 
 
 means any present or future stamp or documentary taxes and any other excise or property taxes, or similar charges or levies, which arise from any payment made pursuant to this Agreement or under any Note or from the execution or delivery of, or otherwise with respect to, this Agreement or any Note.
Other Taxes
 
(b)
 
Any and all payments by the Borrower to or for the account of any Lender or the Agent hereunder or under any Note shall be made without deduction for any Taxes or Other Taxes; that, if a withholding agent shall be required by law to deduct any Taxes or Other Taxes from any such payments, (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section 8.04) such Lender or the Agent (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the withholding agent shall make such deductions, (iii) the withholding agent shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant taxation authority or other authority in accordance with applicable law, and (iv) the withholding agent shall furnish to the Agent, at the Agents address referred to in Section 9.01, the original or a certified copy of a receipt evidencing payment thereof.  Without prejudice to the rights of a Lender or Agent under Section 8.04(c), the Borrower shall timely pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority to the extent required by applicable law.
provided
 
(c)
 
The Borrower agrees to indemnify each Lender and the Agent for the full amount of Taxes or Other Taxes (including any Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted by any jurisdiction on amounts payable under this Section 8.04) paid by such Lender or the Agent (as the case may be) and any liability (including penalties, interest and expenses, except to the extent attributable to the negligence or misconduct of such Lender or the Agent, as the case may be) arising therefrom or with respect thereto.  This indemnification shall be made within 15 days from the date such Lender or the Agent (as the case may be) makes demand therefor.
 
(d)
 
Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Agent, within 15 days after demand therefor, for (i) any Taxes attributable to such Lender (but only to the extent that the Borrower has not already indemnified the Agent for such Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Borrower to do so), (ii) any taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings attributable to such Lenders failure to comply with the provisions of Section 9.05(e) relating to the maintenance of a Participant Register and (iii) any taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings (other than Taxes, as defined in Section 8.04(a) but without giving effect to clauses (i) and (ii) of the definition of such term, and Other Taxes)) attributable to such Lender, in each case, that are payable or paid by the Agent in connection with this Agreement or any Note, and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes or taxes, duties, levies, imposts, deductions, charges or withholdings were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority.  A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability delivered to any Lender by the Agent shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  Each Lender hereby authorizes the Agent to set off and apply any and all amounts at any time owing to such Lender under this Agreement or any Note or otherwise payable by the Agent to such Lender from any other source against any amount due to the Agent under this Section 8.04(d).
 
 
 
47
 
 
 
(e)
 
Each Lender that is not a United States Person within the meaning of Section 7701(a)(30) of the Internal Revenue Code, on or prior to the date of its execution and delivery of this Agreement in the case of each Lender listed on the signature pages hereof and on or prior to the date on which it becomes a Lender in the case of each other Lender, shall provide the Borrower and the Agent with (i) two Internal Revenue Service () forms W-8 BEN or any successor form prescribed by the IRS, certifying that such Lender is entitled to benefits under an income tax treaty to which the United States is a party which exempts such Lender from United States Federal withholding tax or reduces the rate of withholding tax on payments of interest and eliminates withholding tax on any fees, or (ii) two IRS forms W-8ECI or any successor form prescribed by the IRS, certifying that the income receivable pursuant to this Agreement is effectively connected with the conduct of a trade or business in the United States.  If the form provided by a Lender indicates a United States interest withholding tax rate in excess of zero, withholding tax at such rate shall be considered excluded from  as defined in Section 8.04(a).  Each such Lender undertakes to deliver to each of the Borrower and the Agent (A) a replacement form (or successor form) on or before the date that such form expires or becomes obsolete or after the occurrence of any event requiring a change in the most recent form so delivered by it, and (B) such amendments thereto or extensions or renewals thereof as may reasonably be required (but only so long as such Lender remains lawfully able to do so).
IRS
Taxes
 
(f)
 
If a payment made to a Lender under this Agreement or any Note would be subject to United States Federal withholding tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Borrower and the Agent at the time or times prescribed by law and at such other time or times reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Agent such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by the Borrower or the Agent as may be necessary for the Borrower and the Agent to comply with their obligations under FATCA and to determine that such Lender has complied with such Lenders obligations under FATCA or to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment.  Solely for purposes of this Section 8.04(f), the term FATCA shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the date of this Agreement.
 
(g)
 
For any period with respect to which a Lender has failed to provide the Borrower with the appropriate form pursuant to Section 8.04(e) (unless such failure is due to a change in treaty, law or regulation occurring subsequent to the date on which a form originally was required to be provided), such Lender shall not be entitled to indemnification under Section 8.04(c) or Section 8.04(d) with respect to Taxes imposed by the United States; that if a Lender, which is otherwise exempt from or subject to a reduced rate of withholding tax, becomes subject to Taxes because of its failure to deliver a form required hereunder, the Borrower shall take such steps as such Lender shall reasonably request to assist such Lender to recover such Taxes.
provided
 
(h)
 
Each Lender will promptly notify the Borrower and the Agent of any event of which it has knowledge, occurring after the date hereof, which will entitle such
 
 
 
48
 
 
 
Lender to make any claim for indemnification in respect of Taxes or Other Taxes pursuant to this Section 8.04 (each, a Tax Event) and will designate a different Applicable Lending Office if such designation will avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, such claim or any other amounts payable by the Borrower under this Section 8.04 and will not, in the judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.  Failure or delay on the part of any Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lenders right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender pursuant to this Section for any Taxes incurred more than 120 days prior to the date that such Lender notifies the Borrower of the event giving rise to such Taxes and of such Lenders intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if any change in law giving rise to such Taxes is retroactive, then the 120-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
 
SECTION 8.05.
 
.  If (i) the obligation of any Lender to make or maintain Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02 or (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03(a) and the Borrower shall, by at least five Euro-Dollar Business Days prior notice to such Lender through the Agent, have elected that the provisions of this Section shall apply to such Lender, then, unless and until such Lender notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such suspension or demand for compensation no longer apply:
Base Rate Loans Substituted for Affected Euro-Dollar Loans
 
(a)
 
all Loans which would otherwise be made by such Lender as (or continued as or converted into) Euro-Dollar Loans shall instead be Base Rate Loans, and
 
(b)
 
after each of its outstanding Euro-Dollar Loans has been repaid (or converted to a Base Rate Loan), all payments of principal which would otherwise be applied to repay such Euro-Dollar Loans shall be applied to repay its Base Rate Loans instead.
 
If such Lender notifies the Borrower that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer apply, the Borrower shall elect that the principal amount of each such Base Rate Loan shall be converted into a Euro-Dollar Loan on the first day of the next succeeding Interest Period applicable to the related Euro-Dollar Loans of the other Lenders.
 
SECTION 8.06.
 
.  If (i) the obligation of any Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02, (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03 or 8.04 or (iii) any Lender shall be a Defaulting Lender, the Borrower shall have the right to seek a substitute financial institution or financial institutions () (which may be one or more of the Lenders) to purchase the Loans or assume the Commitment of such Lender (the ) under this Agreement and, if the Borrower locates a Substitute Lender, the Affected Lender shall, upon payment to it of the purchase price agreed between it and the Substitute Lender (or, failing such agreement, a purchase price in the amount of the outstanding principal amount of its Loans and accrued interest thereon to the date of payment) plus any amount (other than principal and interest) then due to it or accrued for its account hereunder, assign all its rights and obligations under this
Substitution of Lender
Substitute Lenders
Affected Lender
 
 
 
49
 
 
 
Agreement and all of its Notes to the Substitute Lender, and the Substitute Lender shall assume such rights and obligations, whereupon the Substitute Lender shall be a Lender party to this Agreement and shall have all the rights and obligations of a Lender.
 
SECTION 8.07.
 
.  If during any Level I Period or Level II Period (i) the obligation of any Lender to make Euro-Dollar Loans has been suspended pursuant to Section 8.02, (ii) any Lender has demanded compensation under Section 8.03 or 8.04 or (iii) any Lender is a Defaulting Lender, the Borrower may elect to terminate this Agreement as to such Lender, and in connection therewith not to borrow any Loan hereunder from such Lender or to prepay any Base Rate Loan made pursuant to Section 8.02 or 8.05 (without altering the Commitments or Loans of the remaining Lenders); that the Borrower (i) notifies such Lender through the Agent of such election at least two Euro-Dollar Business Days before any date fixed for such borrowing or such a prepayment, as the case may be, and (ii) repays all of such Lenders outstanding Loans, accrued interest thereon and any other amounts then due to such Lender or accrued for its account hereunder concurrently with such termination.  Upon receipt by the Agent of such notice, the Commitment of such Lender shall terminate.
Election to Terminate
provided
 
 
 
SECTION 9.01.
 
.  (a)  Subject to Section 9.01(b), all notices, requests and other communications to any party hereunder shall be in writing (including bank wire, facsimile transmission or similar writing) and shall be given to such party:  (x) in the case of the Borrower or the Agent, at its address or facsimile number set forth on the signature pages hereof, (y) in the case of any Lender (other than Goldman Sachs Bank USA), at its address or facsimile number set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire or (z) in the case of any party, such other address or facsimile number as such party may hereafter specify for the purpose by notice to the Agent and the Borrower.  All notices from outside the United States to the Borrower shall only be given by facsimile transmission.  Each such notice, request or other communication shall be effective (i) if given by facsimile transmission, when such facsimile transmission is transmitted to the number determined pursuant to this Section and the appropriate answerback is received, (ii) if given by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, when such return receipt is signed by the recipient, (iii) if given by electronic communications pursuant to Section 9.01(b), when sent in accordance with procedures approved by the Agent or (iv) if given by any other means, when delivered at the address specified in this Section, or, if such delivery does not occur on a business day in the location where received, on the next business day in such location; that notices to the Agent under Article II or Article VIII shall not be effective until received; that if any notice, request or other communication given through means referred to in clauses (i) or (iii) of this sentence is not transmitted or sent, as the case may be, during normal business hours for the recipient, such notice, request or other communication  shall be deemed effective no earlier than at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient.
Notices
provided
provided
further
 
 
 
50
 
 
 
(b)
 
Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder (including the delivery of information required by Section 5.01) may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Agent and the applicable Lender.  The Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
provided
provided
 
(c)
 
The Borrower hereby acknowledges that the Agent will make available to the Lenders materials and/or information provided by or on behalf of the Borrower hereunder (collectively, ) by posting the Information Materials on IntraLinks, SyndTrak or another similar electronic system (the ).  THE PLATFORM IS PROVIDED AS IS AND AS AVAILABLE.  THE AGENT DOES NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS OF THE INFORMATION MATERIALS OR THE ADEQUACY OF THE PLATFORM, AND EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS LIABILITY FOR ERRORS IN OR OMISSIONS FROM THE INFORMATION MATERIALS.  NO WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OF THIRD PARTY RIGHTS OR FREEDOM FROM VIRUSES OR OTHER CODE DEFECTS, IS MADE BY THE AGENT IN CONNECTION WITH THE INFORMATION MATERIALS OR THE PLATFORM.  In no event shall the Agent or any of its Affiliates have any liability to the Borrower, any Lender, or any other Person for losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses of any kind (whether in tort, contract or otherwise) arising out of the Borrowers or the Agents transmission of Information Materials through the Internet, except to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by a final and non-appealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of the Agent; , , that in no event shall the Agent have any liability to the Borrower, any Lender or any other Person for indirect, special, incidental, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages).
Information Materials
Platform
provided
however
 
SECTION 9.02.
 
.  No failure or delay by the Agent or any Lender in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder or under any Note shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege.  The rights and remedies herein provided shall be cumulative and not exclusive of any rights or remedies provided by law.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the making of a Loan shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default or Event of Default, regardless of whether the Agent or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default or Event of Default at the time (it being the express intent of the parties hereto that the Lenders be able to exercise all rights and remedies provided for in Section 6.01 (subject to the limitations set forth therein), whether or not the absence of any Event of Default entitling them to exercise such rights and remedies was a condition precedent to the making of the Loans on the Closing Date).
No Waivers
 
 
 
51
 
 
 
SECTION 9.03.
 
.  (a)  The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses of the Agent, including reasonable fees and disbursements of special counsel for the Agent, in connection with the preparation and administration of this Agreement, any waiver or consent hereunder or any amendment hereof or any Default or alleged Default hereunder and (ii) if an Event of Default occurs, all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Agent or any Lender, including fees and disbursements of counsel, in connection with such Event of Default and collection and other enforcement proceedings resulting therefrom.
Expenses; Indemnification
 
(b)
 
In the event that the Agent, either Arranger, any Lender, any Affiliate of any such Person or any partner, member, director, agent, employee or controlling person or subsidiary of a controlling Person, as the case may be, of any such Person or any such Affiliate becomes involved in any capacity in any action, proceeding or investigation brought by or against any Person, including the Borrower, the Acquired Business or any of their equityholders, Affiliates or creditors, in connection with or as a result of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, the Commitment Letter or the Fee Letter referred to therein (together, the ), the Borrower agrees to periodically reimburse such Indemnified Person for its reasonable out-of-pocket legal and other out-of-pocket expenses (including the cost of any investigation and preparation) incurred in connection therewith.  The Borrower also agrees to indemnify and hold each Indemnified Person harmless against any and all losses, claims, damages or liabilities to any Person, including the Borrower, the Acquired Business or any equityholder or Affiliate of the foregoing, arising out of any investigation, litigation, claim or proceeding in connection with or as a result of the transactions contemplated by the Documents, including any actual or proposed use of proceeds of Loans hereunder , except to the extent that (and only for so long as) such loss, claim, damage or liability has been found by a judgment of the highest court of competent jurisdiction to have considered such matter to have resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnified Person (or any of its controlling Persons or subsidiaries of controlling Persons or any of their or such Indemnified Persons partners, members, directors, agents, employees or controlling Persons) in performing the services or obligations that are the subject of the Documents, or the material breach of the material agreements of such Indemnified Person set forth in one or more of the Documents.  If for any reason the foregoing indemnification is unavailable to an Indemnified Person or insufficient to hold it harmless, then the Borrower will contribute to the amount paid or payable by such Indemnified Person as a result of such loss, claim, damage or liability in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect (i) the relative economic interests of (A) the Borrower, the Acquired Business and their equityholders and Affiliates, on the one hand, and (B) such Indemnified Person, on the other, in the matters contemplated by the Documents, and (ii) if and to the extent the allocation provided for in the immediately preceding clause (i) is for any reason held to be unenforceable, the relative fault of (A) the Borrower, the Acquired Business and their equityholders and Affiliates, on the one hand, and (B) such Indemnified Person, on the other, with respect to such loss, claim, damage or liability and any other relevant equitable considerations.  The Borrowers reimbursement, indemnity and contribution
(collectively, the 
Indemnified Persons
)
Documents
(whether or not such investigation, litigation, claim or proceeding is brought by the Borrower, the Acquired Business or any of their equityholders, Affiliates or creditors or any Indemnified Person and whether or not any Indemnified Person is otherwise a party thereto)
 
 
 
52
 
 
 
obligations under this Section 9.03(b) shall be in addition to any liability or obligation that the Borrower may otherwise have, any liability to the Borrower or any Person asserting claims on behalf of or in right of the Borrower in connection with or as a result of any matter referred to in the Documents, except, in the case of any such liability to the Borrower, solely to the extent that (and only for so long as) any losses, claims, damages, liabilities or expenses incurred by the Borrower have been found by a judgment the highest court of competent jurisdiction to have considered such matter to have resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnified Person (or any of its controlling Persons or subsidiaries of controlling Persons or any of their or such Indemnified Persons partners, members, directors, agents, employees or controlling Persons) in performing the services or obligations that are the subject of the Documents, or the material breach of the material agreements of such Indemnified Person set forth in the Documents; that in no event will the Borrower or any Indemnified Person have any liability for any indirect, consequential, special or punitive damages in connection with or as a result of the transactions contemplated by the Documents (it being agreed, however, that the Borrowers indemnity and contribution obligations, as set forth in the preceding provisions of this Section 9.03(b), will apply in respect of any indirect, consequential, special or punitive damages that may be awarded against any Indemnified Person).  The provisions of this Section 9.03(b) will survive any termination of, or completion of the arrangements provided for in, the Documents.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, (x) the Borrowers obligation to reimburse legal expenses shall, in connection with any one action or proceeding or separate but substantially similar actions or proceedings arising out of the same general allegations, be limited to the fees, charges and disbursements of one counsel for all Indemnified Persons (and, if reasonably necessary, one local counsel plus one specialist counsel in, respectively, any relevant jurisdiction or applicable specialty), which, if the Arrangers or the Agent or their Affiliates shall be parties or potential parties to any such action or proceeding, shall be selected by the Arrangers or the Agent, as the case may be, and, solely in the case of an actual or potential conflict of interest affecting any Indemnified Person or Indemnified Persons, of one additional counsel (and if reasonably necessary, one local counsel plus one specialist counsel in, respectively, any relevant jurisdiction or applicable specialty) for the affected Indemnified Person or Indemnified Persons and (y) to the extent that it is found by a judgment of the highest court of competent jurisdiction to have considered such matter that an Indemnified Person is not entitled to indemnification because such loss, claim, damage or liability resulted from the bad faith, gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnified Person (or any of its controlling persons or subsidiaries of controlling Persons or any of their or such Indemnified Persons partners, members, directors, agents, employees or controlling Persons) in performing the services or obligations that are the subject of the Documents, or the material breach of the material agreements of such Indemnified Person set forth in one or more of the Documents, then such Indemnified Person will refund to the Borrower any portion of the reimbursed amounts that is attributable to expenses incurred in relation to the act or omission of such Indemnified Person which is the subject of such finding; , that any amount so
and will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of any successors, assigns, heirs and personal representatives of the Borrower and such Indemnified Persons.  The Borrower also agrees that none of the Indemnified Persons will have
provided
provided
 
 
 
53
 
 
 
refunded shall be returned by the Borrower if such finding is overturned by a higher court.
 
(c)
 
The agreements in this Section 9.03 shall survive the termination of the Commitments and this Agreement, and the repayment, satisfaction or discharge of the Loans and all the other amounts due hereunder.
 
SECTION 9.04.
 
.  Any provision of this Agreement or the Notes may be amended or waived if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed by the Borrower and the Required Lenders (and, if the rights or duties of the Agent are affected thereby, by the Agent); that no such amendment or waiver shall, unless signed by each Lender directly affected thereby, (i) increase or, other than pursuant to Section 2.05(d), decrease the Commitment of any Lender or subject any Lender to any additional obligation, (ii) reduce or forgive the principal of or rate of interest on any Loan or any fees hereunder, (iii) postpone the date fixed for any payment of principal of or interest on any Loan or any fees hereunder or for any reduction or termination of any Commitment or (iv) change Section 2.06(c) or Section 2.11(c) or any other provision requiring the ratable sharing of payments or reduction of Commitments among the Lenders; that no such amendment or waiver shall, unless signed by all the Lenders, amend this Section 9.04 or otherwise change the percentage of the Commitments or of the aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Loans, or the number of Lenders, which shall be required for the Lenders or any of them to take any action under this Section 9.04 or any other provision of this Agreement.
Amendments and Waivers
provided
provided
further
 
SECTION 9.05.
 
.  (a)  The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void), except as contemplated by Section 5.05.  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby and each Indemnitee) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns
 
(b)
 
Any Lender may assign to one or more assignees (other than to the Borrower, any of the Borrowers Affiliates or to any natural Person) all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment or, if the Commitments have terminated, the Loans at the time owing to it); that (i) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Approved Fund or an Affiliate of a Lender, in each case after the Closing Date, each of the Agent and the Borrower must give their prior written consent to such assignment (which consents shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed, it being agreed that, on or prior to the Closing Date, it shall be reasonable for the Borrower to withhold consent if the proposed assignee does not have an investment grade rating), (ii) except in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Approved Fund or an Affiliate of a Lender after the Closing Date or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Commitment (or, if the Commitments have terminated, the entire amount of its outstanding Loans), the amount
provided
 
 
 
54
 
 
 
of the Commitment (or, if the Commitments have terminated, the amount of the outstanding Loans) of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Agent otherwise consent, (iii) each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, (iv) the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500 (except that such fee shall not be payable in the case of an assignment by a Lender to one of its Affiliates, to an Approved Fund or to another Lender), and (v) the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Agent an Administrative Questionnaire; and that any consent of the Borrower otherwise required under this Section 9.05(b) shall not be required if an Event of Default under Section 6.01(a), Section 6.01(b), Section 6.01(g) or Section 6.01(h) has occurred and is continuing.  Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to Section 9.05(d), from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.12, 8.03, 8.05 and 9.03).  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.05(b) shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with Section 9.05(e).
provided
further
 
(c)
 
The Agent, acting for this purpose as a non-fiduciary agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in The City of New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ).  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and the Borrower, the Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(d)
 
Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignees completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in Section 9.05(b) and any written consent to such assignment required by Section 9.05(b), the Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register.  No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this Section 9.05(d).
 
 
 
55
 
 
 
(e)
 
Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower or the Agent, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (other than to the Borrower, any of the Borrowers Affiliates or to any natural Person) (a ) in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (i) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (iii) the Borrower, the Agent and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement.  Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first  proviso to Section 9.04 that affects such Participant.  Subject to Section 9.05(f), the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits, and subject to the obligations, of Sections 2.12, 2.14, 8.03 and 8.04 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to Section 9.05(b).  Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as a non-fiduciary agent of the Borrower, maintain a register at one of its offices in the United States on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participants interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the ); that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participants interest in any Commitments, Loans or its other obligations under this Agreement) to any Person except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such Commitment, Loan or other obligation is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations. The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary.  For the avoidance of doubt, the Agent (in its capacity as Agent) shall have no responsibility for maintaining a Participant Register.
Participant
provided
provided
Participant Register
provided
 
(f)
 
A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 8.03 or 8.04 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrowers prior written consent or by reason of the provisions of Section 8.02, 8.03 or 8.04 requiring such Lender to designate a different Applicable Lending Office under certain circumstances.
 
(g)
 
Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank or any other central bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest
provided
 
 
 
56
 
 
 
shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
 
SECTION 9.06.
 
.  Each Lender hereby notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act, it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender to identify the Borrower in accordance with the requirements of the USA Patriot Act.  The Borrower hereby agrees to cooperate with each Lender to provide such information promptly following a request therefor from such Lender.
USA Patriot Act
 
SECTION 9.07.
 
.  (a)  This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York; that each of (a) the interpretation of the definition of Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect and the determination of whether there shall have occurred an Acquired Business Material Adverse Effect, (b) the determination of whether the Merger has been consummated as contemplated by the Merger Agreement and (c) the determination of whether the representations and warranties made by the Acquired Company in the Merger Agreement are accurate and the determination of whether as a result of any inaccuracy thereof the Borrower has the right to terminate its obligations under the Merger Agreement or not to consummate the Merger, shall be determined in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware without regard to principles of conflicts of laws that would result in the application of the laws of another jurisdiction.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
provided
 
(b)
 
Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims arising out of or relating to this Agreement brought by it or any of its Affiliates shall be brought, and shall be heard and determined, exclusively in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees, to the fullest extent permitted by law, that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.
 
(c)
 
Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement in any court referred to in Section 9.07(b).  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(d)
 
Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01.  Nothing in this Agreement
 
 
 
57
 
 
 
will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 9.08.
 
.  This Agreement may be signed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile transmission or other electronic transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement and understanding among the parties hereto and, except as expressly provided in the Commitment Letter or in the Fee Letter referred to therein, supersedes any and all prior agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.
Counterparts; Integration
 
SECTION 9.09.
 
.  The headings in this Agreement are for reference only and shall not affect the interpretation of this Agreement.
Headings
 
SECTION 9.10.
 
.  EACH OF THE BORROWER, THE AGENT AND THE LENDERS HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
SECTION 9.11.
 
.  (a)  Each Lender agrees to maintain and to cause its Affiliates to maintain the confidentiality of all non-public information provided to it by the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or by the Agent on the Borrowers or such Subsidiarys behalf, under this Agreement, and neither it nor any of its Affiliates shall use any such information other than in connection with or in enforcement of this Agreement or in connection with other business now or hereafter existing or contemplated with the Borrower or any Subsidiary; except to the extent such information (i) was or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of disclosure by such Lender or its Affiliates or their respective directors, officers, employees and agents, or (ii) was or becomes available on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries so long as such source is not, to the knowledge of such Lender, prohibited from disclosing such information by a legal, contractual or fiduciary obligation to the Borrower or any of its Affiliates; that any Lender may disclose such information (A) at the request or pursuant to any requirement of any self-regulatory body, governmental body, agency or official to which such Lender or any of its Affiliates is subject or in connection with an examination of such Lender or Affiliate thereof by any such authority or body; (B) pursuant to subpoena or other court process; (C) when required to do so in accordance with the provisions of any applicable requirement of law; (D) to the extent reasonably required in connection with any litigation or proceeding to which the Agent, any Lender or their respective Affiliates may be party; (E) to the extent reasonably required in connection with the exercise of any remedy hereunder; (F) to such Lenders independent auditors, counsel, and any other professional advisors of such Lender who are advised of the confidentiality of such information; (G) to any Participant or assignee, actual or potential, or to any direct or indirect contractual counterparties (or the professional advisors thereto) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations, that such
Confidentiality
provided
,
however
,
provided
 
 
 
58
 
 
 
Person agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to keep such information confidential to the same extent required of the Lenders hereunder; (H) as to any Lender or its Affiliate, as expressly permitted under the terms of any other document or agreement regarding confidentiality to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is party with such Lender or such Affiliate; (I) to its Affiliates and its and its Affiliates directors, officers, employees and agents, that each such Affiliate, director, officer, employee or agent shall keep such information confidential to the same extent required of the Lenders hereunder; (J) to any other party to the Agreement; (K) to any rating agency when required by such rating agency in connection with rating such Lender, that, prior to any disclosure, such rating agency shall undertake in writing to preserve the confidentiality of any confidential information relating to the Borrower received by such rating agency from the Agent or any Lender; (L) to market data collectors or similar service providers to the lending industry and service providers to the Agent and the Lenders in connection with the administration and management of the Facility; and (M) disclosure on a confidential basis to the CUSIP Service Bureau or any similar agency in connection with the issuance and monitoring of CUSIP numbers with respect to the Loans.  Each Lender shall be responsible for any breach of this Section 9.11 by any of its Affiliates or any of its or its Affiliates directors, officers, employees and agents.
provided
provided
 
(b)
 
Each Lender acknowledges that all information, including requests for waivers and amendments, furnished by the Borrower or the Agent pursuant to or in connection with, or in the course of administering, this Agreement will be syndicate-level information, which may contain MNPI.  Each Lender represents to the Borrower and the Agent that (i) it has developed compliance procedures regarding the use of MNPI and that it will handle MNPI in accordance with such procedures and applicable law, including Federal, state and foreign securities laws, and (ii) it has identified in its Administrative Questionnaire a credit contact who may receive information that may contain MNPI in accordance with its compliance procedures and applicable law, including Federal, state and foreign securities laws.
 
(c)
 
The Borrower and each Lender acknowledges that, if information furnished by the Borrower pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement is being distributed by the Agent through the Platform, (i) the Agent may post any information that the Borrower has indicated as containing MNPI solely on that portion of the Platform designated for Private Side Lender Representatives and (ii) if the Borrower has not indicated whether any information furnished by it pursuant to or in connection with this Agreement may contain MNPI, the Agent reserves the right to post such information solely on that portion of the Platform designated for Private Side Lender Representatives.  With respect to any information provided by or on behalf of the Borrower, at the reasonable request of the Agent, the Borrower agrees to use commercially reasonable efforts to inform the Agent of whether or not the information provided may contain MNPI, and the Agent shall be entitled to rely on any such communication by the Borrower without liability or responsibility for the independent verification thereof.
 
SECTION 9.12.
 
.  The Agent, the Lenders and their Affiliates may have economic interests that conflict with those of the Borrower and its Affiliates.  The Borrower, on behalf of itself and the Subsidiaries, agrees that in connection with all aspects of the transactions contemplated hereby and any
No Fiduciary Relationship
 
 
 
59
 
 
 
communications in connection therewith, the Borrower, the Subsidiaries and their Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Agent, the Lenders and their Affiliates, on the other hand, will have a business relationship that does not create, by implication or otherwise, any fiduciary duty on the part of the Agent, the Lenders or their Affiliates, and no such duty will be deemed to have arisen in connection with any such transactions or communications.
 
SECTION 9.13.
 
Severability.
  Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
 
SECTION 9.14.
 
  All representations and warranties made by the Borrower herein and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement shall survive the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the making of any Loans and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated.
Survival.
 
 
 
60
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
[Signature Page to Bridge Credit Agreement]
 
 
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Bridge Credit Agreement]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
[Signature Page to Bridge Credit Agreement]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
* For use by any Lender requiring a second signature line.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
* For use by any Lender requiring a second signature line.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
* For use by any Lender requiring a second signature line.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
* For use by any Lender requiring a second signature line.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
* For use by any Lender requiring a second signature line.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.5
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, and for the six months ended June 30, 2012, combine the historical consolidated statements of income of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the merger of a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (which is referred to as Merger Sub) with and into Coventry (which is referred to as the merger) as if it had occurred on January 1, 2011. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of June 30, 2012, combines the historical consolidated balance sheets of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the merger as if it had occurred on June 30, 2012. The historical consolidated financial information has been adjusted in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements to give effect to pro forma events that are (i) directly attributable to the merger, (ii) factually supportable, and (iii) with respect to the statements of income, expected to have a continuing impact on the combined results. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information should be read in conjunction with the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. In addition, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information was based on and should be read in conjunction with the following historical consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes:
 
 
 
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information has been prepared by Aetna using the acquisition method of accounting in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. The acquisition accounting is dependent upon certain valuation and other studies that have yet to commence or progress to a stage where there is sufficient information for a definitive measurement. The proposed merger has not yet received the necessary approvals from governmental authorities, and under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (which is referred to as the HSR Act) and other relevant laws and regulations, before completion of the merger, there are significant limitations regarding what Aetna can learn about Coventry. The assets and liabilities of Coventry have been measured based on various preliminary estimates using assumptions that Aetna believes are reasonable based on information that is currently available. Differences between these preliminary estimates and the final acquisition accounting will occur, and those differences could have a material impact on the accompanying unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements and the combined company's future results of operations and financial position. The pro forma adjustments are preliminary and have been made solely for the purpose of providing unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements prepared in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Aetna intends to commence the necessary valuation and other studies required to complete the acquisition accounting promptly upon completion of the merger and will finalize the acquisition accounting as soon as practicable within the required measurement period in accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board, Accounting Standards Codification (which is referred to as ASC) 805, but in no event later than one year following completion of the merger.
 
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information has been presented for informational purposes only. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information does not purport to represent the actual results of operations that Aetna and Coventry would have achieved had the companies been combined during these periods and is not intended to project the future results of operations that the combined company may achieve after the merger. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information does not reflect the realization of any cost savings following completion of the merger and also does not reflect any related restructuring and integration charges to achieve those cost savings. Material intercompany transactions between Aetna and Coventry during the periods presented in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements have been eliminated (refer to and ).
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments
Note 8. Balance Sheet Pro Forma Adjustments
 
 
 
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in .
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments
 
 
 
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in .
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments
 
 
 
 
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in .
Note 8. Balance Sheet Pro Forma Adjustments
 
 
 
On August 19, 2012, Aetna, Merger Sub and Coventry entered into the Agreement and Plan of Merger (which is referred to as the merger agreement), pursuant to which, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the merger agreement, Coventry will become a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna. Upon completion of the merger, each share of Coventry common stock issued and outstanding will be converted into the right to receive $27.30 in cash, without interest, and 0.3885 of an Aetna common share.
At completion of the merger, each option to purchase shares of Coventry common stock outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price less than the sum of (a) $27.30 and (b) the product of (i) the Aetna closing price multiplied by 0.3885 (which sum is referred to as the equity award cash consideration and which options are referred to as in-the-money options), will be cancelled and converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest and less applicable withholding taxes, equal to the product of (x) the excess of (i) the equity award cash consideration over (ii) the applicable per share exercise price of that in-the-money option multiplied by (y) the total number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that in-the-money option. The average of the volume weighted averages of the trading prices for Aetna common shares on the New York Stock Exchange for each of the five trading days ending on the trading day that is two trading days prior to the completion of the merger is referred to as the Aetna closing price.
During the 60-day period following the date of the merger agreement, Aetna, in consultation with Coventry, will consider the appropriate treatment of each option to purchase shares of Coventry common stock outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price equal to or greater than the equity award cash consideration (which options are referred to as underwriter options), taking into account the appropriate terms and conditions of each such underwater option.
At completion of the merger, each outstanding restricted share of Coventry common stock (which represents a share of Coventry common stock subject to vesting and forfeiture restrictions) will be converted into the right to receive the merger consideration payable to holders of shares of Coventry common stock, less applicable withholding taxes.
At completion of the merger, each Coventry performance share unit and restricted stock unit outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan (which are collectively referred to as Coventry stock units) that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the merger agreement, is vested or becomes vested upon completion of the merger (and each Coventry stock unit held by Allen F. Wise), which are collectively referred to as cashed-out units, will be converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest and less applicable withholding taxes, equal to the product of (a) the equity award cash consideration multiplied by (b) the number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that cashed-out unit.
At completion of the merger, each Coventry stock unit outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the merger agreement, is not vested and will not become vested upon completion of the merger (other than the Coventry stock units held by Mr. Wise), which are referred to as rollover units, will be converted into a cash-settled Aetna restricted stock unit with the number of Aetna common shares underlying that cash-settled Aetna restricted stock unit equal to the product of (x) the number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that rollover unit immediately prior to completion of the merger multiplied by (y) the quotient of (i) the equity award cash consideration divided by (ii) the Aetna closing price. Each such cash-settled Aetna restricted stock unit will be subject to the same terms and conditions (including service-based vesting) as applied to the corresponding rollover unit immediately prior to completion of the merger.
The merger is subject to adoption of the merger agreement by Coventry stockholders, early termination or expiration of the waiting period under the HSR Act, the required governmental authorizations having been obtained and being in full force and effect and other usual and customary conditions to completion. As of the date of this Current Report on Form 8-K, the merger is expected to be completed in mid-2013.
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information was prepared using the acquisition method of accounting and was based on the historical financial statements of Aetna and Coventry. The acquisition method of accounting is based on ASC 805 and uses the fair value concepts defined in ASC 820, .
Fair Value Measurements
 
 
ASC 805 requires, among other things, that most assets acquired and liabilities assumed be recognized at their fair values as of the acquisition date. In addition, ASC 805 requires that the consideration transferred be measured at the date the merger is completed at the then-current market price. This requirement will likely result in a per share equity component that is different from the amount assumed in these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements.
ASC 820 defines the term "fair value" and sets forth the valuation requirements for any asset or liability measured at fair value, expands related disclosure requirements and specifies a hierarchy of valuation techniques based on the nature of the inputs used to develop the fair value measures. Fair value is defined in ASC 820 as "the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date." This is an exit price concept for the valuation of the asset or liability. In addition, market participants are assumed to be buyers and sellers in the principal (or the most advantageous) market for the asset or liability. Fair value measurements for an asset assume the highest and best use by these market participants. As a result of these standards, Aetna may be required to record the fair value of assets which are not intended to be used or sold and/or to value assets at fair value measures that do not reflect Aetna's intended use of those assets. Many of these fair value measurements can be highly subjective, and it is possible that other professionals, applying reasonable judgment to the same facts and circumstances, could develop and support a range of alternative estimated amounts.
Under the acquisition method of accounting, the assets acquired and liabilities assumed will be recorded, as of completion of the merger, primarily at their respective fair values and added to those of Aetna. Financial statements and reported results of operations of Aetna issued after completion of the merger will reflect these values, but will not be retroactively restated to reflect the historical financial position or results of operations of Coventry.
Under ASC 805, acquisition-related transaction costs (e.g., advisory, legal, valuation and other professional fees) are not included as a component of consideration transferred but are accounted for as expenses in the periods in which the costs are incurred. Total acquisition-related transaction costs expected to be incurred by Aetna and Coventry are estimated to be approximately $120 million and $45 million, respectively, of which none had been incurred as of June 30, 2012. Acquisition-related transaction costs expected to be incurred by Aetna include estimated fees related to a bridge financing commitment and agreement and estimated interest costs associated with the expected issuance of long-term transaction-related debt in the fourth quarter of 2012. Those costs are reflected in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as an increase to accrued expenses and other current liabilities, with the related tax benefits reflected as an increase in other current assets and the after tax impact presented as a decrease to retained earnings.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect the projected realization of cost savings following completion of the merger. These cost savings opportunities are from administrative cost savings, as well as network and medical management savings. Although Aetna projects that cost savings will result from the merger, there can be no assurance that these cost savings will be achieved. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect projected pretax restructuring and integration charges associated with the projected cost savings, which are projected to be approximately $250 million to $300 million over a period of three years following completion of the merger. Such restructuring and integration charges will be expensed in the appropriate accounting periods after completion of the merger.
 
At completion of the merger, Aetna will review Coventry's accounting policies. As a result of that review, Aetna may identify differences between the accounting policies of the two companies that, when conformed, could have a material impact on the combined financial statements. At this time, Aetna is not aware of any differences that would have a material impact on the combined financial statements. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements assume there are no differences in accounting policies.
 
 
The following is a preliminary estimate of consideration expected to be transferred to effect the acquisition of Coventry:
 
 
Certain amounts may reflect rounding adjustments.
 
 
 
The following is a preliminary estimate of the assets to be acquired and the liabilities to be assumed by Aetna in the merger, reconciled to the estimate of total consideration expected to be transferred:
 
 
The fair value of identifiable intangible assets is determined primarily using variations of the "income approach," which is based on the present value of the future after tax cash flows attributable to each identified intangible asset. Other valuation methods, including the market approach and cost approach, were also considered in estimating the fair value. Under the HSR Act and other relevant laws and regulations, there are significant limitations on Aetna's ability to obtain specific information about the Coventry intangible assets prior to completion of the merger.
At this time, Aetna does not have sufficient information as to the amount, timing and risk of cash flows of all of Coventry's identifiable intangible assets to determine their fair value. Some of the more significant assumptions inherent in the development of intangible asset values, from the perspective of a market participant, include: the amount and timing of projected future cash flows (including revenue and profitability); the discount rate selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows; and the assessment of the asset's life cycle and the competitive trends impacting the asset. However, for purposes of these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements and using publicly available
 
 
information, such as historical revenues, Coventry's cost structure, industry information for comparable intangible assets and certain other high-level assumptions, the fair value of Coventry's identifiable intangible assets and their weighted-average useful lives have been estimated as follows:
 
These preliminary estimates of fair value and weighted-average useful life will likely be different from the final acquisition accounting, and the difference could have a material impact on the accompanying unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. Once Aetna has full access to information about Coventry's intangible assets, additional insight will be gained that could impact (i) the estimated total value assigned to intangible assets, (ii) the estimated allocation of value between finite-lived and indefinite-lived intangible assets and/or (iii) the estimated weighted-average useful life of each category of intangible assets. The estimated intangible asset values and their useful lives could be impacted by a variety of factors that may become known to Aetna only upon access to additional information and/or by changes in such factors that may occur prior to completion of the merger. These factors include, but are not limited to, changes in the regulatory, legislative, legal, technological and competitive environments. Increased knowledge about these and/or other elements could result in a change to the estimated fair value of the identifiable Coventry intangible assets and/or to the estimated weighted-average useful lives from what Aetna has assumed in these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. The combined effect of any such changes could then also result in a significant increase or decrease to Aetna's estimate of associated amortization expense.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna and Coventry each have a Missouri Medicaid business. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information assumes Aetna will dispose of its Missouri Medicaid business at the time of the merger and continue to operate Coventry's Missouri Medicaid business. Specifically, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income reflect the elimination of the revenues associated with Aetna's Missouri Medicaid business as well as elimination of the costs specifically identifiable with that revenue. Aetna does not currently have market participant bids or other information regarding similar transactions that may be indicative of the fair value of the Missouri Medicaid business. As a result, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet reflects the disposal of Aetna's Missouri Medicaid business assuming that the book value of that business approximates fair value, and also assumes cash consideration received equal to book value.
 
This note should be read in conjunction with and. Adjustments included in the column under the heading "Pro Forma Adjustments" represent the following:
Note 1. Description of Transaction; Note 2. Basis of Presentation; Note 4. Estimate of Consideration Expected to be Transferred;
Note 5. Estimate of Assets to be Acquired and Liabilities to be Assumed
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following table summarizes the computation of the unaudited pro forma combined weighted average basic and diluted shares outstanding:
 
 
Certain amounts may reflect rounding adjustments.
 
 
This note should be read in conjunction with ; ; and . Adjustments included in the column under the heading "Pro Forma Adjustments" represent the following:
Note 1. Description of Transaction; Note 2. Basis of Presentation
Note 4. Estimate of Consideration Expected to be Transferred
Note 5. Estimate of Assets to be Acquired and Liabilities to be Assumed
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not present a combined dividend per share amount. On both April 27, 2012 and July 27, 2012, Aetna paid dividends of $0.175 per Aetna common share. On both April 9, 2012 and July 9, 2012, Coventry paid dividends of $0.125 per share of Coventry common stock. In addition, on August 27, 2012, Coventry declared a dividend of $0.125, which will be paid on October 8, 2012, and is not reflected in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. Coventry is not permitted to declare, set aside or pay a dividend or other distribution other than its regular quarterly cash dividend in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, in an amount not in excess of $0.125 per share of Coventry common stock prior to completion of the merger, and any future payment of Coventry's quarterly dividend is subject to future approval and declaration by the Coventry board of directors. Prior to completion of the merger, Aetna is not permitted to declare, set aside or pay any dividend or other distribution other than its regular cash dividend in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice. The dividend policy of Aetna following completion of the merger will be determined by the Aetna board of directors following completion of the merger.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect the projected realization of cost savings following completion of the merger. These cost savings opportunities are from administrative cost savings, as well as network and medical management savings. Although Aetna management projects that cost savings will result from the merger, there can be no assurance that these cost savings will be achieved.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121005170623.txt.gz
TIME:20121005170623
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
Section 8 - Other Events
Item 8.01 Other Events.
As part of its continuing cooperation with the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) and in order to provide the DOJ with additional time for review, Aetna Inc. (Aetna) will re-file its premerger notification with the DOJ and the U.S. Federal Trade Commission under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 (the HSR Act) in connection with its proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry).  The notification will be re-filed on or before October 10, 2012, and will initiate a new waiting period under the HSR Act that will expire 30 days later, unless extended by a request for further information or terminated earlier.
Aetna has filed all material applications required for state regulatory approval of the acquisition of Coventry and continues to project that the transaction will be completed in mid-2013.
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This communication contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. You can generally identify forward-looking statements by the use of forward-looking terminology such as anticipate, believe, continue, could, estimate, expect, explore, evaluate, intend, may, might, plan, potential, predict, project, seek, should, or will, or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology. These forward-looking statements are only predictions and involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond Aetna's and Coventry's control.
Statements in this document that are forward-looking, including Aetna's projections as to the timing of the re-filing of its premerger notification and the projected date the proposed transaction will be completed, are based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's and Coventry's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future events to differ materially from those currently expected by Aetna's management, including, but not limited to: the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied, the risk that a regulatory approval that may be required for the proposed acquisition is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated and the outcome of various litigation matters related to the proposed acquisition.
No assurances can be given that any of the events anticipated by the forward-looking statements will transpire or occur, or if any of them do occur, when they will occur and what impact they will have on the results of operations, financial condition or cash flows of Aetna or Coventry. Neither Aetna nor Coventry assumes any duty to update or revise forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, as of any future date.
Important Information For Investors And Stockholders
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval. On September 21, 2012, Aetna filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) a registration statement on Form S-4 containing a preliminary proxy statement/prospectus.  The registration statement has not yet become effective.  After the registration statement is declared effective by the SEC, Coventry will file with the SEC a definitive proxy statement/prospectus, and each of Aetna and Coventry will file other documents with respect to the proposed acquisition of Coventry and a definitive proxy statement/prospectus will be mailed to stockholders of Coventry. INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF COVENTRY ARE URGED TO READ THE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS AND OTHER DOCUMENTS FILED OR THAT WILL BE FILED WITH THE SEC CAREFULLY AND IN THEIR ENTIRETY BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN OR WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION. Investors and security holders may obtain free copies of the registration statement and the proxy statement/prospectus and other documents filed with the SEC by Aetna or Coventry through the website maintained by the SEC at . Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Aetna are available free of charge on Aetna's internet website at or by contacting Aetna's Investor Relations Department at 860-273-8204. Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Coventry are available free of charge on Coventry's internet website at or by contacting Coventry's Investor Relations Department at 301-581-5717.
http://www.sec.gov
http://www.aetna.com
http://www.cvty.com
 
 
 
Aetna, Coventry, their respective directors and certain of their executive officers may be considered participants in the solicitation of proxies in connection with the proposed transaction. Information about the directors and executive officers of Coventry is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 28, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 6, 2012, and its Current Report on Form 8-K, which was filed with the SEC on May 31, 2012. Information about the directors and executive officers of Aetna is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 24, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 9, 2012 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 which was filed with the SEC on July 31, 2012. Other information regarding the participants in the proxy solicitations and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, are contained in the preliminary proxy statement/prospectus filed with the SEC and will be contained in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials to be filed with the SEC when they become available.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121022172037.txt.gz
TIME:20121022172037
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 8-K
 
 
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
Item 1.01.  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Merger Agreement Amendment
 
On October 17, 2012, Aetna Inc. (), Coventry Health Care, Inc. () and Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (), entered into Amendment No. 1 () to the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of August 19, 2012 (the ), previously entered into by the parties.  Pursuant to the Merger Agreement, as amended by Amendment No. 1, subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, Merger Sub will be merged with and into Coventry, with Coventry surviving the merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (the ).
Aetna
Coventry
Merger Sub
Amendment No. 1
Merger Agreement
Merger
 
Under the terms of the Merger Agreement (prior to the execution of Amendment No. 1), Aetna and Coventry agreed to discuss the appropriate treatment of outstanding Coventry stock options with an exercise price greater than or equal to the Equity Award Cash Consideration (as defined in the Merger Agreement) (each such option, an ). Based on those discussions, Aetna and Coventry entered into Amendment No. 1, which provides that upon completion of the Merger, each Underwater Option will be cancelled.  In addition, Amendment No. 1 provides that each holder of an Underwater Option who executes a customary acknowledgment and waiver will be eligible to receive an amount in cash calculated by reference to the exercise price of such Underwater Option and equivalent to $1.00 to $4.00 per share of Coventry common stock subject to such Underwater Option.  For active employees of Coventry, such payment will also be conditioned upon such employee remaining employed by the surviving corporation or Aetna for one year following the closing of the Merger (subject to acceleration upon termination of employment due to death, disability, an involuntary termination without cause or, in certain circumstances, a constructive termination). The maximum aggregate amount to be paid by Aetna pursuant to Amendment No. 1 with respect to the Underwater Options will not exceed $8 million.
Underwater Option
 
Amendment No. 1 also amends Section 6.01(d) of the Merger Agreement to reduce the aggregate dollar value of stock units that Coventry is permitted to issue to new hires in the ordinary course of business between the execution of the Merger Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby from $7,000,000 to $3,000,000.
 
The foregoing description of Amendment No. 1 and the Merger Agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of Amendment No. 1, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 2.1 and incorporated by reference herein, and the Merger Agreement, which was filed as Exhibit 2.1 to Aetnas Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 22, 2012 and incorporated by reference herein.  A copy of Amendment No. 1 has been included to provide stockholders and other security holders with information regarding its terms and is not intended to provide any factual information about Aetna or Coventry. The representations, warranties and covenants, as applicable, contained in Amendment No. 1 and the Merger Agreement have been made solely for the purposes of Amendment No. 1 and the Merger Agreement and as of specific dates; were solely for the benefit of the parties to Amendment No. 1 and the Merger Agreement; are not intended as statements of fact to be relied upon by Aetnas or Coventrys stockholders and other security holders, but rather as a way of allocating the risk between the parties in the event the statements therein prove to be inaccurate; have been modified or qualified by certain confidential disclosures, as applicable, that were made between the parties in connection with the negotiation of Amendment No. 1 and the Merger Agreement, which disclosures, as applicable, are not reflected in either Amendment No. 1 or the Merger Agreement; may no longer be true as of a given date; and may apply standards of materiality in a way that is different from what may be viewed as material by stockholders or other security holders. Security holders are not third-party beneficiaries under Amendment No. 1 or the Merger Agreement (except with respect to stockholders right to receive the merger consideration following the effective time of the Merger) and should not rely on the representations, warranties or covenants or any descriptions thereof as characterizations of the actual state of facts or condition of Coventry, Aetna or Merger Sub. Moreover, information concerning the subject matter of the representations and warranties may change after the date of the Merger Agreement, which subsequent information may or may not be fully reflected in Aetnas or Coventrys public disclosures. Aetna acknowledges that, notwithstanding the inclusion of the foregoing cautionary statements, it is responsible for considering whether additional specific disclosures of material
 
 
1
 
 
information regarding material contractual provisions are required to make the statements in this Form 8-K not misleading.
 
Important Information For Investors And Stockholders
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval. Aetna Inc. (Aetna) has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission () a registration statement on Form S-4 (File No. 333-184041), including Amendment No. 1 thereto, containing a proxy statement/prospectus, and Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry) has filed with the SEC a proxy statement/prospectus, and each of Aetna and Coventry has filed and will file other documents with respect to the proposed acquisition of Coventry. The registration statement was declared effective on October 18, 2012, and Aetna and Coventry commenced mailing the definitive proxy statement/prospectus to Coventry stockholders on or about October 19, 2012. INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF COVENTRY ARE URGED TO READ THE DEFINITIVE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS AND ANY OTHER DOCUMENTS THAT HAVE BEEN FILED OR WILL BE FILED WITH THE SEC CAREFULLY AND IN THEIR ENTIRETY BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN OR WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION. Investors and security holders may obtain free copies of the registration statement and the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other documents filed with the SEC by Aetna or Coventry through the website maintained by the SEC at . Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Aetna will be available free of charge on Aetnas internet website at or by contacting Aetnas Investor Relations Department at 860-273-8204. Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Coventry will be available free of charge on Coventrys internet website at or by contacting Coventrys Investor Relations Department at 301-581-5717.
SEC
http://www.sec.gov
http://www.aetna.com
http://www.cvty.com
Aetna, Coventry, their respective directors and certain of their executive officers may be considered participants in the solicitation of proxies in connection with the proposed transaction. Information about the directors and executive officers of Coventry is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 28, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 6, 2012, and its Current Report on Form 8-K, which was filed with the SEC on May 31, 2012. Information about the directors and executive officers of Aetna is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 24, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of shareholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 9, 2012, and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012, which was filed with the SEC on July 31, 2012. Other information regarding the participants in the proxy solicitations and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, are contained in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials filed with the SEC.
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01.  Other Events.
 
Attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein are updated Aetna and Coventry unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements as of, and for the six months ended, June 30, 2012 and for the year ended December 31, 2011 (the ).  The Pro Formas were prepared in connection with the filing of Amendment No. 1 to Aetnas Registration Statement on Form S-4 (File No. 333-184041) and reflect Amendment No. 1 to the Merger Agreement and certain developments since September 21, 2012. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2011, and for the six months ended June 30, 2012, combine the historical consolidated statements of income of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the Merger as if it had occurred on the first day of each period presented. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of June 30, 2012, combines the historical consolidated balance sheets of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the Merger as if it had occurred on June 30, 2012.
Pro Formas
 
The Pro Formas and the accompanying notes are based on, and should be read in conjunction with, the following historical consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes:
 
 
2
 
 
 
 
 
 
Coventrys separate historical financial statements referred to in the preceding paragraph were prepared by Coventry and provided to Aetna. Aetna takes no responsibility for Coventrys separate historical financial statements, and Aetna is not incorporating into this Current Report on Form 8-K such financial statements. Coventrys separate historical financial statements may be read and copied at the SECs public reference room at 100 F Street, N.E., Room 1580, Washington, D.C., 20549. Please call the SEC at 1-800-SEC-0330 for further information on the operation of the public reference room. Coventrys separate historical financial statements contained in its SEC filings are also available to the public at the SECs web site at .
www.sec.gov
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
The following exhibits are filed as part of this Current Report:
 
 
3
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
4
 
 
Exhibit Index
 
 
 
 
5
 

Exhibit 2.1
 
AGREEMENT AND PLAN OF MERGER  AMENDMENT NO. 1
 
AMENDMENT NO. 1 (this ) dated as of October 17, 2012 among Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (), Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a Delaware corporationand a wholly owned subsidiary of Parent (), and Coventry Health Care, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ).
Amendment
Parent
 
Merger Subsidiary
Company
 
W  I  T  N  E  S  S  E  T  H :
 
WHEREAS, Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company entered into that certain Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of August 19, 2012 (the ); and
Merger Agreement
 
WHEREAS, Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company desire to amend certain provisions of the Merger Agreement as provided for in this Amendment.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company hereby agree as follows:
 
ARTICLE 1
Amendments
 
Section 1.01
.  Section 1.01(b) of the Merger Agreement is amended to include:
. Amendment to Section 1.01(b)
 
Section 1.02
Section 2.05(b) of the Merger Agreement is deleted in its entirety and the following is substituted in its place:
.  Amendment to Section 2.05(b).  
 
(b)           Each Company Stock Option, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price equal to or greater than the Equity Award Cash Consideration shall be canceled as of the Effective Time (each, an ).  Parent shall pay to each holder of each UnderwaterOption a cash amount determined based on Exhibit A-1 attached (in each case, the ); , , that (i) any individual holding an UnderwaterOption who is an employee of the Company or an Affiliate of the Company as of
Underwater Option
 
Applicable Payment
provided
however
 
 
 
 
 
 
the date of this Amendment shall receive the Applicable Payment only if such employee remains employed by Parent, Company or their respective Affiliates continuously through the 12-month anniversary of the Effective Date, in which case Parent shall cause such employee to be paid the Applicable Payment on the 12-month anniversary date, or if the employees employment is terminated sooner due to death, disability or an involuntarily termination without cause, Parent shall cause such employee (or such employees estate) to be paid the Applicable Payment promptly, but no later than 14 days, following the termination of such employees employment and (ii) payment of the Applicable Payment to each holder of an Underwater Option shall be conditioned upon the holders execution, by November 30, 2012, of a written acknowledgement of the foregoing payment conditions and waiver of claims with respect to the Underwater Options, in a form reasonably acceptable to Parent.  For purposes of the foregoing, any employee whose employment is terminated without cause or due to a constructive termination within the meaning of an individually executed employment agreement between such employee and the Company or an Affiliate of the Company in effect as of October 17, 2012 shall be deemed to have been involuntarily terminated without cause for purposes of this Section 2.05(b).
 
Section 1.03
.Section 6.01(d) of the Merger Agreement is amended to reduce the dollar amount appearing in clause (iii)(B) thereof from $7,000,000 to $3,000,000.
Amendment to Section 6.01(d).  
 
ARTICLE 2
Miscellaneous
 
Section 2.01
Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Amendment shall have the meaning assigned to such terms in the Merger Agreement.
.  Definitions.
 
Section 2.02
. .  All notices, requests and other communications to any party to this Amendment shall be in writing (including facsimile transmission) and shall be given,
Notices
 
if to Parent or Merger Subsidiary, to:
 
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, Connecticut 06156
 
2
 
 
with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
 
Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP
450 Lexington Avenue
New York, New York 10017
H. Oliver Smith
 
if to the Company, to:
 
Coventry Health Care, Inc.
6270-B Rockledge Drive, Suite 700
Bethesda, Maryland 20817
 
with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
 
Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz
51 West 52 Street
nd
New York, New York 10019
 
and
 
Bass, Berry & Sims PLC
150 Third Avenue South, Suite 2800
Nashville, Tennessee 37201
Angela Humphreys
 
or to such other address or facsimile number as such party may hereafter specify for the purpose by notice to the other parties hereto.  All such notices, requests and other communications shall be deemed received on the date of receipt by the recipient thereof if received prior to 5:00 p.m. on a Business Day in the place of receipt.  Otherwise, any such notice, request or communication shall be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day in the place of receipt.
 
Section 2.03
.  .  (a) Any provision of this Amendment may be amended or waived prior to the Effective Time if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed, in the case of an amendment, by each party to this Amendment, or, in the case of a waiver, by each
Amendments and Waivers
 
 
3
 
 
party against whom the waiver is to be effective; that, after the Company Stockholder Approval has been obtained there shall be no amendment or waiver of this Amendment that would require the further approval of the stockholders of the Company under the Delaware Law without such approval having first been obtained.
provided
 
(b)
 
No failure or delay by any party in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege.  The rights and remedies herein provided shall be cumulative and not exclusive of any rights or remedies provided by Applicable Law.
 
Section 2.04
.  .  Except as otherwise provided herein, all costs and expenses incurred in connection with this Amendment shall be paid by the party incurring such cost or expense.
Expenses
 
Section 2.05
.  .  The provisions of this Amendment shall be binding upon and inure solely to the benefit of the parties hereto.  No party may assign, delegate or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations under this Amendment without the prior written consent of each other party hereto, except that Parent or Merger Subsidiary may transfer or assign its rights and obligations under this Amendment, in whole or from time to time in part, to (i) one or more of their Affiliates at any time and (ii) after the Effective Time, to any Person; that such transfer or assignment shall not relieve Parent or Merger Subsidiary of its obligations hereunder or enlarge, alter or change any obligation of any other party hereto or due to Parent or Merger Subsidiary.
Successors and Assigns
provided
 
Section 2.06
.  .  This Amendment shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to the conflicts of law rules of such state.
Governing Law
 
Section 2.07
.  .  Each of the parties hereto (i) irrevocably consents to the service of the summons and complaint and any other process in any action or proceeding relating to the transactions contemplated hereby, on behalf of itself or its property, in accordance with Section 2.02 or in such other manner as may be permitted by Applicable Law, of copies of such process to such party, and nothing in this Section 2.07 shall affect the right of any party to serve legal process in any other manner permitted by Applicable Law, (ii) irrevocably and unconditionally consents and submits itself and its property in any action or proceeding to the exclusive general jurisdiction of the Delaware Court of Chancery and any state appellate court therefrom within the State of Delaware (or, only if the Delaware Court of Chancery declines to accept jurisdiction over a particular matter, any state or federal court within the State of Delaware) in the event any dispute arises out of this Amendment or the transactions contemplated hereby, or for recognition and enforcement of any
Jurisdiction/Venue
 
 
4
 
 
judgment in respect thereof, (iii) agrees that it shall not attempt to deny or defeat such personal jurisdiction by motion or other request for leave from any such court, (iv) agrees that any actions or proceedings arising in connection with this Amendment or the transactions contemplated hereby shall be brought, tried and determined only in the Delaware Court of Chancery (or, only if the Delaware Court of Chancery declines to accept jurisdiction over a particular matter, any state or federal court within the State of Delaware), (v) waives any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the venue of any such action or proceeding in any such court or that such action or proceeding was brought in an inconvenient court and agrees not to plead or claim the same and (vi) agrees that it shall not bring any action relating to this Amendment or the transactions contemplated hereby in any court other than the aforesaid courts.  Each of Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company agrees that a final judgment in any action or proceeding in such court as provided above shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by Applicable Law.
 
Section 2.08
.  .  EACH PARTY ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT ANY CONTROVERSY WHICH MAY ARISE UNDER THIS AMENDMENT IS LIKELY TO INVOLVE COMPLICATED AND DIFFICULT ISSUES, AND THEREFORE EACH SUCH PARTY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY WAIVES ANY RIGHT SUCH PARTY MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AMENDMENT.  EACH PARTY CERTIFIES AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT (i) NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER, (ii) EACH PARTY UNDERSTANDS AND HAS CONSIDERED THE IMPLICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER, (iii) EACH PARTY MAKES THIS WAIVER VOLUNTARILY AND (iv) EACH PARTY HAS BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AMENDMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 2.08.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
Section 2.09
.  .  This Amendment may be signed in any number of counterparts, including by facsimile or by email with .pdf attachments, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.  This Amendment shall become effective when each party hereto shall have received a counterpart hereof signed and delivered (by electronic communication, facsimile or otherwise) by all of the other parties hereto.  Until and unless each party has received a counterpart hereof signed by the other parties hereto, this Amendment shall have no effect and no party shall have any right or obligation hereunder (whether by virtue of any other oral or written agreement or other
Counterparts; Effectiveness
 
 
5
 
 
communication).  Except as expressly amended herein, all other terms and conditions of the Merger Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.  The term Agreement as used in the Merger Agreement shall be deemed to refer to the Merger Agreement, as amended hereby.
 
Section 2.10
.If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Amendment is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other Governmental Authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Amendment shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated so long as the economic or legal substance of the transactions contemplated hereby is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party.  Upon such a determination, the parties shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Amendment so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible in an acceptable manner in order that the transactions contemplated hereby be consummated as originally contemplated to the fullest extent possible.
  Severability.  
 
 
()
Remainder of Page Intentionally Left Blank
 
 
6
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011, and for the six months ended June 30, 2012, combine the historical consolidated statements of income of Aetna Inc. ("Aetna") and Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry"), giving effect to the merger of a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna ("Merger Sub") with and into Coventry (which is referred to as the merger) as if it had occurred on the first day of each period presented. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of June 30, 2012, combines the historical consolidated balance sheets of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the merger as if it had occurred on June 30, 2012. The historical consolidated financial information has been adjusted in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements to give effect to pro forma events that are (i) directly attributable to the merger, (ii) factually supportable, and (iii) with respect to the statements of income, expected to have a continuing impact on the combined results. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information should be read in conjunction with the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. In addition, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information was based on and should be read in conjunction with the following historical consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes:
 
 
 
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information has been prepared by Aetna using the acquisition method of accounting in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. Aetna has been treated as the acquirer in the merger for accounting purposes. The acquisition accounting is dependent upon certain valuation and other studies that have yet to commence or progress to a stage where there is sufficient information for a definitive measurement. The proposed merger has not yet received the necessary approvals from governmental authorities, and under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (which is referred to as the HSR Act) and other relevant laws and regulations, before completion of the merger, there are significant limitations regarding what Aetna can learn about Coventry. The assets and liabilities of Coventry have been measured based on various preliminary estimates using assumptions that Aetna believes are reasonable based on information that is currently available. Differences between these preliminary estimates and the final acquisition accounting will occur, and those differences could have a material impact on the accompanying unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements and the combined company's future results of operations and financial position. The pro forma adjustments are preliminary and have been made solely for the purpose of providing unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements prepared in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Aetna intends to commence the necessary valuation and other studies required to complete the acquisition accounting promptly upon completion of the merger and will finalize the acquisition accounting as soon as practicable within the required measurement period in accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board, Accounting Standards Codification (which is referred to as ASC) 805, but in no event later than one year following completion of the merger.
 
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information has been presented for informational purposes only. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information does not purport to represent the actual results of operations that Aetna and Coventry would have achieved had the companies been combined during these periods and is not intended to project the future results of operations that the combined company may achieve after the merger. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information does not reflect the realization of any cost savings following completion of the merger and also does not reflect any related restructuring and integration charges to achieve those cost savings. Material intercompany transactions between Aetna and Coventry during the periods presented in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements have been eliminated (refer to and ).
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments
Note 8. Balance Sheet Pro Forma Adjustments
 
 
 
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments.
 
 
 
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments.
 
 
 
 
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in .
Note 8. Balance Sheet Pro Forma Adjustments
 
 
 
On August 19, 2012, Aetna, Merger Sub and Coventry entered into the Agreement and Plan of Merger (which, as amended, is referred to as the merger agreement), pursuant to which, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the merger agreement, Coventry will become a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna. Upon completion of the merger, each share of Coventry common stock issued and outstanding will be converted into the right to receive $27.30 in cash, without interest, and 0.3885 of an Aetna common share.
At completion of the merger, each option to purchase shares of Coventry common stock outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price less than the sum of (a) $27.30 and (b) the product of (i) the Aetna closing price multiplied by 0.3885 (which sum is referred to as the equity award cash consideration and which options are referred to as in-the-money options), will be cancelled and converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest and less applicable withholding taxes, equal to the product of (x) the excess of (i) the equity award cash consideration over (ii) the applicable per share exercise price of that in-the-money option multiplied by (y) the total number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that in-the-money option. The average of the volume weighted averages of the trading prices for Aetna common shares on the New York Stock Exchange for each of the five trading days ending on the trading day that is two trading days prior to the completion of the merger is referred to as the Aetna closing price.
During the 60-day period following the date of the merger agreement, Aetna and Coventry discussed the treatment of each option to purchase shares of Coventry common stock outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price greater than or equal to the equity award cash consideration (which options are referred to as underwater options), taking into account the appropriate terms and conditions of each such underwater option and decided to cancel such underwater options upon completion of the merger. Aetna has agreed to pay the holders of underwater options that execute customary acknowledgments and waivers an amount in cash calculated by reference to the exercise price of the underwater options and equivalent to $1.00 to $4.00 for each share of Coventry common stock subject to an underwater option. For active employees of Coventry, such payment will also be conditioned upon such employee remaining employed by the surviving corporation or Aetna for one year following the closing of the merger (subject to acceleration upon certain terminations of employment).
At completion of the merger, each outstanding restricted share of Coventry common stock (which represents a share of Coventry common stock subject to vesting and forfeiture restrictions) will be converted into the right to receive the merger consideration payable to holders of shares of Coventry common stock, less applicable withholding taxes.
At completion of the merger, each Coventry performance share unit and restricted stock unit outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan (which are collectively referred to as Coventry stock units) that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the merger agreement, is vested or becomes vested upon completion of the merger and each Coventry stock unit held by Allen F. Wise, which are collectively referred to as cashed-out units, will be converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest and less applicable withholding taxes, equal to the product of (a) the equity award cash consideration multiplied by (b) the number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that cashed-out unit.
At completion of the merger, each Coventry stock unit outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the merger agreement, is not vested and will not become vested upon completion of the merger (other than the Coventry stock units held by Mr. Wise), which are referred to as rollover units, will be converted into a cash-settled Aetna restricted stock unit with the number of Aetna common shares underlying that cash-settled Aetna restricted stock unit equal to the product of (x) the number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that rollover unit immediately prior to completion of the merger multiplied by (y) the quotient of (i) the equity award cash consideration divided by (ii) the Aetna closing price. Each such cash-settled Aetna restricted stock unit will be subject to the same terms and conditions (including service-based vesting) as applied to the corresponding rollover unit immediately prior to completion of the merger.
The merger is subject to adoption of the merger agreement by Coventry stockholders, early termination or expiration of the waiting period under the HSR Act, the required governmental authorizations having been obtained and being in full force and effect and other usual and customary conditions to completion. As of the date of this Current Report on Form 8-K, the merger is expected to be completed in mid-2013.
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information was prepared using the acquisition method of accounting and was based on the historical financial statements of Aetna and Coventry. The acquisition method of accounting is based on ASC 805 and uses the fair value concepts defined in ASC 820,
Fair Value Measurements.
 
 
ASC 805 requires, among other things, that most assets acquired and liabilities assumed be recognized at their fair values as of the acquisition date. In addition, ASC 805 requires that the consideration transferred be measured at the date the merger is completed at the then-current market price. This requirement will likely result in a per share equity component that is different from the amount assumed in these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements.
ASC 820 defines the term "fair value" and sets forth the valuation requirements for any asset or liability measured at fair value, expands related disclosure requirements and specifies a hierarchy of valuation techniques based on the nature of the inputs used to develop the fair value measures. Fair value is defined in ASC 820 as "the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date." This is an exit price concept for the valuation of the asset or liability. In addition, market participants are assumed to be buyers and sellers in the principal (or the most advantageous) market for the asset or liability. Fair value measurements for an asset assume the highest and best use by these market participants. As a result of these standards, Aetna may be required to record the fair value of assets which are not intended to be used or sold and/or to value assets at fair value measures that do not reflect Aetna's intended use of those assets. Many of these fair value measurements can be highly subjective, and it is possible that other professionals, applying reasonable judgment to the same facts and circumstances, could develop and support a range of alternative estimated amounts.
Under the acquisition method of accounting, the assets acquired and liabilities assumed will be recorded, as of completion of the merger, primarily at their respective fair values and added to those of Aetna. Financial statements and reported results of operations of Aetna issued after completion of the merger will reflect these values, but will not be retroactively restated to reflect the historical financial position or results of operations of Coventry.
Under ASC 805, acquisition-related transaction costs (e.g., advisory, legal, valuation and other professional fees) are not included as a component of consideration transferred but are accounted for as expenses in the periods in which the costs are incurred. Total acquisition-related transaction costs expected to be incurred by Aetna and Coventry are estimated to be approximately $128 million and $45 million, respectively, of which none had been incurred as of June 30, 2012. Acquisition-related transaction costs expected to be incurred by Aetna include estimated fees related to a bridge financing commitment and agreement and estimated interest costs associated with the expected issuance of long-term transaction-related debt in the fourth quarter of 2012. Those costs are reflected in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as an increase to accrued expenses and other current liabilities, with the related tax benefits reflected as an increase in other current assets and the after tax impact presented as a decrease to retained earnings.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect the projected realization of cost savings following completion of the merger. These cost savings opportunities are from administrative cost savings, as well as network and medical management savings. Although Aetna projects that cost savings will result from the merger, there can be no assurance that these cost savings will be achieved. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect projected pretax restructuring and integration charges associated with the projected cost savings, which are projected to be approximately $250 million to $300 million over a period of three years following completion of the merger. Such restructuring and integration charges will be expensed in the appropriate accounting periods after completion of the merger.
 
At completion of the merger, Aetna will review Coventry's accounting policies. As a result of that review, Aetna may identify differences between the accounting policies of the two companies that, when conformed, could have a material impact on the combined financial statements. At this time, Aetna is not aware of any differences that would have a material impact on the combined financial statements. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements assume there are no differences in accounting policies.
 
 
The following is a preliminary estimate of consideration expected to be transferred to effect the acquisition of Coventry:
 
 
Certain amounts may reflect rounding adjustments.
 
 
 
The following is a preliminary estimate of the assets to be acquired and the liabilities to be assumed by Aetna in the merger, reconciled to the estimate of total consideration expected to be transferred:
 
 
The fair value of identifiable intangible assets is determined primarily using variations of the "income approach," which is based on the present value of the future after tax cash flows attributable to each identified intangible asset. Other valuation methods, including the market approach and cost approach, were also considered in estimating the fair value. Under the HSR Act and other relevant laws and regulations, there are significant limitations on Aetna's ability to obtain specific information about the Coventry intangible assets prior to completion of the merger.
At this time, Aetna does not have sufficient information as to the amount, timing and risk of cash flows of all of Coventry's identifiable intangible assets to determine their fair value. Some of the more significant assumptions inherent in the development of intangible asset values, from the perspective of a market participant, include: the amount and timing of projected future cash flows (including revenue and profitability); the discount rate selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows; and the assessment of the asset's life cycle and the competitive trends impacting the asset. However, for purposes of these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements and using publicly available
 
 
information, such as historical revenues, Coventry's cost structure, industry information for comparable intangible assets and certain other high-level assumptions, the fair value of Coventry's identifiable intangible assets and their weighted-average useful lives have been estimated as follows:
 
These preliminary estimates of fair value and weighted-average useful life will likely be different from the final acquisition accounting, and the difference could have a material impact on the accompanying unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. Once Aetna has full access to information about Coventry's intangible assets, additional insight will be gained that could impact (i) the estimated total value assigned to intangible assets, (ii) the estimated allocation of value between finite-lived and indefinite-lived intangible assets and/or (iii) the estimated weighted-average useful life of each category of intangible assets. The estimated intangible asset values and their useful lives could be impacted by a variety of factors that may become known to Aetna only upon access to additional information and/or by changes in such factors that may occur prior to completion of the merger. These factors include, but are not limited to, changes in the regulatory, legislative, legal, technological and competitive environments. Increased knowledge about these and/or other elements could result in a change to the estimated fair value of the identifiable Coventry intangible assets and/or to the estimated weighted-average useful lives from what Aetna has assumed in these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. The combined effect of any such changes could then also result in a significant increase or decrease to Aetna's estimate of associated amortization expense.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Aetna and Coventry each have a Missouri Medicaid business. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information assumes Aetna will dispose of its Missouri Medicaid business at the time of the merger and continue to operate Coventry's Missouri Medicaid business. Specifically, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income reflect the elimination of the revenues associated with Aetna's Missouri Medicaid business as well as elimination of the costs specifically identifiable with that revenue. Aetna does not currently have market participant bids or other information regarding similar transactions that may be indicative of the fair value of the Missouri Medicaid business. As a result, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet reflects the disposal of Aetna's Missouri Medicaid business assuming that the book value of that business approximates fair value, and also assumes cash consideration received equal to book value.
 
This note should be read in conjunction with and Adjustments included in the column under the heading "Pro Forma Adjustments" represent the following:
Note 1. Description of Transaction; Note 2. Basis of Presentation; Note 4. Estimate of Consideration Expected to be Transferred;
Note 5. Estimate of Assets to be Acquired and Liabilities to be Assumed.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The following table summarizes the computation of the unaudited pro forma combined weighted average basic and diluted shares outstanding:
 
 
Certain amounts may reflect rounding adjustments.
 
 
This note should be read in conjunction with ; and Adjustments included in the column under the heading "Pro Forma Adjustments" represent the following:
Note 1. Description of Transaction; Note 2. Basis of Presentation
Note 4. Estimate of Consideration Expected to be Transferred;
Note 5. Estimate of Assets to be Acquired and Liabilities to be Assumed.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not present a combined dividend per share amount. On both April 27, 2012 and July 27, 2012, Aetna paid dividends of $0.175 per Aetna common share. In addition, on September 28, 2012, Aetna declared a dividend of $0.175 per Aetna common share, which will be paid on October 26, 2012, and is not reflected in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. On both April 9, 2012 and July 9, 2012, Coventry paid dividends of $0.125 per share of Coventry common stock. In addition, on August 27, 2012, Coventry declared a dividend of $0.125 per share of Coventry common stock, which was paid on October 8, 2012, and is not reflected in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. Coventry is not permitted to declare, set aside or pay a dividend or other distribution other than its regular quarterly cash dividend in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, in an amount not in excess of $0.125 per share of Coventry common stock prior to completion of the merger, and any future payment of Coventry's quarterly dividend is subject to future approval and declaration by the Coventry board of directors. Prior to completion of the merger, Aetna is not permitted to declare, set aside or pay any dividend or other distribution other than its regular cash dividend in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice. The dividend policy of Aetna following completion of the merger will be determined by the Aetna board of directors following completion of the merger.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect the projected realization of cost savings following completion of the merger. These cost savings opportunities are from administrative cost savings, as well as network and medical management savings. Although Aetna management projects that cost savings will result from the merger, there can be no assurance that these cost savings will be achieved.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121025062900.txt.gz
TIME:20121025062900
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On October 25, 2012, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended September 30, 2012. A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA REPORTS
THIRD
-QUARTER 2012 RESULTS
HARTFORD, Conn., 
October 25, 2012
- Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced
third
-quarter 2012 operating earnings
(1)
of $
523.2 million
, or $1.55 per share, a per share increase of 11 percent over the third quarter of 2011. Net income for the
third
quarter of 2012 was
$499.2 million
, or
$1.47
per share, and includes a $.07 per share loss on the early extinguishment of long-term debt, $.04 per share of transaction-related costs associated with the proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. and $
.03
per share of net realized capital gains.
Aetna/
2
Aetna's strong performance in the third quarter is the result of our diversified business model, and demonstrates the rigor with which we manage our operations, said Mark T. Bertolini, Aetna chairman, CEO and president. We've achieved our full-year medical membership guidance level of approximately 18.2 million medical members and remain focused on a disciplined balance between profitability and growth.
Our emerging businesses strategy continues to see positive results from collaboration with providers, including lower costs, higher care quality and added membership for our core businesses. We just announced our newest accountable care organization plus a package of commercial health plans with a group of independent physician practice associations in California. To date, Aetna has 11 signed Accountable Care Solutions partnerships, with 26 letters of intent and a robust pipeline of prospects, said Bertolini.
The third quarter was an important one for Aetna, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, Aetna senior executive vice president and CFO.  We committed to deploy more than $7 billion of capital for our proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care. We continued to execute on the fundamentals of our business and deliver solid financial performance this year, including a 6 percent increase in revenues and strong cash flow generation.
Based on our year-to-date performance, we are raising our full-year 2012 operating earnings per share guidance to approximately $5.10 per share. Looking beyond 2012, we believe we have the winning strategy in the marketplace. Our core businesses, supplemented by emerging businesses growth and effective capital deployment, position Aetna for growth, said Zubretsky.
Total company results
Aetna/
3
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
Aetna/
4
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Aetna/
5
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily for qualified pension plans, reported:
Aetna's conference call to discuss
third
-quarter 2012 results will begin at 7:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetna's Investor Information website.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 1-888-352-6793 or +1-719-325-2204 for
international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 6373334. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 1-888-203-1112, or +1-719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 6373334. Telephone replays will be available until 11 p.m. ET on November 7, 2012.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities, Medicaid health care management services and health information technology services. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, health care providers, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
Aetna/
6
Aetna/
7
Aetna/
8
Aetna/
9
Aetna/
10
Aetna/
11
Aetna/
12
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
For the periods covered in this press release, the following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 7 through 9 and 11 of this press release.
(2)
Projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Projected operating earnings per share also excludes projected transaction-related costs related to the Coventry acquisition. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction-related costs related to the Coventry acquisition) and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2012 reflect a range of approximately 344 million to 347 million weighted average diluted shares.
(3)
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses as noted in
(1)
above. Refer to the tables on pages 8, 9 and 11 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses to revenue calculated under GAAP.
(4)
The business segment operating expense ratio reflects the exclusion of the Corporate Financing segment from operating expenses and excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any. For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 9 of this press release.
(5)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetna's profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetna's pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetna's performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes. Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(7)
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. Net income of the Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt, the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (benefits), and the loss on the early extinguishment of long-term debt. As described in (1) above, operating earnings of the Corporate Financing segment exclude other items, if any. In the third quarter of 2012, Corporate Financing operating earnings exclude the loss on the early extinguishment of long-term debt and the interest expense component of transaction-related costs.
(8)
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetna's Commercial medical membership.
(9)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetna's dental provider network for a nominal fee.
Aetna/
13
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, medical membership and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the risk that a regulatory approval for the proposed acquisition of Coventry is delayed, is not obtained or is subject to conditions that are not anticipated; the diversion of management time on acquisition related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to repeal, amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, the 2012 presidential and congressional elections, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q) and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (Aetna's Second Quarter 10-Q"), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC), and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 (together with Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q and Second Quarter 10-Q, Aetna's "Quarterly Reports"), when filed with the SEC. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121106162513.txt.gz
TIME:20121106162513
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 8 - Other Events
 
Item 8.01.  Other Events.
 
In connection with Aetna Inc.'s ("Aetna's") proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry"), attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein are Aetna and Coventry unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements as of, and for the nine months ended, September 30, 2012 and for the year ended December 31, 2011 (the Pro Formas).  The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2011, and for the nine months ended September 30, 2012, combine the historical consolidated statements of income of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the merger of a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna ("Merger Sub") with and into Coventry, with Coventry surviving the merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (the "Merger") as if it had occurred on the first day of each period presented. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of September 30, 2012, combines the historical consolidated balance sheets of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the Merger as if it had occurred on September 30, 2012.
 
The Pro Formas and the accompanying notes are based on, and should be read in conjunction with, the following historical consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes:
Coventry's separate historical financial statements referred to in the preceding paragraph were prepared by Coventry and provided to Aetna. Aetna takes no responsibility for Coventry's separate historical financial statements, and Aetna is not incorporating into this Current Report on Form 8-K such financial statements. Coventry's separate historical financial statements may be read and copied at the SEC's public reference room at 100 F Street, N.E., Room 1580, Washington, D.C., 20549. Please call the SEC at 1-800-SEC-0330 for further information on the operation of the public reference room. Coventry's separate historical financial statements contained in its SEC filings are also available to the public at the SEC's web site at
www.sec.gov
.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) Exhibit
 
The following exhibit is filed as part of this Current Report:
Important Information For Investors And Stockholders
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval. Aetna Inc. (Aetna) has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) a registration statement on Form S-4 (File No. 333-184041), including Amendment No. 1 thereto, containing a proxy statement/prospectus, and Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry) has filed with the SEC a proxy statement/prospectus, and each of Aetna and Coventry has filed and will file other documents with respect to the proposed acquisition of Coventry. The registration statement was declared effective on October 18, 2012, and Aetna and Coventry commenced mailing the definitive proxy statement/prospectus to Coventry stockholders on or about October 19, 2012. INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF COVENTRY ARE URGED TO READ THE DEFINITIVE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS AND ANY OTHER DOCUMENTS THAT HAVE BEEN FILED OR WILL BE FILED WITH THE SEC CAREFULLY AND IN THEIR ENTIRETY BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN OR WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION. Investors and security holders may obtain free copies of the registration statement and the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other documents filed with the SEC by Aetna or Coventry through the website maintained by the SEC at
http://www.sec.gov
. Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Aetna will be available free of charge on Aetna's internet website at
http://www.aetna.com
or by contacting Aetna's Investor Relations Department at 860-273-8204. Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Coventry will be available free of charge on Coventry's internet website at
http://www.cvty.com
or by contacting Coventry's Investor Relations Department at 301-581-5717.
Aetna, Coventry, their respective directors and certain of their executive officers may be considered participants in the solicitation of proxies in connection with the proposed transaction. Information about the directors and executive officers of Coventry is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 28, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 6, 2012, and its Current Report on Form 8-K, which was filed with the SEC on May 31, 2012. Information about the directors and executive officers of Aetna is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 24, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of shareholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 9, 2012, and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012, which was filed with the SEC on October 25, 2012. Other information regarding the participants in the proxy solicitations and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, are contained in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials filed with the SEC.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

Exhibit 99.1
AETNA AND COVENTRY
UNAUDITED PRO FORMA CONDENSED COMBINED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2011, and for the nine months ended September 30, 2012, combine the historical consolidated statements of income of Aetna Inc. ("Aetna") and Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry"), giving effect to the merger of a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna ("Merger Sub") with and into Coventry (which is referred to as the merger) as if it had occurred on the first day of each period presented. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of September 30, 2012, combines the historical consolidated balance sheets of Aetna and Coventry, giving effect to the merger as if it had occurred on September 30, 2012. The historical consolidated financial information has been adjusted in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements to give effect to pro forma events that are (i) directly attributable to the merger, (ii) factually supportable, and (iii) with respect to the statements of income, expected to have a continuing impact on the combined results. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information should be read in conjunction with the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. In addition, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information was based on and should be read in conjunction with, the following historical consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes:
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information has been prepared by Aetna using the acquisition method of accounting in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. Aetna has been treated as the acquirer in the merger for accounting purposes. The acquisition accounting is dependent upon certain valuation and other studies that have yet to commence or progress to a stage where there is sufficient information for a definitive measurement. The proposed merger has not yet received the necessary approvals from governmental authorities, and under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (which is referred to as the HSR Act) and other relevant laws and regulations, before completion of the merger, there are significant limitations regarding what Aetna can learn about Coventry. The assets and liabilities of Coventry have been measured based on various preliminary estimates using assumptions that Aetna believes are reasonable based on information that is currently available. Differences between these preliminary estimates and the final acquisition accounting will occur, and those differences could have a material impact on the accompanying unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements and the combined companys future results of operations and financial position. The pro forma adjustments are preliminary and have been made solely for the purpose of providing unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements prepared in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Aetna intends to commence the necessary valuation and other studies required to complete the acquisition accounting promptly upon completion of the merger and will finalize the acquisition accounting as soon as practicable within the required measurement period in accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board Accounting Standards Codification (which is referred to as ASC) 805,
Business Combinations
, but in no event later than one year following completion of the merger.
Page
1
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information has been presented for informational purposes only. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information does not purport to represent the actual results of operations that Aetna and Coventry would have achieved had the companies been combined during these periods and is not intended to project the future results of operations that the combined company may achieve after the merger. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information does not reflect the realization of any cost savings following completion of the merger and also does not reflect any related restructuring and integration charges to achieve those cost savings. Material intercompany transactions between Aetna and Coventry during the periods presented in the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements have been eliminated (refer to
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments
and
Note 8. Balance Sheet Pro Forma Adjustments
).
Page
2
Unaudited Pro Forma Condensed Combined
Statement of Income
For the Year Ended December 31, 2011
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments.
Page
3
Unaudited Pro Forma Condensed Combined
Statement of Income
For the Nine Months Ended September 30, 2012
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in
Note 7. Income Statement Pro Forma Adjustments.
Page
4
Unaudited Pro Forma Condensed Combined
Balance Sheet
As of September 30, 2012
See the accompanying notes to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, which are an integral part of these statements. The pro forma adjustments are explained in
Note 8. Balance Sheet Pro Forma Adjustments.
Page
5
NOTES TO THE UNAUDITED PRO FORMA CONDENSED
COMBINED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
On August 19, 2012, Aetna, Merger Sub and Coventry entered into the Agreement and Plan of Merger (which, as amended, is referred to as the merger agreement), pursuant to which, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the merger agreement, Coventry will become a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna. Upon completion of the merger, each share of Coventry common stock issued and outstanding will be converted into the right to receive $27.30 in cash, without interest, and 0.3885 of an Aetna common share.
At completion of the merger, each option to purchase shares of Coventry common stock outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price less than the sum of (a) $27.30 and (b) the product of the Aetna closing price multiplied by 0.3885 (which sum is referred to as the equity award cash consideration and which options are referred to as in-the-money options), will be cancelled and converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest and less applicable withholding taxes, equal to the product of (x) the excess of (i) the equity award cash consideration over (ii) the applicable per share exercise price of that in-the-money option multiplied by (y) the total number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that in-the-money option. The average of the volume weighted averages of the trading prices for Aetna common shares on the New York Stock Exchange for each of the five trading days ending on the trading day that is two trading days prior to the completion of the merger is referred to as the Aetna closing price.
During the 60-day period following the date of the merger agreement, Aetna and Coventry discussed the treatment of each option to purchase shares of Coventry common stock outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan, whether or not vested or exercisable, with a per share exercise price greater than or equal to the equity award cash consideration (which options are referred to as underwater options), taking into account the appropriate terms and conditions of each such underwater option and decided to cancel such underwater options upon completion of the merger. Aetna has agreed to pay the holders of underwater options that execute customary acknowledgments and waivers an amount in cash calculated by reference to the exercise price of the underwater options and equivalent to $1.00 to $4.00 for each share of Coventry common stock subject to an underwater option. For active employees of Coventry, such payment will also be conditioned upon such employee remaining employed by the surviving corporation or Aetna for one year following the closing of the merger (subject to acceleration upon certain terminations of employment).
At completion of the merger, each outstanding restricted share of Coventry common stock (which represents a share of Coventry common stock subject to vesting and forfeiture restrictions) will be converted into the right to receive the merger consideration payable to holders of shares of Coventry common stock, less applicable withholding taxes.
At completion of the merger, each Coventry performance share unit and restricted stock unit outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan (which are collectively referred to as Coventry stock units) that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the merger agreement, is vested or becomes vested upon completion of the merger and each Coventry stock unit held by Allen F. Wise, which are collectively referred to as cashed-out units, will be converted into the right to receive an amount in cash, without interest and less applicable withholding taxes, equal to the product of (a) the equity award cash consideration multiplied by (b) the number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that cashed-out unit.
At completion of the merger, each Coventry stock unit outstanding under any Coventry employee benefit plan that, pursuant to its terms as of the date of the merger agreement, is not vested and will not become vested upon completion of the merger (other than the Coventry stock units held by Mr. Wise), which are referred to as rollover units, will be converted into a cash-settled Aetna restricted stock unit with the number of Aetna common shares underlying that cash-settled Aetna restricted stock unit equal to the product of (x) the number of shares of Coventry common stock underlying that rollover unit immediately prior to completion of the merger multiplied by (y) the quotient of (i) the equity award cash consideration divided by (ii) the Aetna closing price. Each such cash-settled
Page
6
Aetna restricted stock unit will be subject to the same terms and conditions (including service-based vesting) as applied to the corresponding rollover unit immediately prior to completion of the merger.
The merger is subject to adoption of the merger agreement by Coventry stockholders, early termination or expiration of the waiting period under the HSR Act, the required governmental authorizations having been obtained and being in full force and effect and other usual and customary conditions to completion. As of the date of this Current Report on Form 8-K, the merger is expected to be completed in mid-2013.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information was prepared using the acquisition method of accounting and was based on the historical financial statements of Aetna and Coventry. The acquisition method of accounting is based on ASC 805 and uses the fair value concepts defined in ASC 820,
Fair Value Measurements
.
ASC 805 requires, among other things, that most assets acquired and liabilities assumed be recognized at their fair values as of the acquisition date. In addition, ASC 805 requires that the consideration transferred be measured at the date the merger is completed at the then-current market price. This requirement will likely result in a per share equity component that is different from the amount assumed in these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements.
ASC 820 defines the term fair value and sets forth the valuation requirements for any asset or liability measured at fair value, expands related disclosure requirements and specifies a hierarchy of valuation techniques based on the nature of the inputs used to develop the fair value measures. Fair value is defined in ASC 820 as the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date. This is an exit price concept for the valuation of the asset or liability. In addition, market participants are assumed to be buyers and sellers in the principal (or the most advantageous) market for the asset or liability. Fair value measurements for an asset assume the highest and best use by these market participants. As a result of these standards, Aetna may be required to record the fair value of assets which are not intended to be used or sold and/or to value assets at fair value measures that do not reflect Aetnas intended use of those assets. Many of these fair value measurements can be highly subjective, and it is possible that other professionals, applying reasonable judgment to the same facts and circumstances, could develop and support a range of alternative estimated amounts.
Under the acquisition method of accounting, the assets acquired and liabilities assumed will be recorded, as of completion of the merger, primarily at their respective fair values and added to those of Aetna. Financial statements and reported results of operations of Aetna issued after completion of the merger will reflect these values, but will not be retroactively restated to reflect the historical financial position or results of operations of Coventry.
Under ASC 805, acquisition-related transaction costs (e.g., advisory, legal, valuation and other professional fees) are not included as a component of consideration transferred but are accounted for as expenses in the periods in which the costs are incurred. Acquisition-related transaction costs expected to be incurred by Aetna include estimated fees related to a bridge financing commitment and agreement and estimated interest costs associated with the issuance of long-term transaction-related debt that Aetna agreed to issue on November 2, 2012. Total acquisition-related transaction costs expected to be incurred by Aetna and Coventry are estimated to be approximately $120 million and $37 million, respectively, of which $13.8 million and $6.5 million, respectively, has been incurred in the nine months ended September 30, 2012.
Acquisition-related transaction costs incurred in the nine months ended September 30, 2012 are reflected as a pro forma adjustment to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statement of income for that same period as a reduction to selling, general and administrative expenses because those costs are not expected to have a continuing impact on the combined results. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of September 30, 2012 is required to include adjustments which give effect to events that are directly attributable to the transaction regardless of whether they are expected to have a continuing impact on the combined results or are non-recurring.
Page
7
Therefore, acquisition-related transaction costs expected to be incurred by Aetna and Coventry subsequent to September 30, 2012 of $106.2 million and $30.6 million, respectively, are reflected as a pro forma adjustment to the unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet as of September 30, 2012 as an increase to accrued expenses and other current liabilities, with the related tax benefits reflected as an increase in other current assets and the after tax impact presented as a decrease to retained earnings.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect the projected realization of cost savings following completion of the merger. These cost savings opportunities are from administrative cost savings, as well as network and medical management savings. Although Aetna projects that cost savings will result from the merger, there can be no assurance that these cost savings will be achieved. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect projected pretax restructuring and integration charges associated with the projected cost savings, which are projected to be approximately $250 million to $300 million over a period of three years following completion of the merger. Such restructuring and integration charges will be expensed in the appropriate accounting periods after completion of the merger.
At completion of the merger, Aetna will review Coventrys accounting policies. As a result of that review, Aetna may identify differences between the accounting policies of the two companies that, when conformed, could have a material impact on the combined financial statements. At this time, Aetna is not aware of any differences that would have a material impact on the combined financial statements. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements assume there are no differences in accounting policies.
The following is a preliminary estimate of consideration expected to be transferred to effect the acquisition of Coventry:
Page
8
Certain amounts may reflect rounding adjustments
(a) Pursuant to the terms of the Employment Agreement between Coventry and Allen F. Wise, dated April 30, 2009, as amended on June 16, 2010 and January 31, 2012, on January 1, 2013. Mr. Wise is entitled to receive Coventry stock units with a grant date fair value of $7,600,000, which is referred to as the Wise 2013 Grant. The Wise 2013 Grant is not reflected in the table above.
The following is a preliminary estimate of the assets to be acquired and the liabilities to be assumed by Aetna in the merger, reconciled to the estimate of total consideration expected to be transferred:
Page
9
The fair value of identifiable intangible assets is determined primarily using variations of the income approach, which is based on the present value of the future after tax cash flows attributable to each identified intangible asset. Other valuation methods, including the market approach and cost approach, were also considered in estimating the fair value. Under the HSR Act and other relevant laws and regulations, there are significant limitations on Aetna's ability to obtain specific information about the Coventry intangible assets prior to completion of the merger.
At this time, Aetna does not have sufficient information as to the amount, timing and risk of cash flows of all of Coventry's identifiable intangible assets to determine their fair value. Some of the more significant assumptions inherent in the development of intangible asset values, from the perspective of a market participant, include: the amount and timing of projected future cash flows (including revenue and profitability); the discount rate selected to measure the risks inherent in the future cash flows; and the assessment of the assets life cycle and the competitive trends impacting the asset. However, for purposes of these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements and using publicly available information, such as historical revenues, Coventrys cost structure, industry information for comparable intangible assets and certain other high-level assumptions, the fair value of Coventry's identifiable intangible assets and their weighted-average useful lives have been estimated as follows:
These preliminary estimates of fair value and weighted-average useful life will likely be different from the final acquisition accounting, and the difference could have a material impact on the accompanying unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. Once Aetna has full access to information about Coventry's intangible assets, additional insight will be gained that could impact (i) the estimated total value assigned to intangible assets, (ii) the estimated allocation of value between finite-lived and indefinite-lived intangible assets and/or (iii) the estimated weighted-average useful life of each category of intangible assets. The estimated intangible asset values and their useful lives could be impacted by a variety of factors that may become known to Aetna only upon access to additional information and/or by changes in such factors that may occur prior to completion of the merger. These factors include, but are not limited to, changes in the regulatory, legislative, legal, technological and competitive environments. Increased knowledge about these and/or other elements could result in a change to the estimated fair value of the identifiable Coventry intangible assets and/or to the estimated weighted-average useful lives from what Aetna has assumed in these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements. The combined effect of any such changes could then also result in a significant increase or decrease to Aetna's estimate of associated amortization expense.
Page
10
(*) Aetna assumed a 35% tax rate when estimating the deferred tax aspects of the acquisition.
(e) As of completion of the merger, property and equipment is required to be measured at fair value, unless those assets are classified as held-for-sale on the acquisition date. The acquired assets can include assets that are not intended to be used or sold, or that are intended to be used in a manner other than their highest and best use. Aetna does not have sufficient information at this time as to the specific nature, age, condition or location of Coventry's property and equipment, and Aetna does not know the appropriate valuation premise, in-use or in-exchange, as the valuation premise requires a certain level of knowledge about the assets being evaluated as well as a profile of the associated market participants. All of these elements can cause differences between fair value and net book value. Accordingly, for the purposes of these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, Aetna has assumed that the current Coventry book values represent the best estimate of fair value except for capitalized internal-use software for which the historical book value was eliminated as the fair value was estimated in (b) above. This estimate is preliminary and subject to change and could vary materially from the actual value on the date the merger is completed.
Aetna and Coventry each have a Missouri Medicaid business. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial information assumes Aetna will dispose of its Missouri Medicaid business at the time of the merger and continue to operate Coventry's Missouri Medicaid business. Specifically, the unaudited pro forma condensed combined statements of income reflect the elimination of the revenues associated with Aetna's Missouri Medicaid business as well as elimination of the costs specifically identifiable with that revenue. The unaudited pro forma condensed combined balance sheet reflects the disposal of Aetna's Missouri Medicaid business assuming that the book value of that business
approximates fair value, and also assumes cash consideration received equal to book value. The actual fair value of Aetna's Missouri Medicaid business, and the actual cash consideration received, may be greater than, or less than, book value.
Page
11
This note should be read in conjunction with
Note 1. Description of Transaction
;
Note 2. Basis of Presentation
;
Note 4. Estimate of Consideration Expected to be Transferred;
and
Note 5. Estimate of Assets to be Acquired and Liabilities to be Assumed
. Adjustments included in the column under the heading Pro Forma Adjustments represent the following:
(c) For purposes of these unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements, Aetna estimated foregone interest income associated with adjusting the amortized cost of Coventry's investment portfolio to fair value as of completion of the merger. Foregone interest income due to fair value adjustments to the investment portfolio under the acquisition method of accounting is projected to be approximately $31.2 million and $19.3 million in 2011 and for the nine months ended September 30, 2012, respectively.
(*) Assumes an estimated $1.3 billion of finite-lived intangibles and a weighted average amortization period of 12 years (Refer to
Note 5. Estimate of Assets to be Acquired and Liabilities to be Assumed
).
Page
12
Page
13
The following table summarizes the computation of the unaudited pro forma combined weighted average basic and diluted shares outstanding:
Certain amounts may reflect rounding adjustments.
This note should be read in conjunction with
Note 1. Description of Transaction
;
Note 2. Basis of Presentation
;
Note 4. Estimate of Consideration Expected to be Transferred;
and
Note 5. Estimate of Assets to be Acquired and Liabilities to be Assumed
. Adjustments included in the column under the heading Pro Forma Adjustments represent the following:
(b) To eliminate intercompany accounts receivable and accrued expenses primarily related to network rental fees of $1.4 million.
    
Page
14
    
    
(j) To adjust tax liabilities as follows:
    
    
Page
15
    
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not present a combined dividend per share amount. On April 27, 2012, July 27, 2012, and October 26, 2012, Aetna paid dividends of $0.175 per Aetna common share. On April 9, 2012, July 9, 2012, and October 8, 2012, Coventry paid dividends of $0.125 per share of Coventry common stock. Coventry is not permitted to declare, set aside or pay a dividend or other distribution other than its regular quarterly cash dividend in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice, in an amount not in excess of $0.125 per share of Coventry common stock prior to completion of the merger, and any future payment of Coventry's quarterly dividend is subject to future approval and declaration by the Coventry board of directors. Prior to completion of the merger, Aetna is not permitted to declare, set aside or pay any dividend or other distribution other than its regular cash dividend in the ordinary course of business consistent with past practice. The dividend policy of Aetna following completion of the merger will be determined by the Aetna board of directors following completion of the merger.
The unaudited pro forma condensed combined financial statements do not reflect the projected realization of cost savings following completion of the merger. These cost savings opportunities are from administrative cost savings, as well as network and medical management savings. Although Aetna management projects that cost savings will result from the merger, there can be no assurance that these cost savings will be achieved.
Page
16


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121107104055.txt.gz
TIME:20121107104055
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrant's Business and Operations
 
On November 2, 2012, Aetna Inc. (the "Company") executed a Pricing Agreement (the "Pricing Agreement") with Goldman, Sachs & Co. and UBS Securities LLC, as representatives of the underwriters named in Schedule I thereto (together, the "Underwriters"), pursuant to which the Company agreed to issue and sell to the Underwriters $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.50% senior notes due November 15, 2017, $1,000,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 2.75% senior notes due November 15, 2022 and $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 4.125% senior notes due November 15, 2042 (collectively, the "Senior Notes"). The Pricing Agreement incorporated by reference the terms of an Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") of the Company dated as of May 1, 2012. The sale of the Senior Notes was registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission in a Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-178272) (the "Registration Statement"). The Senior Notes were offered pursuant to a prospectus dated December 2, 2011 and a prospectus supplement dated November 2, 2012. The issuance of the Senior Notes is scheduled to close on November 7, 2012.
Goldman, Sachs & Co. and UBS Securities LLC have each served as our financial advisors in connection with the merger of a wholly owned subsidiary of the Company with and into Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry") (which is referred to as the merger). Certain affiliates of the Underwriters have committed to provide bridge financing for the merger pursuant to the terms of our $2,000,000,000 Bridge Credit Agreement dated as of September 24, 2012 (the "Bridge Credit Agreement"), among the Company, the lenders party thereto and Goldman Sachs Bank USA, as Administrative Agent (the "Administrative Agent"). As described under Item 1.02 below, the commitments of such affiliates of the Underwriters will be terminated following the closing of the offering of the Senior Notes.
In connection with the offering and sale of the Senior Notes, on November 7, 2012, a supplemental indenture of the Company was executed with U.S. Bank National Association, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the "Trustee"), to establish and designate the Senior Notes and the terms and characteristics of the Senior Notes (the "Supplemental Indenture"). The Supplemental Indenture was executed pursuant to the Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 between the Company and the Trustee (the "Base Indenture"). The Senior Notes were issued pursuant to the Base Indenture, as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture.
The Underwriting Agreement, which was filed as Exhibit 1.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 4, 2012, the Pricing Agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 1.1 to this Current Report, the Supplemental Indenture, which is filed as Exhibit 4.1 to this Current Report and the Base Indenture, which was filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Registration Statement filed on December 2, 2011, are each incorporated by reference herein in response to this Item 1.01.
 
On November 7, 2012, in connection with the closing of the offering of the Senior Notes, the Company sent a notice of termination to the Administrative Agent under the Bridge Credit Agreement pursuant to which the Bridge Credit Agreement will be terminated effective November 13, 2012, in accordance with the terms thereof. A description of the Bridge Credit Agreement is included under Item 2.03 of the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on September 27, 2012, which is incorporated by reference in response to this Item 1.02.
 
A copy of the opinion of Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP, special New York counsel to the Company, relating to the legality of the Senior Notes, is filed as Exhibit 5.1 to this Current Report. A copy of the opinion of Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel to the Company, as to certain matters governed by Pennsylvania law, is filed as Exhibit 5.2 to this Current Report.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
(d) Exhibits
The following exhibits are filed as part of this Current Report:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
Date: November 7, 2012
 
Exhibit Index
 

Exhibit 1.1
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
UBS Securities LLC
As Representatives of the several
Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto
November 2, 2012
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ""), proposes, subject to the terms and conditions stated herein and in the Underwriting Agreement dated May 1, 2012 (the ""), to issue and sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule I hereto (the "") the debt securities specified in Schedule II hereto (the ""). Each of the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement is incorporated herein by reference in its entirety, and shall be deemed to be a part of this Agreement to the same extent as if such provisions had been set forth in full herein; and each of the representations and warranties set forth therein shall be deemed to have been made at and as of the date of this Pricing Agreement. Each reference to the Representatives herein and in the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement so incorporated by reference shall be deemed to refer to you. The Representatives designated to act on behalf of each of the Underwriters of the Designated Securities pursuant to Section 15 of the Underwriting Agreement and the addresses of the Representatives referred to in such Section 15 are set forth at the end of Schedule II hereto. Unless otherwise defined herein, terms defined in the Underwriting Agreement are used herein as therein defined.
Company
Underwriting Agreement
Underwriters
Designated Securities
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, the Company agrees to issue and to sell to each of the Underwriters, and each of the Underwriters agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company, at the time and place and at the purchase price to the Underwriters set forth in Schedule II hereto, the principal amount of Designated Securities set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule I hereto, less the principal amount of Designated Securities covered by Delayed Delivery Contracts, if any, as may be specified in Schedule II hereto.
The Company further represents and warrants to, and agrees with, each of the Underwriters, as of the date hereof and as of the Time of Delivery for the Designated Securities, that the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of August 19, 2012 (as heretofore amended, the "Merger Agreement") among the Company, Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc. ("Merger Subsidiary"), and Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry") has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by, and constitutes a valid and legally binding agreement of, the Company and Merger Subsidiary enforceable against the Company and Merger Subsidiary in accordance with its terms. The Merger Agreement conforms in all material respects to the description thereof contained in Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please sign and return to us counterparts hereof, and upon acceptance hereof by you, on behalf of each of the Underwriters,
this letter and such acceptance hereof, including the provisions of the Underwriting Agreement incorporated herein by reference, shall constitute a binding agreement between each of the Underwriters and the Company. It is understood that your acceptance of this letter on behalf of each of the Underwriters is or will be pursuant to the authority set forth in a form of Agreement among Underwriters, the form of which shall be submitted to the Company for examination upon request.
Accepted as of the date hereof:
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
UBS Securities LLC
On behalf of each of the Underwriters
 
 
TITLE OF DESIGNATED SECURITIES:
1.50% Senior Notes due November 15, 2017 (hereinafter referred to as the "")
2017 Notes
2.75% Senior Notes due November 15, 2022 (hereinafter referred to as the "")
2022 Notes
4.125% Senior Notes due November 15, 2042 (hereinafter referred to as the "", and together with the 2017 Notes and the 2022 Notes, the "")
2042 Notes
Notes
AGGREGATE PRINCIPAL AMOUNT:
2017 Notes: $500,000,000
2022 Notes: $1,000,000,000
2042 Notes: $500,000,000
PRICE TO PUBLIC:
99.519% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2017 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from November 7, 2012
98.309% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2022 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from November 7, 2012
98.457% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2042 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from November 7, 2012
PURCHASE PRICE BY UNDERWRITERS:
98.919% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2017 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from November 7, 2012
97.659% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2022 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from November 7, 2012
97.582% of the aggregate principal amount of the 2042 Notes, plus accrued interest, if any, from November 7, 2012
SPECIFIED FUNDS FOR PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE:
Immediately available funds delivered to the bank account(s) specified in the cross-receipt to the Underwriters
INDENTURE:
Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001, between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as Trustee (the ""), as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture to be dated on or prior to November 7, 2012, between the Company and the Trustee (as so supplemented, the "").
Base Indenture
Indenture
MATURITY:
November 15, 2017 for the 2017 Notes
November 15, 2022 for the 2022 Notes
November 15, 2042 for the 2042 Notes
INTEREST RATE:
1.50% per annum for the 2017 Notes
2.75% per annum for the 2022 Notes
4.125% per annum for the 2042 Notes
INTEREST PAYMENT DATES:
With respect to the 2017 Notes, each May 15 and November 15, beginning May 15, 2013.
With respect to the 2022 Notes, each May 15 and November 15, beginning May 15, 2013.
With respect to the 2042 Notes, each May 15 and November 15, beginning May 15, 2013.
In any case where any interest payment date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
REDEMPTION PROVISIONS:
Optional Redemption
2017 Notes
At any time prior to October 15, 2017 (one month prior to the maturity date of the 2017 Notes), the 2017 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
At any time on or after October 15, 2017 (one month prior to the maturity date of the 2017 Notes), the 2017 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2017 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
2022 Notes
At any time prior to August 15, 2022 (three months prior to the maturity date of the 2022 Notes), the 2022 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
At any time on or after August 15, 2022 (three months prior to the maturity date of the 2022 Notes), the 2022 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2022 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
2042 Notes
At any time prior to May 15, 2042 (six months prior to the maturity date of the 2042 Notes), the 2042 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
At any time on or after May 15, 2042 (six months prior to the maturity date of the 2042 Notes), the 2042 Notes will be redeemable, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2042 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the date of redemption.
Certain Definitions
"" means, with respect to any redemption date for any portion of the Notes of a series,
Treasury Rate
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
"" means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes of the series to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes of such series to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
"" means, with respect to any redemption date for any Notes of a series, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations (as defined below) obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
"" means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
"" means each of Goldman, Sachs & Co. and UBS Securities LLC. If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a "Primary Treasury Dealer"), the Company will substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
"" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the redemption date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice; Interest
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 days but no more than 60 days before the redemption date to each holder of Notes of the series to be redeemed.
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the redemption price, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes of the series or the portions of the Notes of the series called for redemption on and after the redemption date.
Special Mandatory Redemption
If the merger (as defined below) has not been completed by November 19, 2013 (or such later date to which the End Date (as defined in the agreement and plan of merger, dated August 19, 2012, among the Company, Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc. and Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry") (as amended, the "merger agreement")) may be extended by agreement between the Company and Coventry, as described below) or if, prior to such date, the merger agreement is terminated, then the Company must redeem all of the Notes on the special mandatory redemption date at a redemption price equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes, plus accrued and unpaid interest from the date of initial issuance, or the most recent date to which interest has been paid or provided for, whichever is later, to, but excluding, the special mandatory redemption date. The "special mandatory redemption date" means the 30th day (or if such day is not a business day, the first business day thereafter) following the transmission of a notice of special mandatory redemption. The merger agreement provides that if the closing of the merger shall not have occurred on or before November 19, 2013, the Company or Coventry, as applicable, shall, if requested by the other, consider in good faith agreeing (but shall not be obligated to agree) to a further extension of the End Date. Pursuant to the merger agreement, subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, the Company will acquire Coventry in a transaction valued at approximately $7.3 billion, including the assumption of Coventry debt (the "merger"), based on the closing price of Aetna common shares on August 17, 2012.
The Company will cause notice of a special mandatory redemption to be transmitted to each holder of Notes at its registered address, with a copy to the Trustee, no later than 60 days after the occurrence of the event triggering redemption. If funds sufficient to pay the special mandatory redemption price of the Notes on the special mandatory redemption date (plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the special mandatory redemption date) are deposited with the Trustee on or before such special mandatory redemption date, the Notes will cease to bear interest on and after the special mandatory redemption date.
Repurchase Upon a Change of Control
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs with respect to the Notes of a series, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Notes of such series in full, as described under "Optional Redemption" above, the Company will make an offer to each holder of Notes of such series (the "Change of Control Offer") to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such holder's Notes of such series at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes of such series to be repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the "Change of Control Payment"). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Notes of a series, the Company will be required to mail a notice to holders of Notes of such series describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Notes of such series on the date specified in the notice (the "Change of Control Payment Date"), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Notes of such series and described in such notice. The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act, and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes of a series as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes of a series, the Company will be required to comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes by virtue of such conflicts.
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Notes of a series upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Notes of such series if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Notes of such series properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; provided that for all purposes of the Notes of such series and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Notes of such series unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Notes of such series at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third party's scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
On the Change of Control Payment Date for Notes of a series to be repurchased, the Company will be required, to the extent lawful, to:
 
 
 
"" means the Notes of a series are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Company's intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Company's intention to effect a Change of Control; provided, however, that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Notes of such series, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Notes of such series by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the Rating Agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Company's or the Trustee's request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
"" means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Company's voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Company's Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; provided, however, that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Company's voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition, "voting stock" means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
Change of Control
"" means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
"" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Notes; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Company's proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
"" means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
"" means a rating by Moody's equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moody's), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of "Rating Agencies."
Investment Grade Rating
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
"" means (1) Moody's, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moody's, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Notes of a series or fails to make a rating of the Notes of such series publicly available for reasons outside of the Company's control, a "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Company's Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moody's, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be, with respect to such series of Notes.
Rating Agencies
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
SINKING FUND PROVISIONS:
No sinking fund provisions
TIME OF DELIVERY:
9:00 a.m. Eastern time on November 7, 2012
CLOSING LOCATION:
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP, 125 Broad Street, New York, New York 10004
DELAYED DELIVERY:
None
NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF REPRESENTATIVES:
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
200 West St.
New York, New York 10282
UBS Securities LLC
677 Washington Boulevard
Stamford, CT 06901
OTHER TERMS:
The holders of the Notes will not have the benefit of clause (5) of Section 501 of the Base Indenture entitled "Events of Default."
The holders of the Notes will not have the benefit of Section 1005 of the Base Indenture entitled "Limitations on Liens on Common Stock of Principal Subsidiaries."
Time of Sale
4:16 p.m. Eastern time on November 2, 2012
Time of Sale Information
Preliminary Prospectus dated November 2, 2012
Free Writing Prospectus dated November 2, 2012
 
[intentionally omitted]
The Issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the Issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the Issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, copies of the prospectus and the prospectus supplement may be obtained from Goldman, Sachs & Co. by calling 1-866- 471-2525, UBS Securities LLC by calling 1-877-827-6444, ext. 561 3884, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC by calling 1-212-834-4533, Morgan Stanley & Co LLC by calling 1-866-718-1649 or RBS Securities Inc. by calling 1-866-884-2071.

Exhibit 4.1
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE (this ""), dated as of November 7, 2012, between AETNA INC., a corporation duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania (the ""), having its principal office at 151 Farmington Avenue, Hartford, Connecticut 06156 and U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the "").
Supplemental Indenture
Company
Trustee
WHEREAS, the Company and the Trustee entered into a Senior Indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 (the "", and as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, the "") providing for the issuance from time to time of the Company's debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness (the ""), to be issued in one more series as in the Base Indenture provided;
Base Indenture
Indenture
Securities
WHEREAS, Sections 201 and 301 of the Base Indenture provide that the Company and the Trustee may establish the terms of a new series of Securities in an indenture supplemental to the Base Indenture;
WHEREAS, Section 901 of the Base Indenture provides that the Company and the Trustee may enter into an indenture supplemental to the Base Indenture, without the consent of any Holders, to eliminate any of the provisions of the Base Indenture in respect of a new series of Securities so established pursuant to Section 301 of the Base Indenture;
WHEREAS, pursuant to resolutions adopted by the Board of Directors of the Company on September 23, 2011 and the Delegation of Authority of Mark T. Bertolini, Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President of the Company, dated October 25, 2012 (collectively, the ""), the Company has approved to be established three new series of Securities, designated as its 1.50% Senior Notes due November 15, 2017 (the ""), its 2.75% Senior Notes due November 15, 2022 (the "") and its 4.125% Senior Notes due November 15, 2042 (the "" and together with the 2017 Notes and the 2022 Notes, the "") as in this Supplemental Indenture provided; and
Company Resolutions
2017 Notes
2022 Notes
2042 Notes
Notes
WHEREAS, all requirements necessary to make this Supplemental Indenture a valid, binding and enforceable instrument in accordance with its terms and to make the Notes, when executed, authenticated and delivered by the Company, the valid, binding and enforceable obligations of the Company have been done and performed.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and mutual covenants herein contained and intending to be legally bound, the parties to this Supplemental Indenture hereby agree as follows:
Section 1.01
. Definitions.
(a) Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein have the respective meanings assigned to them in the Base Indenture.
(b) The following terms shall have the meanings assigned to them in this Section 1.01(b):
"" has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
2017 Notes
"" has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
2022 Notes
"" has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
2042 Notes
"" has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Base Indenture
"" means the Notes of a series are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Company's intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Company's intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Notes of such series, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Notes of such series by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 
to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the Rating Agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Company's or the Trustee's request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
"" means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Company's voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Company's Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Company's voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition, "" means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
Change of Control
provided, however
voting stock
"" has the meaning stated in Section 2.08(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Offer
"" has the meaning stated in Section 2.08(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Payment
"" has the meaning stated in Section 2.08(a) of this Supplemental Indenture.
Change of Control Payment Date
 
"" means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
"" means the Person named as the "Company" in the first paragraph of this Supplemental Indenture until a successor Person shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Indenture, and thereafter "Company" shall mean such successor Person.
Company
"" has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Company Resolutions
"" means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes of the series to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Notes of such series to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
"" means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Notes of a series, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
"" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Notes; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Company's proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
"" means Coventry Health Care, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Coventry
"" means The Depository Trust Company.
DTC
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in the Merger Agreement.
End Date
"" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and any successor statute thereto.
Exchange Act
"" means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
"" has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Indenture
 
"" means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
"" means a rating by Moody's equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moody's), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of "Rating Agencies".
Investment Grade Rating
"" means the acquisition of Coventry by the Company on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement.
Merger
"" means the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated August 19, 2012, among the Company, Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc. and Coventry, as amended from time to time.
Merger Agreement
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
"" has the meaning stated in the fourth recital of this Supplemental Indenture.
Notes
"" has the meaning stated in the definition of "Reference Treasury Dealer" in this Section 1.01(b).
Primary Treasury Dealer
"" means (1) Moody's, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moody's, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Notes of a series or fails to make a rating of the Notes of such series publicly available for reasons outside of the Company's control, a "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Company's Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moody's, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be, with respect to such series of Notes.
Rating Agencies
"" means each of Goldman, Sachs & Co. and UBS Securities LLC. If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a ""), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary Treasury Dealer
 
"" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
"" has the meaning stated in the first recital of this Supplemental Indenture and more particularly means any Securities authenticated and delivered under the Indenture, including, without limitation, the Notes.
Securities
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
"" means the 30th day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the first Business Day thereafter) following the transmission of a notice of special mandatory redemption.
Special Mandatory Redemption Date
"" has the meaning stated in the first paragraph of this instrument.
Supplemental Indenture
"" means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Notes of a series,
Treasury Rate
 
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
"" means the Person named as the "Trustee" in respect of the Notes in the first paragraph of this Supplemental Indenture until a successor Trustee in respect of the Notes shall have become such pursuant to the applicable provisions of the Indenture, and thereafter "Trustee" shall mean or include such Person who is then a Trustee in respect of the Notes.
Trustee
Section 1.02Each reference to a particular section set forth in this Supplemental Indenture shall, unless the context otherwise requires, refer to this Supplemental Indenture. Each reference to a particular section of the Base Indenture shall refer to that particular section of the Base Indenture.
. Section References.
Section 2.01The Notes shall be issued as three series of Securities under the Base Indenture as supplemented by this Supplemental Indenture, which such series shall be known and designated as the "1.50% Senior Notes due November 15, 2017", the "2.75% Senior Notes due November 15, 2022" and the "4.125% Senior Notes due November 15, 2042" of the Company. Each series of Notes shall constitute a separate series of Securities for all purposes under the Indenture. The Notes shall be unsecured. The Notes shall be executed, authenticated and delivered in accordance with the provisions of the Indenture. The aggregate principal amount of the 2017 Notes which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is initially limited to $500,000,000, the aggregate principal amount of the 2022 Notes which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is initially limited to $1,000,000,000 and the aggregate principal amount of the 2042 Notes which may be authenticated and delivered under the Indenture is initially limited to $500,000,000 (except, in each case, for such Notes authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, other Notes of the same series pursuant to Sections 304, 305, 306, 906 or 1107 of the Base Indenture and except for any Notes which, pursuant to Section 303 of the Base Indenture, are deemed never to have been authenticated and delivered thereunder). Additional Notes of a series may be authenticated and delivered from time to time as contemplated in Section 301 of the Base Indenture; that if the additional Notes of a series are not fungible with the Notes of such series for United States Federal income tax purposes, the additional Notes of the series will have a separate CUSIP number.
. Issue of Notes.
provided
 
The entire amount of Notes of each series may immediately be executed by the Company and delivered to the Trustee and shall be authenticated by the Trustee and delivered to or upon the order of the Company pursuant to Section 303 of the Base Indenture.
Section 2.02The Stated Maturity of the principal of the 2017 Notes shall be November 15, 2017, the Stated Maturity of the principal of the 2022 Notes shall be November 15, 2022 and the Stated Maturity of the principal of the 2042 Notes shall be November 15, 2042.
. Stated Maturity.
Section 2.03
. Notes Issuable as Global Securities.
(a) The Notes shall be issued in the form of one or more Global Securities registered in the name of DTC or its nominee, to be deposited with, or on behalf of, DTC, New York, New York.
(b) The Notes shall be in such form or forms as may be approved by the officers of the Company as provided in the Company Resolutions, such approval to be evidenced by any such officer's manual or facsimile signature on the Notes, provided that such form or forms of the Notes are not inconsistent with the requirements of the Indenture or the Company Resolutions and are substantially in the form or forms attached hereto as .
Exhibit A
Section 2.04The 2017 Notes shall bear interest at the rate of 1.50% per annum, the 2022 Notes shall bear interest at a rate of 2.75% per annum and the 2042 Notes shall bear interest at the rate of 4.125% per annum, which in each case will accrue from November 7, 2012, or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, as the case may be, payable semi-annually on May 15 and November 15 in each year, commencing May 15, 2013, to the Person in whose name such Notes (or one or more predecessor Notes) are registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date next preceding the Interest Payment Date. Each May 15 and November 15 shall be an "" for such Notes, and the May 1 or November 1 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding an Interest Payment Date shall be the "" for the interest payable on such Interest Payment Date. In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
. Interest and Payment.
Interest Payment Date
Regular Record Date
Section 2.05Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on the Notes will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York; , , that at any time that the Notes are not represented by Global Securities, at the option of the Company, payment of interest may be made by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as such address shall appear in the Security Register.
. Payment of Interest.
provided
however
 
Section 2.06
. Optional Redemption
(a) At any time prior to October 15, 2017, the 2017 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days' nor more than 60 calendar days' notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
(i) 100% of the principal amount of the 2017 Notes being redeemed, or
(ii) the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled payments of principal and interest on the 2017 Notes being redeemed from the Redemption Date to the date of Maturity for the 2017 Notes discounted to the Redemption Date on a semi-annual basis (assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months) at the Treasury Rate plus 12.5 basis points,
, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
plus
(b) At any time on or after October 15, 2017, the 2017 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days' nor more than 60 calendar days' notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2017 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
(c) At any time prior to August 15, 2022, the 2022 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days' nor more than 60 calendar days' notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
(i) 100% of the principal amount of the 2022 Notes being redeemed, or
(ii) the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled payments of principal and interest on the 2022 Notes being redeemed from the Redemption Date to the date of Maturity for the 2022 Notes discounted to the Redemption Date on a semi-annual basis (assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months) at the Treasury Rate plus 20 basis points,
, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
plus
 
(d) At any time on or after August 15, 2022, the 2022 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days' nor more than 60 calendar days' notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2022 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
(e) At any time prior to May 15, 2042, the 2042 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days' nor more than 60 calendar days' notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
(i) 100% of the principal amount of the 2042 Notes being redeemed, or
(ii) the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled payments of principal and interest on the 2042 Notes being redeemed from the Redemption Date to the date of Maturity for the 2042 Notes discounted to the Redemption Date on a semi-annual basis (assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months) at the Treasury Rate plus 20 basis points,
, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
plus
(f) At any time on or after May 15, 2042, the 2042 Notes will be redeemable upon not less than 30 calendar days' nor more than 60 calendar days' notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the 2042 Notes being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
(g) Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each holder of the Notes of the series to be redeemed.
(h) Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Notes of the series or the portions of the Notes of the series called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
Section 2.07
. Special Mandatory Redemption.
(a) If the Merger has not been completed by November 19, 2013 (or such later date to which the End Date may be extended by agreement between the Company and Coventry pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement) or if, prior to such date, the Merger Agreement is terminated, then the Company must redeem all of the Notes on the Special Mandatory Redemption Date at a special
 
mandatory redemption price equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes, plus accrued and unpaid interest from the date of initial issuance, or the most recent date to which interest has been paid or provided for, whichever is later, to, but excluding, the Special Mandatory Redemption Date.
(b) The Company shall cause notice of a special mandatory redemption to be transmitted to each Holder of Notes at its registered address, with a copy to the Trustee, no later than 60 days after the occurrence of the event triggering redemption. If funds sufficient to pay the special mandatory redemption price of the Notes on the Special Mandatory Redemption Date (plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the Special Mandatory Redemption Date) are deposited with the Trustee on or before such Special Mandatory Redemption Date, the Notes will cease to bear interest on and after the Special Mandatory Redemption Date.
Section 2.08
. Change of Control Offer to Purchase.
(a) If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs with respect to the Notes of a series, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Notes of such series in full pursuant to Section 2.06, the Company will make an offer to each Holder of Notes of such series (the "") to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holder's Notes of such series at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Notes of such series to be repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ""). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Notes of a series, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of Notes of such series describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Notes of such series on the date specified in the notice (the ""), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required by the Notes of such series and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
(b) The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes of a series as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes of a series, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Notes by virtue of such conflicts.
 
(c) The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Notes of a series upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Notes of such series if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Notes of such series properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Notes of such series and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Notes of such series unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Notes of such series at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third party's scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
(d) On the Change of Control Payment Date for Notes of a series to be repurchased, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
(i) accept or cause a third party to accept for payment all Notes of such series or portions of Notes of such series properly tendered pursuant to the Change of Control Offer;
(ii) deposit or cause a third party to deposit with the Paying Agent an amount equal to the Change of Control Payment in respect of all Notes of such series or portions of Notes of such series properly tendered; and
(iii) deliver or cause to be delivered to the Trustee the Notes of such series properly accepted, together with an officer's certificate stating the aggregate principal amount of Notes of such series or portions of Notes of such series being purchased.
Section 2.09
. Applicability of Certain Provisions of the Base Indenture in Respect of the Notes.
(a) The Event of Default specified in Section 501(5) of the Base Indenture shall not apply to the Notes.
(b) Section 1005 of the Base Indenture shall not apply to the Notes.
Section 2.10U.S. Bank National Association shall act as Paying Agent and registrar with respect to the Notes.
. Registrar and Paying Agent.
Section 2.11The Company shall not be obligated to redeem or purchase the Notes of either series pursuant to any sinking fund or analogous provision, or at the option of any Holder thereof, except as provided in Sections 2.07 or 2.08 of this Supplemental Indenture.
. No Sinking Fund.
 
Section 2.12The Notes shall be issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof.
. Minimum Denominations.
Section 3.01This Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder of Securities heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered under the Indenture shall be bound hereby.
. Relation to Indenture.
Section 3.02Except as expressly supplemented and amended by this Supplemental Indenture, the Base Indenture shall continue in full force and effect in accordance with the provisions thereof, and the Base Indenture is in all respects hereby ratified and confirmed. This Supplemental Indenture and all its provisions shall be deemed a part of the Indenture in the manner and to the extent herein and therein provided.
. Continued Effect.
Section 3.03All of the covenants, stipulations, promises and agreements in this Supplemental Indenture by the Company shall bind its successors and assigns whether so expressed or not.
. Provisions Binding on Company's Successors.
Section 3.04
. Certain Trustee Matters.
(a) The recitals contained herein shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for their correctness.
(b) The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Supplemental Indenture or the Notes or the proper authorization or the due execution hereof or thereof by the Company.
Section 3.05This Supplemental Indenture and the Notes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the internal laws of the State of New York.
. Governing Law.
Section 3.06This Supplemental Indenture may be signed in various counterparts which together will constitute one and the same instrument.
. Counterparts.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first above written.
 
Exhibit A
THIS SECURITY IS A GLOBAL SECURITY WITHIN THE MEANING OF THE INDENTURE HEREINAFTER REFERRED TO AND IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF A DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF. THIS SECURITY MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO, OR REGISTERED OR EXCHANGED FOR SECURITIES REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF, ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE DEPOSITARY OR A NOMINEE THEREOF, AND NO SUCH TRANSFER MAY BE REGISTERED EXCEPT IN THE LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN THE INDENTURE. EVERY SECURITY AUTHENTICATED AND DELIVERED UPON REGISTRATION OF TRANSFER OF, OR IN EXCHANGE FOR OR IN LIEU OF, THIS SECURITY SHALL BE A GLOBAL SECURITY SUBJECT TO THE FOREGOING, EXCEPT IN SUCH LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES.
Unless this certificate is presented by an authorized representative of The Depository Trust Company, a New York corporation (""), to Aetna Inc. or its agent for registration of transfer, exchange or payment, and any certificate issued is registered in the name of Cede & Co. or in such other name as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC (and any payment is made to Cede & Co. or to such other entity as is requested by an authorized representative of DTC), ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE, OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL inasmuch as the registered owner hereof, Cede & Co., has an interest herein.
DTC
CUSIP: []
ISIN: []
 
AETNA INC., a Pennsylvania corporation (herein called the ""), which term includes any successor Person under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, for value received, hereby promises to pay to Cede & Co., or registered assigns, the principal sum of [            ] Dollars ($[]) upon presentation and surrender of this Security on November 15, 20[], and to pay interest thereon from November 7, 2012 or from the most recent Interest Payment Date to which interest has been paid or duly provided for, semi-annually on May 15
Company
 
and November 15 in each year, commencing May 15, 2013, at the rate of []% per annum until the principal hereof is paid or made available for payment. The interest so payable, and punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date will, as provided in such Indenture, be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the Regular Record Date for such interest, which shall be the May 1 or November 1 (whether or not a Business Day), as the case may be, next preceding such Interest Payment Date. Any such interest not so punctually paid or duly provided for will forthwith cease to be payable to the Holder on such Regular Record Date and may either be paid to the Person in whose name this Security (or one or more Predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on a Special Record Date for the payment of such Defaulted Interest to be fixed by the Trustee, notice whereof shall be given to Holders of Securities of this series not less than 10 calendar days prior to such Special Record Date, or be paid at any time in any other lawful manner not inconsistent with the requirements of any securities exchange on which the Securities of this series may be listed, and upon such notice as may be required by such exchange, all as more fully provided in said Indenture. In any case where any Interest Payment Date is not a Business Day, then payment of interest may be made on the next succeeding Business Day without any additional amount being payable in respect of any delay.
Payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on this Security will be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and private debts.
Reference is hereby made to the further provisions of this Security set forth on the reverse hereof, which further provisions shall for all purposes have the same effect as if set forth at this place. Such provisions include, without limitation, provisions relating to redemption of this Security by the Company.
Unless the certificate of authentication hereon has been executed by the Trustee referred to on the reverse hereof by manual signature, this Security shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Indenture or be valid or obligatory for any purpose.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company has caused this instrument to be duly executed under its corporate seal.
Dated: November 7, 2012
 
 
 
This is one of the Securities of the series designated under, and referred to in, the within-mentioned Indenture.
 
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of securities of the Company (herein called the ""), issued and to be issued in one or more series under a Senior Indenture, dated as of March 2, 2001 (herein called the ""), between the Company, as issuer, and U.S. Bank National Association (as successor in interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company), as Trustee (herein called the "", which term includes any successor trustee under the Indenture), as supplemented by the Supplemental Indenture dated as of November 7, 2012, between the Company and the Trustee (together with the Base Indenture, the ""), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto reference is hereby made for a statement of the respective rights, limitations of rights, duties and immunities thereunder of the Company, the Trustee and the Holders of the Securities and of the terms upon which the Securities are, and are to be, authenticated and delivered. This Security is one of the series designated on the face hereof, initially limited in aggregate principal amount to $[], subject to future issuances of additional Securities pursuant to Section 301 of the Base Indenture.
Securities
Base Indenture
Trustee
Indenture
 
At any time prior to [], 20[], the Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days' nor more than 60 calendar days' notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to the greater of:
 
 
plus, in each case, any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
At any time on or after [], 20[], the Securities of this series are subject to redemption upon not less than 30 calendar days' nor more than 60 calendar days' notice by mail, in whole or in part, at the election of the Company, at a Redemption Price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Securities being redeemed plus any interest accrued but not paid to the Redemption Date.
 
"" means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any portion of the Securities of this series,
Treasury Rate
 
 
The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
"" means the United States Treasury security selected by an Independent Investment Banker as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Securities of this series to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of the Securities of this series to be redeemed.
Comparable Treasury Issue
"" means, with respect to any Redemption Date for any Securities of this series, the average of all Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations obtained.
Comparable Treasury Price
"" means one of the Reference Treasury Dealers appointed by the Trustee after consultation with the Company.
Independent Investment Banker
 
"" means each of Goldman, Sachs & Co. and UBS Securities LLC. If any Reference Treasury Dealer ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in the United States (a ""), the Company shall substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer for that dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealer
Primary Treasury Dealer
"" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any Redemption Date, the average, as determined by the Trustee, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee by that Reference Treasury Dealer at 5:00 p.m. on the third Business Day preceding the Redemption Date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
Notice of any redemption will be mailed at least 30 calendar days but no more than 60 calendar days before the Redemption Date to each Holder of the Securities of this series to be redeemed.
Unless the Company defaults in payment of the Redemption Price, interest will cease to accrue on the Securities of this series or the portions of the Securities of this series called for redemption on and after the Redemption Date.
If this Security is redeemed in part only, a new Security or Securities of this series and of like tenor for the unredeemed portion hereof will be issued in the name of the Holder hereof upon the cancellation hereof.
 
If the Merger has not been completed by November 19, 2013 (or such later date to which the End Date may be extended by agreement between the Company and Coventry pursuant to the terms of the Merger Agreement) or if, prior to such date, the Merger Agreement is terminated, then the Company must redeem all of the Securities of this series on the Special Mandatory Redemption Date at a special mandatory redemption price equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities of this series, plus accrued and unpaid interest from the date of initial issuance, or the most recent date to which interest has been paid or provided for, whichever is later, to, but excluding, the Special Mandatory Redemption Date.
The Company shall cause notice of a special mandatory redemption to be transmitted to each Holder of the Securities of this series at its registered address, with a copy to the Trustee, no later than 60 days after the occurrence of the event triggering redemption. If funds sufficient to pay the special mandatory redemption price of the Securities of this series on the Special Mandatory Redemption Date (plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the Special Mandatory Redemption Date) are deposited with the Trustee on or before such Special Mandatory Redemption Date, the Securities of this series will cease to bear interest on and after the Special Mandatory Redemption Date.
 
"" means Coventry Health Care, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Coventry
"" has the meaning ascribed to such term in the Merger Agreement.
End Date
"" means the acquisition of Coventry by the Company on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in the Merger Agreement.
Merger
"" means the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated August 19, 2012, among the Company, Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc. and Coventry, as amended from time to time.
Merger Agreement
"" means the 30th day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the first Business Day thereafter) following the transmission of a notice of special mandatory redemption.
Special Mandatory Redemption Date
 
If a Change of Control Triggering Event occurs with respect to the Securities of this series, unless the Company has exercised its right to redeem the Securities of this series in full, as described under "Optional Redemption" above, the Company will make an offer to each Holder of the Securities of this series (the "") to repurchase any and all (equal to $2,000 or an integral multiple of $1,000) of such Holder's Securities of this series at a repurchase price in cash equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the Securities of this series to be repurchased plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase (the ""). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Securities of this series, the Company will mail a notice to Holders of the Securities of this series describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event and offering to repurchase the Securities of this series on the date specified in the notice (the ""), which date will be no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed, pursuant to the procedures required hereby and described in such notice.
Change of Control Offer
Change of Control Payment
Change of Control Payment Date
The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, and any successor statute thereto (the ""), and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Securities of this series as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any
Exchange Act
 
securities laws or regulations conflict with the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities of this series, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under the Change of Control repurchase provisions of the Securities of this series by virtue of such conflicts.
The Company will not be required to offer to repurchase the Securities of this series upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event with respect to the Securities of this series if a third party makes such an offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements for an offer made by the Company and the third party repurchases on the applicable date all Securities of this series properly tendered and not withdrawn under its offer; that for all purposes of the Securities of this series and the Indenture, a failure by such third party to comply with the requirements of such offer and to complete such offer shall be treated as a failure by the Company to comply with its obligations to offer to purchase the Securities of this series unless the Company promptly makes an offer to repurchase the Securities of this series at 101% of the outstanding principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, thereon, to the date of repurchase, which shall be no later than 30 days after the third party's scheduled Change of Control Payment Date.
provided
On the Change of Control Payment Date for the Securities of this series to be repurchased, the Company will, to the extent lawful:
 
 
 
"" means the Securities of this series are rated below an Investment Grade Rating by each of the Rating Agencies on any date from the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Company's intention to effect a Change of Control, in each case until the end of the 60-day period following the earlier of (1) the occurrence of a Change of Control and (2) public notice of the Company's intention to effect a Change of Control; , that if (i) during such 60-day period one
Below Investment Grade Rating Event
provided, however
 
or more Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering the possible downgrade of the Securities of this series, and (ii) a downgrade by each of the Rating Agencies that has made such an announcement would result in a Below Investment Grade Rating Event, then such 60-day period shall be extended for such time as the rating of the Securities of this series by any such Rating Agency remains under publicly announced consideration for possible downgrade to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating and a downgrade by such Rating Agency to a rating below an Investment Grade Rating could cause a Below Investment Grade Rating Event. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a rating event otherwise arising by virtue of a particular reduction in rating will not be deemed to have occurred in respect of a particular Change of Control (and thus will not be deemed a Below Investment Grade Rating Event for purposes of the definition of Change of Control Triggering Event) if the Rating Agencies making the reduction in rating to which this definition would otherwise apply do not announce or publicly confirm or inform the Trustee in writing at the Company's or the Trustee's request that the reduction was the result, in whole or in part, of any event or circumstance comprised of or arising as a result of, or in respect of, the applicable Change of Control (whether or not the applicable Change of Control has occurred at the time of the rating event).
"" means the occurrence of any of the following: (1) direct or indirect sale, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the properties or assets of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole to any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than to the Company or one of its subsidiaries; (2) the consummation of any transaction (including, without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) other than the Company or one of its subsidiaries becomes the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the then outstanding number of shares of the Company's voting stock; or (3) the first day on which a majority of the members of the Company's Board of Directors are not Continuing Directors; , that a transaction will not be deemed to involve a Change of Control if (A) the Company becomes a wholly owned subsidiary of a holding company and (B)(x) the holders of the voting stock of such holding company immediately following that transaction are substantially the same as the holders of the Company's voting stock immediately prior to that transaction or (y) immediately following that transaction no "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act) is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the voting stock of such holding company. For purposes of this definition, "" means capital stock of any class or kind the holders of which are ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, entitled to vote for the election of directors (or persons performing similar functions) of the Company, even if the right to vote has been suspended by the happening of such a contingency.
Change of Control
provided, however
voting stock
 
"" means the occurrence of both a Change of Control and a Below Investment Grade Rating Event.
Change of Control Triggering Event
"" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors of the Company who (1) was a member of the Board of Directors of the Company on the date of the issuance of the Securities; or (2) was nominated for election or elected to the Board of Directors of the Company with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors of the Company at the time of such nomination or election (either by specific vote or by approval of the Company's proxy statement in which such member was named as a nominee for election as a director).
Continuing Directors
"" means Fitch Ratings Inc.
Fitch
"" means a rating by Moody's equal to or higher than Baa3 (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Moody's), a rating by S&P equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P), a rating by Fitch equal to or higher than BBB- (or the equivalent under any successor rating category of Fitch), and the equivalent investment grade credit rating from any replacement rating agency or rating agencies selected by the Company under the circumstances permitting the Company to select a replacement agency and in the manner for selecting a replacement agency, in each case as set forth in the definition of "Rating Agencies".
Investment Grade Rating
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
"" means (1) Moody's, S&P and Fitch; and (2) if any or all of Moody's, S&P or Fitch ceases to rate the Securities of this series or fails to make a rating of the Securities of this series publicly available for reasons outside of the Company's control, a "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" within the meaning of Rule 15c3-1(c)(2)(vi)(F) under the Exchange Act, that the Company selects (pursuant to a resolution of the Company's Board of Directors) as a replacement agency for any of Moody's, S&P or Fitch, or all of them, as the case may be, with respect to the Securities of this series.
Rating Agencies
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
S&P
 
The Indenture contains certain covenants that, among other things, limit the ability of the Company to consolidate, merge or sell all or substantially all of its assets. These covenants are subject to a number of important qualifications and exceptions. Section 1005 of the Base Indenture, including, without limitation, the limitation on liens on the Common Stock of Principal Subsidiaries set forth therein, does not apply to the Securities of this series.
 
If an Event of Default with respect to Securities of this series shall occur and be continuing, the principal of the Securities of this series may be declared due and payable in the manner and with the effect provided in the Indenture. The Event of Default set forth in Section 501(5) of the Base Indenture, including, without limitation, the cross-acceleration provisions thereof, does not apply to the Securities of this series.
 
The Indenture permits, with certain exceptions as therein provided, the amendment thereof and the modification of the rights and obligations of the Company and the rights of the Holders of the Securities of each series to be affected under the Indenture at any time by the Company and the Trustee with the consent of the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities at the time Outstanding of each series to be affected. The Indenture also contains provisions permitting the Holders of specified percentages in principal amount of the Securities of each series at the time Outstanding, on behalf of the Holders of all Securities of such series, to waive compliance by the Company with certain provisions of the Indenture and certain past defaults under the Indenture and their consequences. Any such consent or waiver by the Holder of this Security shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders of this Security and of any Security issued upon the registration of transfer hereof or in exchange hereof or in lieu hereof, whether or not notation of such consent or waiver is made upon this Security.
 
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Security or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security at the times, place and rate, and in the coin or currency, herein prescribed.
 
As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, the transfer of this Security is registrable in the Security Register upon surrender of this Security for registration of transfer at the office or agency of the Company in any place where the principal of and any premium and interest on this Security are payable, duly endorsed by, or accompanied by a written instrument of transfer in form satisfactory to the Company and the Security Registrar duly executed by, the Holder hereof or such Holder's attorney duly authorized in writing, and thereupon one or more new Securities of this series and of like tenor, of authorized denominations and for the same aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the designated transferee or transferees.
The Securities of this series are issuable only in registered form without coupons in denominations of $2,000 and any multiple of $1,000 in excess thereof. As provided in the Indenture and subject to certain limitations therein set forth, Securities of this series are exchangeable for a like aggregate principal amount of Securities of this series and of like tenor of a different authorized denomination, as requested by the Holder surrendering the same.
No service charge shall be made for any such registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, but the Company or the Trustee may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration of transfer or exchange of Securities, other than exchanges pursuant to Section 304, 906 or 1107 of the Base Indenture not involving any transfer.
Prior to due and proper presentment of this Security for registration of transfer, the Company, the Trustee and any agent of the Company or the Trustee may treat the Person in whose name this Security is registered as the owner hereof for all purposes, whether or not this Security is overdue, and neither the Company, the Trustee nor any such agent shall be affected by notice to the contrary.
The Indenture provides that the Company, at the Company's option, (a) will be discharged from any and all obligations in respect of the Securities (except for certain obligations to register the transfer or exchange of Securities, replace stolen, lost or mutilated Securities, maintain paying agencies and hold moneys for payment in trust) or (b) need not comply with certain restrictive covenants of the Indenture, in each case if the Company deposits, in trust, with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations which through the payment of interest thereon and principal thereof in accordance with their terms will provide money, in an amount sufficient to pay all the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on, the Securities on the dates such payments are due in accordance with the terms of such Securities, and certain other conditions are satisfied.
 
No recourse shall be had for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, or interest on this Security, or for any claim based hereon, or otherwise in respect hereof, or based on or in respect of the Indenture or any indenture supplemental thereto, against any incorporator, stockholder, officer, employee, agent or director, as such, past, present or future, of the Company or of any successor corporation, whether by virtue of any constitution, statute or rule of law, or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, all such liability being, by the acceptance hereof and as part of the consideration for the issue hereof, expressly waived and released.
All terms used in this Security which are defined in the Indenture shall have the respective meanings assigned to them in the Indenture.
 

Exhibit 5.1
 
 
 
November 7, 2012
The Board of Directors
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue
Hartford, Connecticut 06156
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as special counsel to Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the "") in connection with the Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-178272) (the "") filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""), for the registration by the Company of $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 1.50% Senior Notes due November 15, 2017, $1,000,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 2.75% Senior Notes due November 15, 2022 and $500,000,000 aggregate principal amount of its 4.125% Senior Notes due November 15, 2042 (collectively, the ""). The Notes are to be issued pursuant to a senior debt indenture dated as of March 2, 2001 (the "") between the Company and U.S. Bank National Association, successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company, as trustee (the ""), as supplemented by a supplemental indenture to be dated as of November 7, 2012 (together with the Base Indenture, the "") between the Company and the Trustee, and to be sold pursuant to a Pricing Agreement dated as of November 2, 2012 (the "") among the Company and the several underwriters named in Schedule I thereto.
Company
Registration Statement
Commission
Securities Act
Notes
Base Indenture
Trustee
Indenture
Pricing Agreement
We, as your counsel, have examined originals or copies of such documents, corporate records, certificates of public officials and other instruments as we have deemed necessary or advisable for the purpose of rendering this opinion.
In rendering the opinions expressed herein, we have, without independent inquiry or investigation, assumed that (i) all documents submitted to us as originals are authentic and complete, (ii) all documents submitted to us as copies conform to authentic, complete originals, (iii) all documents filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement that have not been executed will conform to the forms thereof, (iv) all signatures on all documents that we reviewed are genuine, (v) all natural persons executing documents had and have the legal capacity to do so, (vi) all statements in certificates of public officials and officers of the Company that we reviewed were and are accurate and (vii) all representations made by the Company as to matters of fact in the documents that we reviewed were and are accurate.
 
 
Based upon the foregoing, we advise you that, in our opinion, when the Notes have been duly executed, authenticated, issued and delivered in accordance with the Indenture and the Pricing Agreement against payment therefor, the Notes will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable in accordance with their terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency and similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and the rights and remedies of creditors of insurance companies generally, concepts of reasonableness and equitable principles of general applicability.
In connection with the opinion expressed above, we have assumed that (i) the Registration Statement became effective upon filing with the Commission and such effectiveness shall not have been terminated or rescinded; (ii) the Indenture and the Notes are valid, binding and enforceable agreements of each party thereto (other than as expressly covered above in respect of the Company); and (iii) there shall not have occurred any change in law affecting the validity or enforceability of the Notes. We have also assumed that the execution, delivery and performance of the Indenture and the Notes by the Company will not violate any applicable law or public policy or result in a violation of any provision of any instrument or agreement then binding upon the Company, or any restriction imposed by any court or governmental body having jurisdiction over the Company.
We are members of the Bar of the State of New York, and the foregoing opinion is limited to the laws of the State of New York and the federal laws of the United States of America. Insofar as the foregoing opinion involves matters governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, we have relied, without independent investigation, on the opinion of even date herewith of Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP, special Pennsylvania counsel to the Company, filed with the Registration Statement.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to a report on Form 8-K to be filed by the Company on the date hereof and its incorporation by reference into the Registration Statement. In addition, we consent to the reference to our name under the caption "Validity of the Notes" in the prospectus supplement which is a part of the Registration Statement. In giving this consent, we do not admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act.
 

Exhibit 5.2
 
 
Goldman, Sachs & Co. and
UBS Securities LLC,
as Representatives of the
several Underwriters
November 7, 2012
Page 2
 
As to questions of fact material to this opinion, we have relied upon the accuracy of certificates and other comparable documents of officers and representatives of the Company, upon statements made to us in discussions with the Company's management and upon certificates of public officials. Except as otherwise expressly indicated, we have not undertaken any independent investigation of factual matters.
The opinion in paragraph 1 concerning the corporate existence of the Company is based on a certificate dated October 26, 2012 from the Pennsylvania Department of State.
We express no opinion as to the effect on the following opinions of (a) the laws of any jurisdiction other than the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, (b) any state securities laws or "blue sky" laws or (c) any insurance, insurance holding company or insurance securities laws. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, we give no opinion as to any federal securities laws.
Based on the foregoing, and subject to the qualifications, limitations and assumptions stated herein, we advise you that, in our opinion:
 
 
 
 
 
Goldman, Sachs & Co. and
UBS Securities LLC,
as Representatives of the
several Underwriters
November 7, 2012
Page 3
 
 
Sullivan & Cromwell LLP and Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP may rely on this opinion as if addressees hereon for the purposes of their opinions dated November 7, 2012 and delivered to you. We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to a report on Form 8-K to be filed by the Company on the date hereof and its incorporation by reference into the Registration Statement. In addition, we consent to the reference to our name under the caption "Validity of the Notes" in the prospectus supplement which is a part of the Registration Statement. In giving this consent, we do not admit that we are in the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act. We further advise you that the opinions given herein are given as of the date hereof, limited by facts, circumstances and laws in effect as of such date, and that by rendering these opinions we undertake no obligation to advise you with respect to any changes therein.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121109074811.txt.gz
TIME:20121109074811
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01 Other Events.
 
As previously disclosed, on August 19, 2012, Aetna Inc. (Aetna), Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry) and Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (Merger Sub), entered into an Agreement and Plan of Merger (as previously amended, the "Merger Agreement"), pursuant to which, subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, Merger Sub will be merged with and into Coventry, with Coventry surviving the merger as a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (the Merger).
 
The consummation of the Merger remains subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain closing conditions, including the early termination or expiration of the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended (the HSR Act).
 
As previously disclosed, on October 9, 2012, Aetna re-filed its premerger notification form with the U.S. Department of Justice (the DOJ) and the U.S. Federal Trade Commission under the HSR Act.  As a result, the waiting period under the HSR Act with respect to the Merger was scheduled to expire at 11:59 p.m. on November 8, 2012, unless extended by a request for further information or terminated earlier.
 
On November 8, 2012, Aetna and Coventry each received a request for further information (the second request) from the DOJ in connection with the DOJs review of the Merger.
 
Issuance of the second request extends the waiting period under the HSR Act until 30 days after both Aetna and Coventry have substantially complied with the second request, unless the waiting period is terminated earlier by the DOJ.  Aetna and Coventry have been cooperating with the DOJ staff since shortly after the announcement of the Merger and are continuing to cooperate with the DOJ staff in its review of the Merger.  Aetna continues to expect that the transaction will be completed in mid-2013.
 
Completion of the transactions contemplated by the Merger Agreement remains subject to approval by Coventrys stockholders, as well as the satisfaction or waiver of the other closing conditions specified in the Merger Agreement.
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. You can generally identify forward-looking statements by the use of forward-looking terminology such as anticipate, believe, continue, could, estimate, expect, explore, evaluate, intend, may, might, plan, potential, predict, project, seek, should, or will, or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology. These forward-looking statements are only predictions and involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond Aetnas and Coventrys control.
Statements in this document that are forward-looking, including the projected date the proposed transaction will be completed, are based on managements estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas and Coventrys control. Important risk factors could cause actual future events to differ materially from those currently expected by Aetnas management, including, but not limited to: the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied, the risk that a regulatory approval that may be required for the proposed acquisition is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated and the outcome of various litigation matters related to the proposed acquisition.
No assurances can be given that any of the events anticipated by the forward-looking statements will transpire or occur, or if any of them do occur, when they will occur and what impact they will have on the results of operations, financial condition or cash flows of Aetna or Coventry. Neither Aetna nor Coventry assumes any duty to update or revise forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, as of any future date.
 
 
 
 
 
Important Information For Investors And Stockholders
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval. Aetna has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) a registration statement on Form S-4 (File No. 333-184041), including Amendment No. 1 thereto, containing a proxy statement/prospectus, and Coventry has filed with the SEC a proxy statement/prospectus, and each of Aetna and Coventry has filed and will file other documents with respect to the proposed acquisition of Coventry.  The registration statement was declared effective on October 18, 2012, and Aetna and Coventry commenced mailing the definitive proxy statement/prospectus to Coventry stockholders on or about October 19, 2012. INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF COVENTRY ARE URGED TO READ THE DEFINITIVE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS AND ANY OTHER DOCUMENTS THAT HAVE BEEN FILED OR WILL BE FILED WITH THE SEC CAREFULLY AND IN THEIR ENTIRETY BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN OR WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION. Investors and security holders may obtain free copies of the registration statement and the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other documents filed with the SEC by Aetna or Coventry through the website maintained by the SEC at . Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Aetna are available free of charge on Aetnas internet website at or by contacting Aetnas Investor Relations Department at 860-273-8204. Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Coventry are available free of charge on Coventrys internet website at or by contacting Coventrys Investor Relations Department at 301-581-5717.
www.sec.gov
www.aetna.com
www.cvty.com
Aetna, Coventry, their respective directors and certain of their executive officers may be considered participants in the solicitation of proxies in connection with the proposed transaction. Information about the directors and executive officers of Coventry is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 28, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 6, 2012, and its Current Report on Form 8-K, which was filed with the SEC on May 31, 2012. Information about the directors and executive officers of Aetna is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 24, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of shareholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 9, 2012 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012, which was filed with the SEC on October 25, 2012. Other information regarding the participants in the proxy solicitations and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, are contained in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials filed with the SEC.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
Date: November 9, 2012
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121113061423.txt.gz
TIME:20121113061423
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported): 
   
   
November 13, 2012 (November 12, 2012)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
x
 
    Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 
    Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
 
Item 1.01.  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
 
Merger Agreement Amendment
 
As set forth in Item 8.01 below, on November 12, 2012, the parties to the Consolidated Delaware Action (as defined in Item 8.01 below) executed a memorandum of understanding (the ) containing the terms of the parties agreement in principle to resolve the Consolidated Delaware Action. The MOU provides that, in consideration for the settlement of the Consolidated Delaware Action, Aetna Inc. (), Coventry Health Care, Inc. () and Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (), will agree to amend the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of August 19, 2012 (as previously amended, the ) to reflect that (i) the Termination Fee (as defined in the Merger Agreement) payable by Coventry upon a termination of the Merger Agreement in certain circumstances is reduced from $167,500,000 to $100,000,000 and (ii) the period during which Coventry is required to discuss and negotiate in good faith with Aetna before making an Adverse Recommendation Change (as defined in the Merger Agreement) involving or relating to a Superior Proposal (as defined in the Merger Agreement) or terminating the Merger Agreement in order to enter into a definitive agreement with respect to a Superior Proposal is reduced from five calendar days to two calendar days.  The parties to the Merger Agreement have entered into Amendment No. 2 to the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of November 12, 2012 (), which reflects these changes.  Other than as provided in Amendment No. 2, the Merger Agreement, as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, remains in full force and effect.
MOU
Aetna
Coventry
Merger Sub
Merger Agreement
Amendment No. 2
 
The foregoing description of Amendment No. 2 and the Merger Agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of Amendment No. 2, which is attached hereto as Exhibit 2.1 and incorporated by reference herein, and the Merger Agreement, which was filed as Exhibit 2.1 to Aetnas Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 22, 2012, and Amendment No. 1 to the Merger Agreement, which was filed as Exhibit 2.2 to Amendment No. 1 to Aetnas Registration Statement on Form S-4 filed on October 17, 2012 (Registration No. 333-184041), each of which is incorporated by reference herein.  A copy of Amendment No. 2 has been included to provide stockholders and other security holders with information regarding its terms and is not intended to provide any factual information about Aetna or Coventry. The representations, warranties and covenants, as applicable, contained in Amendment No. 2 and the Merger Agreement have been made solely for the purposes of Amendment No. 2 and the Merger Agreement and as of specific dates; were solely for the benefit of the parties to Amendment No. 2 and the Merger Agreement; are not intended as statements of fact to be relied upon by Aetnas or Coventrys stockholders and other security holders, but rather as a way of allocating the risk between the parties in the event the statements therein prove to be inaccurate; have been modified or qualified by certain confidential disclosures, as applicable, that were made between the parties in connection with the negotiation of Amendment No. 2 and the Merger Agreement, which disclosures, as applicable, are not reflected in either Amendment No. 2 or the Merger Agreement; may no longer be true as of a given date; and may apply standards of materiality in a way that is different from what may be viewed as material by stockholders or other security holders. Security holders are not third-party beneficiaries under Amendment No. 2 or the Merger Agreement (except with respect to stockholders right to receive the merger consideration following the effective time of the Merger (as defined in the Merger Agreement)) and should not rely on the representations, warranties or covenants or any descriptions thereof as characterizations of the actual state of facts or condition of Coventry, Aetna or Merger Sub. Moreover, information concerning the subject matter of the representations and warranties may change after the date of the Merger Agreement and/or Amendment No. 2, which subsequent information may or may not be fully reflected in Aetnas or Coventrys public disclosures. Aetna acknowledges that, notwithstanding the inclusion of the foregoing cautionary statements, it is responsible for considering whether additional specific disclosures of material information regarding material contractual provisions are required to make the statements in this Form 8-K not misleading.
 
 
 
2
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
 
Item 8.01.  Other Events.
 
Settlement of Litigation
 
As previously disclosed on pages 92 and 93 of the definitive proxy statement/prospectus dated October 17, 2012, relating to Aetnas proposed acquisition of Coventry under Litigation Relating to the Merger:
 
Shortly following the announcement of the Merger, several putative shareholder class action complaints were filed in the Circuit Court for Montgomery County, Maryland (the ) and in the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware (the ) against the Coventry board of directors, Coventry, Aetna and Merger Sub, which generally allege, among other things, that the individual defendants breached their fiduciary duties owed to Coventrys public stockholders in connection with the Merger because the merger consideration and certain other terms in the Merger Agreement are unfair; that Aetna and Merger Sub aided and abetted these alleged breaches of fiduciary duty; and that Aetnas Preliminary Registration Statement on Form S-4 filed on September 21, 2012, contained various deficiencies.  Among other remedies, the complaints in the Maryland Actions and the Delaware Actions generally seek injunctive relief prohibiting the defendants from completing the proposed merger or, in the event that an injunction is not awarded, unspecified money damages, costs and attorneys fees.
Maryland Actions
Delaware Actions
 
On October 4, 2012, the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware (the ) entered an order consolidating the Delaware Actions under the caption In re Coventry Health Care, Inc. Shareholder Litigation, Consolidated C. A. No. 7905-CS, and appointing the Employees Retirement System of the Government of the Virgin Islands, the General Retirement System of the City of Detroit, and the Police and Fire Retirement System of the City of Detroit as Co-Lead Plaintiffs (the ).  Between October 16, 2012 and November 3, 2012, the parties engaged in expedited document and deposition discovery in the Consolidated Delaware Action.
Chancery Court
Consolidated Delaware Action
 
On October 31, 2012, defendants filed a motion in the Circuit Court for Montgomery County, Maryland (the ) to stay the Maryland Actions.  On November 7, 2012, the Maryland Court granted defendants motion and ordered the Maryland Actions stayed for a period of 90 days.
Maryland Court
 
On November 12, 2012, the parties to the Consolidated Delaware Action executed the MOU containing the terms of the parties agreement in principle to resolve the Consolidated Delaware Action.  Pursuant to the MOU, defendants will provide certain supplemental disclosures relating to the Merger as set forth below in this Form 8-K; and the parties to the Merger Agreement will amend the Merger Agreement to reflect that (i) the Termination Fee payable by Coventry upon a termination of the Merger Agreement in certain circumstances is reduced from $167,500,000 to $100,000,000; and (ii) the period during which Coventry is required to discuss and negotiate in good faith with Aetna before making an Adverse Recommendation Change involving or relating to a Superior Proposal or terminating the Merger Agreement in order to enter into a definitive agreement with respect to a Superior Proposal is reduced from five calendar days to two calendar days.
 
The MOU further provides that (i) the parties will agree upon and execute a stipulation of settlement (the Stipulation), which will replace the MOU and which will be submitted to the Chancery Court for review and approval; (ii) the Stipulation will provide for dismissal of the Consolidated Delaware Action with prejudice on the merits; (iii) the Stipulation will include a general release of defendants from any and all claims relating to, among other things, the Merger, the Merger Agreement and any disclosures made in connection therewith; and (iv) the MOU is, and the Stipulation will be, conditioned on, among other things, consummation of the merger, class certification, and final approval by the Chancery Court following notice to the shareholders of Coventry.  Pending execution of the Stipulation, the parties have agreed to stay all proceedings in the Consolidated Delaware Action, except those relating to the settlement.
 
The defendants have denied and continue to deny any wrongdoing or liability with respect to all claims, events and transactions complained of in the aforementioned actions or that they have engaged in any wrongdoing.
The defendants have entered into the MOU to eliminate the uncertainty, burden, risk, expense and distraction of further litigation.
 
 
3
 
 
The settlement will not affect the form or amount of consideration to be received by Coventry stockholders in the merger.
 
 
Set forth below are certain additional disclosures required to be made in accordance with the MOU. The disclosures appear below the appropriate section heading that corresponds to the sections in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus previously mailed on or about October 19, 2012 to the Coventry stockholders of record as of the close of business on October 15, 2012 (the ).
Proxy Statement
Proposal I:  The Merger:  Background of the Merger
The section of the Proxy Statement Proposal I:  The Merger:  Background of the Merger starting on page 62 of the Proxy Statement is hereby amended and supplemented as follows:
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the following paragraph is hereby added after the current second paragraph (the paragraph currently running from page 62 to page 63):
On January 31, 2012, Allen F. Wise, Coventrys chief executive officer, entered into a second amendment to his employment agreement with Coventry, which extended the period of Mr. Wises employment for an additional two-year period that would end on December 31, 2013. In 2009, Mr. Wise agreed to serve as Coventrys chief executive officer on an interim basis. Between 2009 and January 31, 2012, Mr. Wise had expressed to the Coventry board of directors on multiple occasions his desire to retire, but had agreed, at the boards request, to continue serving as chief executive officer until a successor was identified. It was the expectation of the Nominating / Corporate Governance Committee of the Coventry board and of Mr. Wise that Coventrys board would identify a successor to Mr. Wise by early 2013 and that Mr. Wise would remain with Coventry through the end of 2013 to allow for an orderly transition. Since 2009, the Nominating / Corporate Governance Committee has overseen a process designed to identify a successor to Mr. Wise. That process is proceeding more slowly than anticipated, however, and to date it has not resulted in the identification of a successor.
 
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the first sentence of the current third paragraph (the current first full paragraph on page 63) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Mr. Wise from time to time meets with other chief executive officers of managed care companies to discuss industry developments and events (including approximately four meetings in the previous 12 months with the chief executive officers of large managed care organizations).
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the following paragraphs are hereby added after the current third paragraph (the current first full paragraph on page 63):
On February 8, 2012, executives of Coventry, including Randy Giles, Coventrys chief financial officer, and Drew Asher, Coventrys senior vice president of corporate finance, met with Richard C. Jacobsen, a Managing Director focusing on the health care services sector at Greenhill. Mr. Wise was present for a portion of the meeting. The meeting had been scheduled in January 2012 at Mr. Jacobsens request, and was consistent with Mr. Jacobsens practice of meeting periodically with executives in the sector to discuss the managed care industry and potential strategic opportunities. Mr. Jacobsens presentation to the Coventry executives focused on potential strategic acquisition opportunities involving independent Medicaid managed care organizations. During Mr. Jacobsens presentation, there was a discussion concerning what other industry participants might also have a potential interest in acquiring an independent Medicaid managed care organization. Aetna was identified as one such industry participant, and the participants at the meeting discussed the view that Aetna would want to increase its presence in the Medicaid business and that Coventrys growth in the Medicaid business could potentially make Coventry more
attractive to Aetna as a potential acquisition target. In the course of these discussions, a Coventry executive noted the strength of Coventrys own Medicaid business, and suggested that the next time Mr. Jacobsen met with Aetna, Mr. Jacobsen should discuss with Aetna the strength of Coventrys Medicaid business. As part of Greenhills practice of meeting with industry participants from time to time, Mr. Jacobsen had previously met with Aetna executives on January 31, 2012 to discuss the managed care industry and potential strategic opportunities.
 
 
4
 
 
On March 7, 2012, Scott Bok, the chief executive officer of Greenhill, and Mr. Jacobsen met with executives of Aetna, including Mark L. Keim, Aetnas global head of strategy and corporate development, and Joseph M. Zubretsky, Aetnas senior executive vice president and chief financial officer, to discuss the managed care industry and potential strategic opportunities, including three specific potential acquisitions that would increase Aetnas presence in the Medicaid business. This meeting was scheduled in February 2012 at Mr. Jacobsens request as part of Greenhills customary practice of meeting with industry participants from time to time. One of the strategic opportunities that Mr. Bok and Mr. Jacobsen presented was an acquisition of Coventry by Aetna. The written materials presented by Mr. Bok and Mr. Jacobsen at the meeting included an Illustrative Acquisition Analysis that identified an illustrative acquisition price for each of the three potential acquisition targets and included a Preliminary Impact Analysis for each company that identified illustrative acquisition prices based on premiums of 20%, 30%, and 40% to each companys current stock price. That analysis resulted in illustrative acquisition prices of $38.84, $42.08, and $45.32 per share, respectively, for Coventry. During the course of the meeting, representatives of Aetna indicated to Mr. Bok and Mr. Jacobsen that, prior to the meeting, Aetna had begun to consider and analyze, among other strategic alternatives, a potential acquisition of Coventry by Aetna.
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the words in the first sentence of the current fourth paragraph (the current second full paragraph on page 63) are hereby replaced with the words, .
Following this meeting, on April 6, 2012
On April 6, 2012
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the current fifth paragraph (the current third full paragraph on page 63) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following paragraphs:
On April 26, 2012, Coventry and Aetna executed a confidentiality and one-year standstill agreement in anticipation of the potential exchange of information and in-person meetings between members of senior management of both companies. Subsequently, Greenhill conducted for Coventrys management and board of directors certain preliminary analyses relating to a potential transaction with Aetna. Around this time, Mr. Asher indicated to Mr. Jacobsen that Coventry management likely would recommend that Coventrys board of directors engage Greenhill in the event that the Coventry board determined to engage a financial advisor in connection with a potential sale of the company, although Greenhill was advised that any decision to engage a particular financial advisor would be made by the Coventry board.
On or about April 27, 2012, Mr. Jacobsen made a presentation to representatives of Coventry with respect to a potential acquisition of Coventry by Aetna. The presentation addressed a variety of matters relating to a potential acquisition, including potential strategic acquirers other than Aetna that might have an interest in acquiring Coventry. The presentation identified at least two other potential strategic acquirers with the financial resources to acquire Coventry, but stated that their interest in such a transaction was uncertain. In this same time period, Mr. Wise expressed the view to other management at Coventry that, depending on the course of discussions, Coventry may decide to convey to Aetna that Coventry was not for sale and did not intend to start a wide sales process. At the same time, Mr. Wise expressed the view that Coventry must make clear that if Aetna made a definitive offer for Coventry, the decision whether to initiate such a sales process would be made by Coventrys board, based on input from the boards advisors, the boards perspective on the value of Aetnas proposal, and other factors.
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the first sentence of the current sixth paragraph (the current fourth full paragraph on page 63) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
On May 2, 2012, Mr. Bertolini, Mr. Zubretsky, and Mr. Keim met with Mr. Wise, Mr. Giles, and Mr. Asher in New York in order to initiate a more formal dialogue relating to a potential business combination.
 
 
5
 
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the current seventh paragraph (the current fifth full paragraph on page 63) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
On May 16, 2012, Mr. Wise telephoned Mr. Bertolini, and Mr. Bertolini confirmed that Aetna anticipated making a proposal following discussion at its board meeting on May 18 and that he would call Mr. Wise following that board meeting. While Mr. Wise had previously updated certain members of Coventrys board of directors of his discussions with Mr. Bertolini and kept them apprised of events and developments in connection with those discussions, he had not presented such information to Coventrys board of directors as a whole at a formal meeting of the board. On May 17, 2012, during an executive session of a regularly scheduled in-person meeting of the Coventry board, Mr. Wise discussed with Coventrys full board of directors the details of the preliminary discussions with Mr. Bertolini and that Coventry would likely be receiving a proposal from Aetna in the following days. The Coventry board then scheduled a telephonic meeting for May 23, 2012, to discuss the terms of any proposal received. Following this meeting, the members of the Coventry board of directors reviewed background materials on Aetna and the managed care industry generally that had been prepared by Greenhill at the request of Coventrys management. During this meeting, some Coventry board members were in favor of hiring Greenhill, while others decided that they did not yet have sufficient information about Greenhill to make a decision to retain it as the boards financial advisor. As a result of the boards concerns, Mr. Wise later sent the Coventry board a list of potential candidates that could serve as the boards financial advisor if it considered a transaction. This list included Greenhill.
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the last sentence of the current ninth paragraph (the current first full paragraph on page 64) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
Mr. Bertolini advised that Aetna was not in a position to increase its proposal, and Mr. Wise and Mr. Bertolini agreed to terminate discussions between the companies about a potential transaction.
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the following paragraph is hereby added after the current ninth paragraph (the current first full paragraph on page 64):
In light of the parties agreement that discussions between Coventry and Aetna about a potential transaction had been terminated, on May 30, 2012, Mr. Jacobsen attended a meeting with certain Aetna executives. This meeting was scheduled as part of Greenhills customary practice of meeting with industry participants from time to time, and the purpose of the meeting was to discuss, among other things, industry trends and certain potential strategic opportunities for Aetna (other than a potential acquisition of Coventry).
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), in the current tenth paragraph (the current second full paragraph on page 64), the following words are hereby added following, whereby Coventrys shareholders received at least $42.00 per share:
, which, in Mr. Wises view, was a price that would be worthy of consideration by Coventrys board
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the current thirteenth paragraph (the current first full paragraph on page 65) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
After the board meeting, on July 11, 2012, Mr. Wise contacted Mr. Bertolini to inform him that the Coventry board had met and that he would be sending Mr. Bertolini a letter expressing the decision of Coventrys board, following which Mr. Wise sent Mr. Bertolini a letter noting the points decided at the special meeting of Coventrys board. During the July 11 phone call, Mr. Bertolini indicated that while Aetna was willing to proceed with a transaction at $42.00 per share, it was not willing to offer additional consideration.
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the current eighteenth paragraph (the current first full paragraph on page 66) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:
 
 
6
 
Later that day, Mr. Wise and Mrs. Tallett called Mr. Bertolini to communicate the Coventry board of directors message and request that Aetna provide additional value.  Mr. Wise and Mrs. Tallett initially inquired whether Aetna would be prepared to pay $43.00 per share.  Mr. Wise and Mrs. Tallett subsequently expressed the view that Aetna should be able to offer an additional $0.25-$0.50 per share in consideration.  Mr. Bertolini responded during this conversation that Aetna was unwilling to pay any more than $42.00 per share.
Under the caption Background of the Merger (starting on page 62), the current twenty-second paragraph (the paragraph currently running from page 66 to page 67) is hereby deleted and replaced with the following paragraphs:
On August 15 and 16, 2012, Coventrys board was scheduled to hold its regularly scheduled board and committee meetings in Jackson Hole, Wyoming. After conferring with Greenhill, Wachtell Lipton and Bass Berry on the night of August 14, 2012, concerning the status of the merger agreement negotiations, Mr. Wise, on the morning of August 15, 2012, proposed to Mr. Bertolini that he, together with other members of Aetnas senior management and representatives of Aetnas advisors, travel to Jackson Hole to participate in in-person meetings to resolve these remaining material items. Mr. Bertolini accepted the invitation, and he and other members of Aetnas senior management and representatives of Goldman Sachs and Davis Polk traveled to Jackson Hole on August 15, 2012. During the course of the Coventry board meetings in Jackson Hole that day, Coventrys advisors discussed with the board of directors the process of negotiation of the definitive merger agreement, particularly Aetnas and Coventrys positions with respect to the remaining material items. As part of these discussions, the Coventry board of directors once again emphasized its concern that Coventry stockholders receive certainty of completion of any transaction (including a significant commitment by any potential purchaser to seek antitrust and regulatory approval) and that the terms of any definitive agreement not be overly prohibitive to other, potentially competitive, business combination proposals. Coventry management and the Coventry board again reviewed the opportunities and challenges arising from a potential business combination (as well as the opportunities and challenges Coventry would face if it were to remain a stand-alone company), and together with Coventrys advisors also discussed Coventrys due diligence of Aetna, including, among other things, its financial resources to consummate a transaction, adequacy of reserves, and public relations and roll-out plans in the case that a transaction proceeded toward announcement. Also, during a subsequent portion of the meeting, Mr. Giles made a presentation to the board of directors regarding potential strategic alternatives for Coventry, including opportunities for Coventry to acquire managed care organizations and potential transactions involving the acquisition of Coventry by a strategic partner. With respect to the possibility that Coventry could be acquired, Mr. Giles presentation discussed three potential strategic partners: Aetna, Company A, and Company B. The presentation noted that Aetna and Company A may have had a need to increase scale within the government business, and that Company B may have had a need to further diversify into the commercial and Medicaid businesses, to pursue dual eligible opportunities. On the Pros side, the presentation noted that an acquisition of Coventry by Company A would give Company A the opportunity to nearly double commercial risk membership, make it the third largest publicly traded plan by membership, add national multisite capabilities, and add a national commercial network. On the Pros side for Company B, the presentation noted that an acquisition of Coventry by Company B would give Company B the opportunity to diversify away from what is essentially a Medicare only business, give Company B a commercial division and a Medicaid division, and provide Company B with the opportunity for better success with dual eligibles. On the Cons side, however, the presentation noted that Company As recent acquisition of another company could keep it on the sidelines from major deals in the near term and Company B had no real focus on certain business lines in which Coventry operated.
Later in the evening of August 15, 2012, after Mr. Bertolini and the other Aetna representatives and advisors had arrived in Jackson Hole, members of both companies senior management and representatives of their advisors engaged in extensive negotiations regarding the terms of a definitive merger agreement.
Proposal I:  The Merger:  Opinion of Coventrys Financial Advisor
The section of the Proxy Statement Proposal I:  The Merger:  Opinion of Coventrys Financial Advisor starting on page 73 of the Proxy Statement is hereby amended and supplemented as follows:
 
 
7
 
Under the caption Other Considerations (starting on page 82), the third paragraph (the current second full paragraph on page 83) is hereby amended by deleting clause (iii) of such paragraph and replacing it with the following:
(iii) services performed for Aetna in connection with Aetnas acquisition of Medicity Inc., completed January 2011, which services were rendered by certain of the same Greenhill personnel that later advised the Coventry board of directors in connection with the proposed transaction, and for which Aetna paid Greenhill a transaction fee of $4,000,000 and reimbursed certain of its out-of-pocket expenses.
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
 
This Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. You can generally identify forward-looking statements by the use of forward-looking terminology such as anticipate, believe, continue, could, estimate, expect, explore, evaluate, intend, may, might, plan, potential, predict, project, seek, should, or will, or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable terminology. These forward-looking statements are only predictions and involve known and unknown risks and uncertainties, many of which are beyond Aetnas and Coventrys control.
 
Statements in this document that are forward-looking, including the expected settlement of the Consolidated Delaware Action, are based on managements estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetnas and Coventrys control. Important risk factors could cause actual future events to differ materially from those currently expected by Aetnas management, including, but not limited to, the outcome of various litigation matters related to the proposed acquisition.
 
No assurances can be given that any of the events anticipated by the forward-looking statements will transpire or occur, or if any of them do occur, when they will occur and what impact they will have on the results of operations, financial condition or cash flows of Aetna or Coventry. Neither Aetna nor Coventry assumes any duty to update or revise forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, as of any future date.
 
Important Information For Investors And Stockholders
 
This communication does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval. Aetna has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ) a registration statement on Form S-4 (File No. 333-184041), including Amendment No. 1 thereto, containing a proxy statement/prospectus, and Coventry has filed with the SEC a proxy statement/prospectus, and each of Aetna and Coventry has filed and will file other documents with respect to the proposed acquisition of Coventry. The registration statement was declared effective on October 18, 2012, and Aetna and Coventry commenced mailing the definitive proxy statement/prospectus to Coventry stockholders on or about October 19, 2012. INVESTORS AND SECURITY HOLDERS OF COVENTRY ARE URGED TO READ THE DEFINITIVE PROXY STATEMENT/PROSPECTUS AND ANY OTHER DOCUMENTS THAT HAVE BEEN FILED OR WILL BE FILED WITH THE SEC CAREFULLY AND IN THEIR ENTIRETY BECAUSE THEY CONTAIN OR WILL CONTAIN IMPORTANT INFORMATION. Investors and security holders may obtain free copies of the registration statement and the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other documents filed with the SEC by Aetna or Coventry through the website maintained by the SEC at . Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Aetna will be available free of charge on Aetnas internet website at or by contacting Aetnas Investor Relations Department at 860-273-8204. Copies of the documents filed with the SEC by Coventry will be available free of charge on Coventrys internet website at or by contacting Coventrys Investor Relations Department at 301-581-5430.
SEC
http://www.sec.gov
http://www.aetna.com
http://www.cvty.com
 
Aetna, Coventry, their respective directors and certain of their executive officers may be considered participants in the solicitation of proxies in connection with the proposed transaction. Information about the directors and executive officers of Coventry is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which
was filed with the SEC on February 28, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 6, 2012, and its Current Report on Form 8-K, which was filed with the SEC on May 31, 2012. Information about the directors and executive officers of Aetna is set forth in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, which was filed with the SEC on February 24, 2012, its proxy statement for its 2012 annual meeting of shareholders, which was filed with the SEC on April 9, 2012 and its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012, which was filed with the SEC on October 25, 2012. Other information regarding the participants in the proxy solicitations and a description of their direct and indirect interests, by security holdings or otherwise, are contained in the definitive proxy statement/prospectus and other relevant materials filed with the SEC.
 
 
8
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Item 9.01  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(d) Exhibits
 
The following exhibits are filed as part of this Current Report:
 
 
 
9
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
AMENDMENT NO. 2 (this ) dated as of November 12, 2012 among Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (), Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a Delaware corporationand a wholly owned subsidiary of Parent (), and Coventry Health Care, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ).
Amendment
Parent
 
Merger Subsidiary
Company
 
 
 
WHEREAS, Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company entered into that certain Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of August 19, 2012 (as amended by Amendment No. 1 dated as of October 17, 2012 among Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company, the ); and
Merger Agreement
 
WHEREAS, Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company desire to amend certain provisions of the Merger Agreement as provided for in this Amendment.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing, and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company hereby agree as follows:
 
 
 
Section 1.01Section 6.03 of the Merger Agreement is amended to:
.  Amendment to Section 6.03.  
 
(a)      replace each reference to five calendar days or five calendar day period in subsection (e) thereof with a reference to two calendar days or two calendar day period, respectively; and
 
(b)      delete the following text from the first sentence of subsection (e) thereof: , except that such new notice period shall be for three Business Days (as opposed to five calendar days).
 
Section 1.02.Section 10.03 of the Merger Agreement is amended to replace the reference to $167,500,000 in subsection (a) thereof with a reference to $100,000,000.
Amendment to Section 10.03.  
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 2.01Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Amendment shall have the meaning assigned to such terms in the Merger Agreement.
.  Definitions.
 
Section 2.02. .  All notices, requests and other communications to any party to this Amendment shall be in writing (including facsimile transmission) and shall be given,
Notices
 
if to Parent or Merger Subsidiary, to:
 
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, Connecticut 06156
with
a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
 
Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP
450 Lexington Avenue
New York, New York 10017
 
if to the Company, to:
 
Coventry Health Care, Inc.
6270-B Rockledge Drive, Suite 700
Bethesda, Maryland 20817
with a copy (which shall not constitute notice) to:
 
Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz
51 West 52 Street
nd
New York, New York 10019
   
 
and
 
 
2
 
 
Bass, Berry & Sims PLC
150 Third Avenue South, Suite 2800
Nashville, Tennessee 37201
 
or to such other address or facsimile number as such party may hereafter specify for the purpose by notice to the other parties hereto.  All such notices, requests and other communications shall be deemed received on the date of receipt by the recipient thereof if received prior to 5:00 p.m. on a Business Day in the place of receipt.  Otherwise, any such notice, request or communication shall be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day in the place of receipt.
 
Section 2.03.  .  (a) Any provision of this Amendment may be amended or waived prior to the Effective Time if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed, in the case of an amendment, by each party to this Amendment, or, in the case of a waiver, by each party against whom the waiver is to be effective; that, after the Company Stockholder Approval has been obtained there shall be no amendment or waiver of this Amendment that would require the further approval of the stockholders of the Company under the Delaware Law without such approval having first been obtained.
Amendments and Waivers
provided
 
(b)      No failure or delay by any party in exercising any right, power or privilege hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof nor shall any single or partial exercise thereof preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege.  The rights and remedies herein provided shall be cumulative and not exclusive of any rights or remedies provided by Applicable Law.
 
Section 2.04.  .  Except as otherwise provided herein, all costs and expenses incurred in connection with this Amendment shall be paid by the party incurring such cost or expense.
Expenses
 
Section 2.05.  .  The provisions of this Amendment shall be binding upon and inure solely to the benefit of the parties hereto.  No party may assign, delegate or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations under this Amendment without the prior written consent of each other party hereto, except that Parent or Merger Subsidiary may transfer or assign its rights and obligations under this Amendment, in whole or from time to time in part, to (i) one or more of their Affiliates at any time and (ii) after the Effective Time, to any Person; that such transfer or assignment shall not relieve Parent or Merger Subsidiary of its obligations hereunder or enlarge, alter or change any obligation of any other party hereto or due to Parent or Merger Subsidiary.
Successors and Assigns
provided
 
 
3
 
 
Section 2.06.  .  This Amendment shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to the conflicts of law rules of such state.
Governing Law
 
Section 2.07.  .  Each of the parties hereto (i) irrevocably consents to the service of the summons and complaint and any other process in any action or proceeding relating to the transactions contemplated hereby, on behalf of itself or its property, in accordance with Section 2.02 or in such other manner as may be permitted by Applicable Law, of copies of such process to such party, and nothing in this Section 2.07 shall affect the right of any party to serve legal process in any other manner permitted by Applicable Law, (ii) irrevocably and unconditionally consents and submits itself and its property in any action or proceeding to the exclusive general jurisdiction of the Delaware Court of Chancery and any state appellate court therefrom within the State of Delaware (or, only if the Delaware Court of Chancery declines to accept jurisdiction over a particular matter, any state or federal court within the State of Delaware) in the event any dispute arises out of this Amendment or the transactions contemplated hereby, or for recognition and enforcement of any judgment in respect thereof, (iii) agrees that it shall not attempt to deny or defeat such personal jurisdiction by motion or other request for leave from any such court, (iv) agrees that any actions or proceedings arising in connection with this Amendment or the transactions contemplated hereby shall be brought, tried and determined only in the Delaware Court of Chancery (or, only if the Delaware Court of Chancery declines to accept jurisdiction over a particular matter, any state or federal court within the State of Delaware), (v) waives any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the venue of any such action or proceeding in any such court or that such action or proceeding was brought in an inconvenient court and agrees not to plead or claim the same and (vi) agrees that it shall not bring any action relating to this Amendment or the transactions contemplated hereby in any court other than the aforesaid courts.  Each of Parent, Merger Subsidiary and the Company agrees that a final judgment in any action or proceeding in such court as provided above shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by Applicable Law.
Jurisdiction/Venue
 
Section 2.08.  .  EACH PARTY ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT ANY CONTROVERSY WHICH MAY ARISE UNDER THIS AMENDMENT IS LIKELY TO INVOLVE COMPLICATED AND DIFFICULT ISSUES, AND THEREFORE EACH SUCH PARTY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY WAIVES ANY RIGHT SUCH PARTY MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AMENDMENT.  EACH PARTY CERTIFIES AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT (i) NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, 
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER, (ii) EACH PARTY UNDERSTANDS AND HAS CONSIDERED THE IMPLICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER, (iii) EACH PARTY MAKES THIS WAIVER VOLUNTARILY AND (iv) EACH PARTY HAS BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AMENDMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 2.08.
 
 
4
 
 
 
Section 2.09.  .  This Amendment may be signed in any number of counterparts, including by facsimile or by email with .pdf attachments, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.  This Amendment shall become effective when each party hereto shall have received a counterpart hereof signed and delivered (by electronic communication, facsimile or otherwise) by all of the other parties hereto.  Until and unless each party has received a counterpart hereof signed by the other parties hereto, this Amendment shall have no effect and no party shall have any right or obligation hereunder (whether by virtue of any other oral or written agreement or other communication).  Except as expressly amended herein, all other terms and conditions of the Merger Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.  The term Agreement as used in the Merger Agreement shall be deemed to refer to the Merger Agreement, as amended hereby.
Counterparts; Effectiveness
 
Section 2.10.If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Amendment is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other Governmental Authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Amendment shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated so long as the economic or legal substance of the transactions contemplated hereby is not affected in any manner materially adverse to any party.  Upon such a determination, the parties shall negotiate in good faith to modify this Amendment so as to effect the original intent of the parties as closely as possible in an acceptable manner in order that the transactions contemplated hereby be consummated as originally contemplated to the fullest extent possible.
  Severability.  
 
 
 
 
5
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Amendment to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121113160719.txt.gz
TIME:20121113160719
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On November 14, 2012, Aetna Inc. ("Aetna," "we," "us" or "our") expects to participate in presentations and meetings with investors and analysts, including a presentation by Joseph M. Zubretsky, Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna, at the Credit Suisse 2012 Healthcare Conference (the "Conference") in Phoenix, Arizona. During the presentation and these meetings, Aetna intends to disclose that, based on actual results and performance in October of 2012:
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 11:30 a.m. Eastern time on November 14, 2012. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor for 14 days. Website addresses are included for reference only. The information contained on Aetna's website is not part of this Form 8-K and is not incorporated by reference into this Form 8-K.
(1)
Operating earnings, operating earnings per share, projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains of $50.7 million ($77.6 million pretax), $23.0 million ($35.4 million pretax) related to the loss on early extinguishment of long-term debt, and $12.5 million ($13.8 million pretax) of transaction-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition, each reported by Aetna for the nine months ended September 30, 2012. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition), and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2012 reflect a range of approximately 344 million to 347 million weighted average diluted shares.
  
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION - Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, weighted average diluted shares, Commercial medical cost trend, pricing and forecasting assumptions, reserve adequacy and medical membership. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc.; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied; the risk that a regulatory approval of the acquisition is delayed, is not obtained or is subject to conditions that are not anticipated; our ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification both at the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, the pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to repeal, amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; the ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetna's "First Quarter 10-Q"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (Aetna's "Second Quarter 10-Q") and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 (together with Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q and Second Quarter 10-Q, Aetna's "Quarterly Reports"), each on file with the Securities and Exchange
Commission. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121207083541.txt.gz
TIME:20121207083541
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 8 - Other Events
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On December 6, 2012, Aetna Inc. (the Company, and together with its subsidiaries and affiliates, Aetna) entered into a settlement agreement to settle purported class action litigation regarding its practices related to the payment of claims for services rendered to Aetna members by health care providers with whom Aetna does not have a contract. The agreement resolves class action litigation filed on behalf of health plan members and health care providers. The first class action case was commenced on July 30, 2007, and the litigation is pending in the United States District Court for the District of New Jersey (the New Jersey Federal Court) under the caption
In re: Aetna UCR Litigation
, MDL No. 2020.
Under the terms of the proposed nationwide settlement, Aetna will be released from claims relating to its out-of-network reimbursement practices from the beginning of the applicable settlement class period through the date the New Jersey Federal Court preliminarily approves the settlement. The settlement class period for health plan members begins on March 1, 2001, and the settlement class period for health care providers begins on June 3, 2003. The agreement contains no admission of wrongdoing.
Under the settlement agreement, the Company will pay $60 million, the substantial majority of which will be payable upon final court approval of the settlement, and pay up to an additional $60 million at the end of a claim submission and validation period that commences upon final court approval of the settlement. These payments will fund claims submitted by health plan members who are members of the plaintiff class and health care providers who are members of the plaintiff class. These payments also will fund the legal fees of plaintiffs' counsel and the costs of administering the settlement, in each case in amounts to be determined by the New Jersey Federal Court.
The proposed settlement is subject to preliminary and final court approval. Final court approval of the settlement is expected in mid-2013 but could be delayed by appeals or other proceedings. In addition, the Company has the right to terminate the settlement agreement if more than certain percentages of class members elect to opt-out of the settlement.
In connection with the proposed settlement, the Company expects to record an after-tax charge to net income of approximately $78 million in the fourth quarter of 2012. This charge will be recorded as an "other item" and will not affect the Company's operating earnings. The Company will pay for the settlement with available resources and expects the settlement payments to occur over the next twelve to twenty-four months.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT -- Certain information in this Current Report on Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to the timing of final court approval of the settlement, the amount and timing of the charge relating to the proposed settlement and the timing of payments under the proposed settlement. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: obtaining court approval of the proposed settlement, the number of plaintiffs who opt-out of the proposed settlement and whether the proposed settlement is appealed.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20121211161222.txt.gz
TIME:20121211161222
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On December 12, 2012, Aetna Inc. (Aetna, we, us or our) will hold an investor conference (the Conference) in New York, New York. During the Conference, Aetna executives will discuss the company's strategy, performance and outlook, including reviewing business trends and specific initiatives related to its various business units. Aetna executives will also discuss the company's proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry). All of Aetna's projections, including operating earnings per share, exclude the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition unless specifically otherwise noted. At the Conference, Aetna management intends to disclose, among other things, that:
The Conference is scheduled to begin at 9 a.m. Eastern time on December 12, 2012. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to the presentation and to access the slides for the presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor for 14 days. Website addresses are included for reference only. The information contained on Aetna's website is not part of this Form 8-K and is not incorporated by reference into this Form 8-K.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, weighted average diluted shares, medical membership, revenue, Commercial medical cost trend, pricing and forecasting assumptions, reserve adequacy, benefit buy-downs, leap year impacts, and share repurchase activity. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition of Coventry; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfactory; the risk that a regulatory approval for the proposed acquisition is delayed, is not obtained or is subject to conditions that are not anticipated; our ability to achieve the synergies and the value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next six years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to repeal, amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payers, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop
and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetna's "First Quarter 10-Q"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (Aetna's "Second Quarter 10-Q"), and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 (together with Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q and Second Quarter 10-Q, Aetna's "Quarterly Reports"), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130107163513.txt.gz
TIME:20130107163513
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 8 and 9, 2013, Mark T. Bertolini, Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President of Aetna Inc. (Aetna, the Company, we, us or our) and other members of Aetna management will meet with investors and analysts before and after a presentation Mr. Bertolini will provide at the 2013 J.P. Morgan Healthcare Conference (the Conference) on January 8, 2013. During these meetings and presentation, we will discuss the Company's proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry). All of Aetna's projections, including operating earnings per share, exclude the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition unless specifically otherwise noted. Additionally, during these meetings and presentation, Aetna expects to reaffirm the following previously disclosed projections:
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 6:00 p.m. Eastern time (3:00 p.m. Pacific time). Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available on that web site for 14 days.
The paragraph entitled CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION and footnotes (1) and (2) in Item 7.01 of this current report, below, are incorporated herein by reference to this Item 2.02.
The information in this Item 2.02 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
The information above in Item 2.02 of this current report, other than the information as to Aetna's projected 2012 results of operations and financial condition, is hereby incorporated by reference in this Item 7.01. In addition, during the meetings and presentation referenced in Item 2.02, Aetna expects to reaffirm the following previously disclosed projections:
Aetna also will disclose during the meetings and presentation referenced in Item 2.02 that:
fourth quarter of 2012, and any additional other items that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2012 also exclude projected transaction and integration costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition and the charge related to the proposed litigation settlement), and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income or projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, weighted average diluted shares, medical membership, revenue, Commercial medical cost trend, pricing and forecasting assumptions, reserve adequacy, benefit buy-downs, and leap year impacts. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition of Coventry; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied; the risk that a regulatory approval for the proposed acquisition is delayed, is not obtained or is subject to conditions that are not anticipated; our ability to achieve the synergies and the value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care
reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payers, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetna's "First Quarter 10-Q"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (Aetna's "Second Quarter 10-Q"), and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 (together with Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q and Second Quarter 10-Q, Aetna's "Quarterly Reports"), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Item 7.01 shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130122090519.txt.gz
TIME:20130122090519
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 8 - Other Events
Item 8.01 - Other Events.
On January 22, 2013, Aetna Inc. ("Aetna") issued a press release announcing that it has agreed to sell it's Missouri Medicaid business, Missouri Care, Incorporated ("Missouri Care"), to WellCare Health Plans, Inc. The sale of Missouri Care is related to Aetna's proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry"). A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including Aetna's projection as to the closing date for the proposed Coventry transaction and Aetna's projections as to its employees joining WellCare, the receipt of service by Missouri Care members following the proposed sale of Missouri Care, and Aetna's operation of Health Care USA following completion of the proposed Coventry acquisition. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the timing to consummate the proposed Coventry and Missouri Care transactions; the risk that a condition to closing of either of the proposed acquisitions may not be satisfied; the risk that one of the applicable required regulatory approvals for either proposed transaction is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated; the outcome of pending or future litigation relating to either proposed transaction; Aetna's ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed Coventry transaction; Aetna's ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition- and/or divestiture-related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact Aetna's business operations and financial results, including Aetna's medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and Aetna will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of essential benefits, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect Aetna's business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit Aetna's ability to price for the risk it assumes and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in its pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing Aetna's potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); Aetna's ability to differentiate its products and solutions from those offered by its competitors, and demonstrate that its products lead to access to better quality of care by its members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; Aetna's ability to diversify its sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement Aetna's agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; Aetna's ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance its existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of Aetna's health information technology initiatives; Aetna's ability to successfully integrate its businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses Aetna may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key
talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of Aetna's payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from its social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services Aetna offers; Aetna's ability to maintain its relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell Aetna's products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in Aetna's financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K (Aetna's Annual Report), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (Aetna's Second Quarter 10-Q) and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 (together with Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q and Second Quarter 10-Q, Aetna's Quarterly Reports), each on file with the SEC. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
          

News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA TO SELL MISSOURI MEDICAID BUSINESS
HARTFORD, Conn., January 22, 2013
-Aetna (NYSE:
AET
) today announced that it has agreed to sell its Missouri Medicaid business, called Missouri Care, to WellCare Health Plans, Inc. (NYSE: WCG).
Financial terms were not disclosed.
The sale of Missouri Care, a MO HealthNet plan, is subject to customary closing conditions, including regulatory approval. Missouri Care provides managed care services to more than 100,000 members in Central, Eastern and Western Missouri.
Missouri Care CEO Pamela Johnson and employees dedicated to the Missouri Care business will join WellCare to help with the goal of ensuring uninterrupted service for members.
The sale of Missouri Care is related to Aetna's proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc., which operates a Missouri Medicaid plan called Health Care USA. A combination of Missouri Care and HealthCare USA would exceed permissible membership thresholds under Missouri Medicaid contracts. As previously disclosed, Aetna plans to operate HealthCare USA, with more than 250,000 members, when the Coventry acquisition is completed. Aetna continues to expect that the Coventry acquisition will be completed in mid-2013.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities, Medicaid health care management services and health information technology services. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and
hourly workers, health plans, health care providers, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see
www.aetna.com
.
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this press release that are forward-looking, including Aetna's projection as to the closing date for the proposed Coventry transaction and Aetna's projections as to its employees joining WellCare, the receipt of service by Missouri Care members following the proposed sale of Missouri Care, and Aetna's operation of HealthCare USA following completion of the proposed Coventry acquisition, are based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the timing to consummate the proposed Coventry and Missouri Care transactions; the risk that a condition to closing of either of the proposed acquisitions may not be satisfied; the risk that one of the applicable required regulatory approvals for either proposed transaction is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated; the outcome of pending or future litigation relating to either proposed transaction; Aetna's ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed Coventry transaction; Aetna's ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition- and/or divestiture-related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact Aetna's business operations and financial results, including Aetna's medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and Aetna will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of essential benefits, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend, or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect Aetna's business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit Aetna's ability to price for the risk it assumes and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in its pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing Aetna's potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); Aetna's ability to differentiate its products and solutions from those offered by its competitors, and demonstrate that its products lead to access to better quality of care by its members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; Aetna's ability to diversify its sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement Aetna's agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; Aetna's ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance its existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of Aetna's health information technology initiatives; Aetna's ability to successfully integrate its businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses Aetna may acquire in the future,
including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of Aetna's payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from its social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services Aetna offers; Aetna's ability to maintain its relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell Aetna's products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in Aetna's financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K (Aetna's Annual Report), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012 (Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012 (Aetna's Second Quarter 10-Q) and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012 (together with Aetna's First Quarter 10-Q and Second Quarter 10-Q, Aetna's Quarterly Reports), each on file with the SEC. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130131061639.txt.gz
TIME:20130131061639
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o 
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o 
 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
 
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On January 31, 2013, Aetna Inc. (Aetna or the Company) announced the following executive management changes:
 
-  Joseph M. Zubretsky, Senior Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief Enterprise Risk Officer, will take on additional business responsibilities.  Mr. Zubretsky will lead National Businesses, a new organization that includes the Companys large account Commercial administrative services contract business, its emerging businesses (including Accountable Care Solutions), its national network contracting and care management areas, its specialty products and enterprise strategy and corporate development.  Mr. Zubretsky will continue to report directly to Mark T. Bertolini, Aetnas Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President.
 
-  As part of the planned management transition, Shawn M. Guertin has been appointed Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief Enterprise Risk Officer effective February 25, 2013.  Mr. Guertin will succeed Mr. Zubretsky as Aetnas Chief Financial Officer and Chief Enterprise Risk Officer on that date.  Mr. Guertin will report directly to Mr. Bertolini.
 
-  Karen S. Rohan, Executive Vice President, will take on additional business responsibilities.  Ms. Rohan will lead Aetnas Local and Regional Businesses, a new organization that includes the Companys individual, small group and middle market businesses, its field organization, its local network strategy, its regional sales and distribution infrastructure and its Group businesses.  Ms. Rohan will continue to lead Aetnas integration efforts for its proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry).  Ms. Rohan will continue to report directly to Mr. Bertolini
 
Mr. Guertin, age 49, joined the Company in April, 2011, and has served as its Head of Business Segment Finance since that time.  Prior to joining Aetna, Mr. Guertin had served as a consultant to Coventry from January 1, 2010 to December 31, 2011, as an employee of Coventry from November 16, 2009 through December 31, 2009, and as Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of Coventry from March 2005 through November 16, 2009.
 
In connection with Mr. Guertins appointment, the Committee on Compensation and Organization of Aetnas Board of Directors increased Mr. Guertins base salary to $700,000 and set his annual bonus opportunity at target performance to be $700,000.  Mr. Guertin will also receive a 2013 long-term equity grant of Market Stock Units (MSUs) and Performance Stock Units (PSUs).  The MSUs will vest over three years and have a grant date value of $1,400,000.*  The PSUs will vest over two years and have a grant date value of $600,000.*
 
*  
Reflects the grant date fair value of the MSUs and PSUs to be granted.  The number of MSUs and PSUs to be granted will be determined using the closing price of Aetnas common shares on the grant date.  The number of MSUs also is based on a valuation factor that considers Aetnas dividend yield, the historical volatility in Aetnas common share price, the risk free interest rate and the vesting period of the MSUs.
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130131063010.txt.gz
TIME:20130131063010
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 31, 2013, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the fourth quarter and full-year ended December 31, 2012. A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA REPORTS
FOURTH
-QUARTER AND FULL-YEAR 2012 RESULTS
HARTFORD, Conn., 
January 31, 2013
- Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced
fourth
-quarter 2012 operating earnings
(1)
of $
317.0 million
, or
$.94
per share. Full-year 2012 operating earnings
(1)
were
$1.77 billion
, or
$5.13
per share. Net income for the
fourth
quarter of 2012 was
$190.1 million
, or
$.56
per share, and includes
$.44
per share of charges for other items, primarily a litigation-related settlement, offset by $
.06
per share of net realized capital gains. Full-year net income was
$1.66 billion
, or
$4.81
per share.
Aetna/
2
Aetna's solid fourth-quarter performance caps off an important year for the company. In 2012 we demonstrated the power of our diversified portfolio, advanced our mission to transform the health care marketplace and agreed to acquire Coventry Health Care, which will greatly enhance our long-term strategy, said Mark T. Bertolini, Aetna chairman, CEO and president. We are positioned well for 2013, with new commercial contract wins and a successful Medicare selling season across our entire portfolio of Medicare products.
Our Accountable Care Solutions business is making great progress on our strategy to transform the health care system, with five new accountable care agreements in the fourth quarter alone. Our relationships with leading health care providers now share a common set of goals -- to improve both the quality of care and patient experience, a
nd to reduce costs.
This new health care model drives additional membership growth, and will help to improve the quality and affordability of health care as we insure more Americans
, said Bertolini.
Aetna's 2012 results demonstrate our focus on operational and financial execution across all aspects of our business, said Joseph M. Zubretsky, Aetna senior executive vice president and CFO. We ended the year with strong growth in membership to more than 18.2 million medical members, increased revenues by approximately 6 percent over 2011 and reduced our business segment operating expense ratio. We continued to focus on capital management, raising our quarterly dividend by more than 14 percent and repurchasing $1.4 billion of Aetna's shares.
We believe our core business, supplemented by emerging businesses growth and effective capital deployment, will enable us to generate low double-digit operating earnings per share growth on average over time. Our expected completion of the Coventry Health Care acquisition this year will build upon our success and enhance our capabilities, said Zubretsky.
Aetna/
3
Total company results
Aetna/
4
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
Aetna/
5
Full-year 2012 operating earnings for Health Care were
$1.75 billion
, compared with
$1.96 billion
in 2011. The decrease in operating earnings was largely the result of lower underwriting margins in our Commercial business, which were partially offset by the favorable impact of higher underwriting margins in our Medicare business, in part the result of our 2011 acquisition of Genworth's Medicare Supplement business. Our underwriting margin in 2011 included approximately $207 million before-tax of favorable prior-years reserve development. There was no significant prior-years reserve development in 2012. Full-year 2012 net income was
$1.69 billion
, compared to
$1.95 billion
in 2011.
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Full-year 2012 operating earnings
(1)
for Group Insurance were
$161.5 million
, compared with
$153.0 million
in 2011. Full-year 2012 net income was
$176.3 million
, compared to
$181.8 million
in 2011.
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily for qualified pension plans, reported:
Aetna/
6
Full-year 2012 operating earnings
(1)
for Large Case Pensions were
$17.8 million
, compared with
$20.7 million
for 2011. The decrease is consistent with the run-off nature of this segment. Full-year net income was
$17.4 million
, compared to
$21.8 million
for 2011. Full year 2012 revenues
(2)
were
$503.6 million
compared with
$498.6 million
for 2011. Full-year 2012 Total Revenue, which includes group annuity contract conversion premium on an existing contract and net realized capital losses, was
$1.4 billion
compared to
$500.2 million
for 2011.
Aetna's conference call to discuss
fourth
-quarter 2012 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetna's Investor Information website.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 1-888-516-2447 or +1-719-325-2140 for
international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 6653248. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 1-888-203-1112, or +1-719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 6653248. Telephone replays will be available until 11 p.m. ET on February 7, 2013.
Aetna/
7
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities, Medicaid health care management services and health information technology services. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, health care providers, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
Aetna/
8
Aetna/
9
Aetna/
10
Aetna/
11
Aetna/
12
Aetna/
13
Aetna/
14
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
For the periods covered in this press release, the following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 9 through 11 and 13 of this press release.
(2)
Revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses, interest income on the proceeds of the transaction-related debt, and premium from a group annuity contract conversion, as noted in
(1)
above. Refer to the tables on pages 10, 11 and 13 of this press release for a reconciliation of revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses and these other items to total revenue calculated under GAAP.
(3)
All Aetna's projections, including operating earnings per share, exclude the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition and sale of Aetna's Missouri Medicaid business ("Missouri Care"), unless specifically otherwise noted. Projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Projected operating earnings per share also exclude projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition) and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2013 reflect approximately 328 million weighted average diluted shares.
(4)
The business segment operating expense ratio reflects the exclusion of the Corporate Financing segment from operating expenses and excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any. For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 11 of this press release.
(5)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetna's profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetna's pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetna's performance, including performance versus competitors.
(6)
Revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes. Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
Aetna/
15
(7)
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. Net loss of the Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt, the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (benefits), and the loss on the early extinguishment of long-term debt. As described in
(1)
above, operating earnings of the Corporate Financing segment exclude other items, if any. During 2012, Corporate Financing operating earnings exclude the loss on the early extinguishment of long-term debt and the interest expense components of transaction-related costs.
(8)
Represents members in consumer-directed health plans included in Aetna's Commercial medical membership.
(9)
Represents members in products that allow these members access to Aetna's dental provider network for a nominal fee.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share; weighted average diluted shares; the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition on our long-term strategy; our operating earnings per share growth rate; and the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition on us. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition of Coventry and proposed sale of Missouri Care; the risk that a condition to closing the proposed acquisition or proposed sale may not be satisfied; the risk that a regulatory approval for the proposed acquisition of Coventry or proposed sale of Missouri Care is delayed, is not obtained or is subject to conditions that are not anticipated; our ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition or sale related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, the scope of "essential benefits," employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); our ability to differentiate our products and solutions from those offered by our competitors, and demonstrate that our products lead to access to better quality of care by our members; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; adverse changes in size, product mix or medical cost experience of membership; our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings; adverse program, pricing or funding actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; the ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; the success of our health information technology initiatives; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including guaranty fund assessments and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell
Aetna/
16
our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; and a downgrade in our financial ratings. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2011 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's 2011 Annual Report"), Aetna's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended March 31, 2012, June 30, 2012 and September 30, 2012 (together Aetna's "Quarterly Reports"), each on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC). You also should read Aetna's 2011 Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Reports on file with the SEC and Aetna's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130225070932.txt.gz
TIME:20130225070932
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On February 25, 2013, Shawn M. Guertin, Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna Inc. ("Aetna," "we," "us" or "our"), and other members of Aetna management will meet with investors and analysts before and after a presentation Mr. Guertin will provide at the 2013 Citi Global Healthcare Conference (the "Conference") in New York, New York. During these meetings and presentation, we will discuss the Company's performance and outlook, including the proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry). All of Aetna's projections, including operating earnings per share, exclude the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition unless otherwise specifically noted. Additionally, during the presentation and these meetings, Aetna expects to reaffirm the following previously disclosed projections:
Aetna also expects to disclose during the presentation and these meetings that as of February 21, 2013, Aetna had received 20 out of the 21 state approvals for the proposed Coventry acquisition. The proposed acquisition is currently projected to close in mid-2013 and remains subject to customary closing conditions, including expiration of the federal Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 waiting period and approvals of a state department of insurance and other regulators.
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 10:20 a.m. Eastern time on February 25, 2013. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor for 14 days. Website addresses are included for reference only. The information contained on Aetna's website is not part of this Form 8-K and is not incorporated by reference into this Form 8-K.
(1)
Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition), and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2013 reflect approximately 328 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
Projected revenue for the full year 2013 excludes any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from total revenue. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition) and therefore cannot reconcile projected revenue to projected total revenue or to a projected change in total revenue in any period.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, weighted average diluted shares, Commercial medical cost trend,
pricing and forecasting assumptions, reserve adequacy, medical membership, revenues and the closing date for the proposed Coventry acquisition. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition of Coventry and proposed sale of Missouri Care; the risk that a condition to closing the proposed acquisition or proposed sale may not be satisfied; the risk that a regulatory approval for the proposed acquisition of Coventry or proposed sale of Missouri Care is delayed, is not obtained or is subject to conditions that are not anticipated; our ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition or sale related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our pricing and medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings (including by expanding our foreign operations), transform our business model and optimize our business platforms; the success of our Accountable Care Solutions and health information technology initiatives; adverse changes in size, product or geographic mix or medical cost experience of membership; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; failure to adequately implement Health Care Reform; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including audits, challenges to our minimum MLR rebate methodology and/or reports, guaranty fund assessments, intellectual property litigation and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); our ability to manage health care and other benefit costs; adverse program, pricing, funding or audit actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; our ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; a downgrade in our financial ratings; our ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to demonstrate that our products lead to access to quality care by our members; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; and the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's 2012 Annual Report") on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's 2012 Annual Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130312161809.txt.gz
TIME:20130312161809
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On March 12 and 13, 2013, Joseph M. Zubretsky, Senior Executive Vice President and Head of National Businesses of Aetna Inc. (Aetna, we, us or our), and other members of Aetna management will meet with investors and analysts before and after a presentation Mr. Zubretsky will provide at the 2013 Barclays Global Healthcare Conference (the "Conference") in Miami, Florida. During these meetings and presentation, we will discuss the Company's performance and outlook, including the proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry). All of Aetna's projections, including operating earnings per share, exclude the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition unless otherwise specifically noted. Additionally, during the presentation and these meetings, Aetna expects to reaffirm the following previously disclosed projections:
Aetna also expects to disclose during the presentation and these meetings that as of March 11, 2013, Aetna had received 20 out of the 21 state approvals for the proposed Coventry acquisition. The proposed acquisition is currently projected to close in mid-2013 and remains subject to customary closing conditions, including expiration of the federal Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976 waiting period and approvals of a state department of insurance and other regulators.
Aetna's presentation at the Conference is scheduled to begin at 10:15 a.m. Eastern time on March 13, 2013. Investors, analysts and the general public are invited to listen to this presentation over the Internet via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor. A webcast replay will be available via Aetna's Investor Information link at www.aetna.com/investor for 14 days. Website addresses are included for reference only. The information contained on Aetna's website is not part of this Form 8-K and is not incorporated by reference into this Form 8-K.
(1)
Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition), and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2013 reflect approximately 328 million weighted average diluted shares.
(2)
Projected revenue for the full year 2013 excludes any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, from total revenue. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition) and therefore cannot reconcile projected revenue to projected total revenue or to a projected change in total revenue in any period.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share, weighted average diluted shares, Commercial medical cost trend, pricing and forecasting assumptions, reserve adequacy, medical membership, revenues and the closing date for the proposed Coventry acquisition. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond Aetna's control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition of Coventry and proposed sale of Missouri Care; the risk that a condition to closing the proposed acquisition or proposed sale may not be satisfied; the risk that a regulatory approval for the proposed acquisition of Coventry or proposed sale of Missouri Care is delayed, is not obtained or is subject to conditions that are not anticipated; our ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition or sale related issues; and changes in Aetna's future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our pricing and medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings (including by expanding our foreign operations), transform our business model and optimize our business platforms; the success of our Accountable Care Solutions and health information technology initiatives; adverse changes in size, product or geographic mix or medical cost experience of membership; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; failure to adequately implement Health Care Reform; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including audits, challenges to our minimum MLR rebate methodology and/or reports, guaranty fund assessments, intellectual property litigation and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); our ability to manage health care and other benefit costs; adverse program, pricing, funding or audit actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; our ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; a downgrade in our financial ratings; our ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to demonstrate that our products lead to access to quality care by our members; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; and the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's 2012 Annual Report") on file with the Securities
and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's 2012 Annual Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, and shall not be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any Aetna filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130327162300.txt.gz
TIME:20130327162300
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 1 - Registrant's Business and Operations
Item 1.01 Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On March 27, 2013, the maturity date of and the commitments under Aetna Inc.s (Aetnas) Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the Credit Agreement) were extended by one year. The Credit Agreement will now expire on March 27, 2018. JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. is the administrative agent under the Credit Agreement.
A copy of Aetnas request for extension is filed as Exhibit 99.1 hereto. Copies of the acceptance of Aetnas request for extension by each lender under the Credit Agreement are filed as Exhibits 99.2 through 99.21 hereto. A copy of the notice of closing confirming the effectiveness of the extension of the maturity date of and the commitments under the Credit Agreement is filed as Exhibit 99.22 hereto. Each of those Exhibits is hereby incorporated in this Item 1.01 by reference.
The administrative agent and certain of the lender parties to the Credit Agreement perform normal banking, investment banking and/or advisory services for Aetna and its affiliates from time to time for which they have received customary fees and expenses.
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information in Item 1.01 of this current report is hereby incorporated by reference into this Item 2.03.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
    
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
February 8, 2013
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
as Administrative Agent under the Credit
Agreement referred to below
Loan and Agency Services Group
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, TX 77002
Attention: Sharon Craft
Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Terms used but not defined herein have the meanings assigned to them in the Credit Agreement.
Pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, the Company hereby requests that the Lenders agree to extend the Maturity Date from March 27, 2017 to March 27, 2018 and extend the Commitments for an additional period of one year. This notice is being provided to the Administrative Agent in accordance with Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, and the Company understands that the Administrative Agent will notify each of the Lenders of this notice.
AETNA INC.,
By:
/s/ Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.
Name: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.
Title: Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
                        

Exhibit 99.2
February 22, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
J.P. Morgan Chase Bank, N.A.,
by:
/s/ Dawn Lee Lum
,
Name: Dawn Lee Lum
Title: Executive Director

Exhibit 99.3
February 14, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
BANK OF AMERICA, N.A.,
by:
/s/ Yinghua Zhang
,
Name: Yinghua Zhang
Title: Vice President

Exhibit 99.4
February 19, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
Citibank, N.A.,
by:
/s/ Maureen Maroney
,
Name: Maureen Maroney
Title: Vice President

Exhibit 99.5
February 21, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
U.S. Bank, National Association
by:
/s/ Joseph M Schnorr
,
Name: Joseph M Schnorr
Title: Senior Vice President
Copies to:
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: General Counsel
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent under the Credit
Agreement referred to below
Loan and Agency Services Group
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, TX 77002
Attention: Sharon Craft
JP Morgan Chase Bank, N.A.
10420 Highland Manor Drive
4th Floor
Tampa, FL 33610
Attention: Stephen Carew

Exhibit 99.6
February 25, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
by:
/s/ Grainne Pergolini
,
Name: Grainne Pergolini
Title: Director

Exhibit 99.7
February 25, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
BARCLAYS BANK PLC
,
by:
/s/ Diane Rolfe
,
Name: DIANE ROLFE
Title: DIRECTOR

Exhibit 99.8
February 21, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
Credit Suisse AG, Cayman Islands Branch
,
by:
/s/ Ari Bruger
,
Name: Ari Bruger
Title: Vice President
by:
1
/s/ Tyler R. Smith
,
Name: Tyler R. Smith
Title: Associate
____________________________________
1
For any institution requiring a second signature line.

Exhibit 99.9
February 25, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
Goldman Sachs Bank USA,
by:
/s/ Mark Walton
,
Name: Mark Walton
Title: Authorized Signatory

Exhibit 99.10
February 21, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
Morgan Stanley Bank, N.A.,
by:
/s/ Kelly Chin
,
Name: Kelly Chin
Title: Authorized Signatory

Exhibit 99.11
February 19, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
SunTrust Bank
,
by:
/s/ Elizabeth Greene
,
Name: Elizabeth Greene
Title: Director

Exhibit 99.12
February 22, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
THE BANK OF TOKYO-MITSUBISHI
UFJ, LTD.
by:
/s/ Glenn Schuermann
,
Name: Glenn Schuermann
Title: Vice President
Copies to:
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: General Counsel
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent under the Credit
Agreement referred to below
Loan and Agency Services Group
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, TX 77002
Attention: Sharon Craft
JP Morgan Chase Bank, N.A.
10420 Highland Manor Drive
4th Floor
Tampa, FL 33610
Attention: Stephen Carew

Exhibit 99.13
February 22, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
THE ROYAL BANK OF SCOTLAND PLC
,
by:
/s/ William McGinty
,
Name: William McGinty
Title: Director

Exhibit 99.14
February 22, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
UBS LOAN FINANCE LLC
,
by:
/s/ Lana Gifas
,
Name: Lana Gifas
Title: Director
by:
/s/ Joselin Fernandes
,
Name: Joselin Fernandes
Title: Associate Director
Copies to:
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: General Counsel
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent under the Credit
Agreement referred to below
Loan and Agency Services Group
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, TX 77002
Attention: Sharon Craft
JP Morgan Chase Bank, N.A.
10420 Highland Manor Drive
4th Floor
Tampa, FL 33610
Attention: Stephen Carew

Exhibit 99.15
February 20, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
FIFTH THIRD BANK
,
by:
/s/ Joshua N. Livingston
,
Name: Joshua N. Livingston
Title: Duly Authorized Signatory

Exhibit 99.16
February 25, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
PNC Bank, National Association
,
by:
/s/ Gustavus A. Bahr
,
Name: Gustavus A. Bahr
Title: Senior Vice President
by:
1
______________________,
Name:
Title:
Copies to:
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: General Counsel
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent under the Credit
Agreement referred to below
Loan and Agency Services Group
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, TX 77002
Attention: Sharon Craft
JP Morgan Chase Bank, N.A.
10420 Highland Manor Drive
4th Floor
Tampa, FL 33610
Attention: Stephen Carew
____________________________________
1
For any institution requiring a second signature line.

Exhibit 99.17
February 25, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
State Street Bank and Trust Company,
by:
/s/ Kimberly R. Costa
,
Name: Kimberly R. Costa
Title: Vice President
by:
1
______________________,
Name:
Title:
Copies to:
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: General Counsel
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent under the Credit
Agreement referred to below
Loan and Agency Services Group
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, TX 77002
Attention: Sharon Craft
JP Morgan Chase Bank, N.A.
10420 Highland Manor Drive
4th Floor
Tampa, FL 33610
Attention: Stephen Carew
____________________________________
1
For any institution requiring a second signature line.

Exhibit 99.18
February 25, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018 provided that (a) the undersigned Lender receives, on or prior to February 25, 2013, a fee in an amount equal to the product or (i) the higher of (x) 2 basis points and (y) the percentage paid to any other Lender whole Commitment is equal to or less than the Commitment of the undersigned Lender, multiplied by (ii) the amount of the undersigned
Lender's Commitment and (b) on or prior to February 25, 2013 the extension of the Maturity Date referred to above is approved by the requisite percentage of the Lenders as is required pursuant to the Credit Agreement.
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON,
by:
/s/ Jeffrey R. Dickson
,
Name: Jeffrey R. Dickson
Title: Managing Director
Copies to:
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: General Counsel
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as Administrative Agent under the Credit
Agreement referred to below
Loan and Agency Services Group
1111 Fannin, 10th Floor
Houston, TX 77002
Attention: Sharon Craft
JP Morgan Chase Bank, N.A.
10420 Highland Manor Drive
4th Floor
Tampa, FL 33610
Attention: Stephen Carew

Exhibit 99.19
February 14, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
UMB BANK, N.A.
by:
/s/ Kurt Kastendick
,
Name: Kurt Kastendick
Title: Senior Vice President

Exhibit 99.20
February 25, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
HSBC Bank USA, National Association,
by:
/s/ Jody Feldman
,
Name: Jody Feldman
Title: Director

Exhibit 99.21
February 25, 2013
Aetna Inc.
151 Farmington Avenue, RE2T
Hartford, CT 06156
Attention: Alfred P. Quirk, Jr.,
Vice President, Finance and Treasurer
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor
New York, New York 10179
Attention: Dawn Lee Lum
Acceptance of Maturity Date Extension Request
Reference is made to the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Credit Agreement.
The undersigned Lender has received the Borrower's Maturity Date Extension Request dated February 8, 2013, and, pursuant to Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement, hereby agrees to the extension of the Maturity Date to March 27, 2018.
Name of Institution:
Webster Bank, National Association
,
by:
/s/ Lawrence Davis
,
Name: Lawrence Davis
Title: Vice President

Exhibit 99.22
Aetna Inc.
Five-Year Credit Agreement
March 27, 2013
Reference is made to (i) the Five-Year Credit Agreement dated as of March 27, 2012, as amended as of September 24, 2012 (the 
Credit Agreement
), among Aetna Inc. (the 
Company
), the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
), the syndication and documentation agents party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent (the 
Administrative Agent
) and (ii) the Maturity Date Extension Request (the 
Extension Request
) dated February 8, 2013 pursuant to which the Company requested that the Lenders extend the Maturity Date of and the Commitments under the Credit Agreement until March 27, 2018 in accordance with Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meaning assigned to them in the Credit Agreement.
We are pleased to inform you that documents responsive to the requirements of Section 2.08(d) of the Credit Agreement have been received. Accordingly the Administrative Agent hereby notifies you that the Extension Request has become effective as of March 27, 2013 and that the Maturity Date with respect to all Lenders is now March 27, 2018.
We thank you for assisting the Company in completing this important transaction.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130402165656.txt.gz
TIME:20130402165656
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On April 1, 2013, Aetna Inc. ("Aetna") issued a press release announcing that it has completed the sale of its Missouri Medicaid business, Missouri Care, Incorporated ("Missouri Care"), to WellCare Health Plans, Inc. The sale of Missouri Care was completed on March 31, 2013 and is related to Aetna's proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. ("Coventry"). A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projection as to the closing date for the proposed Coventry transaction and our operation of Health Care USA following completion of the proposed Coventry acquisition. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond our control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the timing to consummate the proposed Coventry transaction; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied; the risk that one of the applicable required regulatory approvals for the proposed transaction is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated; the outcome of pending or future litigation relating to the proposed transaction; the diversion of management time on acquisition- and/or divestiture-related issues; and changes in our future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our pricing and medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings (including by expanding our foreign operations), transform our business model and optimize our business platforms; the success of our Accountable Care Solutions and health information technology initiatives; adverse changes in size, product or geographic mix or medical cost experience of membership; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; failure to adequately implement Health Care Reform; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including audits, challenges to our minimum MLR rebate methodology and/or reports, guaranty fund assessments, intellectual property litigation and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); our ability to manage health care and other benefit costs; adverse program, pricing, funding or audit actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; our ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; a downgrade in our financial ratings; our ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to demonstrate that our products lead to access to quality care by our members; our ability to ma
intain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; and the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's 2012 Annual Report") on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's 2012 Annual Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
          

Exhibit 99.1
News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA COMPLETES SALE OF MISSOURI MEDICAID BUSINESS
HARTFORD, Conn., April 1, 2013
- Aetna (NYSE:
AET
) today announced that it has completed the sale of its Missouri Medicaid business, called Missouri Care, to WellCare Health Plans, Inc. (NYSE: WCG). Financial terms were not disclosed.
As previously announced, the sale of Missouri Care is related to Aetna's proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc., which operates a Missouri Medicaid plan called HealthCare USA. Aetna plans to operate HealthCare USA when the Coventry acquisition is completed. Aetna continues to expect that the Coventry acquisition will be completed in mid-2013.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 37.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities, Medicaid health care management services and health information technology services. Our customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, health care providers, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see
www.aetna.com
.
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this press release that are forward-looking, including our projection as to the closing date for the proposed Coventry transaction and our operation of HealthCare USA following completion of the proposed Coventry acquisition, are based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections, and are subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond our control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management,
Aetna/
2
including, but not limited to: the timing to consummate the proposed Coventry transaction; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied; the risk that one of the applicable required regulatory approvals for the proposed transaction is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated; the outcome of pending or future litigation relating to the proposed transaction; the diversion of management time on acquisition- and/or divestiture-related issues; and changes in our future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our pricing and medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings (including by expanding our foreign operations), transform our business model and optimize our business platforms; the success of our Accountable Care Solutions and health information technology initiatives; adverse changes in size, product or geographic mix or medical cost experience of membership; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; failure to adequately implement Health Care Reform; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including audits, challenges to our minimum MLR rebate methodology and/or reports, guaranty fund assessments, intellectual property litigation and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); our ability to manage health care and other benefit costs; adverse program, pricing, funding or audit actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; our ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; a downgrade in our financial ratings; our ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to demonstrate that our products lead to access to quality care by our members; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; and the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's 2012 Annual Report") on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's 2012 Annual Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130430063538.txt.gz
TIME:20130430063538
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2 - Financial Information
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On April 30, 2013, Aetna Inc. issued a press release announcing results for the quarter ended March 31, 2013. A copy of that press release is furnished herewith as Exhibit 99.1 and hereby incorporated in this Item 2.02 by reference.
The information in this Form 8-K shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (as amended, the Exchange Act) or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that Section, nor shall it be or be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Exchange Act, regardless of any general incorporation language in such filing.
Section 9 - Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
          

News Release
_________________________________________________________
AETNA REPORTS
FIRST
-QUARTER 2013 RESULTS
HARTFORD, Conn., 
April 30, 2013
- Aetna (NYSE: AET) today announced
first
-quarter 2013 operating earnings
(1)
of $
495.4 million
, or
$1.50
per share, a per share increase of 12 percent over the first quarter of 2012. Net income
(2)
for the
first
quarter of 2013 was
$490.1 million
, or
$1.48
per share, and includes $.08 per share of transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc., offset by $
.06
per share of net realized capital gains.
Aetna/
2
Aetna's strong first-quarter results demonstrate the strength of our diversified business model, said Mark T. Bertolini, Aetna chairman, CEO and president. Operating revenues increased for the company, and we grew membership for the fourth consecutive quarter fueled by strong growth in our Medicare business. We also introduced Healthagen, a new business brand that combines our population health management solutions and health information technologies to help improve care quality, costs and patient engagement.
Looking ahead to the remainder of 2013, we continue to expect solid operating performance and project that medical membership will increase to 18.4 million by year end. Based on our results, we now project our 2013 operating earnings will be $5.50 to $5.60 per share, up from our previous projection of at least $5.40 per share. Membership and earnings will also increase following the closing of the Coventry acquisition," said Bertolini.
Aetna's first-quarter results demonstrate that our businesses are growing and performing well, said Shawn M. Guertin, Aetna senior vice president and CFO. Year-over-year, we grew operating earnings per share by 12 percent, increased operating revenues by more than 7 percent, and improved our operating expense ratio. During the quarter we continued to aggressively deploy capital to create shareholder value, repurchasing $184 million of Aetna's shares and paying a dividend totaling $66 million. Our operating cash flow generation was excellent.
Our core business is executing well, and we are well-positioned for the Coventry integration. Our Accountable Care Solutions business continues to work to transform the network model, improve our cost structure and drive additional membership growth. Our capital generation remains strong, and is expected to be stronger once we close the Coventry acquisition, said Guertin.
Total company results
Aetna/
3
Health Care business results
Health Care, which provides a full range of insured and self-insured medical, pharmacy, dental and behavioral health products and services, reported:
Aetna/
4
The improvement in our Commercial MBR is primarily due to the impact of increased favorable development of prior-years' health care cost estimates in 2013.
Group Insurance business results
Group Insurance, which includes group life, disability and long-term care products, reported:
Large Case Pensions business results
Large Case Pensions, which manages a variety of discontinued and other retirement and savings products, primarily for qualified pension plans, reported:
Aetna/
5
Aetna's conference call to discuss
first
-quarter 2013 results will begin at 8:30 a.m. ET today. The public may access the conference call through a live audio webcast available on Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com. Financial, statistical and other information, including GAAP reconciliations, related to the conference call also will be available on Aetna's Investor Information website.
The conference call also can be accessed by dialing 1-877-856-1965 or +1-719-325-4794 for
international callers. The company suggests participants dial in approximately 10 minutes before the call. The access code is 6144177. Individuals who dial in will be asked to identify themselves and their affiliations.
A replay of the call may be accessed through Aetna's Investor Information link on the Internet at www.aetna.com or by dialing 1-888-203-1112, or +1-719-457-0820 for international callers. The replay access code is 6144177. Telephone replays will be available until 11 p.m. ET on May 14, 2013.
About Aetna
Aetna is one of the nation's leading diversified health care benefits companies, serving approximately 38.3 million people with information and resources to help them make better informed decisions about their health care. Aetna offers a broad range of traditional, voluntary and consumer-directed health insurance products and related services, including medical, pharmacy, dental, behavioral health, group life and disability plans, and medical management capabilities, Medicaid health care management services, workers' compensation administrative services and health information technology services. Aetna's customers include employer groups, individuals, college students, part-time and hourly workers, health plans, health care providers, governmental units, government-sponsored plans, labor groups and expatriates. For more information, see www.aetna.com.
Aetna/
6
Aetna/
7
Aetna/
8
Aetna/
9
Aetna/
10
Aetna/
11
Aetna/
12
(1)
Operating earnings and operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes.
For the periods covered in this press release, the following items are excluded from operating earnings because we believe they neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance:
For a reconciliation of these items to financial measures calculated under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), refer to the tables on pages 7 through 9 and 11 of this press release.
(2)
Net Income refers to net income attributable to Aetna reported in the GAAP Consolidated Statements of Income. Unless otherwise indicated, all references in this press release to operating earnings, operating earnings per share, net income, and net income per share are based upon net income attributable to Aetna, which exclude amounts attributable to non-controlling interests.
(3)
Operating revenue excludes net realized capital gains and losses and interest income on the proceeds of the transaction-related debt as noted in
(1)
above. Refer to the tables on pages 8, 9 and 11 of this press release for a reconciliation of operating revenue excluding net realized capital gains and losses and an other item to total revenue calculated under GAAP.
(4)
All Aetna's projections, including operating earnings per share, exclude the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition unless specifically otherwise noted. Projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Projected operating earnings per share also exclude projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains and losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the proposed Coventry acquisition) and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2013 assume approximately 328 million weighted average diluted shares.
(5)
The operating expense ratio excludes net realized capital gains and losses and other items, if any. For a reconciliation of this metric to the comparable GAAP measure refer to page 9 of this press release.
(6)
In order to provide useful information regarding Aetna's profitability on a basis comparable to others in the industry, without regard to financing decisions, income taxes or amortization of other acquired intangible assets (each of which may vary for reasons not directly related to the performance of the underlying business), Aetna's pretax operating margin is based on operating earnings excluding interest expense, income taxes and amortization of other acquired intangible assets. Management also uses pretax operating margin to assess Aetna's performance, including performance versus competitors.
(7)
Operating revenue and operating expense information is presented before income taxes. Operating earnings is presented net of income taxes.
(8)
Our Corporate Financing segment is not a business segment. It is added to our business segments to reconcile to our consolidated results. Net loss of the Corporate Financing segment includes interest expense on our outstanding debt and the financing components of our pension and other postretirement benefit plan expenses (benefits). As described in
(1)
above, operating earnings of the Corporate Financing segment exclude other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. During the first quarter of 2013, Corporate Financing operating earnings excluded the interest expense components of transaction-related costs.
Aetna/
13
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- -- Certain information in this press release is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share; weighted average diluted shares; 2013 operating performance; year-end 2013 medical membership; and the impact of the proposed Coventry acquisition on our membership, earnings and capital generation. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond our control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the timing to consummate the proposed acquisition of Coventry; the risk that a condition to closing of the proposed acquisition may not be satisfied; the risk that one of the applicable required regulatory approvals for the proposed acquisition is delayed, is not obtained or is obtained subject to conditions that are not anticipated; the outcome of pending or future litigation relating to the proposed transaction; our ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the proposed acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's business; the diversion of management time on acquisition- and/or divestiture-related issues; and changes in our future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our pricing and medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings (including by expanding our foreign operations), transform our business model and optimize our business platforms; the success of our Healthagen
SM
, Accountable Care Solutions and health information technology initiatives; adverse changes in size, product or geographic mix or medical cost experience of membership; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; failure to adequately implement Health Care Reform; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including audits, challenges to our minimum MLR rebate methodology and/or reports, guaranty fund assessments, intellectual property litigation and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future, including Coventry) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or re-contracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); our ability to manage health care and other benefit costs; adverse program, pricing, funding or audit actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; our ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; a downgrade in our financial ratings; our ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to demonstrate that our products lead to access to quality care by our members; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; and the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report") on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the SEC). You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 when filed with the SEC for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130507162544.txt.gz
TIME:20130507162544
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
Section 1  Registrants Business and Operations
Item 1.01.  Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On May 7, 2013, in connection with the completion of Aetna Inc.s () previously announced acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (), Aetna, Coventry and U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee (the ) entered into a First Supplemental Indenture (the ) to the Indenture, dated as of January 28, 2005 (the ), between Coventry and the Trustee.  The Supplemental Indenture became effective upon the completion of Aetnas acquisition of Coventry.  Pursuant to the Supplemental Indenture, Aetna guaranteed the full and punctual payment of all amounts payable under the 6.125% senior notes due 2015 issued pursuant to the Indenture (the ) and the full and punctual payment of all other amounts payable by Coventry to the holders of Notes or the Trustee under the Indenture.
Aetnas
Coventry
Trustee
Supplemental Indenture
Indenture
Notes
On May 6, 2013, the aggregate principal amount outstanding with respect to the Notes was approximately $229 million.  The Notes accrue interest at a rate of 6.125% per year.  Interest is payable semi-annually on January 15 and July 15 of each year, and interest payments commenced on July 15, 2005. The Notes will mature on January 15, 2015.
The foregoing summary of the Indenture, as amended by the Supplemental Indenture, does not purport to be complete and is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by, the full text of the Indenture and the Supplemental Indenture, which are attached as Exhibits 4.1 and 4.2 hereto, respectively, and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.01.  Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets.
On May 3, 2013, Aetna announced that the United States Department of Justice had cleared Aetnas proposed acquisition of Coventry.
On May 7, 2013, Aetna completed its acquisition of Coventry.  Pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of August 19, 2012, by and among Aetna, Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna (), and Coventry (as previously amended, the ), Merger Sub merged with and into Coventry (the ), with Coventry continuing as the surviving corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Aetna.
Merger Sub
Merger Agreement
Merger
At the effective time of the Merger (the ), each share of outstanding common stock of Coventry (including restricted shares, but not including shares held by Coventry as treasury stock) was converted into the right to receive $27.30 in cash, without interest, and 0.3885 of an Aetna common share.  Additionally, substantially all of Coventrys outstanding stock options, performance share units and restricted stock units (all such awards, collectively, the ) were, pursuant to their terms, vested or became vested upon the Effective Time and were cancelled and converted into the right to receive cash.
Effective Time
Outstanding Awards
In connection with the Merger, Aetna issued approximately 52.2 million common shares and paid an aggregate of approximately $3.8 billion in cash to former Coventry stockholders and Outstanding Award holders in exchange for their shares of Coventry common stock and Outstanding Awards, resulting in aggregate merger consideration to Coventrys former stockholders of approximately $6.9 billion.  Aetna funded the cash portion of the purchase price through a combination of existing cash on hand and proceeds from the issuance of debt and commercial paper.
At the Effective Time, the estimated aggregate fair value of Coventrys long-term debt, including the Notes, was approximately $1.8 billion.
The foregoing summary of the Merger Agreement and the transactions contemplated thereby does not purport to be complete and is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by, the full text of the Merger Agreement, including Amendment No. 1 to the Merger Agreement and Amendment No. 2 to the Merger Agreement, which are attached as Exhibit 2.1 to Aetnas Current Reports on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 22, 2012, October 22, 2012, and November 13, 2012, respectively, and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 2.03.  Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information provided in Item 1.01 to this Current Report is hereby incorporated in this Item 2.03 by reference.
The trustee of, or holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of, the Notes then outstanding may declare to be immediately due and payable the principal amount of all the Notes then outstanding, plus accrued but unpaid
 
 
 
 
 
interest on the Notes, if specified events of default occur and are continuing.  Events of default include, with certain specified qualifications, the following events: the failure to make payment of interest on the Notes when due and payable; the failure to pay the principal of, or premium if any, on, any of the Notes when due and payable at its stated maturity, upon acceleration, required repurchase or otherwise; a default in the performance of, or breaches of other provisions of, the Indenture; upon cross-acceleration of greater than $20.0 million of certain other indebtedness that results in acceleration of the maturity of such indebtedness or upon judgment default of greater than $20.0 million; and certain events of bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization relating to Coventry or any significant subsidiary of Coventry (in which case the principal amount of the Notes then outstanding, plus accrued but unpaid interest on the Notes will become immediately due and payable without any act on the part of the trustee or any holder of the Notes).  In addition, within 30 days of a change of control (as defined in the Indenture) of Coventry, each holder of Notes has the right to require Coventry to repurchase all or any part of such holders Note at a purchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued but unpaid interest on such Notes to the purchase date.
The foregoing summary of the Indenture, as amended by the Supplemental Indenture, does not purport to be complete and is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by, the full text of the Indenture and the Supplemental Indenture, which are attached as Exhibits 4.1 and 4.2 hereto, respectively, and incorporated herein by reference.
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01.  Other Events.
The Coventry acquisition builds on Aetnas existing resources and capabilities, and increases Aetnas mix of business in higher-growth Government programs.  As a result of the Merger, Aetna has added approximately 3.7 million medical members and 1.5 million Medicare Part D members; Aetnas Medicaid business has grown from 1.1 million to more than 2 million members; and Aetnas Medicaid footprint has expanded from 12 to 16 states.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(a)  Financial statements of businesses acquired.
The historical financial statements required by Item 9.01(a) of Form 8-K will be filed by amendment no later than 71 days after this Current Report on Form 8-K is required to be filed.
(b)  Pro forma financial information.
The pro forma financial statements required by Item 9.01(b) of Form 8-K will be filed by amendment no later than 71 days after this Current Report on Form 8-K is required to be filed.
(d)  Exhibits.
* The schedules and exhibits have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K. Aetna agrees to furnish supplementally a copy of such schedules and exhibits, or any section thereof, to the SEC upon request.
 
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 4.2
 
EXECUTION VERSION
 
 
 
FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE (this ), dated as of May 7, 2013, among Coventry Health Care, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ), Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation (the ), and U.S. Bank National Association, a national banking association, as successor to Wachovia Bank, National Association, as trustee (the ).  All capitalized terms used herein but not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the Indenture (as defined below).
Supplemental Indenture
Company
Guarantor
Trustee
WHEREAS, the Company and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered an indenture, dated as of January 28, 2005 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, the ), providing for the issuance of the Companys 6 % Senior Notes due 2015 (the );
Indenture
Notes
WHEREAS, the Company has issued the Notes pursuant to the Indenture;
WHEREAS, Section 4.03 of the Indenture provides, among other things, that the Company shall furnish to the Trustee and the holders of Notes, whether or not required by the Commission, the annual reports, quarterly reports and current reports that the Company would be required to file with the Commission on Form 10-K, 10-Q and 8-K if the Company were required to file such reports;
WHEREAS, pursuant to an Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of August 19, 2012 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, the ), by and among the Company, the Guarantor and Jaguar Merger Subsidiary, Inc. (), Merger Sub will be merged with and into the Company, with the Company continuing as the surviving corporation (the , and the time at which the Merger becomes effective, the  );
Merger Agreement
Merger Sub
Merger
Merger
Effective Time
WHEREAS, in connection with the Merger, the Company will become a wholly owned subsidiary of the Guarantor, will cease to be a reporting company under the Exchange Act and will cease to have an obligation, other than pursuant to the Indenture, to file reports with the Commission pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act;
WHEREAS, as of the Merger Effective Time, the Guarantor desires (and represents it has received authority of its Board of Directors) to (i) fully and unconditionally guarantee all payment obligations of the Company with respect to the Notes on the terms set forth herein and (ii) assume the reporting obligations set forth in Section 4.03 of the Indenture in lieu of the Company;
 
 
 
 
 
WHEREAS, Section 9.01 of the Indenture provides, among other things, that, without the consent of any Holder, the Company and the Trustee may amend or supplement the Indenture or the Notes in certain respects, including, without limitation, to (i) add Guarantees (as defined in the Indenture) with respect to the Notes and (ii) make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of the Holders; and
WHEREAS, the Company and Guarantor have requested that the Trustee execute and deliver this Supplemental Indenture pursuant to Section 9.01 of the Indenture.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing Recitals (made solely by the Company and the Guarantor) and the mutual agreements, provisions and covenants contained herein, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Company, the Guarantor and the Trustee agree as follows:
 
 
 
 
The Guarantor agrees that:
 
Section 1.01Subject to the provisions of this Article 1, the Guarantor hereby fully and unconditionally guarantees the full and punctual payment (whether at maturity, upon acceleration, upon redemption or otherwise) of the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest on, and all other amounts payable under, the Notes, and the full and punctual payment of all other amounts payable by the Company to the Holders or the Trustee under the Indenture (the ).  Upon the failure by the Company to pay punctually any such amount, the Guarantor shall forthwith on demand pay the amount not so paid at the place and in the manner specified in the Indenture.
.  The Guarantee.  
Guarantee
 
Section 1.02The Guarantee shall be unconditional and absolute and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, shall not be released, discharged or otherwise affected by:
.  Guarantee Unconditional.  
 
(a)      any extension, renewal, settlement, compromise, waiver or release in respect of any obligation of the Company under the Indenture or the Notes, by operation of law or otherwise;
 
(b)      any modification or amendment of or supplement to the Indenture or the Notes (other than a modification, amendment or supplement effected in
 
 
2
 
 
accordance with the terms of the Indenture which expressly releases, discharges or otherwise affects the Guarantee);
 
(c)      any change in the corporate existence, structure or ownership of the Company, or any insolvency, bankruptcy, reorganization or other similar proceeding affecting the Company or its assets or any resulting release or discharge of any obligation of the Company contained in the Indenture or the Notes;
 
(d)      the existence of any claim, set-off or other right that the Guarantor may have at any time against the Company, the Trustee or any other Person, whether in connection with the Indenture or an unrelated transaction, that nothing herein prevents the assertion of any such claim by separate suit or compulsory counterclaim;
provided
 
(e)      any invalidity, irregularity or unenforceability relating to, or against the Company for any reason of, the Indenture or the Notes, or any provision of applicable law or regulation purporting to prohibit the payment by the Company of the principal of or interest on the Notes or any other amount payable by the Company under the Indenture; or
 
(f)      any other act or omission to act or delay of any kind by the Company, the Trustee or any other Person or any other circumstance whatsoever which might, but for the provisions of this Section 1.02, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of or defense to the Guarantors obligations hereunder (other than an act contemplated by the parenthetical in Section 1.02(b) above).
 
Section 1.03Subject to Section 1.08, the Guarantee shall remain in full force and effect until the principal of (and premium, if any) and interest on, and all other amounts payable under, the Notes, and all other amounts payable by the Company to the Holders or the Trustee under the Indenture have been paid in full.  If at any time any payment of the principal of (or premium, if any) or interest on, or any other amounts payable under, the Notes or any other amount payable by the Company to the Holders or the Trustee under the Indenture is rescinded or must be otherwise restored or returned upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of the Company or otherwise, the Guarantee with respect to such payment shall be reinstated as though such payment had been due but not made at such time.
.  Discharge Only Upon Payment in Full; Reinstatement in Certain Circumstances.  
 
Section 1.04The Guarantor irrevocably waives acceptance hereof, presentment, demand, protest and any notice not provided for herein, as well as any requirement that at any time any action be taken by any Person against the Company or any other Person.
.  Waiver by the Guarantor.  
 
 
 
3
 
 
Section 1.05The Guarantor agrees that, until the indefeasible payment and satisfaction in full in cash of all applicable obligations under the Notes, the Guarantee and the Indenture, the Guarantor shall waive any claim and shall not exercise any right or remedy, direct or indirect, arising by reason of any performance by it of the Guarantee, whether by subrogation or otherwise, against the Company.
.  Subrogation.  
 
Section 1.06If acceleration of the time for payment of any amount payable by the Company to the Holders under the Indenture or the Notes is stayed upon the insolvency, bankruptcy or reorganization of the Company, all such amounts otherwise subject to acceleration under the terms of the Indenture are nonetheless payable by the Guarantor hereunder forthwith on demand by the Trustee or the Holders.
.  Stay of Acceleration.  
 
Section 1.07The Guarantor acknowledges that the Guarantee shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding the absence on any Note of a notation relating to the Guarantee.
.  Notation of Guarantee Not Required.  
 
Section 1.08The Guarantors obligations under the Guarantee shall terminate upon (a) satisfaction and discharge of the Indenture pursuant to Article 10 of the Indenture or (b) Legal Defeasance or Covenant Defeasance pursuant to Article 8 of the Indenture.
.  Release of Guarantor.  
 
Upon delivery by the Company to the Trustee of an Officers Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel to the foregoing effect and reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee, the Trustee shall execute any documents reasonably required in order to evidence the release of the Guarantor pursuant to this Section 1.08 from its obligations under the Guarantee.
 
Section 1.09The Guarantor acknowledges that it will receive direct and indirect benefits from the financing arrangements contemplated by the Indenture and that the guarantee and waivers made by the Guarantor pursuant to the Guarantee are knowingly made in contemplation of such benefits.
.  Benefits Acknowledged.  
 
 
 
Section 2.01Section 1.01 of the Indenture is hereby amended by (i) inserting the following definition in its appropriate alphabetical placement therein:
.  Amendment of Section 1.01 of the Indenture.  
 
Guarantor means Aetna Inc., a Pennsylvania corporation.
 
 
4
 
 
and (ii) amending and restating the last sentence of the definition of Guarantee to provide that:
 
The term Guarantors shall mean Guarantor and any other Persons Guaranteeing any obligation.
 
Section 2.02Section 4.02(c) of the Indenture is hereby amended and restated to read in its entirety as follows:
.   Amendment of Section 4.02(c) of the Indenture.  
 
(c) The Company hereby designates the Trustee c/o U.S. Bank National Association, 1021 East Cary Street, 18th Floor, Richmond, VA  23219, as one such office, drop facility or agency of the Company in accordance with Section 2.03.
 
Section 2.03Section 4.03 of the Indenture is hereby amended and restated to read in its entirety as follows:
.  Amendment of Section 4.03 of the Indenture.  
 
Section 4.03. Commission Reports.
 
Whether or not required by the Commission, so long as any Notes are outstanding, the Guarantor shall furnish to the Trustee and the Holders of Notes, within the time periods specified in the Commissions rules and regulations:
 
(a) all quarterly and annual reports that would be required to be filed with the Commission on Forms 10-Q and 10-K if the Guarantor were required to file such reports, including a Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations and, with respect to the annual information only, a report on the annual financial statements by the Guarantors independent registered public accountants; and
 
(b) all current reports that would be required to be filed with the Commission on Form 8-K if the Guarantor were required to file such reports.
 
All such reports shall be prepared in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Commission applicable to such reports.
 
In addition, following the consummation of the merger of a subsidiary of the Guarantor with and into the Company (the Merger), whether or not required by the Commission, the Guarantor shall file a copy of all of the information and reports referred to in clauses (a) and (b) above with the Commission for public availability within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and regulations (unless the
 
 
5
 
 
Commission will not accept such a filing) and make such information available to securities analysts and prospective investors upon request. The Guarantors reporting obligations with respect to clauses (a) and (b) above shall be deemed satisfied in the event the Guarantor files such reports with the Commission on EDGAR (or any successor to EDGAR) and delivers a copy of such reports to the Trustee.
 
If, at any time after consummation of the Merger, the Guarantor is no longer subject to the periodic reporting requirements of the Exchange Act for any reason, the Guarantor shall nevertheless continue filing the reports specified in the preceding paragraphs with the Commission, within the time periods specified above unless the Commission will not accept such a filing. The Guarantor agrees that it will not take any action for the sole purpose of causing the Commission not to accept any such filings. If, notwithstanding the foregoing, the Commission will not accept the Guarantors filings for any reason, the Guarantor shall post such reports on its website within the time periods that would apply if the Guarantor were required to file those reports with the Commission.
 
Section 2.04Section 4.04(b) of the Indenture is hereby amended and restated to read in its entirety as follows:
.  Amendment of Section 4.04(b) of the Indenture.  
 
(b) So long as not contrary to the then current recommendations of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, the year-end financial statements delivered to the Trustee pursuant to Section 4.03 above shall be accompanied by a written statement of the Guarantors independent registered public accountants (who shall be a firm of established national reputation) that in making the examination necessary for certification of such financial statements, nothing has come to their attention that would lead them to believe that the Company or the Guarantor has violated any provisions of Articles 4 or 5 hereof applicable to it or, if any such violation has occurred, specifying the nature and period of existence thereof, it being understood that such accountants shall not be liable directly or indirectly to any Person for any failure to obtain knowledge of any such violation.
 
Section 2.05Section 4.07 of the Indenture is hereby amended and restated to read in its entirety as follows:
.  Amendment of Section 4.07 of the Indenture.  
 
Section 4.07. Corporate Existence.
 
Subject to Article 5 hereof, the Company shall do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve and keep in full force and effect (i) its corporate existence, and the corporate, partnership or other existence of
 
 
 
6
 
 
each of its Significant Subsidiaries, in accordance with the respective organizational documents (as the same may be amended from time to time) of the Company or any such Significant Subsidiary and (ii) the rights (charter and statutory), licenses and franchises of the Company and its Significant Subsidiaries; provided, however, that (A) nothing herein shall prevent the Company from effecting a conversion of its legal form from a corporation to a limited liability company if the Board of Directors shall determine that such conversion is not adverse in any material respect to the Holders of the Notes and (B) the Company shall not be required to preserve any such right, license or franchise, or the corporate, partnership or other existence of any of its Significant Subsidiaries, if the Board of Directors shall determine that the preservation thereof is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Company and its Restricted Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, and that the loss thereof is not adverse in any material respect to the Holders of the Notes.
 
Section 2.06.Section 11.02 of the Indenture is hereby amended by replacing the address for the Trustee provided therein with the following address:
  Amendment of Section 11.02 of the Indenture.  
 
U.S. Bank National Association
1021 East Cary Street, 18 Floor
th
Richmond, VA 23219
Telecopier No.: (804) 343-1566
Attention: Corporation Trust Dept.
 
 
 
Section 3.01Notwithstanding anything to the contrary elsewhere herein, this Supplemental Indenture shall become effective only as of, and shall become effective as of, the Merger Effective Time.  Promptly after the Merger Effective Time, the Company shall provide notice thereof to the Trustee.  If the Guarantor notifies the Trustee in writing that the Merger Effective Time will not occur, then the provisions hereof shall not become effective.  Upon the effectiveness of this Supplemental Indenture, the Indenture shall be and be deemed to be modified and amended in accordance herewith and the respective rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities under the Indenture of the Trustee, the Company and the Holders affected thereby shall hereafter be determined, exercised and enforced hereunder subject in all respects to such modifications and amendments, and all the terms and conditions of this Supplemental Indenture shall be and be deemed to be part of the terms and conditions of the Indenture for any and all purposes, subject to Section 3.08 hereof.
.  Effectiveness of Supplemental Indenture.
 
 
7
 
 
Section 3.02Except as amended and supplemented hereby, all provisions in the Indenture shall remain in full force and effect.
.  Indenture Remains in Full Force and Effect.  
 
Section 3.03.    If there is any conflict or inconsistency between the Indenture and this Supplemental Indenture, the provisions of this Supplemental Indenture shall control.
Supplemental Indenture Controls.
 
Section 3.04No past, present or future director, officer, employee, incorporator or shareholder of the Guarantor or any successor of the Guarantor shall have any liability by reason of his, her or its status as such under or upon any obligation, covenant or agreement of the Guarantor contained in this Supplemental Indenture, the Indenture or the Notes, or because of any indebtedness evidenced thereby, all such liability being expressly waived and released by the acceptance of the Guarantee and as part of the consideration for the making of the Guarantee.
.  No Recourse Against Others.  
 
Section 3.05(a) Any notice, demand, direction, request or other document that is required or permitted by any provision of this Supplemental Indenture or the Indenture to be given or made by the Trustee or by the Holders to or upon the Guarantor shall be given or made by postage-prepaid, first-class mail addressed (until another address of the Guarantor is filed by the Guarantor with the Trustee) to Aetna Inc. at 151 Farmington Avenue, RC6A, Hartford, Connecticut 06156, attention: General Counsel.
.  Notices and Demands.  
 
(b)      Any notice, demand, direction, request or other document that is required or permitted by any provision of this Supplemental Indenture or the Indenture to be given or made by the Guarantor to or upon the Trustee or the Holders shall be given or made in accordance with Section 11.02 of the Indenture.  As of the date of this Supplemental Indenture, the address for any such notice, demand, direction, request or other document to be given or made to or upon the Trustee is U.S. Bank National Association, 1021 East Cary Street, 18 Floor, Richmond, VA 23219, attention: Corporate Trust Dept.
th
 
Section 3.06Nothing in this Supplemental Indenture, express or implied, shall give or be construed to give to any Person, other than the parties hereto, any Paying Agent, any Registrar, any successors to the foregoing hereunder and the Holders, any benefit or any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under the Indenture or this Supplemental Indenture.
.  Benefits of Supplemental Indenture.  
 
Section 3.07All covenants and agreements in this Supplemental Indenture made by the Company, the Guarantor or the Trustee shall bind their respective successors and assigns, whether so expressed or not, subject to Section 3.08 hereof.
.  Successors and Assigns.  
 
 
8
 
 
Section 3.08If any provision of this Supplemental Indenture shall be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby, and no Holder shall have any claim therefor against any party hereto.
.  Severability.  
 
SECTION 3.09THIS SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE AND THE RIGHTS AND DUTIES OF THE PARTIES HEREUNDER SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAW OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK (WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO ANY PROVISION THEREOF RELATING TO CONFLICTS OF LAWS PRINCIPLES THAT WOULD APPLY THE LAWS OF ANOTHER JURISDICTION), EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT THE TRUST INDENTURE ACT IS APPLICABLE.
.  
GOVERNING LAW.  
 
Section 3.10This Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall be an original, with the same effect as if the signatures thereto and hereto were upon the same instrument.
.  Counterparts.  
 
Section 3.11The Article and Section headings herein are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction hereof.
.  Headings.  
 
Section 3.12For the avoidance of doubt, the Guarantor shall not be bound by any obligations or covenants under the Indenture except as set forth in this Supplemental Indenture or as otherwise required by the Trust Indenture Act.
.  Obligations Under Indenture.  
 
 
9
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed as of the day and year first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
[]
Signature Page to Supplemental Indenture


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130515083321.txt.gz
TIME:20130515083321
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On May 15, 2013, Thomas F. Cowhey, Vice President and Head of Investor Relations of Aetna Inc. (Aetna, we, us or our), and other members of Aetna management will meet with investors and analysts before and after a presentation Mr. Cowhey will provide at the Bank of America Merrill Lynch 2013 Health Care Conference (the Conference) in Las Vegas, Nevada on that day. During these meetings and presentation, we expect to reaffirm our previously disclosed projections for 2013, including projected full-year 2013 operating earnings per share of $5.70 to $5.85.
 
(1)
(1)
Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains of $19.3 million ($30.3 million pretax) and transaction and integration-related costs of $24.6 million ($37.1 million pretax) reported by Aetna for the three months ended March 31, 2013. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Projected operating earnings and operating earnings per share also exclude projected transaction and integration-related costs related to our acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry). The interest expense and general and administrative expenses associated with the permanent financing of the acquisition of Coventry will be included in operating earnings and operating earnings per share going forward now that the closing of the acquisition is complete. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the Coventry acquisition), and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to net income or projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2013 reflect 362 - 363 million weighted average diluted shares.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond our control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the outcome of pending or future litigation relating to the Coventry transaction; our ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the Coventry acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition- and/or integration-related issues; and changes in our future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our pricing and medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings (including by expanding our foreign operations), transform our business model and optimize our business platforms; the success of our Healthagen
SM
, Accountable Care Solutions and health information technology initiatives; adverse changes in size, product or geographic mix or medical cost experience of
membership; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; failure to adequately implement Health Care Reform; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including audits, challenges to our minimum MLR rebate methodology and/or reports, guaranty fund assessments, intellectual property litigation and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Coventry, Medicity, Prodigy Health Group, PayFlex, and Genworth Financial Inc.'s Medicare Supplement business and other businesses we may acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or recontracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); our ability to manage health care and other benefit costs; adverse program, pricing, funding or audit actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; our ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; a downgrade in our financial ratings; our ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to demonstrate that our products lead to access to quality care by our members; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; and the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 (Aetna's Quarterly Report), and Coventry's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013, each on file with the Securities Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130522161225.txt.gz
TIME:20130522161225
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 5 - Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
Aetna Inc.'s ("Aetna's" or the "Company's") Annual Meeting of Shareholders was held on May 17, 2013. Shareholders voted on the matters set forth below.
1. Election of Director nominees. Each of the nominees listed below was elected as a Director of Aetna until the next Annual Meeting and until their successors are duly elected and qualified based on the following votes:
2. The proposal to approve the appointment of KPMG LLP as the Company's and its subsidiaries' independent registered public accounting firm for 2013 was approved based on the following votes:
3. The proposal to approve the proposed amendment to the Amended Aetna Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan to increase the number of shares authorized to be issued under the Plan was approved based on the following votes:
4. The proposal to approve the Company's executive compensation on a non-binding advisory basis was approved based on the following votes:
5. A shareholder proposal requesting that the Company's Board of Directors (the "Board") adopt a policy that the Chair of the Board be an independent director was not approved based on the following votes:
6. A shareholder proposal requesting that the Board take the steps necessary to implement simple majority voting in each voting requirement in the Company's charter and bylaws was approved based on the following votes:
7. A shareholder proposal requesting that the Board amend the Company's political contributions policy to expand Board oversight over the Company's political expenditures was not approved based on the following votes:
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AET/AET-8K-20130529162106.txt.gz
TIME:20130529162106
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 OR 15(d) of The Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Aetna Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7 - Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On May 30, 2013, Shawn M. Guertin, Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Aetna Inc. (Aetna, we, us or our), and other members of Aetna management will meet with investors and analysts before and after a presentation Mr. Guertin will provide at the Deutsche Bank 38
th
Annual Health Care Conference (the Conference) in Boston, Massachusetts on that day. During these meetings and presentation, we expect to reaffirm projected full-year 2013 operating earnings per share of $5.70 to $5.85.
 
(1)
(1)
Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share exclude from net income net realized capital gains of $19.3 million ($30.3 million pretax) and transaction and integration-related costs of $24.6 million ($37.1 million pretax) reported by Aetna for the three months ended March 31, 2013. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share also exclude from net income any future net realized capital gains or losses and other items, if any, that neither relate to the ordinary course of our business nor reflect our underlying business performance. Projected operating earnings and projected operating earnings per share also exclude projected transaction and integration-related costs related to our acquisition of Coventry Health Care, Inc. (Coventry). The interest expense and general and administrative expenses associated with the permanent financing of the acquisition of Coventry will be included in operating earnings and operating earnings per share going forward now that the closing of the acquisition is complete. Aetna is not able to project the amount of future net realized capital gains or losses or any such other items (other than projected transaction and integration-related costs related to the Coventry acquisition), and therefore cannot reconcile projected operating earnings to projected net income or projected operating earnings per share to projected net income per share in any period. Although the excluded items may recur, management believes that operating earnings and operating earnings per share provide a more useful comparison of Aetna's underlying business performance from period to period. Net realized capital gains and losses arise from various types of transactions, primarily in the course of managing a portfolio of assets that support the payment of liabilities. However, these transactions do not directly relate to the underwriting or servicing of products for customers and are not directly related to the core performance of Aetna's business operations. In addition, management uses operating earnings to assess business performance and to make decisions regarding Aetna's operations and allocation of resources among Aetna's businesses. Operating earnings is also the measure reported to the Chief Executive Officer for these purposes. Projected operating earnings per share for the full year 2013 reflect 362 - 363 million weighted average diluted shares.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT; ADDITIONAL INFORMATION -- Certain information in this Form 8-K is forward-looking, including our projections as to operating earnings per share and weighted average diluted shares. Forward-looking information is based on management's estimates, assumptions and projections and is subject to significant uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond our control. Important risk factors could cause actual future results and other future events to differ materially from those currently estimated by management, including, but not limited to: the implementation of health care reform legislation; the outcome of pending or future litigation relating to the Coventry transaction; our ability to achieve the synergies and value creation contemplated by the Coventry acquisition; our ability to promptly and effectively integrate Coventry's businesses; the diversion of management time on acquisition- and/or integration-related issues; and changes in our future cash requirements, capital requirements, results of operations, financial condition and/or cash flows. Health care reform will significantly impact our business operations and financial results, including our pricing and medical benefit ratios. Components of the legislation will be phased in over the next several years, and we will be required to dedicate material resources and incur material expenses during that time to implement health care reform. Many significant parts of the legislation, including health insurance exchanges, Medicaid expansion, employer penalties and the implementation of minimum medical loss ratios, require further guidance and clarification at both the federal level and/or in the form of regulations and actions by state legislatures to implement the law. In addition, pending efforts in the U.S. Congress to amend or restrict funding for various aspects of health care reform, and the possibility of additional litigation challenging aspects of the law continue to create additional uncertainty about the ultimate impact of health care reform. As a result, many of the impacts of health care reform will not be known for the next several years. Other important risk factors include: adverse changes in health care reform and/or other federal or state government policies or regulations as a result of health care reform or otherwise (including legislative, judicial or regulatory measures that would affect our business model, restrict funding for or amend various aspects of health care reform, limit our ability to price for the risk we assume and/or reflect reasonable costs or profits in our pricing, such as mandated minimum medical benefit ratios, eliminate or reduce ERISA pre-emption of state laws (increasing our potential litigation exposure) or mandate coverage of certain health benefits); adverse and less predictable economic conditions in the U.S. and abroad (including unanticipated levels of, or increases in the rate of, unemployment); our ability to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings (including by expanding our foreign operations), transform our business model and optimize our business platforms; the success of our Healthagen
SM
, Accountable Care Solutions and health information technology initiatives; adverse changes in size, product or geographic mix or medical cost experience of
membership; managing executive succession and key talent retention, recruitment and development; failure to achieve and/or delays in achieving desired rate increases and/or profitable membership growth due to regulatory review or other regulatory restrictions, the difficult economy and/or significant competition, especially in key geographic areas where membership is concentrated, including successful protests of business awarded to us; failure to adequately implement Health Care Reform; reputational issues arising from our social media activities, data security breaches, other cybersecurity risks or other causes; the outcome of various litigation and regulatory matters, including audits, challenges to our minimum MLR rebate methodology and/or reports, guaranty fund assessments, intellectual property litigation and litigation concerning, and ongoing reviews by various regulatory authorities of, certain of our payment practices with respect to out-of-network providers and/or life insurance policies; our ability to integrate, simplify, and enhance our existing information technology systems and platforms to keep pace with changing customer and regulatory needs; our ability to successfully integrate our businesses (including Coventry and other businesses we may acquire in the future) and implement multiple strategic and operational initiatives simultaneously; unanticipated increases in medical costs (including increased intensity or medical utilization as a result of flu, increased COBRA participation rates or otherwise; changes in membership mix to higher cost or lower-premium products or membership-adverse selection; increases resulting from unfavorable changes in contracting or recontracting with providers, and increased pharmacy costs); our ability to manage health care and other benefit costs; adverse program, pricing, funding or audit actions by federal or state government payors, including as a result of sequestration and/or curtailment or elimination of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' star rating bonus payments; our ability to reduce administrative expenses while maintaining targeted levels of service and operating performance; a downgrade in our financial ratings; our ability to develop and maintain relations with providers while taking actions to reduce medical costs and/or expand the services we offer; our ability to demonstrate that our products lead to access to quality care by our members; our ability to maintain our relationships with third party brokers, consultants and agents who sell our products; increases in medical costs or Group Insurance claims resulting from any epidemics, acts of terrorism or other extreme events; changes in medical cost estimates due to the necessary extensive judgment that is used in the medical cost estimation process, the considerable variability inherent in such estimates, and the sensitivity of such estimates to changes in medical claims payment patterns and changes in medical cost trends; and the ability to successfully implement our agreement with CVS Caremark Corporation on a timely basis and in a cost-efficient manner and to achieve projected operating efficiencies for the agreement. For more discussion of important risk factors that may materially affect Aetna, please see the risk factors contained in Aetna's 2012 Annual Report on Form 10-K ("Aetna's Annual Report"), Aetna's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013 (Aetna's Quarterly Report), and Coventry's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2013, each on file with the Securities Exchange Commission. You also should read Aetna's Annual Report and Aetna's Quarterly Report for a discussion of Aetna's historical results of operations and financial condition.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
